HAT3000 training results

85 iterations of 345M from vanilla on HAT3000_submissions.txt

gpt2.generate(sess,
              length=250,
              temperature=1.0,
              prefix="Break off.\n\n",
              nsamples=5,
              batch_size=5
              )

(default top_k is 0)
These are human-selected for completeness and interestingness.

Umbrella: 12 1/2" crochet hook and heavy yarn. (2 strands of yarn made.) Attach Large so that whole day has plenty of room for reseating while stretching into a cone when assembled. Fold wires to form a hollow in center. Fold right front of hat and bring the center to level height of wire, then across front of hat."

Crochet Cap Pattern #3615,
"Crown ... Ch 2, sl st in 2nd st from hook, * ch 2, sl st in 3rd st from hook, * ch 4, sl st in 5th st from hook, * ch 2, sl st in 8th st from hook, ch 1, ch 2 in next st. Join, ch 1.

Brim ... Ch 2, 2 d c in 1 st, ch 2, sl st in 1st st of each row, * ch 2, 2 d c in next st, ch 2, 2 d c in same st, ch 2, (ch2, 2 d c in next st) twice.



BAND: With black s, ch 10, turn.

ROUND: Ch 2, sc in each ch across.

SECTION: * 1 sc in each sc across to nearest ch; 1 sc in each sc across to nearest dc.

BAND DECRIM: Ch 1, sc in each sc across to nearest dc.

ROUND: Working in d c, sc in next sc across, * sc in next sc across to 3rd st of 1st dc, sc in back of next sc across, ch 4. Skip 2 sts (ch 2 is on sc) and 1 sc. Working in d c, ch 1, sc in each of next 2 sts across to 4th st of 1st dc. * sc in each of next 3 sc across to 4th st of 1st dc. * sc in each of next 3 sc across to 4th st of 1st dc. * sc in each of next 4 sc across to 4th st of 1st dc. * sc in each of next 5 sc across to 4th st of 1st dc. Join.

BELL: With white s, ch 4, join to form a ring; work 1dc in ring; work 1 dc in each st around.

BRIM: Ch 4, 1 dc in 1 sc around, 1dc in each st around, join to 1st dc.

CATERAL: Attach 3" of white s to hook, ch 1, join to 1st dc in next st. Work 1 dc in each st around, join; work 1 dc in each st around to 1st dc. Make 3 d c in same fashion.

FLOWERS: * Ch 4, 2 dc in 2dc around (1 fpdc); ch 4, 1 dc in each st around. Work 1 fpdc around, join.

Sew on flowers as for hat.




Brim Hat Pattern #1708,
"First Row:
Round 1: 4 sc in ring.

Round 2: *2 sc in next sc, sc in next sc. Repeat from * to last loop around (42 sc).

Round 3: 2 sc in each sc around, 1 sc in each sc.

Round 4: 2 sc in each sc around.

Round 5: *3 sc in next sc, sc in next sc. Repeat from * around (40 sc).

Round 6: 3 sc in each sc around (38 sc).

Round 7: 2 sc in each sc around.

Round 8: 3 sc in each sc around (40 sc).

Repeat Round 7 for 2 rows.

Next Row: In each sc around working over a double strand yarn in the top st of first row, work 2 d c in each d c (40 d c).

Next Row: Making 1 sc of each d c.

Next Row: 2 sc in each sc around.

Repeat these 2 rows until work measures 9" and measures 32" long. Ch 1, 2 d c in each dc around. Attach yarn over wire and sew around ends of brim to form a bow.

Make another hat,"


Ribbing Hat<|endoftext|>The Best of the Best, Part 2: The Nude Dildo by the Sexy Dolls

By: MargeHorn



Hang in Wind:
Toss the pieces together. This is the windmill:


Windmill in Wind:
With a 1 cc ball of yarn, ch 14, join. Do not join, twist yarn to form a knot, or cut yarn.



"Lumpy Top Pattern,
"Using a ch 8, ch 3. Join. 1st rnd: 6 sc in next st. 2nd rnd: Sc in each st around. 3rd rnd: 2 sc in each sc around. 4th rnd: Sc in each st around. 5th rnd: Sc in each st around. 6th rnd: 5 sc in each sc around. 7th rnd: 2 sc in each sc around. 8th rnd: Sc in each st around. 9th and 10th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 12th rnd: Same as 4th rnd, but with a sl st along one side to increase a bit. 13th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 14th rnd: 5 sc in each sc around. 15th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 16th rnd: Sc in each st around.

"Make other side. Sew on doll or dollhouse canvas and sew to each end of doll or dollhouse canvas.




Top_k 0


'WAR WOUNDED' TAWBOOTS"
Instructions for Sewing Tucked Frogs and...
This hat measures 5½" in diameter. Using thread of 1 s c, make a d c. When sewing in the crown, remember to sew between the two shell caps which stay up when hat is tucked in and unused. Next lucky hat 14 d c in 3 distinct spots, gather thread in each d c and sew flat. Next lucky hat, 15 d c in 3 distinct spots.
Next lucky hat 21 d c in same place as last lucky hat, this time on the back of hat. Next lucky hat, 21 d c in 2 distinct places. Next lucky hat, 21 d c in 3 distinct places. Next hat, 30 d c in next st, * d c in next st, ch 5, ch 3? in next d c, turn.
Next hat, 30 d c in next st, * d c in next st, ch 5, ch 3? in next d c, turn. Next hat, 30 d c in 2 d c, * d c in next st, ch 5, ch 3? in next d c, cut thread. Some sewing supplies desired for sewing over the teeth, crown and leaves. Holding thread from sewing point over each of the points, sew stitches into place. Do not sew sts on opposite sides of needle."


SQUIRT, With Wargaming Dames,
"STOPPING"
1st Row: With MC, ch 115. 2nd Row: * 1 sc in each sc around, join. Repeat throughout row.
"
"MAGNETIC SC
Enter the following number of stitches into Public Addenda on page 47.
2WORLD ROW.
3rd Row: 8 sc near center sc, * 1 sc, 1 sc, 1 sc behind chain 12 sc, join. This row leads up to the hat.
2UTH RABB .
3rd Row: * 2 sc in 1st sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat from * 2 more times around; join. This row follows the 2nd row of magnetized seams. Continue to work on around.
4TH SCRATCH .
5th Row: Sc in each sc around; join. Work along the lines of the last row until a swatch is at the end of each row. Break yarn, snip ends and fasten off."


Crochet Plaitting Hat Pattern #585,
"Ch 22, join wtih a magic point. 6th & 7th rows: Ch 1, sc in each ch, join. 8th & 9th rows: Ch 1, sc in each ch, join. 10th Row: Ch 1, sc in each ch, join. 11th Row: Ch 1, sc in each dc around. 12th Row: Ch 1, sc in each dc around. 13th Row: Ch 1, sc in each dc around. 14th Row: Ch 1, sc in each ch, sc in next dc around. 15th Row: Ch 1, sc in each sin, sc in next sc around. 16th Row: Repeat the 2nd row 5 times.
When the hat is now fitted, sew properly.
END OF TOP ??? ???



top_k = 60


"A very good hat.

1st row (in order of decreasing the amount): 1st s c: 6 sl sts.
2nd Row: *2 sl sts in each of the next 8 sts.
3rd Row: * 1 sl st in 1st s c, 2 sl sts in next s c, 3d sl st in next s c, 2t sl st in each of the next 14 sts, 3d st in next s c, sl st in each of the next 16 sts.
4th Row: * 1 sl st in each of the next 5 s c, 2 sl sts in next s c, 3d s c in next s c, sl st in each of the next 6 s c.
5th Row: * 1 s c in each of the next 2 s c, 2 sl sts in next s c, 3d s c in next s c; sl st in each of the next 6 s c.
5th Row: * 1 s c in each of the next 4 s c, 2 sl sts in next e s c, 3d s c in next s c, sl st in each of the next 11 s c to 1st st of last round.
6th Row: 1 s c in each of the next 2 s c, 2 sl sts in e s c, 3d s c in next s c, sl st in each of the next 13 s c to 1st st of last round. Work 3rd rnd (back of hat only) even, and sew to both sides of hat."


Mock Skull of Man
1st Row: * Working in d c make sc, sc in next sc. Repeat from * 2 more times.
2nd Row: * Working along back of previous row make sc in each sc. Repeat from * around.
3rd Row: * Working up along the front of previous row make 1 sc in each sc.
4th Row: * Working left of previous row make sc in each sc. Repeat from * around.
5th Row: * Working in s c make 1 sc in each sc.
6th Row: * Working to left of previous row make 2 sc in each sc. Work from * to next st around, cutting loops on 3rd row.
7th Row: * Working across row and then behind will be a hazard. Work 6th rnd as above except working in opposite direction and cutting 1 loop in first rnd as in next 2 rnds.
8th Row: * Working in s c but not across row make 3 sc, cut a loop in each sc.
9th Row: * Working across row and then behind will be a hazard. Work 9th rnd as above except working in the reverse direction and cutting 1 loop in first rnd as in second rnd.
10th - 14th Row: Work 14th rnd as before except cutting 1 loop in each st around, cut ribbon, sew into position.
Ribbons: Making 4-D c in each st around ribbon, sew ribbon in position.



Mint Chocolate Chip Cookie Bread,
"CROWN: One 25 inch st.
2nd row: Inc. 8 sc, * inc., sc in next sc, repeat from * around, join with sl st in each st around.
3rd row: Inc. 8 sc.
4th row: Inc. 4 sc, * inc., sc in each sc throughout, join with sl st in first st.
5th row: Inc. 4 sc, * inc, sc in each st around.
6th rows: Dec. 5 sc.
7th row: Dec. 5 sc. Continue to work even until the width of one inch is achieved. Do not break down. If you don't like the pattern that well, take off one sc at the last row. Now cut 4″ of fabric. Place one inch between each incision. Sew along this fabric seam, taking up both the long and short thread during sewing. 
To make bead slits, first sew a bead at each corner of each bead, pin each bead to the inside of another bead, fold the folded edge of each bead over the edge of the previous bead and sew,  pinning the folded edge into place. 
To make a bead slit, tack in place, then slide the bead through the last bead and across the sliter, sewed firmly to your hem. 
The last row of the round is the first of the bead shapes. With this fabric sew a ribbon, turn, sew in place, and sew the ribbon horizontally across the sliter, making sure that it is snug and tucked toward the top.


Cotton Cord Cookie Pattern,
"WS: Make 2 groups of 18 – 24 beads. Turn and sew each bead around the stem to form a cord. Then sew on the opposite side. Make 14 more bands and sew around the stem to form a braid. Make a necklace piece, and sew the bead pieces in position around the neck.
DUCK: Make 2 groups of 1 s c; double and then make 3 pairs of 4 s c each. Next make 7 pairs of 1 s c each, and join to form a hat.
ENDOWMENT AND CHEMMA: Use the yarn thread from the last row of the crown, sew a chain about 1_"" from the center of each bead round to the top of the next bead. Now turn a bead round from the band on the previous row and sew one end of the chain to each bead round. Work in pattern, and sew under the bead on the inside of the hat. Sew along the edge of the hat. Make another piece of crown, sew around the outside of the crown and sew in place. Then sew up the crown. Fold the front of the hat in and sew a button on the front to give it the hat appearance.
ROW 2: Break off leaving a long tail to sew. Sew a long knot in one stitch of each row, making each stitch as long as the last, and sew on the outside of the hat.
ROW 3: Break off and tie a knot at the back of each bead. Pull, tie, and twist in all directions until there are 36 knots, then sew a knot in each of the 36 stitches. Repeat from row 3 on to the next row. Fasten off. 
ENHANCED CHILD'S HAT,
"Make 16 beads with colors A, B, and C. Break off. Fasten a knot into a stitch of the first row, making it one half of a knot. Sew the knot on the end of the last row of beads, forming a knot of double st. For the headbands, make four beads (I make the crown, tie a knot into a stitch, and turn), sew a ring and a bit of thread into place at the ends of the bead and onto the headband, then draw a thread through the center. Then turn and cut thread. Use the yarn and thread inside the hat for sewing up."


I am a large purple wad of gold! For it, I give thee power to kill an elephant as fast as thou canst run! " ~Lydia the Ranged Girl
" The King of Dragons is a boss found in the World Tower . I thought I might include a little picture to make things clearer.
" This is a small purple wad of gold, with only one thread in use. It makes a great hat. " ~Cheryl the Goldwasp, Afterthoughts
" This is my new favorite hat. It was the only hat from the beginning to fit perfectly around my breasts. It is nice and round too." ~Aberria the Chimp, Afterthoughts
"This hat is lovely. It's a wonderful way to show that you are into the Goth style without taking off your outfit. The colors are very vivid. I could stand to wear it all around. I am 6'4" and the hat measures approximately 28 in., including the crown. The hat has 3 ribbed buttons at the base, 1 at each of each of the next 2 buttons. I would love it if you let me know of any things you have added or changed to mine in the comments ! The hat is knitted (instructions below).
 "Next Row: Knit in all sts evenly, insert hook and sls into each st, and pull up all sts to form a loop; * 1 st at each st; repeat from * all around.
"Next Row: Knit in all sts, insert hook and sls into each st, and pull up all sts to form a loop; * 1 st at each st; repeat from * all around.
"Next Row: Knit in all rings, insert hook and sls into previous st and pull loop through; * draw up a sl st in the s c of last st, work a double loop at the end of this row; * repeat from * twice; repeat from * to end of row;
The hat is now finished with the hat crown and the crown ring.


Eternal Serenity Hat,
"Round 1: Ch 7, *chain 2, dc in 2nd st from hook, dc in each st of row 1 round.
2nd Round: *Chain 2, dc in 1st dc of row 1 round, dc in each st of row 1. Repeat 2nd round until piece measures 6". Then increase in every 8th bhdc.
III PINK SMEAR: Round 2: Attach a 2nd chain across back of hat as shown by photo.
4th Round: Attach chain 2 across center front of hat as shown by pic.
5th Round: Attach chain 2 in each st around, increase 4 sts evenly in back to join.
In all rounds, increase 20 sts evenly all around.


Panty Hat Pattern #2292,
"Ch 3. Join in rings, ch 3, join. 1st rnd. Double crochet in each stitch.
2nd rnd. 1st rnd. 2 sc in each stitch.
3rd rnd. *2 sc in next stitch, sc in next stitch. Repeat from * around.
4th rnd. *2 sc in next stitch, sc in next stitch. Repeat from *around.
5th to 8th rnds. *2 sc in next stitch, sc in next stitch. 

Crochet Sled of Theatres and Attractions
"CROWN: With double strand of yarn weave in ends of sts of stitch and join with a sl st and a tacked/tied stitch. Then, using the double strand of yarn make a small chain, which you can tear off at any time. To make a crocheted Sled, wrap one end of yarn in a piece of muslin and sew into position using a loop. Then, take the other end of the yarn, wrap this in a thread of yarn, sew over the stitches of the Sled and cut yarn.

Sparkling Pussyhat with A d c inch in each corner,
"Make a spongy satin in size A diagonally and sew them in position.
Cut a piece of thread 3″ long. Tie the string around a large knot in the center. Attach black thread to each end of string and work pilling across all two ends.
Turn inside of cup back facing you and sew the spongy satin together at top, 2nd from far."

I Am A Pirate Hat Pattern #2626,
"Gauge: 14 sc in 2nd ch from hook; 11 sts in 1st ch.
1st rnd: Work 3 sc in loop st.
2d rnd: * Sc in next sc, sc in next sc. Repeat from * around entire length of hat.
3rd rnd: * Sc in next sc, sc in next 2 sc. Repeat from * around entire length of hat.
4th rnd: * Sc in next sc, sc in next 3 sc. Repeat from * around entire length of hat.
5th to 11th rnds incl: * Sc in each sc around entire length from beginning. Drop yarn and work off all sts using bobbins.
12th to 29th rnds incl: * Cut yarn. Make a second hat of this same material and sew in position. Use either colors to sew hat in place."

"Chunky Hats Crochet Hat Pattern,
"Starting at point, ch 1, join to form a ring.
1st rnd: 6 sc in ring.
2nd rnd: 2 sc in each sc.
3rd rnd: * 2 sc in next sc, 1 sc in next sc. Repeat from * all around, joining to form a ring.
4th rnd: * 2 sc in 1st sc, 1 sc in next sc. Repeat from * all around.
5th rnd: * 2 sc in 1st sc, 1 sc in next sc. Repeat from * around.
6th rnd: 2 sc in each sc.
7th rnd: * 1 sc in each of the next 2 sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat from * around.
8th rnd: Repeat 2nd rnd.
9th rnd: * 2 sc in each sc, 1 sc in each of the following 4 sc.
10th rnd: * 2 sc in each sc. Repeat all 10 rnds around, join.
11th rnd: * 1 sc in each of the next 7 sc, 2 sc in next sc. (10 loops on hook).
13th rnd: * 1 sc in each of the next 6 sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat all 13 rnds around.
14th rnd: * 2 sc in each sc.
15th ROW: * 1 sc in each of the next 5 sc, 3 sc in next sc. The last rnd now includes a single sc.
16th ROW: * 2 sc in each sc.
17th ROW: Same as 4th rnd.
18th ROW: Same as 4th rnd.
19th ROW: Same as 4th rnd.
20th ROW: * 2 sc in each sc, 1 sc in each of the following 5 sc. Break yarn.
Next row: * 2 sc in each sc. Repeat from * around.
Next round: 1 sc in each sc. 1 loop in center sc of each back row.
Next round: * 1 sc in each sc, repeat from * around.
Next row: * 2 sc in each sc, 1 sc in each of the next 3 sc. Break yarn."



Swedish Fish Embroidery Pattern,
"GAUGE: 3 rounds = 1 inch.

COST: $6.00

YARN:

Brim: 30 ch to size (tapestick sizes), about 5_in all.

Hats: 3 ch to size (4th, 5th, and 6th) and about 3'' in all.

TRIM: To make brim and hat fit together, draw up stitches evenly around top and to inside of hat. Then sew to inside of hat using double thread and yarn.

LEFT WEARING TIPS

Be careful using double thread for hats being crochet.

STOW TOGETHER: Keep hat in its original box and place behind your right ear. If hat is worked with double thread, work up a loop of each stitch to within about 0.5 inch of the last stitch.

STRETCH: Fold the double threaded side together to make a chain approximately 6 in and sew it to front of hat. Make another 7 in. chain and sew to back of hat, leaving the outer edge free. Turn hat inside out and sew to opposite side of hat for added comfort. After 18th row, turn hat inside out and sew to inside of hat for added modesty.

HAT COOLDING: Make a diamond shape about 6 inches long by sewing the last row of one side to be closed. Sew two crown pieces in place around the edge and inside of hat, sewing 1st row of crown back, and then 2nd row of crown into place just made. Attach a crown to each crown and sew closed on top of hat.

TRIM: Turn ends of hat inside out and sew to inside of hat to help keep the hats close together."



Here, top_k=40
but prompted with "Lord Vader!"


"Garden Strangler with Hat Pattern No. 898,
"Begin with 1 ch 10. Work into each ch 7. Work 6 sc in each sc (18 sc).
Work 9 sc in next sc, ch 3, skip 1 sc. Work 11 sc in next sc. Work 1 sc in next sc.
Work 10 sc in next sc, ch 3, dc in first 5 sc, sc in each of next 2 sc, dc in 4 of 6 sc.
Work a row of sc in each sc around. Work another row of sc in each sc around. Work a row of sc in each sc around. Work a row of dc between sc in every sc around. Fasten off (80 sc).
Sew a single thread on each of the first two rows of sc; sew in place (a small stitch). Cut a loop from the inside edge of the flower pattern and sew in position on the flower."


Reaction Scabbard Pattern,
"with the following colors and sewing thread:
"Ch 3, dc in 5th st from hook, dc in next 5th st, ch 3 (doesn't count as dc), ch 4, sl st in next dc, dc in next 5th st. Make 5 dc in each sl st and join.
"Round 1: Ch 21, dc in 3rd st from hook, dc in 5th st from left hook. Then the dc in 3rd st from both sides. After the 2nd round, 2 dc in each of 2nd and 3rd st from left to right. Continue as follows:
"In next row, dc in 2nd st from inside insert hook in the next st and thread over and pull loop through, join in 3rd st of chain.
"In same row, dc in the 2nd st from inside insert hook in the 3rd st and thread over and pull loop through, join.
"Repeat last round 4 times.
"Rounds 2 and 3: With right sides of hat against each other, 2 dc in each st of 2nd and 3rd row of 2nd and 3rd row of 2nd row, join, cut yarn.

Moustache Hat Pattern No. 5066,
"Ch 48. 1 dc in 2nd st from hook, work 3 dc in each st across. Ch 1, 2dc in 2nd st of ch, work 5 dc in each st. 2dc in each st across. Ch 1, dc in middle st of ch, 2dc in same st, work 5 dc in each remaining st, sl st in first st of ch, 2dc in next st, hdc in each remaining st around. Ch 1, sc across in center st of ch, 1dc in center st, 2dc in each st down to hook, make 6 sc in center st. The hat measures 12'' in diameter.
2nd Row: Work off ch on next row to right. Work 5 dc in center st of each remaining st, join in 15th and 16th ch. Work 1 dc in each dc down to previous row. Work 1 dc in each dc down to next row, join in 15th and 16th cl. Work 3 dc into center st of next st, join. The hat measures 12'' in diameter.
3rd Row: Sc in center st of each remaining st. The hat measures 11\ in diameter.
4th Row: Work off 2 dc into each st, work 2 dc in each st across to right, join in 15th and 16th sc. Work 1 dc in each dc to the left of center st, 2 dc in each st across, join. The hat measures 9'' in diameter.
5th Row: Sc in each remaining st. The hat measures 8'' in diameter. The next row consists of 2 sc in each st, 2 dc in each st across, join. The hat measures 7'' in diameter.
6th Row: Work off 2 dc into each st, work 2 dc in each st across to left, join. The hat measures 7'' in diameter. The next row consists of 2 sc in each st, 2 dc in each st across, join, the hat measures 4 '' in diameter. Sew hat and join at center of crown at front of hat. Sew an extra large bow to the crown."

STEREO RECTANGLE CAMEL, #1137,
"Garden.
Rear.
Round 1: Two stripes of lace.
2nd Round. Dc into 2nd st's of lace, then 1 st in each st.
3rd Round. Dc into lace, then 1 dc in each st. The last row is sewed on at the front, but at the back not sewn as in the front.
"Next is a large pattern stitch-o-knife. This is, of course, embroidered on the inside of the crown. The crown is made from the same material as the lace, but of the thicker variety.
"Next is a large pattern stitch-o-knife. This is of the same size, but in fact, of a finer color. The crown is made from different sizes and colors, but to suit the hat, always in the center of the crown. The hat is sewed in place with the stitch-o-knife, to the inside of the hat.
Round 2: In the center, there are two dc clusters.
3rd Round. 2 dc into each dc, then 1 dc in each dc of the 2dc. The remaining rows are worked in the same manner as the last, to suit the hat.


"Riding the Dark Side of the Moon, the Emperor points to a Star with his right hand and says:"The first thing we must do is make the base of our crown as long as possible. Once this work is finished, we can make the head crown and the other colors in the color pattern as follows:
"Hazel Blue:
"Starting at tip with a d c in ring. 1st rnd: 7 s c in 8 sc around. Make 2 s c in each st and each st around. Repeat the last 2 rnds 3 times in total.
 "Red:
"Start with a s c in each s c around. 
  Make 3 d c around the top edge of crown.
"
Darkest Blue:
1st rnd: 5 sc in 4 dc.
2nd rnd: * 2 sc in each sc around. 
 3rd to 7th rnds incl: * 1 st in each s c around. 
8th to 13th rnds incl: * 1 st in each st around. Make 4 d c and 3 sc in each st around. 
14th to 18th rnds incl: * 1 st in each st around. Make 2 d c and 3 sc in each st around. 
19th to 21st rnds incl: * 1 st in each st around. Make 2 d c and 2 sl sts around. 
12th rnd: * 2 d c in each st around. 
22nd rnd: * 2 d c in each of the next 2 sts around. 
23rd to 36th rnds: * 2 d c in each of the next 1 st around. 
37th rnd: * 2 d c in each of the next 2 st around, making 3 d c in each of the first 2 sts, and then 1 d c in each st around. 
38th rnd: *2 d c in each of the next 2 st around, making 6 d c in each of the first 2 sts around, and then 1 d c in each of the remaining 2 sts around. 
39th rnd: *3 d c in each of the next 2 sts around. 
40th rnd: *3 d c in each of the next 2 st around. Continue in this manner until crown measures about 6"" across. 


Lord Vader! And his lightsaber!"
"The Master!"
"And his lance,"
"The scythe!"
"The hilt of her hat — hat!"
"The hat!"
"The cloak,"
"And the mask, with the crown of our hero, all rolled up,"
"The crown and crown,"
"The hat and cloak,"
"The flower-patterned skirt and top, and, in colors, lace trimming for hat, the cap, and cuffs, in sizes 4 S and up"
"Fancy a pattern, with both colours?"
"And the pattern of the hat,"
"Gauge, make 10 dots in the center of each stitch.
"Continue to purl, 1 row on each stitch. 
Next row: 8 dots; 1 row, 8 dots; 1 row, 7 dots. 
Next row: 9 dots; 1 row, 8 dots; 1 row, 7 dots. 
Next row: 10 dots; 1 row, 8 dots; 1 row, 7 dots. 
Next row: 11 dots; 1 row, 8 dots; 1 row, 8 dots. 
Sew crown and crown and lace trimming for hat and hat and hat on both sides. Make crown. Sew ribbon tied at crown and tie up and sew around crown. 
Turn hat over and sew to crown in position."



Carrion Hat Pattern,
"Make a chain 6 inches long, turn and weave in ends. Make a single inch diameter and sew along edges. Make a second piece, make a double inch diameter, sew along edges to each of the second pieces. Make a single inch diameter and sew to each end of remaining pieces so that all are together as follows:
"Make a 3 inch diameter. Then make a single inch diameter and sew along each edge to each of the other pieces below.
"Make a double inch diameter and sew along the center of last and 1st center front corner of each piece, to cover off the back of hat:
"ROUND SIDE:
"In first round, work in pattern, ch 1, sc in 1st ch. Do not join this round.
2nd ROUND: Working in pattern, ch 1, skip 1 ch (to make a sc), sc in next 11 sc.
3rd ROUND: Working in pattern, ch 1, skip 1 ch (to make a sc), sc in 2 ch. Do not join this round. 3rd rnd: Working in pattern, ch 1, skip 1 ch (to make a sc), dc in dc and 1 dc, sc in next sc, dc in last sc. 6th rnd: Working in pattern, ch 1, dc in 9 dc and 1 dc, dc in last dc.


Tried top_k=40, temperature 0.8, prompt: "Sew ends together."

"Tacky Trousers,
"Using double strands of yarn, crochet a double knot loop at the top of each hat. Work 2 d c in loop and work a double knot loop at each end of each hat. Work a double knot loop over each crown. Then, working on the 4 d c at the top of each hat, go around the 4 d c in this way, making the 2 d c in each d c loop.


prompt: "Sew on jet pearls and veiling."


The Pretty Things Hat Pattern #3188,
"Gauge: 12 s c in 2nd st from hook, join with a sl st.

Ch 3, join with a sl st.

2nd Row: Ch 1, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, ch 2 (does not count as d c), 2 d c in each ch (1 d c in 2nd ch), repeat from * all around (36 sts).

Continue in this manner for all 4 rows.

3rd Row: Ch 3, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, * 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, repeat from * all around (36 sts).

Continue in this manner for all 4 rows.

4th Row: Ch 3, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, repeat from * all around (36 sts).

Continue in this manner for all 4 rows.

5th Row: Ch 3, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 6th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, repeat from * all around (36 sts).

Continue in this manner for all 4 rows.

6th Row: Ch 3, 1 d c in 6th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 6th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 6th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 6th ch from hook, repeat from * all around (36 sts).

Continue in this manner for all 4 rows.

7th Row: Ch 3, 1 d c in 7th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 7th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 7th ch from hook, repeat from * all around (36 sts).

Continue in this manner for all 4 rows.

8th Row: Ch 3, 1 d c in 8th ch from hook, * 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 8th ch from hook, ch 2, 1 d c in 8th ch from hook, repeat from * all around (36 sts).

End row and work from the center.

9th Row: Work along the 9th row of sts using your right side to sew the end of the row to the hat.

10th Row: Work in the same manner as the 9th row of sts except working along the inside of the hat.

11th Row: Work along the inside of the hat, using your right side to sew the end of the row to the hat.

12th Row: Work along the inside of the hat using your left side.

13th Row: Work along the inside of the hat in the same manner as the 9th row of sts.

Attach another piece of ribbon, do not join them.

Flower crown."


Pumpkin Stuffed Hat Pattern,
"Crown: With the crown stitched you will have 18 ribbed buttons. Starting at the outer edge make one row of sc, ch 1, 2 d c in same stitch, sc in the next 16 stitches, sc in the next 16 stitches, ch 1, 2 d c in same stitch, sc in the next 16 stitches, ch 2. Continue in this manner as in cap, but with the crown stitched.


"Crown" with Brim Headband, No. 707,
"CROWN: 1st row: With right side of crown facing you, ch 6. 1st rnd: 2 sc in 4th ch from hook. 2nd rnd: * 2 sc in the next sc, 3 sc in next sc. 3rd rnd: * 2 sc in the next sc, 3 sc in the next sc. 4th rnd: * 2 sc in the next sc, 3 sc in the next sc. Repeat 4th rnd until piece measures 14_ inches in diameter.

2nd Row: Working in sc, make a sc in the ch-6 sp of each rnd, ch 5. 1st row: 2 sc in each sc. 2nd row: * 2 sc in the next sc, 3 sc in the next sc. 3rd row: * 2 sc in the next sc, 3 sc in the next sc. 4th row: * 2 sc in the next sc, 3 sc in the next sc. Repeat 4th row until piece measures 28 inches in diameter. Work even until last row measures 28_ inches. Work another row even until piece measures 28_ inches. Work a row even until last row measures 28_ inches.



"Crochet Hat Pattern #1903,
"Make a hat which fits between the crown and eyes.

Crochet Hat Pattern #1972,
"Make a hat of any color.


Beauteous Cute Hat Pattern,
"Ch 5, join with sl st to form a ring or ch-3.
2nd Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-5 (to count as d c, you will need a small d c or 2 d c).
3rd Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
4th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
5th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
6th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
7th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
8th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
9th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
10th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
11th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
12th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
13th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
14th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
15th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
16th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
17th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
18th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1.
19th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-2.
20th Row: 2 d c in ring, 2 d c in each d c of ch-1. Attach a sewing needle and sew a stitch in each stitch. Make a sewing loop in each stitch of either end for the hat. Tie knot in front. Sew a ribbon on each end of ribbon, tie knot in front of ribbon and sew ribbon to ribbon. Tie knots in front."


Wreath Pattern #2,
"Round 1: Ch 3, dc in 3rd st, * sc in next dc, * d c in next dc.
Rounds 2 and 3: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 4: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 5: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 6: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 7 and 8: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 9: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 10: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 11: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 12: Sl st in each st around.
Rounds 13: Sl st in each st around.
... for at least 80 rounds


temperature 0.8, top_k=0

Toss of Jeans
"Toss of Jeans Pattern #3139,
"Starting at center, ch 1. Working in double ch, ch 2. 1st rnd: * 1 sc in each sc of previous rnd. 2nd rnd: Sc in each sc. 3rd rnd: *2 sc in each sc. Repeat from * around. 4th to 8th rnds incl: Sc in each sc around. 9th rnd: *2 sc in each sc. Repeat 9th rnd. 10th to 12th rnds incl: Sc in each sc around. 13th rnd: *2 sc in each sc. Repeat 13th rnd. 14th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 15th and 16th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 17th rnd: *2 sc in each sc. 16th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 17th rnd: *2 sc in each sc. 18th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 19th to 26th rnds incl: Sc in each sc around. 27th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 28th rnd: *2 sc in each sc. 29th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 30th to 32nd rnds: Sc in each sc around. 33rd rnd: *2 sc in each sc. 34th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 35th rnd: *2 sc in each sc. 36th rnd: *1 sc in each sc. 37th to 42nd rnds incl: Sc in each sc around.

BOW: Using the yarn worked up in this section, ch 2 and join with sl st in 2nd st from hook. 1st row: Ch 1, ch 5. 2nd row: Ch 1, ch 2. 3rd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 4th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 5th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 6th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 7th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 8th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 9th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 10th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 11th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 12th and 13th rows: * 1 sc in each sc. 14th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 15th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 16th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 17th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 18th row: * 2 sc in each sc. 20th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 21st row: * 2 sc in each sc. 22nd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 23rd row: * 2 sc in each sc. 24th to 26th rows incl: * 1 sc in each sc. 27th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 28th rows: * 1 sc in each sc. 29th to 32nd rows incl: * 1 sc in each sc. 33rd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 34th to 36th rows incl: * 1 sc in each sc. 37th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 38th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 39th to 40th rows incl: * 1 sc in each sc. 41st row: * 1 sc in each sc. 42nd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 43rd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 44th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 45th to 48th rows incl: * 1 sc in each sc. 49th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 50th row: *1 sc in each sc. 51st row: *1 sc in each sc. 52nd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 53rd row: * 1 sc in each sc. 54th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 55th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 56th row: *1 sc in each sc. 57th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 58th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 59th row: * 1 sc in each sc. 60th row: *1 sc in each sc. 61st row: * 1 sc in each sc. 62nd row: * 1 sc in each sc.



Tudor Modernist Hat Pattern,
"Ch 4, join with sl st to form a ring. 1st rnd: 9 sc in ring. 2nd rnd: H dc in each sc around. 3rd rnd: H dc in each sc around. 4th and 5th rnds: H dc around. 6th rnd: H dc around. 7th and 8th rnds: H dc around. 9th and 10th rnds: H dc around. 11th to 14th rnds: H dc around. 15th rnd: H dc around. 15th rnd: H dc around. 16th rnd: H dc around. 16th rnd: H dc around. 17th rnd: H dc around. 17th rnd: H dc around. 18th rnd: H dc around. 19th rnd: H dc around. 20th rnd: H dc around. 20th rnd: H dc around. 21st and 22nd rnds: H dc around, numbering 1 st throughout. 23rd rnd: H dc around. 25th rnd: H dc around. 25th rnd: H dc around. 25th rnd: H dc around. 25th rnd: H dc around, numbering 1 st around. 26th rnd: H dc around. 28th rnd: H dc around. 30th rnd: H dc around. 30th rnd: H dc around. 30th rnd: H dc around. 30th rnd: H dc around. 33rd rnd: H dc around. 33rd rnd: H dc around. 33rd rnd: H dc around. 38th rnd: H dc around. 42nd rnd: H dc around. 42nd rnd: H dc around. 42nd to 48th rnds: H dc around. 48th rnd: H dc around. 48th rnd: H dc around. 48th rnd: H dc around. 48th rnd: H dc around. 49th rnd: H dc around. 49th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th to 49th rnds: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around. 50th rnd: H dc around, numbering 8 sts around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 52nd rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around. 54th rnd: H dc around.



top_k=60



Harry whirled to face Snape, heart beating hard. A spell is casting a charm on him.

[Harry and Snape run around the corner to see Snape giving Harry directions to cross one of the pits of Voldemort's Death Eater armor.
]

[Harry and Voldemort are looking at each other, which was what Snape intended to do],
In-Action Stomping Pies Round 1: Snape has Harry stand in front of him, keeping right heel of his left foot on Harry's back. Begin stomper pattern in this manner at the bottom. Stomper in the front loops of each stomper in this manner. Continue in this manner, ending with a sl st in the first loop of each stomper. Work 4 rounds in straight line pattern.

In-Action Stomping Pies Round 2: Work a round of stomper in the front loops of each stomper. Work one more round of stomper in each stomper, to the front loop of each stomper. Work in the pattern until there are 19 loops on stomper. Cut yarn."



Harry whirled to face Snape, heart beating hard. "Wh--What will you do?"

Snape's eyes narrowed slightly and he lowered his wand, then stepped aside. As he approached behind Harry, he knelt down to kiss the front rim of Harry's green-gloved hat as he pulled her closer. Snape slipped on the silk and reached in carefully, then unbuttoned Harry's green-gloved hat. He looked Harry in the eyes and stroked her crown lightly before pushing on the seam of the hat to attach it. He finished on the front of Harry's hat with a snap. With a light flourish he tied an extra strand of fabric, then another twist of silk, then another twist of silk.

"Now, let's see how this hat is made." With a swift glance between Snape and Harry, he flipped his hat over and then began to sew fabric into place. In one movement, the front of the hat was made. It was then that Snape noticed there was no visible center back of the hat in this photo. He stood back and began work on the side seams. As he worked, he looked up to see Harry looking toward him.

"Now, move down the back of the crown," whispered Snape as he laid the hat on Harry.

A sharp, s-shaped s c of color was sewn in place. On the inside of the hat, an s d and t c of color are sewn into place. In another movement, fabric was made on the inside of the crown of the hat by working across the inside of the crown to the inside of the brim. Then the front of the hat was completed.

"Let's make the front of this hat as well. First, we'll make a knot. Make it as large as one would like for an earring or a bow, but not bigger than earrings or a bow. Sew the end of the knot in place along the inside of the brim line.

"Then, making a knot as large as one would like for a flower, sew over the entire beret. Make a st st ringer of silk, wrap this around the crown and sew with a thread, or another soft thread."

Potions and Spells, Chapter 14
"Make a sc in each st of your hook. Make a sc in each st of your yarn. Turn your work over on your right hand and tack to this sc to form a hook, work 1 sc in each st of your hook, turn over on you right side (turning over on both sides of the working piece) to turn.

"With this piece laid over the hat, draw in the loop of each stitch, insert the yarn in the next st, and insert in this stitch (to make sure that the yarn is fully inserted), work 1 sc in each remaining st of the knitting thread or yarn.

"Now work all the sl sts of the hat in this way.

"Piece closed, tuck the crown in place, and fold the crown slightly up in the hand in order to prevent the hat from rising up a bit when pulled so out."



This is from a sample prompted with "Wug Hat,"

Wug Hat, Size 1 and 4.

Sc in the dc of last row, dc2tog in the dc of each st and make a sc between each st.

HAT BOOT:
Clip edge of one side of bow (wrong side facing you) on the edge of the hat, with a single selving around the crown. Clip the other side of bow (left side facing you) over the hat (make another sewing st). Tie yarn so that it remains unruly after sewing the pieces together.

COLOR BOOT:
Sl st into each stitch around hat, make a sc in each stitch.

LEFT BAND:
Work 4 dc around crown,  working from the back side, ending with dc1tog around. Work 1 st in each st around crown.

DIMONIZED BEAMS:
Sl st into each st around hat, make a dc around the outside of hat.

UNDERWEAR:
Make a ring, sew two pieces together (the underwear), sew in the round as follows:

Front BAND:
In the 1st s c of each st around crown, inc. 5 sts. 2 s c in each st. 3 s c around, join.

Center BAND:
In the next sc around the crown, inc. 8 sts. 2 s c in each st. 2 s c in each st, 1 s c in each of the 2 remaining st. 1 s c in each of the next 2 sts. 3 s c around, join.

Back BAND:
In the next st around the crown, inc. 11 sts. 2 s c in each st. 2 s c in each st, 1 s c in each of the 2 remaining st. 1 s c in each of the next 4 sts. 2 s c around, join.

In the next st around the crown, inc. 15 sts. 2 s c in each st. 2 s c in each st, 1 s c in each of the 2 remaining st. 1 s c in each of the 3 previous sts.

Back

Beams: Make a wire loop, sew securely (see picture of wire loop below). Using a 2-way thread (make another wire loop and sew in place), make another wire loop around the right side of crown and sew securely.

TREASURES: Sew one wire loop around each of the two ends of hat. Sew wire loops around each side of the top of hat back and around the outside of hat.

Sew the inside of hat center toward the crown.



This is from a sample prompted with "Darth Vader clenched his fist."

Darth Vader clenched his fist. "I am not the Darth," he cried, throwing his hood up and closing his eyes tight. "I am not... you do not know me, you do not recognize me, and I am not supposed to share who I am with you... only that I know you are not supposed to make these fools of yourselves!"

The Force touched him and his smile widened. "I am Alderaan," he said, glancing at the girl next to him in the assembly. She smiled at him, but moved to shut the door. "We will now see how they might respond."

The first step was to move the chair out from under the desk and place it on top of the dresser. The second step was to take the hood off the headdress. Then taking the ribbon, slip the ribbon under the hood, and turn it inside out."

"I wish we could have one more!" cried Han, making little movements.

"We cannot have any more," said Obi-Wan. "Please pass the ribbon to me." The ribbon was soon passed around his hand, and the other side of the work of art.

In another scene, the First Order Stormtrooper is working on creating an Imperial Imperial Army bandana with a green ribbon. The Ribbon is a little larger than the tip of the bandana. After making two more bandsana pins, the bandana can be fastened tightly around the headband and pinned tightly on the headband.

In another scene, Han and Princess Leia are riding the ship where they are being raised into space. Leia is holding the ribbon with one knuckle, and Han is holding the ribbon with the other knuckle, then the hat. Leia is now going to sew her hat on."


Darth Vader clenched his fist. After a few more minutes, and several more minutes of rubbing one of the other tips of each end of the ribbon, Darth Vader took the hat in both hands, worked the ribbon together so that the "BAND and FRIBBON" pattern was completed, folded the ribbon in half and worked the next piece inside of the hat as follows:
D-STAR: Ch 7, double crochet (dc), 1 dc, 1 dc, 1 dc, * 1 dc, 1 dc. 2dc.

This is the crown of the hat, and is filled for the crown of the hat with fabric from the bottom. Then, sew on the hat, taking care not to get it too loose before the brim is fully completed. Cut fabric in 1 inch lengths as follows:
BAND: One half inch measures 16 inches from the fold of fabric going under the crown, and 5 inches from the front edge of hat.

FRIBBON: One half inch measures 13 inches from fold of fabric in front of crown, and 5 inches from front edge.

RING: One half inch measures 6 inches, and 6 inches from tail end of crown.

BRAVE: One half inch measures 19 inches from seam at end at the front of hat, and 1 inch from the end of the crown in front. Cut one inch longer than stated, and sew the last section closely on. If desired, sew another crown on the other hat."


Tried top_k=40, temperature 0.8, prompt: "Lord Vader!"

...
BEN: "This is the new weapon!"

[Darth Vader] Darth Vader! [Darth Vader]

BEN: "This is the new weapon!"

[Darth Vader] Darth Vader! [Darth Vader]

BEN: "This is the new weapon!"

[Darth Vader] Darth Vader! [Darth Vader]

BEN: "This is the new weapon!"

[Darth Vader] Bunnies! [Darth Bunny]

BEN: "This is the new weapon! Take it!"

[Darth Bunny] [Darth Bunny]

BEN: "This is the new weapon! Take it!"

[Darth Bunny]

BEN: "This is the new weapon!"

[Darth Bunny]

BEN: "This is the new weapon!"

[Darth Bunny] [Darth Bunny]
...



top_k=0, temperature 0.8, prompt "The earthlings did not yet know they were doomed."

The earthlings did not yet know they were doomed. But in the round more vivid did they see the earth walking, as it was moving about the west of the round, and at the same time it erected a hedge round the central part of the circle. Then as the round demanded scenes, the earthling made a ring of earth, and placed the remaining clay in place.

"Now fill the quarters of the ring with earth, such as will form a core of four or five inches diameter.

"Next fill the rings, inclosing all but one of them, with earth, and repeat throughout.

"Next fill the rings with earth, and repeat the last round.

"Next fill the rings with earth, and fill the outermost edge of each of the previous rounds with green.

"Next fill the two outer edges of each of the preceding rounds with water, and repeat the last round.

"Next fill the stones with water, and each in turn into an oval shape, and set on a square of matchwood.

"Next fill the stone holes in the top of each of the preceding rounds with a piece of match, and repeat the last round. Then fill all the sections of round with the same stuff, and repeat the whole round, casting the stones in all around the crown.

"Next fill each of the last two rounds with matchworms and, to a piece of match, make a knot.

"Next fill all the square sections with match, and repeat the last round. Then fill in the stone holes of the crown, so that the crown takes the shape of a hat.

"Next fill each of the last two rounds with match, and make a knot.

"Next fill and fill with water, to the brim of the hat, and then put on the green pieces, making sure that the water runs down to the brim."


top_k=60, temperature 1.0 prompt "Loki held out his hand, laughing at Thor."


Loki held out his hand, laughing at Thor. Loki had picked up his sword, and the two laughed together, their faces slightly obscured by the fur. As soon as Loki's dagger had gotten between Thor and Thor's ribs, they both pulled it out of their bodies, and Thor grinned. He reached out and took Loki's hat off, and placed it on the floor and threw it at Loki. Loki caught it, but Thor cut his hat off and flung it behind him so he would never realize he was holding one again.

"Worst Hat Ever," said Thor.

Loki frowned. "That's wrong," he said. Thor tossed Loki a blanket to cover his forehead, and they both walked away together.





Loki held out his hand, laughing at Thor. Thor threw a bit of Thor's magic on Loki with his Thorsteel, causing Loki to spin in his chair with exaggerated movements. Thor yelled "Ursa Mantle: Do not go bare," or something to that effect.

"Now turn your arms out to cover the head of Thor." Loki commanded, "Turn Thor's arms so that he is standing over his head, with his left hand on the base of his bow, and with his right hand over the end of the bow. And now bring both ends of the bow near each end of the head of Thor."

The rope was tied close to the base of Thor's head, about three inches in diameter. The next part of the plan includes a twist, one inch long, and fasten one end of the rope to each end of the head of Thor. Then, working in increasing rounds of knots and thread, weave thread through every inch of slack as through a spiral stitch. To make the stitches thicker, hold the head of Thor and attach a needle to the centre of each stitch. Attach a needle around the widest part of each stitch and draw tight and thread through just over the loop. Tie another strand of lace around the ends of each hook. Repeat until you have four sets of knots, and then use up all remaining lace thread. Make a second pair of ropes around the ends of both rings as before, and weave them through all points of the stitches. Make a third pair of ropes around the ends of one tail and tie them up around the lower edge of the head-gear. Then take off the last two sets of knots. Fasten the hats together at the top of the headscrat and sew to the front of the hats."



Loki held out his hand, laughing at Thor. He put his free hand in Thor's. Loki nodded and Thor held out his hand. "And I don't believe in magic," Thor said, and Loki took his free hand, holding it up to keep it from turning to stone. Thor then said, "There is another door through the open door." As Thor approached, Loki opened the door, revealing himself in a bright yellow. Thor stopped and looked at him, but then said in a calm voice, "I thought you were a man." Thor then said, "Who are you? Aren't you Thor?" Thor nodded slowly, but said, "Of course." Thor then said, "I'm Tulkas, born about this time and bred for you." To Tulkas, who looked surprised, Thor said, "I thought you were an evil elf." "Oh, I'm the same as that," Tulkas replied with a smile. "You should probably keep your head down." Loki said, "I'm not the sort of man who likes to wear yellow, but I'm sure you can see there's not much gold or silver here." "Yes. Well then, we need to make some adjustments there." To Tulkas, who looked annoyed at the idea, Loki said, "Make your head quite a bit smaller than usual so that this piece will hang straight above the lower half of the head, and so that Tulkas can see you. Make a second slant in the same way, but make it a little longer so that it extends a bit over the crown of Thor's head." Tulkas replied, "You're in trouble, Loki. Here's how to do it." With two slants (to reduce an extra inch), Loki took his hat off, and put it on with the three-quarter lace from the previous garment. He placed the hat under the crown with the crown on his head. Then with the crown on his head, he brought the hat straight down over the crown, and took his hat back up over the crown, so that it will hang straight up over the crown. Next, he took off the hat so that it hangs in the crown. The next step is to draw up a cinch, so that it will fit over the crown perfectly, and then sew it closed. Tulkas now sits on Thor's knee so that it is easy to turn. Then he points Thor's hat at his breast, which is visible from above because it is cut in two, and said, "Hold your right leg on the left side of my left shoulder, and pull hard at both sides of my right shoulder, so that you will be able to turn right." He puts Thor's right hand over his left shoulder, and while holding Thor's head on either side, make a slight twist at either side of his head. The same technique is then made with both hands, by placing both hands over the opposite side of the turn, turn, lay down the needle of the left hand on the second side of the top of the turn, and make the turn with both hands. Then bring Thor's head over him, and, in the same fashion, turn, draw up a cinch, and sew the three-quarter lace around the edge of the hat."

Thor had a new favorite hat. "Now we may place the crown over the hat as we were doing the previous one. Make a cinch of thread, and sew the crown securely to the hat. Next will be made. As with the previous hat, it is also necessary that the hat does not come straight down when being turned. The crown, then, should measure approximately half the diameter of Thor's head. Now, having cut a few strands as we spoke of, fasten them together so that they will form a knot. To fasten, make short st. with the left side of the sc of the next stitch, and repeat for another loop, or as many loops as your yarn will give you. Continue with the left needle, and in the next stitch sew a st. in place. Then to sew a loop, draw down the left side of the sc and thread one needle through and sew the opposite side of the loops into place. Next stitch and the same way all the rest of the way around. To make the first stitch fold the tail and sew directly to the tip of the hat. With the remaining thread from one of the rows or rows of ribbons, sew the ribbons straight over the stitch just made. Next sew the back of the hat together, at top and bottom. Then work straight to the front."


Loki held out his hand, laughing at Thor. Loki laughed, then gave a quick rub over Thor's shoulders, causing him to bend forward at one point as well as at Thor's waist. He then went over to the ground and lifted up Thor. Loki then turned his back on Thor, while Thor bent his knees at a 90 degree angle, and lowered down from this position. Then Loki started the action again with Thor taking up all of his weight in his left hand, and Thor's right hand, laying on top of Loki's right hand and holding it parallel to the ground. Then Thor reached up and took Loki's right earlobe in his right hand, and began to drag Loki beneath him. Now the trick is to hold both ears straight in front of you, with their rings on either side, while you run your hands down the length of both ears, in order to bring them about right. This is usually done best by folding in half on both sides. If you do not know how to fold then simply go to another type of picture book (the two pictures below below shows how to fold). Then, folding the top of the hat slightly and holding it tightly folded, do not hold it any longer than you would have under usual circumstances. Next, turn the hat toward you and hold it in front of you as in the image to the left. It will look as if there were a fold over in your place. Then turn it in the same manner, but turning under the right arm and under the left arm. Now the seam should be fairly evident. To close, just thread a needle along the back of the earlobe and sew them together neatly. Attach a needle in the next stitch, draw the hook through and up along the right front edge of the hat, and through the right side seam and over the headband stitch, join. Then sew the ends together closely under the eye. Once the seams are closed simply tack the last sewn stitch down on top of the hat and leave it on its side until it is in your hand, then work a row of short stitches between. Repeat the last two rows until there are 30 stitches on each side of the work. Sew the hat in place."



Kylo Ren leapt behind a support column at the sight of Han Solo. He swiped at his left eye and left wrist, and with one swift movement spun on his heel for his next swing. The spinning action knocked a handful of the dust from Han Solo's eyes and onto his feet, and soon he was spinning in the air and making his way around the platform without stopping. His arm suddenly snapped to his side like a mallet's head snapping to the back on a woodblock. For another few seconds he lay motionless on the sloping ledge, only pausing occasionally to make sure he wasn't jumping.

Finally, he spun in the wind and darted toward the rear of the ship. Just as he was reaching the bridge, his left arm snapped forward to protect it from the thorns of the ship's sails. Before he could reach the bridge itself, however, he was struck in the back of the head with a ball made from his favorite color yarn. The loose ends slipped between his teeth, and Han Solo was left with less than an inch of his missing upper part of the head. He immediately ran straight to the nearest stool and wiped the dust from his eyes."



Trained for 92 iterations from vanilla



gpt2.generate(sess,
              length=5000,
              temperature=1.0,
              prefix="Sew on jet pearls and veiling.",
              nsamples=5,
              batch_size=1,
              top_k=60
              )


"Chiffon Brimstone

Crown (Make 1): Ch 1, joining with sl st to form ring. 1st rnd: 10 sc in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 dc in ring, 1 dc in each ch-1 sp. 3rd rnd: 2 dc in ring, 1 dc in each dc around (100 dc). 4th rnd: * 1 dc in next sc, 3 dc in next sc - 1 dc in next sc, repeat from * around, ending with: * 1 dc in next 2 sc, 3 dc in next sc - 1 dc in next sc, repeat from * (130 dc). 5th rnd: 1 dc in each sc around. 6th rnd: * 1 dc in next 2 dc, 3 dc in next dc - 1 dc in next sc, repeat from * around. 7th rnd: 2 dc in next sc, 1 dc in each dc around (175 dc). 8th and 9th rnd: * 1 dc in each dc around, 1 dc in each st around. 10th rnd: * 1 dc in each dc, 2 dc in 1st dc, * 1 dc in each dc round, repeat from * around (205 dc). 11th rnd: Same as 4th rnd. 12th to 12th rnds incl: * 1 dc in each of the next 2 sc, 2 dc in next sc. Repeat this division up, ending with: * 1 * 1 dc in each dc around. Join in 5th rnd. 12th rnd: Same as first rnd. 13th and 14th rnds: Same as 1st rnd. 15th rnd: Same as 1st rnd.

16th rnd: Same as 2nd rnd. 17th rnd: Same as 3rd rnd. 18th rnd: Same as 3rd rnd. 19th rnd: Join in 4th waltz. 20th rnd: Same as 3rd rnd (18 dc). Rounded: * Join in 4th st of rnd, ch 1, fpdc in next st, repdc in next st. Repeat from * around (22 dc). After 1-semester increase, sl st in each rnd to correspond.

BRIM: 1st rnd: Brim with a contrasting color. D c C in same sp, h P in next sp, h P in next 1st sp. Turn. 2nd rnd: Attach contrasting color, and make D C C. Turn. 3rd rnd: Attach contrasting color, and d c in each of its next 4 sts. (The following rnd: 2 dc in first st, 1 dc in next st, * 1 dc in each of next 18 sts, 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * (28 dc). Turn.

4th rnd: Attach contrasting color, and make D C C in each of the next 2 sts. D c C in each of the next 3 sts. D c C in each of the next 2 sts. D c C in each of the next 5 sts. Work like this one all through the brim, then work it through back loop of 1st rnd.

BAND: Attach contrasting color, and make a double chain 12 loop, cut the 2 chains, cut the chain on each rnd from the previous row, and insert them in next 2 loops of a chain from the previous row. Then insert them in next 10 loops of a chain from the previous row. Then remove all 4 loops of a chain which had been inserted to the rear, and work through back loop of 3rd rnd (1 loop worked in each of the next 3 rnds), join, turn. Work until the chain is worked 2x as long as the outer loop of a double chain.

BRIM (Make 2): With a black cord, make this chain: 1st rnd: * D c in next loop, d c in next loop. Repeat from * (2 loops worked in each rnd).

2nd rnd: Working in back loop of 1st loop, d c in same loop. 3rd rnd: * 2 d c in next loop, 3 d c in next loop. Repeat from * (a loop worked in each rnd). Then attach contrasting color to chain, and work rnds in same manner as Band.

BRIM: 1st rnd: * 1 d c in each d c, 2 d c in next rnd. Repeat rnds until chain measures about 1 inch. Break off.



Trained for 161 iterations from vanilla



gpt2.generate(sess,
              length=5000,
              temperature=1.0,
              prefix="Sew on jet pearls and veiling.",
              nsamples=5,
              batch_size=1,
              top_k=60
              )



Tongue and Hairband Pattern,
"Starting at center, ch 6. Join with sl st to form ring. 1st rnd: 10 sc in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 sc in each pice of loops. 3rd rnd: * Sc in next rnd, 2 sc in next rnd. Repeat from * around (30 sc). 4th rnd: * Sc in 4th dc, ch 3, sc in next dc making 10 sc in join, repeat from * around. 9th rnd: Sc in each st around, join. 10th rnd: * Ch 5, skip 1 dc, sc in next dc making 3 dc. Repeat from * around. 11th rnd: * Sc in next dc, ch 3, sc in next dc making 14 dc. Repeat from * around. 12th rnd: * Sc in next dc, ch 3, sc in next dc making 26 dc. Repeat from * around. 13th rnd: Sc in single crochet, ch 3, sc in next dc making 16 dc. 14th rnd: Sc in each dc around, join. 15th rnd: * Sl st in next row, sc in next st. Repeat from * around. 16th rnd: Sl st in each dc and in each st of last rnd. 17th (even, no frills) rnd: Sc in each st of last rnd, ch 3, sc in each dc of last rnd. 18th and 19th rnds: Work even until piece measures 5 inches in diameter, join. 20th rnd: * Ch 6, ssc in each st around. Join. 21st rnd: Sl st in each st of last rnd. Break off and use to make a pom pom of hat, leaving a 4.5-diameter rim. Turn edges of rim aside to form a circle. With white, make sc in circles around edge of rim. Make another pom pom of hat. Make a second Pom Pom. Join, chain 24. With White, work even until piece measures 5 inches from starting, join. Repeat steps 2nd and 3rd rnds of Hairband Pattern, ending as follows: 1st and 2nd rnds: Repeat 2nd rnd. 3rd rnd: 2 sc in each loop, 9 sc. 4th rnd: 2 sc in each st. 5th rnd: 2 sc in each st, 10 sc. 6th rnd: * 2 sc in next st, 1 sc in next st. Repeat from * around; join. 7th rnd: Sl st in each st of last rnd. Break off. 9th rnd: With White, make sc in each st around. * 2 sc in next st, rep from * around. Break off. 12th rnd: * Sc in next 5 sts, ch 3. Repeat from * around. 13th rnd: Sl st in each st. Break off. 14th rnd: * 2 sc in next sc, 1 sc in next ch-3 sp. Repeat from * around. 15th rnd: Sl st in each st throughout. Join. 16th rnd: Sl st in each st around. 17th rnd: Working in front loop only, sc in each st around ending with sc in back loop at end, join in front loop of each rnd.

Flowers: Ch 2. 1st rnd: Sc in first d, sc in each d but do not join rnds. 2nd rnd: Sc in each d around. 3rd rnd: Sc in each d. Break off. Make a flower in any color. Sew flower to brim. Sew to flower. Sew on hat as illustrated. Sew on hat as shown."


Sparkling Cane Lacy Swim Hat,
"CROWN: Ch 3, join with sl st to form ring. 1st rnd: 4 sc in ring. Join with sl st in 1st sc. 2nd rnd: 3 sc in each st around. 3rd rnd: Sc in each sc around. 4th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 5th rnd: Sc in each sc around. Repeat 3rd rnd until piece measures 10 inches. Break off. Make beads as illustrated.


Cookie Hat Pattern,
"Ch 4. 1st rnd: Sc in each st around. Join with sl st in 1st s c. 2nd rnd: Sc in each sc to within 25 sc, * skip 2 sts as before, sc in next sc. Repeat from * to within 20 sc. 3rd, 4th and 5th rnds: Sc in each sc, * skip 2 sts as before, sc in next. repeat from * to within 25 sc. 6th rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd. 7th rnd: Skipping next (skip 2 sts as before) sc, * skip 2 sts as before, sc in next 2 sts. repeat from * to within 30 sc. 8th rnd: Skipping next (skip 2 sts as before) sc, * skip 2 sts as before, sc in next 2 sts. repeat from * to within 45 sc. 9th rnd: Sc in each st, * ch 1, sc in each remaining st. repeat from * to within 1 sc. 10th rnd: Sc in each st, * 2 sc in 1st sc, sc in next sc. repeat from * to within 15 dc. 11th rnd: Sc in each st to center, * skip 2 dc and each remaining dc (as before), sc in next dc. repeat from * to within 5 dc. 12th rnd: Break yarn, leaving an end for sewing. Sew onto hat.


The Queen of the Sea Hat Pattern #2092,
"CROWN: (Make a magic circle.) Using FDC 8 as level, ch 1. Join. * Ch 5 and draw through front loops only, ch 4, d c in circle. repeat from * around. Join. * Ch 3, d c in next sc, ch 3, d c in next sc. repeat from * around. Join. * Ch 3, d c in next sc, ch 3, d c in next 3 sc. ch 3, d c in center of next d c. ch 3, d c in each of next 4 sc. ch 3, d c in each of next 6 sts. join. * Ch 3 and d c in next 3 dc, ch 3, d c in next 5 dc. ch 3, d c in each of next 9 dc, ch 3. repeat from * around. Join. * Ch 3 and d c in next 5 dc, ch 3, d c in next 6 dc. ch 3, d c in each of next 12 dc, ch 3. repeat from * around. Join. * Ch 3, d c in next 4 dc. ch 3, d c in each of next 11 dc, ch 3. repeat from * around. join. * Ch 3 and d c in next 5 dc, ch 3, d c in each of next 13 dc, ch 3. loop st in next dc, 3 sc in last dc. ch 1, turn. Repeat ch 3, turn. 
DINNER: Ch 2, in front loop of loop st that came before, make d c in each st around, join.  
BRIM: Ch 2, in next st, make 1 sc in center dc of each of next 6 sts & d c in next 4 sts (100 bp group), join.
RING: Starting at center of d c group, ch 1, join.  
FLOOWER: Ch 2, dc in each dc around, join only if you change group twice. 
WING: Ch 2, dc in each dc around, join only if you change group twice. 
BOW: Ch 2, * ch-6 sp, ch 6 sc (1 ch-6 sp). Repeat from * around. Join.
Brim with wire: Ch 2, dc in each dc around.
Brim ends with wire: Ch 1.


A Thousand Pearls,
"Crown. Using DMC, ch 30. Join with sl st to form ring. Round 1: Ch 1, dc in ring. Round 2: 3 dc in each st for 9 rounds. Round 3: * 3 dc in next st, dc in next st (this is a dc2tog). Repeat from * around. Round 4: * 3 dc in next st, dc in next st, repeat from * around.

Round 5: * 3 dc in next st, dc in next st, repeat from * around. Round 6: * 3 dc in next st, dc in next sc, ch-1. Repeat from * around. Round 7: * 6 sc in next st, dc in next st. Repeat from * around. Round 8: * 3 dc in next st, dc in next dc, ch-1. Repeat from * around. Round 9: * 3 dc in next st, dc in next st. Repeat from * round 15 times. Dec 4, weave a thread. Pick up the last of the stitches with the tail on (dec by putting on tail piece). Now weave a long string, pick up only the last 3 sc. Dec 9, weave a long string. Ch 1, join to the join.

Round 10: * dc in next st, * sc in next st. Repeat from * around. Round 11: * 3 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Make a loop in each st, insert hook in back loop of sc's on both rounds and pull loop through, yarn over and draw through 2 loops on hook (instead of having it beig in front) and pull loop through. Repeat from * around, ending with * dc in top of first st. Break off.

Chain 1, s c in 1st dc, ch 5, dc in each st around. Break yarn and use wire to finish off.

Ch 2, 1 s c in each of next 5 sts. Ch 2, s c in each sc around, ending with 1 s c each ch. Fasten thread.

Flowers. Starting at front of crown, ch 2. Join with sl st in 1st sc, sc in each st around. Break yarn. Using 3 strands of D, ch 1 working 2 s c in top of 1st s c.

Flowers: Ch 2, s c in first 2 sts, in next st make dc make dc2tog. Repeat from * in all 5 sts. Break yarn. Use cable to finish off. Sew flowers to crown."



Crocheted Fanny Cap Pattern #2058,
"CROWN: With double strand of H, sc in 4th ch from hook. Join, but don't join this with a join to the first sc of a rnd. Ch 3, turn.

2nd and 3rd rnds: Sc in each st, 1 sc in every st around. Join. Repeat 2nd rnd until piece measures 9 inches. Break yarn, leaving an End for storing. Make 8 more Fanny Cap rnds as desired.
  Ch 3, turn.  Make 2 sc in each st. Break yarn leaving a end. Make 2 more Hat Bases (3-inch in diameter or less) as desired. Divide brim into 4 quarters and make a chain 72 inches long. Make 20 more Fanny Bases as desired."



Tom Boy Pocket Bamboozles,
"CH 4 (Shell Round): Work 12 rnds of dc using d c. Do not join rnds, and skip each rnd. 1st rnd: With 2 strands of yarn, (ch 1, turn) c in each ch-1 space of ch-0 - 4 loops. 2nd rnd: * ch 3, s c in next s c, repeat from * until there are 9 loops. 3rd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd only change to C and ch-1, (b, turn) c in next s c of ch-0 - 12 loops. 4th rnd: * ch 3, s c in next s c, repeat from * 4 times and change to D. 5th rnd: * Ch 3, s c in next s c, repeat from * once and change to C. 6th rnd: * Ch 3, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice and change to D. 7th rnd: Same as 3rd. 8th rnd: Same as 3rd and 4th rnds rnds. 9th rnd: Same as 7th rnd. 10th rnd: Ch 1, FDC 32, dc, sl st in next s c of ch-1. Break yarn.

Row 11: With Color, ch 2, 5 sc in first st, * skip 2 s c of ch-3, s c in next s c, repeat from * all around. Break yarn.

Row 12: With Color, join Color (shell), (ch 1, turn) c in each s c. Break yarn.

Row 13: Ch 1, FDC 28, dc, sl st in next d (dc). Break yarn.

Row 14: Ch 2, s c in next d, * skip next s c, s c in next d, repeat from * all around. Break yarn.

Row 15: Work 2 s c in each d c, joining Color (shell) to begin. 3rd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd, (ch 1, turn) c in each of next 2 d c, * s c in next s c, repeat from * all around. Break yarn.



Hair of the Wolf,
"CROWN: Ch 50, s c in 2nd ch from hook, make 8 sc, turn.
2nd rnd: Sc in each sc around (20 sc). 3rd rnd: *(1 sc in next 2 sc, 2 sc in next dc) in next dc, 3 sc in next dc. Repeat from * (60 sc). 4th rnd: Work 3 sc in each sc, make 4 sc in each sc (60 sc). Next rnd: **(1 sc in next 2 sc, 2 sc in next dc) in next 2 sc, 3 sc in next sc. Repeat from * (80 sts). Repeat the 4th rnd 4 more times. Then work 2 rnds of sc each scarier side only (40 sc).

Back Piece: Ch 8, s c in 2nd st from hook, make 6 s c, turn.

Repeat 2nd rnd until piece measures 5 inches in diameter, turn.

FACING: S c in 1st sc, make 20 sc in ring, turn.

Swing ends of brim all around and sew in place.

Brim. Fold brim closed and twist to form ball and sew firmly to front of hat.



The End…."
Round 1 (Make 2 s c in each st). 
2180 s c at beginning (10 sc in all). 
2160 s c in 1st s c of ch-1 (10 sc in ch-1 and 2 sc in next st). 
2155 s c in next s c, ch 5, s c in next s c, * ch 6, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice, ch 6, s c in next s c. 
2120 s c in next s c, ch 5. 
2120 s c in next s c. 
2160 s c in ch-8, * ch 5, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice, ch6, s c in next s c. 
2180 s c in ch-8, * ch 5, s c in 1st s c of ch-8, repeat from * twice (30 stitches in all). 
2140 s c in remaining s c, ch 2 (does not count as ch-2), * skip 2nd st, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice, ch 6. 
2120 s c in ch-2, * ch 6, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice, ch 5, s c in 1st s c of ch-2, * skip 2nd st, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice, ch 6. 
2160 s c in next s c, * ch 6, s c in ch-8, repeat from * twice, ch 5, s c in 1st s c of ch-5, * skip 2nd st, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice, ch 6, s c in ch-5. 
2160 s c in next s c, and ch 2. 
Now ch 5, s c in ch-2, * skip 2nd st, s c in next s c, repeat from * twice. 
2160 s c in next s c, ch 5. 
2160 s c in ch-2, * skip 2nd st, s c in next st, repeat from * twice, ch 6. 
2160 s c in ch-6, * ch 5, s c in next st, repeat from * twice, ch 7. 
2160 s c in first st, s c in next st, and repeat from * once (60 stitches). 
Skip next 2 sts, s c in first st. 
2120 s c in next s c, ch 7 and turn. 
2160 s c in first st of ch-7 and s c in each st for 1 minute. 



Shelter in the Woods,
"CROWN. As usual, make a magic circle with 6 ch-10's, ch 2, 8 dcs, 2 rows of sl st, and a magic circle. 1st rnd: Ch 4. 2nd rnd: 3 dc in each st around. Join to BLO of the ch-10(9) for the first rnd of the work. 3rd rnd: * 2 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Join to BLO of the ch-10(9) for the next rnd. 4th rnd: Ch 3. 5th rnd: 2 dc in same st as * and in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Join to BLO of the ch-10(9) for the following rnd of the work. 5th rnd: 3 dc in same st as * and in next dc, dc in next dc. repeat from * around. Join. 6th rnd: Ch 2, dc in 1st dc, dc in 1st dc of a ch-2 group. 7th rnd: * 2 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around, joining to BLO of the ch-2 group for first dc. 8th rnd: Ch 1, dc in 2nd dc, dc in next dc. 9th rnd: ** 2 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from ** around, splitting yarn. 10th rnd: Sl st in each dc, making a chain 36 inches long (4 loops) in length. 11th rnd: Ch 1, dc in 2nd dc, dc in next dc. 12th rnd: Sl st in each dc, increasing to 36 dc in each rnd on every rnd without increasing. 13th rnd: Ch 1, dc in each dc, increasing at the end of every rnd. 14th rnd: With Magic Circle, 1 dc in each dc. 15th rnd: * 1 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * Around. Join to BLO of 2-dc clover group for the 1st rnd of ch 1. 16th rnd: Ch 1, sc in each dc, increasing to 36 dc at end of every rnd. (60 sc). 17th rnd: Sc in each dc, increasing to 64 dc at end of every rnd without increasing. 18th rnd: Sl st in each dc, making a chain 1 and 2_ inches to length. 19th rnd: Sl st in each dc. 20th rnd: Sl st in each dc. 21st rnd: * 1 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around.

SIDE. Cut a piece of 12-inch aluminum foil. Lightly paint with color of your choice. Break off at both ends and spray metal mesh with some WD40. Cut another piece, then break off. Work side as follows: Sc in each of next 3 dc, being careful not to twist yarn. Sl st in each dc. Work 1 side. Break off. With long yarn use yarn to weave in ends. Tie. Sew to tip of cap as you wish."


BLADE OF THE ETERNIAL LASER 666 BLADE

Rnd 1: Ch 5, 10 sc in ring. Join with sl st to form ring. Ch 3 turn. 2nd rnd: * Ch 12, sl st in next fpdc, repeat from * around. Make 3 sc in each of the next 9 fpdc, * 1 sc in next sc, sl st in next fpdc. Repeat from * around. Join. Ch 3 turn. 3rd rnd: * Ch 3, sl st in next fpdc, repeat from * around. Ch 3 turn. 4th rnd: * Ch 4, sl st in next dc, repeat from * around. Ch 4 turn. 5th rnd: * Ch 5, sl st in next fpdc, repeat from * around, * 2 sl sts in next dc, 1 sl st in next fpdc. Repeat from * around, join. Ch 3 turn. 6th rnd: * Ch 4, sl st in next st, repeat from * around. Ch 4 turn. 7th rnd: * Ch 6, sl st in next st, repeat from * around. Ch 2 do not have to be complete, you could either sl st or dc. But make sure the last rnd to point is complete. 8th rnd: * Ch 6, sl st in next fpdc, repeat from * around. Ch 6 turn. 9th rnd: * Ch 4, sl st in next sts, repeat from * around. Ch 50 turn. 10th rnd: * Ch 2, sc in 2nd ch-2 sp, sl st into next dc, repeat from * around. Ch 2 and ch 6 turn. 11th rnd: * Ch 5, sl st in next dc, repeat from * around. Ch 5 turn. 12th rnd: * Ch 5, sl st in next dc, repeat from * around. Ch 5 turn. 13th rnd: * Ch 6, sl st in next dc, repeat from * around. Ch 6 turn.


Princess Twilight Sparkle Hat (Crochet #2112),
"This hat begins with a Magic Loop (see link above) and ends with a Magic Circle, making 16 Magic Circle motifs in all. Sl st in each stitch.

Starting with Magic Loop (make 4 Magic Loop motifs, work 18 Magic Circle motifs in one stitch), ch 20. 2nd ROUND: *2 dc in magic circle, dc in next dc, skip 1 st, 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * 5 times. End off. 3rd ROUND: FDC 34, join."


Crud-Crowned Spruce Hat,
"CROWN: S c in 2nd st from hook, turn. 2 s c in each ch. 3 s c in next st. 4 s c in next st. 5 s c in next st. This is repeat of last rnd. 3 more rnds. 6 s c in last (7 st or 32 sts). 7 s c in 1st s c (counts as first st). 8 st on rnd. 9 rnds. 10 more rnds. 11 s c in next st, count back 2 sts at front of rnd and at this place, s c in each st, h dc in each st for 9 rnds (27 sts, 32 sts). Work as for crown, working into the back loops only, 3 times. Cut yarn. Use last sl st to sew crown to crown. Trim ends with Velcro."



Crocheted Pom-Pom Flute Pattern #2131
"Break yarn 8. Then with Orange, chain 6. Make 8 - 10 sc in ring. Join with sl st to first chain sc. 1st rnd: Ch 2, sc in second ch from hook. [ch 2, sc in next ch] twice, skip next ch, [ch 2, sc in next ch] twice. Repeat from * (8 dc). Join to first sc, ch 1, turn, ch 1, turn. 2nd rnd: Work sc in both loops of each loop and in each st, breaking yarn on rnd 3 and leaving a long tail. Join to sl st, ch 1, turn. 3rd rnd: Work sc in each st, increasing in every 2nd st. Now, work sc in each st, increasing with each inc. Join. Ch 1, turn, 5 sc in each sc. When last loop is worked, ch 1. Break yarn and using orange, make a magic ring, chain 12. Make four tr's. 6th rnd: Working through both loops of each st, sc around to correspond. Break yarn, leaving a long tail. Use this as a yarn hook and make sc in each st of rnd 6. 7th rnd: Sc in each st, increasing in every 2nd st. Join, ch 1, turn, ch 1, turn. 8th rnd: Work sc in each st and in each sc of last rnd. Break yarn, leaving long tail.

Make a magic 8-segment lacy in top of hat. 9th rnd: Sc in each sc around. Join to first sc, ch 1, turn. 10th rnd: Sc in each st around and in each st, increasing 8 sc evenly around. Join, ch 1, turn. 11th rnd: Working through both loops of each st, sc around. Join, ch 1, turn. 12th rnd: Working through both loops of each st, sc around, increasing about 4 sc evenly around every rnd. Join. 13th rnd: Sl st in each sc around. Sl st in each ch of each st around. Sl st in each st, ch 1, turn, turn. 14th rnd: Starch, sc in each st around. Sl st twice, ch 1, turn. 15th rnd: Repeat 16th rnd. Sl st twice, ch 1, turn. 16th rnd: Work 4 sc in each sc around. Join, ch 1, turn, turn. 17th rnd: Sl st in each st around. Sl st, ch 1, turn. Break yarn leaving an end. Sew to top of hat."




Hat Made In the Sea,
"Fringed Hat Made To Sorrow From the Fall of the Sky.
Round 1. Start with single strand wool. Work 2 dc in 2nd st from hook, * ch 2, skip 2 sts, dc in next st (this is a dc toc). Repeat from * 4 times. Join yarn to 1st dc, DC in center dc of next shell, * skip 2 sts, dc in next st (this is a dc toc). Repeat from * 4 times, join yarn to center dc of next shell. Break yarn and give hat as a gift to the person you'd like to honor. Make a row neck hat or a scarf.

Round 2. Ch 2, dc in 2nd st from hook, * skip 2 sts, DC in next st. Repeat from * 4 times. Join yarn to top of dc, DC in center of next shell, * skip 2 sts, dc in next st. Repeat from * 4 times. Join to top of dc, DC in center of next shell. Break yarn and give hat as a gift to the person you'd like to honors. Make a scarf.

Round 3. Ch 2, dc in 2nd st from hook, * skip 3 sts, DC in next st. Repeat from * 4 times. Join to top of dc, DC in center of next shell, * ch 1, skip 2 sts, dc in next se. dc in next st. dc in top of ch loop (this is a dc sp). dc in next st. dc in next dc, * ch 1, dc in next st. dc in next sp. dc in top of ch loop. crochet off. Break yarn and give hat as a gift to the person you'd like to honor. Make a row collar.

Round 4. Ch 2, dc in 2nd st from hook, * skip ch 3, dc in next st. Repeat from * 4 times. Join, DC in center of next shell, * ch 1, dc in next st. dc in next st. dc in 2nd ch. dc in top of hook. dc in ch 1 and each dc of the next row. dc in next st, dc in center of next shell. dc in next st. dc in next 2 sts, d c in top of next dc, DC in center of next shell, * ch 1, dc in next st. dc in next ST. dc in next dc, dc in top of ch loop. dc in next st, dc in center of next shell. dc in next dc, dc in sc (this is a dc sp). dc in next dc, ch 2, dc in next dc. dc in the top st of ch loop. dc in next dc. dc in top st of ch loop. dc in next st. dc in ch 1 and each dc of the next row. dc in next dc, dc in next st. dc in next dc. dc in ch 1 and each dc of the next row. dc in next dc, dc in next dc. dc in center of next shell. dc in next dc, ch 2, dc in same st. dc in top st of ch loop. dc in next dc, dc in center of next shell


Sparkling Water Cat Pattern,
"Cut the thread. Join to form a ring.

  Attach yarn to 15 count s c around. (15)

1st rnd: 2 sc in each ch. Break yarn. Fasten thread. (15)

Make 2 sc in each sc around.

2nd rnd: Sc in 2nd ch from hook, sc in each other ch and each ch around.

3rd rnd: Sc in each st around.

4th rnd: Working in double digits make sc, sc in each st to within first sc or ch-3 and repeat (15).

5th rnd: Sc in each of next 4 sts, * sc, skip next st, sc in next st, repeat from * around, leaving 3 sc between top and bottom.

6th rnd: Ch 1, dc in back loop of the ch-5 repeat around to within the ch-3.

7th rnd: Sc in each st around.

8th rnd: Ch 1, dc in next 4 sts, skip next st, * sc in next st, dc in next st, repeat from * around, leaving 1 sc between top and bottom.

9th to 10th rnds incl: Ch 1, dc first, sc in each st around.

11th to 12th rnd: Ch 1, * dc first, sc in next st, dc in next st, dc in each st until work measures 6 inches from ch-4, and dc for 2 inches in last st.

14th and 15th rnds: Sc in each st around.

16th and 17th rnds: Sc in each st around. Work 3 rnds without increasing.

18th, 19th and 20th rnds: * Dc in next st, sc in next. Repeat from * 3 more times.
  Do not increase this way for 1st rnd and next rnd.

21st rnd: Sc in each st around.

22nd rnd: Dc in next st, sc in each st to close.

23rd rnd: * Sc in next st, dc in next st. Repeat from * 3 more times.

24th rnd: * Dc in next st, dc in next st. Repeat from * 3 more times.

25th, 26th and 27th rnds: * Make sc between two st. Sl st in sc formed between groups. Do not break off yarn.

28th rnd: Sc in each st around.

29th rnd: * Dc in next st, ch 5, skip 2 sts (sc), dc in next st. Repeat from * 3 times.

30th rnd: * Skip next st, sc in next 5 sts. Repeat from * 3 times, s c in ch 5 sp, skip next st (dec), * ch 5, s c around, skip next 2 sts (dec), dc in next st, ch 2 and in ch of 2 loop, 2 dc in each st around.

Join.

31st and 32nd rnds: Sc in each st around.

33rd to 34th rnds incl: Work in single digits make sc. sl st in next st, ch 2, skip next st, sc in next 5 sts, ch 5, next 2 dc in each st.

Repeat these 3 rnds. end off.

Repeat the last rnd once."





Prompt: The Enterprise dodged a laser blast and accelerated hard.


The Enterprise dodged a laser blast and accelerated hard. The first few miles were uneventful, with no major damage. The next couple miles were more challenging, stretching nearly seven miles at a time. About halfway through the mile, however, something happened to the Enterprise that made it wobble a bit (this is often known as a change in direction) during each change. So to the right of the Starboard Front, the Enterprise turned back. At the same time she turned she was accelerating hard against a wall. In the middle of the change, she turned, but her ship remained perfectly still, and she swung into a 90 degree turn. The ship was carried over and through the 90 degree turn, then dropped back to her starting point. To the left of the Starboard Back, she turned. The ship was carried through the 90th turn, then turned. Then the back was turned, and it was carried straight and out through the back. To the left of the Starboard Back, the left of the Starboard Front, the left of this change in direction, and then the right of the Change in direction. The right of the change in direction was carried straight through, so that there were 8 inches between change and Starboard Front. To the right of these points, the left front turned and the ship was carried through each direction. Hereafter, and throughout the rest of the course, proceed as follows: 1) At the first breaking of Starport 1, or the start of a Starport, turn the Enterprise's outermost tip right and work center-to-center, then work under it twice. Break both ends into four pieces. 2) Attach to Starport 1 with 1 double knot, and work 1 tr in 1st tr. Break off. 3) Attach to Starport 1 with 9 double knots, and work 8 tr in each tr as before, then work 1 tr in each tr of each of 2 and 3 d c of Star. Divide the resulting double knot into 3 pieces, each having one double knot. Now work double sl st over the double knot; making sure that the double knot is evenly distributed. 4) Attach to Starport 1 with 5 double knots, and work 6 double sl st over the double knot of each tr. Break off. 5) Attach to Starport left with 2 double knots; work 1 str in each tr. Break off. 6) Attach to Starport right with 1 double knot, work 1 str in each tr. Break off. 7) Attach to Starport end with 1 double knot, work 1 str in last tr. Break off. 8) Attach as before to the start of Colonnade, carry in right hand, working d c hard, then work in double sl sts throughout, making 6 sl sts in 2nd & 3rd ch. Break off. 9) Attach to Colonnade, work 1 (long) sc in each st for 1 inch. Break off. 10) Attach and work sl sts over Colonnade. 11) Attach to Starport and work d c over Star.

Prompt: The adventurers crested the mountain pass and the valley was laid before them.

The adventurers crested the mountain pass and the valley was laid before them. Climb over boulders and water-courses, while the party stays concealed. Crawl through a thick wood for a while, and pass through a series of ditches and culverts. Then descend through the chinks of wood, over obstacles, and into the middle of the valley, where the water courses at right angles to the river. Continue around, in a round piece, for a distance of about fifty rods. Turn right and leave the wood. Climb up in the opposite direction, and make a left head turn. Pass through and through another ditch and a culvert, and through a series of next ditches and culverts. Cut a piece of wire about six inches wide and four inches deep, and hang it up in a small chateau in the mountain pass. Sew on hat top, and trim as desired."


The adventurers crested the mountain pass and the valley was laid before them. The land extended from north to south approximately 5 miles, reaching to an elevation of approximately 16 feet. No grasses were to be seen, but many vines had recently sprung up around the rim to form a dense forest.

At the front, 5 feet from the rim, there were 20 or 30 groups of goblins all wearing white, each having 3 hands and wearing dark gray cloaks. 1 set of goblins were stationed in a square, next to a group of goblins on the rim, making 4 groups of 5 goblins per square. 3 squares away, a group of goblins of differing sizes and colors were all to be seen. 2 squares away, the 3-piece Goblin Hat was worn, together with gold hoops, 2-spoked feet, white bow, double d ring, and 2 hearts."


Prompt: The wizard grinned up at her.


The wizard grinned up at her. "Well, you won."

"Thank you, wizard," Chastity said. Her hand slipped through his.

"Someday I might be able to meet the wizards again," the wizard said.

"I'll be sure to update you when he changes that."

Someday? Then why were you going to the gym on a Monday afternoon?

"I already started, then again I should have started," Chastity said. The wizard waved the book to her and gave her the first riddle of the week.

"Riddle: How many eggs will you make?"

"As many as you like," Chastity said.

Riddle: How many strands of thread will you weave with this riddle?

"Make 25, then split 15 threads into 1_" and tie in a bow."

Riddle: How many pieces of yarn can be used?
"Use each inch in the beginning and work off the next 30" every riddle.
 Riddle: How many balls will fit in the eyes before they become droopy?

"Rnd: Rnd 1: Holding 21 sps or 30 oz, ch 6, turn. Rnd 2: Ch 4, * skip 2 sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat from * 11 times; join to 2nd ch. Rnd 3: Ch 5, s c in each d c made; join to 1 st before. Rnd 4: Ch 4, s c in each d c, make 2 dc in next dc, * skip 2 sc, 2 dc in next dc. Repeat from * around, join to 1 st before. Rnd 5: Ch 5, s c in each d c making 18 dc, ch 3, turn. Rnd 6: Ch 5, s c in each d c making 7 dc, ch 3, turn. Rnd 7: Sl st in each dc making 8 dc as before, * skip 2 sc, dc2tog. 3 dc in next dc. ch 5. 4 dc2tog, 2 dc in ch-5 of turning chain. dc in each dc making 14 dc. 2 dc in each dc making 18 dc. ch 2, turn. Rnd 8: Ch 1, * 2 dc in ch-5 of turning chain, dc in next dc making 28 dc. ch 5. 2 dc in next dc. skip 2 dc, dc near turning chain. ch 5. dc2tog, dc near turning chain, pick up hook only. 2 dc in next dc. ch 6, turn. Rnd 9-10: Ch 5, s c in each sc making 15 dc, ch 3, s c in s c of next 8 dc, ch 5, s c in each dc, * skip 2 sc, dc in next dc making 16 dc. ch 6. skip 2 sc, dc 2tog. Ch 5. skip 3 dc of next 10 dc, sc in next dc making 16 dc. ch-3, turn. Rnd 11: Ch 5, s c in each ch making 8 dc, ch 3, s c in next dc making 24 dc, ch 3, s c in next dc, * dc2tog, dc in next dc making 32 dc. ch 5. s c in next dc. skip next dc, make dc on ch-3. repeat from * around. join, turn. Rnd 12: Ch 3, s c in each dc making 6 sts, ch 3, s c in next st making 24 sts. break yarn, weave in ends.



Black Forest Cake

1 (18.25-ounce) package chocolate cake mix
1 can prepared coconut–pecan frosting
3/4 cup vegetable oil
4 large eggs
1 cup semi-sweet chocolate chips
3/4 cup butter or margarine
1 2/3 cup granulated sugar
2 cups all-purpose flour

Don't forget garnishes such as: Fudge-stuffed eyes, flower-tipped rose rings, and chocolate-covered grapes.
This piece is one that looks great both in person and on the cake.



Prompt: Dr. Malcolm opened the door to the kitchen and gasped. Velociraptors!

Dr. Malcolm opened the door to the kitchen and gasped. Velociraptors! "Rasp, rasp!" croaked Dr. Malcolm.

"Hi, Vel and I hope you're having too much cake," said Croquet Crochet crocheted hat.

"Thanks for giving to the homeless!" exclaimed Velcro-Corded Bunny Crochet Hat.

"So are those things purple or blue?"
"I won't say," said Velcro-Corded Bunny Crochet Hat.

"Oh my," shouted Velcro-Corded Bunny Crochet Hat.

"Oh my! You are awesome!"
"Darling," croaked Velcro-Corded Bunny Crochet Hat. "I hope those were cute eyes!"

"What is this crazy thing?!" gasped Velcro-Corded Bunny Crochet Hat as he stuffed the hat closed and stuffed his ears down. "That's a rabbit!"

"That was a bunny," laughed Velcro-Corded Bunny Crochet Hat.

"Thank you. Thank you for creating my new favorite hat. Make it as cute as you like, but don't make it over 50. It could easily stretch with some stretch, but try to be creative. It will be your hat all life. Happy bunny hunting!



Cedar Creek is a village square in central Ohio about a mile east of Ohio State University.

"Cedar Creek,"

"Okay, the first thing you're offered is a picnic lunch. For four o'clock, people line up on both sides. For two o'clock, families circle each other on circles.

"For the second o'clock, everyone gathers in a circle.

"For the third o'clock, everyone gathers in a circle with back to one another, then breaks off.

"Next, everyone gathers in front of the table.

"Next, everyone starts to walk.

"Next, everyone leaves the circle and circles in front of each other all around.

"Now, for the final o'clock, everyone breaks off and circles again behind each other.

"For the last o'clock, everybody returns to the circle of the first break.

"At the end of last circle, everyone joins in.

"You should be able to see about 50 people to the left of I-70 in front of the break. For about 5 of the last six people, split up and follow the directions above."

Mingle in style.




Sherlock frowned. "Now, what are you guys going to do with this guy? All right, then," said the man.

"How 'bout a little more fun, please?" said the woman.

"I said, 'You guys go have some fun,'" sighed the man.

"Got it. You know what we're gonna do next, don't you?" said the woman.

"I'll go up in a tree and make a bow, made of branches and leaves, and tie a ribbon through the base of it," said the man.
"Hurry up. We must get this tree started. Now make a stitch of yarn 4" long in half and work 3 rnds of s c in each side.

"
Continue working s c in the tree until piece measures 4"" wide. Join with a sl st to the 3rd st of ch-8.

"
"Brim!" cried the woman. "Pull a loop of fabric through the 5th st and sew to hat, finishing at one end."


"Cord! Tie an  inch rope thru 3 loops at bottom of chain and tie securely to 1st row of the Rope. Stuff with yarn. Sew to begin of Belt as illustrated".

"
"Rid yourself of all leather. Turn, with the back of brim toward you. Make a magic circle and hdc in ring."


Prompt: Elizabeth laughed at Mr. Darcy.

Elizabeth laughed at Mr. Darcy. "Well, my dear Darcy," she said, "I've always wanted a nice cloak. Make a long, narrow strip, two and a half feet in length, and sew to the front of the hat. "Next row: Ch 4, *2 c in back loop-sl st tog; rep from * across strip, ending with 5 sec dc in 1st dc. From now on, when a chain is worked across strip, double every c tog.

Rows 4 through 7: Ch 2, *join to 2 dc of 1st dc on 3rd row, ch 1, skip 1 ch tog and repeat. Repeat from * around (96 sts), join to 2 dc of first ch-1 work.

Rows 8 – 9: Ch 1, *1 dc in 2nd st from hook, 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * around, joining to first ch-1 work.

Rows 10 – 11: Ch 1, *2 dc in 2nd st from hook, 3 dc in next st. Repeat from * around, ending with ch 1, dc in 1st dc of round. From now on, sl st in 2nd st from hook.

Rows 12 – 13: Ch 1, *2 dc in 2nd st from hook, skip 2 sts, 1 dc in next st, dc in next st. Repeat from * around, ending with ch 1, dc in 1st dc of round. From now on, sl st in first dc.

Rows 14 – 16: Ch 1, *2 dc in 2nd st from hook, dc in next st. repeat from * around, joining to first dc work of round. Continue to work in this manner, being sure that last chain is joined at the back. From now on, sl st in first dc.

Rows 17 – 19: Ch 1, *6 3 dc in 2nd st from hook; dc in nextst st, *6 dc in 2nd st from hook, dc in next 2 sts. repeat from * around, joining to first dc work of round. In next row, ch 1, dc in first dc, *2 dc in next st, dc in next dc. repeat from * around. Join to first dc work of round.

Rows 20 – 21: Ch 1, *12 dc, dc in next st. repeat from * around. Join to first dc work of round. Work without changing colors until piece is 6 inches from center crown. Then, work in this manner for 4 straight rows. Make a magic circle, crochet hook.

Rows 22 and 23: Ch 1, *2 dc in next st, dc in next st. repeat from * around. Join to first dc work of round.

Rows 24 – 26: Ch 1, p dc in 2nd st from hook. (24 sts and 24 dc)

Rows 27 – 28: Ch 1, *1 dc in ch-1 sp. repeat from * around. Join to next dc work of round.

Rows 29 and 30: Ch 1, *2 dc in ch-1 sp. repeat from * around. * ch 4, dc in next sp. repeat from * around. Join to first dc work of round.

Rows 31 and 32: Ch 1, *1 dc in ch-1 sp. repeat from * around. ch 3, dc in next ch-1 sp. repeat from * around. Join to first dc work of round.

Rows 33 and 34: Ch 1, *2 dc in ch-1 sp. repeat from * around. * ch 2, dc in next st. repeat from * around, join to first dc work of round.

Rows 35 and 36: Ch 1, *2 dc in ch-1 sp. repeat from * around. * ch 4, dc in next sp. repeat from * around, join to first dc work of round.

Rows 37 and 38: Ch 1, *ch 4, dc in next dc. repeat from * around. * ch 2, dc in next dc. repeat from * around. * ch 1, (ch 4, dc inc) all around, join to 1st dc work of round.

"



Started from scratch (vanilla) and trained on HAT3000 crochet patterns

Training...
[10 | 26.86] loss=2.31 avg=2.31
[20 | 42.80] loss=2.50 avg=2.41
[30 | 59.03] loss=1.50 avg=2.10
[40 | 75.10] loss=1.20 avg=1.87
[50 | 91.05] loss=1.97 avg=1.89
[60 | 106.96] loss=1.82 avg=1.88
[70 | 122.87] loss=1.59 avg=1.84
[80 | 138.83] loss=0.60 avg=1.68
[90 | 154.84] loss=1.33 avg=1.64
[100 | 170.84] loss=1.35 avg=1.61
[110 | 186.80] loss=2.16 avg=1.66
[120 | 202.71] loss=0.84 avg=1.59
[130 | 218.65] loss=1.41 avg=1.57
[140 | 234.61] loss=2.11 avg=1.61
[150 | 250.66] loss=1.03 avg=1.57
[160 | 266.67] loss=0.83 avg=1.52
interrupted
Saving checkpoint/run1/model-163


gpt2.generate(sess,
              length=1023,
              temperature=1.0,
              prefix="Harry and Draco glared at each other.",
              nsamples=5,
              batch_size=1,
              top_k=60
              )
              
              
Harry and Draco glared at each other.
"Why are you smiling?" Snape asked, ignoring the sneer in Harry's tone.
"Liar" Harry snarled. "Never forget who made you into a boy, Potter, but we're not here to bully you." Harry grinned. "We would not wish to be deceived as to who we are and how the world works." Harry smiled shyly and moved his hand under the brim of his hat. "Now, as you will come to understand, this hat is made to honor one of Harry's favorite colors, a shade named 'blood'. You see, 'blood' is red. So, if I were to wear this hat, would the color make its way to my head? Or could I always change it if needed?" Harry asked.
"You could always change to any shade that you wished," Draco explained."


"Good…so why don't you tell me about Hogwarts as my new hat?" Harry asked.
"And you can do that as well, but just be sure to ask for permission at least a month in advance. This is where you'll find my lab kits." Harry pulled out his Harry's lab kit and marked out the sizes according to the Hogwarts hat he was making for the class, and went off to have the fabulously talented, Mary Lou, do her magic. While Mary Lou made some of the Hogwarts hat pieces, you will need to make your own pieces.
Brim here. 

Headband here. In fact, this is where you'll find all the parts for Harry's new hat, plus some unique designs for each hat set. 
Each kit comes with 5 pieces, and will make a total of 9 sets and each type of hat set. 

Hogwarts Hats set (in alphabetical order):"
Hogwarts Hat Pattern No. 54721 (left)


Row 1: With Double S crochet hook, crochet 2 sc in sc and work 7 sc around (76 sc). 
Row 2: * Ch 1, 2 sc in next sc, ch 2, repeat from* around, ending with a sl st in last st made. 

Continue this way as below. 

Next (right) row, do NOT make sl sts when working in back loop of 2 sc (#528), instead make sl st and break off."


Prompt: Voldemort raised his wand and pointed it at Darth Vader.

Voldemort raised his wand and pointed it at Darth Vader. This was the final command that Obi-Wan should have delivered to the Dark Elf, the last command being, "Be good. Don't kill me." The Dark Elf obeyed the command of Darth_Vader by sitting down on his left-hand. He, too, raised his wand, pointing it at the same Dark Elf that was standing up now. Then he raised his wand at the end to point it at his own head (to make a rooster cravat). In this case, the Dark Elf pointed it directly at his head. The rooster cravat was completed by having all the silk stitches in and out, about equal in length. Then he stitched the back of the feather so that it should fold into the hat as shown in illustration below.
Next, his crown was made into a rooster cravat and stitched loosely with the Silk and Silk Stitch methods. His hat was tied at the hat-bottom by double thread. In illustration below, we show the back of the hat.
Now the crown is stitched to the inside of the hat. This creates a snug fit that should form a loose bobble, or a ball. Make a row of brooches or "bobs" depending on preferences of hat wearer, and fasten stitches together in order for the hat to sit upright."


Prompt: I made this cake last weekend for a party and it was gone almost immediately.

I made this cake last weekend for a party and it was gone almost immediately. I thought I had it all figured out and planned on using it to make a birthday cake for my fiance and all my other family and friends next week. However it looks way too small in this picture. I made another a few days after the last photos.

As soon as you have the chunky and dry stuff collected, place flour, sugar, baking powder, and salt in a bowl and whip together until smooth.

Now we will get into the fun stuff. I used Baking Soda to make a thin sieve-like product. I've never made such a thing but I have tried. Take a piece of parchment paper and line a piece of plywood or a cardboard box with baking soda. Roll that piece of cardboard or cardboard box in half. Press one plywood or cardboard box directly on one of these two pieces of parchment paper so it sticks out.

Turn the two halves of cardboard or cardboard box in the other direction. Place the cardboard or cardboard piece directly on the inner of the Baking Soda thin sieve-like product. This is where you want to insert the sieve-like product.

Slide the thin sieve-like product over the other piece and push both pieces through the Baking Soda roll. If you made the Baking Soda rolling up of one piece, go ahead and do the other piece and make the thin sieve like product. I have come to love knitting sweaters and this is a good reason to knit sweater. But if you don't like knitting, feel free. The thinner the sieve on the cardboard or cardboard, the better. You may want to make another tin to house these. Now simply fold one or both strands of yarn tightly together. With the 2D crochet hook, use a stitch twirler to trace a stitch and with your crochet hook or yarn thread working along the outer of the thinnetween strands, weave thread through both thinnets and through both the double whittles of the 2D crochet hook. Turn the 5 pieces around. If you don't have a stitch twirler, cut another sheet of paper. Cut a piece of cardboard that you will use every other piece. Fold a piece of cardboard right sides together, covering the inner of the 3" pieces, leaving 1 inch of cardboard.

Now we turn to the 2D Crochet Hook. This is the hook you will attach the 3D crochet. The 4 holes in the Crochet hook are the stitch heads. With the 2D crochet hook work stitch heads 1_ in. apart. The 4 stitch heads are the stitch heads 2" and above, the stitch heads of 1_ and 2_."




I made this cake last weekend for a party and it was gone almost immediately. However, this cake is made with one layer of butter. Therefore, my first few attempts I made failed. I just repeated the two layers with another thinner, then another, leaving 8 inches at the top for the cake to tack to as it dries.

Next, I made this cake, but I added more butter. I was pleased to have already added butter. But since this cake is made with two layers, it needs extra room to tack to where the cake lays flat upon its side.

Since cake was already made with 9_ inches of butter, I decided to make a smaller version.

First, I made a smaller cake.

Second, I made a smaller round cake.

Third, I made a smaller round cake.

Fourth, I made a smaller round cake.

Fifth, I made a smaller round cake.

Sixth, I made a smaller round cake.

Seventh and onward, I use each of these 4 layers until the cake measures 27"".

Next, I make a larger cake.

Next, a larger round cake.

Next, a larger round cake.

Next, a larger round cake.

Next, a larger round cake.

Next, a larger round cake.

Next, a larger round cake....then a larger round cake, and work 1 more time.

END TO CALENDAR !!!

I hope you like this pattern. I'd love to hear about how to make it in the comments section below. If so...please share a link at the bottom of this page, or check out the finished product online! And remember...I only sell finished items.


Prompt: The key to puff pastry is lamination.

The key to puff pastry is lamination. Start with the wrong side facing you. Hold a piece of puff pastry in each of the next two front corners. Start puffing on the other side of the puff pastry, this is the open side. Hold another puff pastry in the open side of puff pastry and puff pastry 1 more time. Hold a puff pastry in corner of back puff pastry for one more puff pastry puff. Next puff pastry puff is open. Continue to puff puff puff until there are 55 loops in corner puff pastry. With a long tail feather, ch 1, 1 s c in the 2nd loop, and 2 d c in each of the next 5 loops. Continue on puffing puff puff without stopping for more than 2 rows. Next puff pastry puff is open/close. Continue to puff puff puff until puff pastry puff is almost full (75 loops). The back of puff pastry is then folded in half. Attach ribbon with puff pastry puff pastry puff pastry that came with your puff pastry set.   
 Turn puff pastry inside out once to expose the back. Puff pastry puff pastie back around so that puff pastry puff circumference is about 6 inches deep. Fold puff pastry puff out to have a mini puff pastry puff on inside. Fold puff pastry puff around to have a mini puff pastry puff at each corner (56 loops).   Break open puff pastry puff pastry to reveal all, puff pastry puff pastie back around to have a mini puff pastry puff on inside.  
 Break open puff pastry puff pastry to have a mini puff pastry meringue on inside. Cut strips of puff pastry 15" wide. Turn back at the top (back of puff pastry) and sew in place. 



Never could I have imagined the horror that was in store for me when I opened that final, terrible door.

DUDE:
I took off my robe to reveal my very real hair! Wow. So dark and shaggy and beautiful – that was a whole lot of hair! I mean, it was long and it was beautiful – but it was long and it was shaggy and ugly too. I know, from what you've already seen, the hair color choices for this model are quite limited to only the three colors I've decided to try: Chocolate, Brown, and Navy blue. Do you know how many colors I've chosen to make this model? Two. Okay. So what's next? Well, I'll take off that robe so you can see my new long hair – and then I'll whip up some simple lace patterns to add to my hat and gown."


Baby Prince Muffin Pattern,
"Ch 6, join with a sl st to form a ring — ch 11, 1 swedish double crochet in ring. Ch 1 — dc3tog in the next st, sl st in next dc — 1 dc, 3 ch, and 1 swedish double crochet. Join to first dc with a sl st. 1 st remain to complete hat. (Make 2 hats)



Never could I have imagined the horror that was in store for me when I opened that final, terrible door and beheld the unspeakable tentacled monster. The horrible noises stopped, suddenly and quietly, under my breath. I had only barely stepped back from the monster and it was so close to me. I could see the stench coming from the tent. I had just given it a good scrubbing and was just about ready to put it out. The monster was now a bit more then 2 feet at its widest point. It kept lurching around and over, and it eventually stopped on its hind legs and lay down on the floor. It lay there in its horrible shape for a few minutes to get used to the position and then slowly got up onto one knee. It's now time to move on to the next door.
I had worked with the big tentacle all the way around, until I found the right size. Now I am looking at a little more than 5' in diameter. I used a pair of sewing looped stitches, and sew a piece of ribbon around the circumference of the tentacle to hold it up. I now turn to work on my next tentacle.
The next tentacle is a tad larger then the previous one. It is also made from a ribbon and so I made another ribbon. I worked the same way in making a ribbon, but only to the very top of the tentacle. The next tentacle is a tad larger. I will take each section of ribbon, and tack them together. I made another ribbon, which was the big tentacle section. Now I have a pretty long ribbon, and it is made like this, having a ribbon loop at one end, and a ribbon loop and ribbed inside of tentacle, and this last piece being made like this. The ribbon is attached to the ribbed inside of tentacle, and has a ribbon inside of tote. They go side by side, and I attach ribbon, which is made like this around center point of hat, and a ribbon, around top of hat.  I then wrap ribbon around 1st ribbed piece, and glue ribbon to hat. Next ribbed piece is a tad larger. I attach ribbon from inside of ribbon loop, around outside of ribbon, and tote, and glue ribbon to hat. And with those last Ribbons I made, and all the other pieces made, I am now ready to attach ribbon to crown.  Now attach ribbon around crown of hat, and tack ribbon together.  Now tie ribbon knots with ribbon. Tie ribbon in ribbon bind off loops, and put ribbon through one of the ribbon loops, and attach ribbon to different piece of ribbon.   Now attach ribbon to different ribbed inside of ribbed, and glue ribbon to the inside of ribbon loop, and tote folded pieces together.  Roll ribbons around.  Fold the folded pieces in half lengthwise.  Cut ribbon in half. Glue ribbon to the outside of ribbon loop, and weave ribbon in and out of ribbon loop. (I did not have ribbon for the inside of the inside of the outer of hat and so have not made ties for either of these pieces of work yet). Holding ribbon to the inside of circumference of outer hat, and knitting ribbon tightly into position inside circumference of hat, make 2 more ribbons.  * 1st ribbon is on the inside of inner part of inner part of breast pocket. * 2nd ribbons are on the inside of each breast pocket.  This will be used later.  Work only through each ribbon, not the other side as for hat.  Tie ribbon knots with ribbon. Tie ribbon to 1st ribbed piece, and lace ribbon to the one at the end of each ribbons."


My hovercraft is full of eels. At first I tried to catch the little critters out of my hat with my back, but after a few rounds of trying, I realized I couldn't do it. So, instead, I made my way behind the hat to the other side and hooked my tail behind it to the front. This created another hoop at the side of the hat, and from this hoop I caught all the little critters. Then I made a few more hoops all around the hat, ending with a couple of hoops at the top of the hat,"Crocodile Scavenger Hat Pattern",Crocodile Scravenger,New York,
"HAT

With Main Color:

R1. Starting at center, make a chain to measure about 50"" long. 1st row: * Sc in top of ch 2, 2 sc in next ch. Repeat from * around (35 stars). 2nd and subsequent rows: * 2 sc in each of next 2 sc, sc in center sc of next tree. Repeat from * around (50 stars). 3rd row: * 2 sc in each of next 4 sc, sc in center sc of next tree. Repeat from * around (80 stars). 4th and subsequent rows: * 2 sc in each of next 5 sc, sc in center sc of next tree. Repeat from * around (100 stars). 5th to 13th rows incl: * sc in each of next 5 sc, sc in center sc of next tree. Repeat from * once more. 14th row: * sc in each of first 30 sc, sc in center sc of next tree. Repeat from * once more. 15th, 32nd and 39th rows: Repeat 4th and 5th rows, alternating ones and having 1sc more between them. Break off.

BRIM TOP ... In Main Color, ch 6 loosely. 1st row: Sc in 3rd ch from hook and in each ch across, sc in each of next 82 sc. Ch 6 loosely. 2nd and subsequent rows: * Sc in same place as sl st, sc in center sc of next star, * sc in each of next 32 sc. Ch 6 loosely. Repeat 2nd row until Brim Top measures 5"" from start. Next row: * Sc in next 2 sc, sc in center sc of next star, sc in each of next 82 sc. Ch 6 loosely. Repeat last row until crown measures 3_"" ending with sc in last 2 SC. Break off. Attach contrasting color and work same as brim. Fasten contrasting color securely around entire brim. Sew Brim Top to Crown.

SIDE: Attach contrasting color in same place as 1st contrasting color and work same as brim. From now on, work in back loop only of each SC. 2nd Row: With Main Color, sc in each sc across to within 3"" of centre back. Ch 1, turn. 3rd Row: With Contrasting Color, sc in each sc across to within 3"" from center back. Ch 1, turn. 4th Row: With Main Color, sc in each sc across to within 3"" of centre back. Ch 1, turn. 5th Row: With Contrasting Color, sc in each sc across to within 3"" from centre back. Ch 1, turn. 6th Row: With Main Color, sc in each sc across to within 3"" of centre back. Ch 1, turn. 7th and 8th Rows: Work same as 5th row. End off. Weave inside of Crown to side of Brim Top.

FRINGE ... Attach contrasting color in same place where Main Color was joined at back. * Sc in each sc along border. Sc in each sc across. Sc in each sc across to within 4"" of beg. Ch 1, turn. 9th Row: With Contrasting Color, sc in each sc across to within 4"" of beg. Ch 1, turn. 10th Row: With Contrasting Color, sc in each sc across to within 4"" of beg. Ch 1, turn. 11th Row: With Contrasting Color, sc in each sc across, decreasing 4 sts evenly spaced. Repeat the last row, having 1 more sc between the last 3 scs on the wire. Break off. Attach contrasting color in same place where Main Color was joined at back. * Sc in each sc across, decreasing 4 sts evenly spaced. Repeat the last row until 1"" long. Break off. Fasten contrasting color securely around outside of Crown. Weave inside of Fringe of Crown as follows: 1st row: Attach contrasting color in same place where Main Color was joined at back. 2nd row: Attach contrasting color to center of each st across which has a """""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""""" from center of Brim Top, skip next""""""""""


My hovercraft is full of eels. 
The middle circle is a ring, with four loops.  Starting at one side, ch 2. 1st rnd: 6 sc in ring. Do not join this or following rnds. 2nd rnd: 2 sc in each sc around. 3rd rnd: * Sc in next sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat from * around. 4th rnd: * Sc in each of next 2 sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat from * around. Continue in this manner, alternating 1 sc in each of the first 3 rnds (16 sc) while increasing in the rnds 3 sc evenly spaced. 5th rnd: * Sc in each of next 6 sc, 2 sc in next sc. Repeat from * around. 6th to 15th rnds incl: Sc in each sc.
 16th rnd: Sc in next 5 sc, 2 sc in next sc. (Approximate: 16 sc.)

17th and 18th rnds: Sc in each sc. 9th rnd: With yarn double, yarn over and draw through ch-1, insert hook in same place where sl st was made, yarn over and pull through both ch-1s, yarn over and sc in same place where sl st was made, yarn over and draw through 2 loops, yarn over and break yarn, insert in next sc and work off 2 loops until last loop, yarn over and break yarn, skip 1 sc, sc in each of next 2 sc, * skip 1 sc, sc in next 2 sts, 2 sc in first sc. Repeat from * across, sl st in 5th st of turning chain, break yarn and work off remaining loop, sl st in 5th st of turning chain.

BRIM: * With yarn double, join and break off. 12th rnd: Sc in each st around. 13th, 14th and 15th rnds: Sc in each sc. 6th rnd: Sl st in next 2 sts, sc in each loop around (96 sc). Break off.

STRETCH PATTERN: With yarn double, sl st in next st. Break off. Sew the brim to the crown, sewing one brim to each end of crown.

MANDACLE ... With contrasting color, ch 16. 1st rnd: With wrong side of brim facing you, make sc in 2nd ch from hook and in each ch across. Do not join rnds. 2nd rnd: Sc in each sc across. 3rd rnd: * Sc in each sc across. Repeat from * across. 4th to 10th rnds incl: Sc in each sc. 11th to 16th rnds incl: Sc in each sc across. Next 30 rnds: Sc in each sc across. Ending last rnd with sc in next 15 sc. Ch 1, turn. 2nd rnd: Sc in each sc across. Ch 1, turn. Repeat this last 2 rnds until work measures 3 inches. If larger hat is desired, it should be made larger in diameter. Next 4 rnds: Attach contrasting color, sc in each sc across. Ch 1, turn. Next rnd: Attach contrasting color, sc in each sc across. Continue thus, alternating colors, working 3 rnds of contrasting color on the 29th and 30th rnds of brim. Next rnd: Attach contrasting color, sc in each sc across. End off. Sl st in next st, turn. Complete other side of brim.

CORD ... With contrasting color, ch 11. 1st rnd: Sc in 2nd ch from hook and in each ch across. Do not join rnds. 2nd rnd: 2 sc in each sc across. 3rd rnd: Sc in each sc across rapidly so as to give rise to a firm but loop. Break off. Attach contrasting color, sc in each sc across. Continue thus, alternating colors, going over each sc as previously dec rnded, gaining 2 sc on each rnd (not directly over work). Break off. Attach contrasting color, sc in each sc across. End off. Complete other side of brim.

COCKMARK ... With contrasting color, ch 3. 1st rnd: Sc in each sc across. 2nd and 3rd rnds: Sc in each sc across. Continue thus, alternating colors, increasing 13 sc evenly on each rnd until band measures 6 inches in diameter. Break off. Attach contrasting color, sc in each sc across. End off. Sew center of band to center of Crown. Sew other parts in position around band as necessary.

TIMBER BOARD ... Cut 21 inches of lumber. Take strip and tie ends securely around hat. Tack ends firmly to hat and sew across ends.



Started fresh and trained for 281 iterations

gpt2.generate(sess,
              length=1023,
              temperature=1.0,
              prefix="The demon chuckled softly.",
              nsamples=5,
              batch_size=1,
              top_k=60
              )



Clip-on Hat Pattern #25,
"Starting at center of top, ch 4. Make 8 sc in loop, working around. Join with sl st. Ch 2 and turn. Ch 3, working round 1, make sc in each dc around. Sl st in each sc. Join with sl st. Ch 3, turn. Ch 1, working round 2, make sc between each loop on last round. Join with sl st. Ch 2 and turn. Break off Glue.

SINGLE-USE CLIP-ON STAINLESS STEEL PROJECTOR

Using a Dc, join with sl st to form ring. Ch 2. 1st rnd: Using Green Demon, sc in same space, * ch 4, skip ch 1; * ch 1, sc in next ch 4 space, ch 1; repeat from * around, making 1 sc in each location on ring. Join with sl st. Ch 3, turn. Ch 1, working round 9, make sc between each loop on last round. Sl st in each sc. Join with sl st and break off Glue.

TRIM-MINDLE-TOOTH BLOODLETTER PROJECTOR

With Green Demon loop, ch 4, ch 3 working round 10, join with sl st, ch 1, ** skip ch-1, sc in next ch 5 space, ch 1; repeat from * around. Sl st in each sc. Join and break off Glue.



DARK KNIGHT RETURN TO WORK

Rough Instructions

1st Row: With Gray working in the back loops of WS, making 5 to 10 repeats. Working into the back loops only, join with sl st. Turn.

2nd and 3rd Rows: Working into loops ONLY, join with a sl st.

4th ROW: With Brown working in the 2 d c next to WS, doing 2 double d c. Join.

5th to 10th Rows: Working in loops only, join with a sl st.

When working in Brown, be aware that the color is increasing."


Cord Wrapped Zombie Picnic Ring,
"SIZE: About 8.5 mm,
"Starting at center, ch 5 join with sl st to form a ring.

1st rnd: 8 tr, 2 ss, 3 dc in the 10th ch from hook. 4th rnd: * Sc around the ring, 3 dc in next st. Repeat from * around. Join with sl st in 1st ch of ch-3 first sc.

2nd rnd: With 2 strands of thread, join the two sl st (made in the beginning) with a sl st. Ch 3, turn.

3rd rnd: With another strand of thread, make 1 sc around. Join.

4th rnd: With 1 strands of thread, make 1 sc around. Join and break off at end of 4th rnd."



A Little Potato,
"Ch 1, join with sl st to form a ring.

1st rnd: 8 dc in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 dc in each st. 3rd rnd: * Attach a double strand of thread, sc around sl sts (increasing), increasing in every third st. Repeat from * around. Join and break off at end of 3rd rnd.

8TH ROUND: In next 10th sc, make a couple of 1 dc in top of each st. Join and break off.

16TH ROUND: In next 12th sc, make a little 1 sc over each st. Join.

17TH ROUND: (Referring to sketch above) * * In each of next 13th sc, make a 2nd sc around. Ch 1, turn. Repeat from * around. Join and break off.

18TH ROUND: (Referring to sketch below) * * In each of next 14th and 15th rnds, make 1 sc around. Ch 1, turn. Repeat from * Around. (16 sc)

21ST ROUND: With Yellow and 2 strands of thread, work same as 4th round.

22ND RING: With Yellow and 1 strand of thread, join top of the piñata to the other side.

23RD RIDGE: In next 3rd rnd, work as for 16th rnd (increasing in every 5th rnd). Join and break off at end of 14th rnd.

24TH RIDGE: For the other side, work same as this piñata as follows. With Yellow, ch 100, * skip 1 sc of round, 2 hdc in next sc, repeat from * around. Join.

Cut off leaving an end for sewing.



"With Love from Lacy toe
The top of the hat is made with two strands of Lacy stitch.

The following instructions are taken from Lacy Stitch, by Betty Ann Dickey, published in June 1990 by the Washington, D.C. area division of the Lacy Machine Company and then in addition to that published by Lacy Cloche, on two different occasions.

Before you begin, ch 8, join.

Round  8: Ch 1, sc with black yarn.

Round  9: Cut yarn, ch 3 and join to form ring.

BRIM/DAIL: 
Round 1: Sl st in same place where yarn was joined to, 1 in each of next 2 stitches below.

Round 2: 2 d c in each st below; join in front of work.

Rounds 3 - 7: Repeat Rounds 3 - 7.

Round 8: Ch 1, sc with blue yarn.

Rounds 9 - 13: Sl st in each stitch.

Rounds 14-19: Repeat Rounds 14 - 16.

Rounds 20 - 29: Sl st in same places where yarn was joined to back, join.

30th Round: Ch 4, sc in same spots as slst, * ch 5, sc in next ch 5, ch 2, skip 2 ch, 2 d c in next slst. Repeat from * around.

Round 30: * Ch 17, * skip 3 ch, sc in next ch 3. Repeat from * around.

Round 31:  Repeat Round 29.

Round 32: Sl st in next ch 2 space.

Round 33:  Repeat Round 29.

Round 34: Sc in next d c, * ch 15, * skip 2 d c, sc in next d c, ch 2, skip 2 d c, sc in next d c, ch 16, make a 5 ch, sl st in next d c. Repeat from * around.

Round 35: Ch 2, sc in each ch 1 space.

Round 36: Sl st in next ch 2 space.

Round 37: * Ch 22, * skip 2 ch, sc in next ch 1 space. Repeat from * around — 13 times. Repeat Round 17 with Ch 11 between last slst and join.

Round 38:  Repeat Round 17 with Ch 9 between slsts.

Repeat the last 2 rounds until piece measures 34 inches. Turn.

RIDGE: With Worsted gauge, make a chain 5 inches wide and 1 inch long (120 sc). Wind yarn at top, join yarn at bottom. Using White, ch 100 (80 ch sts). With Lacy, ch 2, sc in each ch 2 space. Join yarn at base of hat.



Trained more until 320


CREATURE

[Cuddly Pig]

Start with the top of the character design, ch 112. Ch 2, sl st in 2nd st from hook, sc in same space, (double sc in same space) across next 2 sts, (sc in next 2 sts) across next st; sl st in ch-ch-102 first made, * sc in next 2 sts, 2 sc in next st; skip 2 sts and make sc directly over next double sc. Repeat from * around, ending with 4 sc in last st. Ch 1, sc in top of last sc. (8 piglets)

Row 4: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in ch-1 sp and next 4 sc in each loop around; turn. (4 piglets)

Row 5: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in center of next 6 sc on the character design, * skip 3 sc, sc in next sc. Repeat from * across row, ending with 5 sc in last sc. Ch 1, sc in same place as skipped 3 sc, sc in next 6 sc. (8 piglets)

Row 6: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in each sc across, join. (8 piglets)

Row 7: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in each sc across, join. (8 piglets)

Row 8: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in each sc across, join. (8 piglets)

Row 9: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in center of next 8 sc on the character design, * skip next 6 sc, sc in next 7 sc. Repeat from *, ending with skipped 4 sc in last sc. Ch 1, sc in next sc on top of last sc. (16 piglets)

Row 10: Sl st into loop, ch 1, sc in center of next 4 Sc on the Character Design, * skip next 3 sc, sc in next sc. Repeat from * around, ending with skipped 4 sc in last sc. Turn and with right side of fabric facing you: sc in next 5 sc. "



Vlad the Impaler Hat with Scarf,
"RUNNY SKATEBOAT WITH CUFFRIN TOP:
"Starting at centre top, ch 4, join with sl st to form ring.
 rnd: (Round 1) 6 s c in ring. (Round 2) 2 s c in each of next 8 s c. (Round 3) S c in each of next 8 s c. (Round 4) 2 s c in each of next 4 s c, (2 s c in 1st s c of previous round) twice; (Round 5) S c in each of next 4 s c, (2 s c in 1st s c of previous round) twice; (Round 6) S c in each of next 4 s c, (2 s c in 1st s c of previous round) twice; repeat from beginning up; out 1 loop.

S c in next s c. (S c in next 2 s c. (S c in next 2 s c. (S c in next 2 s c. (S c in next s c. (S c in 1st s c of previous round))) twice) twice) through next 5 s c, 2 s c in each of next 8 s c, 1 s c in last s c; join.

ROUND 6: Change yarn and work S c in each s c through round, changing colors at end of round. Work 1 round even; end round with CUFF CARPET.

FIGURE 4: With No. 7 hook, work 12 s c in ring. (6 s c inc. sts.)

ROUND 9: Work even. (6 s c)

ROUND 10: Work off 1 round as 1 d c. (12 sts)

ROUND 11: Ch 1, working in front loops only, dc in back loop only of next 2 sts of previous round, * skip 1 st c, 1 s c in same st as previous round, skip 1 st c, 1 s c in next st, 1 s c in next st; repeat from * around, joining, cut yarn. Break free tail and finish off."



Nobody expected stegosaurs in spaceships. These tiny armored reptiles helped keep the craft stable. [See illustration at bottom of this post.]

Next 3 Space Shells
HANDS FREE
The next three space shells are made of two strands, each 4 inches long. Twist loosely, and sew on front of hat.

Side Band

With White, ch 17, and work 1 s c in 3rd ch from hook. 1st rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in loop, then repeat from * all around. Break off. 2nd rnd: Ch 1, s c in 2nd ch from hook and work s c loosely. 3rd and subsequent rnds: S c in each s c, working s c in each ch rather loosely (1 s c in the center of each s c). 1 hour and 12 minutes later: Work 1 rnd with s c in each s c. Then 1 round more, then 1 round less. Fasten off. Now attach Color B, and work 1 rnd with s c in each s c. Fasten off. Attach Contrasting Color and work 1 rnd with s c in each s c of Blue and work 2 rnds, without turning. Fasten off."



Foiled Skipper Hat Pattern,
"Round 1 ­- Ch 4. Join with sl st to form ring.

Round 2: Ch 6. 2 d c into ring. Join with sl st.

Round 3: 1 d c in 1st d c; repeat around.

Round 4: 2 d c in each of next 2 d c; repeat around decreasing 2 sts at end of round; join with sl st at end of round.

Round 5: Sl st into 2nd tr, ch 13, s c in same space.

Round 6: Ch 2, s c in same space, 2 s c in each remaining space, s c in 1st s c of next round; join.

Round 7: Sl st into 1st st, ch 10, s c in same space, * skip 1 st, s c in next st; repeat from * around, skip 1 st, s c in last s c; join.

Round 8: Ch 10, s c in last s c, * s c in same space, 1 s c in next st; repeat from * around; join.

Round 9: Ch 1, s c in next st, * s c in next tr, 2 s c in next tr; repeat from * around; join.

Round 10: Ch 1, s c in 2nd s c of 1st round, * s c in 1st s c, skip 1 s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c; repeat from * around; join.

Round 11: Ch 1, s c in next s c, * s c in next s c, skip 1 s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c; repeat from * around; join.

Round 12: Ch 1, s c in next s c, * s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c; repeat from * around; join.

Round 13: Ch 1, s c in next s c, * s c in next s c, skip next s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c; repeat from * around; join.

Round 14: Rep Round 8 but inc 1 st at the beginning of each round; then, work even on 30th round.

Round 15: Ch 1, s c in next s c, * s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in s c, s c in s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c, s c in s c, 1 s c, 2 sts; repeat from * around, join.

Round 16: Ch 1, s c in next s c, * s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in s c, s c in next s c, s c in s c, 1 s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, 1 s c, s c in s c, 3 sts; repeat from * around, join.

Round 17: Ch 1, s c in next s c, * s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, s c in next s c, 2 sts; rep from * around, join.

Round 18:  Ch 1, s c in each st around; join.

Round 19: Attach thread to center back of hat; s c in each s c around; join.

Round 20: Attach thread to center back of hat; * ch 3, skip 1 s c, s c in next s c, repeat from * all around; join.

Round 21: Repeat Round 20, cut thread.

Finishing—With right side of hat toward you, work a row of s c around entire outside of hat, then work a row of s c around inside of hat, then work a row of s c around entire outside of hat.



Futuristic Star Destroyer,
"With Charcoal;
"Ch 2, 8 s c in 2nd st from hook; join. 3rd Round. Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, s c in first st; * ch 3, s c in next st, repeat from * all around ending with ch 3, s c in 3rd st of beginning. 4th Round. * Ch 3, s c in each of next 2 sts, 2 s c in last. Repeat from * all around ending with ch 3, join. 5th Round. * Ch 3, s c in each of next 3 sts, 2 s c in last, ch 3, s c in 3rd st of beginning. Repeat 3rd round until there are 8 sts in the rnd, join. 6th Round. * Ch 3, s c in each of next 9 sts, 2 s c in last, repeat from * once. 7th Round. * Ch 3, s c in each of next 10 sts, 2 s c in last, repeat from * all around ending with ch 3, s c in 3rd st of beginning, do not join rnds yet. 8th Round. Same as 3rd round. 9th Round. * Ch 3, s c in in next 3 sts, 2 s c in same st as last (this is an increase), ch 3, s c in 3rd st of beginning, s c in next s c, repeat from * all around ending with ch 3, s c in 3rd st of beginning, do not join rnds yet. 10th Round. * Ch 3, s c in each of next 4 sts, 2 s c in last, ch 3, s c in 3rd s c of ch-3, s c in next s c, ch 3, s c in 4th st of ch-3, s c in each of next 2 sts, 2 s c in last, repeat from * all around ending with ch 3, s c in 3rd st of ch-3, do not fasten off. 11th Round. Ch 3, s c in each s c. 12th Round. Work as for 6th round. 13th Round. Same as 6th round. 14th Round. Same as 5th round. 15th Round. Same as 4th round. 16th Round. Work as for 3rd round. Repeat the last 2 rounds once. Turn the last round over so as to form a knob at center back of hat.

BOTTOM BRIM: 16th Round. Starting at one side of brim, ch 40. 1st row: 2 tr; working along edge of brim, make 3 tr; 3 tr; 4 tr; 5 d c in next tr, skip 1 loop, 3 tr; 6 tr; repeat from beginning all around. Ch 3, turn. 2nd row: 2 tr; working along edge of brim, make 3 tr; 3 tr; 6 tr; 7 tr; 8 tr; 9 tr; 10 tr; 11 tr; 13 tr; repeat 2nd row until piece measures 2 _ inches in diameter. Break off. 3rd row: 2 tr; working along edge of brim, make 3 tr; make 6 tr; 7 tr; 8 tr; 9 tr; 10 tr; 11 tr; 13 tr; repeat 3rd row 13 _ inches in all; break off. Next Row: Attach Charcoal, ch 40, s c in same space, * ch 3, s c in next s c, repeat from * once, skip next loop, s c in next loop, repeat from end of chain, ch 3, s c in same space. Repeat the last row once, break off. Ch 1, turn. Next Row: Ch 1, s c in same space, s c in next s c, * ch 3, s c in next s c, repeat from * once, skip next loop, s c in next loop, repeat from end of chain, repeat from beginning of row, then ch 3, s c in ch-3 first made, then ch 3, s c in 3rd st of ch-3, ch 3, s c in same space. Hereafter work in same manner, alternating colors, for pattern, but not one color for lower edge only. Attach Charcoal, repeat from * once, sew band on lower edge of hat. Attach Bertha and work the same as bottom band, having yarn on lower edge of hat and working over it in order to conceal it. Turn band inside out 1 _ inches and fasten off. 



================================================================
Note from Janelle Shane: now begins the unfiltered output! 

For the remaining patterns, rather than select the most interesting (according to my uneducated eye) patterns, I'm showing raw export from HAT3000.

The prompt is the first sentence, and usually there's a sequence of about 20 patterns that I exported using the same prompt. The exception is the first few exports that follow, for which I didn't provide a prompt at all.

Note that HAT3000 can only export 1023 characters in a single batch, so quite a few patterns are (perhaps mercifully) cut off at the end.

================================================================


Mint Chocolate Chip Cookie Bread,
"CROWN: One 25 inch st.
2nd row: Inc. 8 sc, * inc., sc in next sc, repeat from * around, join with sl st in each st around.
3rd row: Inc. 8 sc.
4th row: Inc. 4 sc, * inc., sc in each sc throughout, join with sl st in first st.
5th row: Inc. 4 sc, * inc, sc in each st around.
6th rows: Dec. 5 sc.
7th row: Dec. 5 sc. Continue to work even until the width of one inch is achieved. Do not break down. If you don't like the pattern that well, take off one sc at the last row. Now cut 4″ of fabric. Place one inch between each incision. Sew along this fabric seam, taking up both the long and short thread during sewing. 
To make bead slits, first sew a bead at each corner of each bead, pin each bead to the inside of another bead, fold the folded edge of each bead over the edge of the previous bead and sew,  pinning the folded edge into place. 
To make a bead slit, tack in place, then slide the bead through the last bead and across the sliter, sewed firmly to your hem. 
The last row of the round is the first of the bead shapes. With this fabric sew a ribbon, turn, sew in place, and sew the ribbon horizontally across the sliter, making sure that it is snug and tucked toward the top."


Cotton Cord Cookie Pattern,
"WS: Make 2 groups of 18 – 24 beads. Turn and sew each bead around the stem to form a cord. Then sew on the opposite side. Make 14 more bands and sew around the stem to form a braid. Make a necklace piece, and sew the bead pieces in position around the neck.
DUCK: Make 2 groups of 1 s c; double and then make 3 pairs of 4 s c each. Next make 7 pairs of 1 s c each, and join to form a hat.
ENDOWMENT AND CHEMMA: Use the yarn thread from the last row of the crown, sew a chain about 1_"" from the center of each bead round to the top of the next bead. Now turn a bead round from the band on the previous row and sew one end of the chain to each bead round. Work in pattern, and sew under the bead on the inside of the hat. Sew along the edge of the hat. Make another piece of crown, sew around the outside of the crown and sew in place. Then sew up the crown. Fold the front of the hat in and sew a button on the front to give it the hat appearance.
ROW 2: Break off leaving a long tail to sew. Sew a long knot in one stitch of each row, making each stitch as long as the last, and sew on the outside of the hat.
ROW 3: Break off and tie a knot at the back of each bead. Pull, tie, and twist in all directions until there are 36 knots, then sew a knot in each of the 36 stitches. Repeat from row 3 on to the next row. Fasten off. 
ENHANCED CHILD'S HAT,
"Make 16 beads with colors A, B, and C. Break off. Fasten a knot into a stitch of the first row, making it one half of a knot. Sew the knot on the end of the last row of beads, forming a knot of double st. For the headbands, make four beads (I make the crown, tie a knot into a stitch, and turn), sew a ring and a bit of thread into place at the ends of the bead and onto the headband, then draw a thread through the center. Then turn and cut thread. Use the yarn and thread inside the hat for sewing up."


Pajamas Pattern,
"CROWN: 1st Row: Sc in each st around.  Next Row: 6 sc in second st from hook, sc in each of next 2 st.  Next Row: 6 sc in next st, sc in each remaining st. 
2nd Row: Sc in each sc around.
Work evenly all around.
ROUND: Sc in each sc around.
 
POM: Ch 7. 
1st Row: Ch ½, *ch 1, ch 1. 
2nd Row: Ch 1, sc in each sc around.
3rd Row: Ch 6, * ch 7, sc in each sc around. 
4th Row: * Ch ½, ch 3, * ch 3, ch 3. 
Round 2: Ch 6, repeat from * to turn.
Round 5: Ch 6,  ch 6,  ch 6,  ch 6
====================
BRAKES:
Crochet Knit Round Belt: With yarn over hook, place the last stitch of the hat into the hat and sc around.
Round Belt Pattern: With yarn, ch 1.

Row 1: With Color A, ch 1, sc in 2nd ch of ch-1 (hats) of previous row.

Row 2: With Color B, ch 1, sc in 1st st of ch-1 (hats), * ch 2 and sc in 1st st of ch-2 (hats), sc in 2nd ch of ch-2, draw up a loop in 3rd st of ch-2 and make a sc in 4th st of ch-2, y o and repeat last row 5 times, turning.

Row 3: With Color D, sc in 1st st of ch-1, * ch 2 and sc in 1st st of ch-0, sc in 3rd st of ch-0, y o and repeat last row 5 times.

Then work a row of ch-2s.

Row 4: With Color D, * sc in 1st ch-2 sp, * ch 3 to left of sc in 1st ch-2 sp, * sc in the next 4 sts, skip 1 st, sl st around in next st, repeat from * all around, ending here with a ch 4, 2 d c in the ch 3 to center ch-3 sp of previous row, y o, join with a sl st so that the yarn hangs close to you and you dont have a sharp edge to pinch, ch 3.

Row 5: With Color A, ch 3, * sc in center st, y o, join with a sl st so that the yarn hangs close to you, ch 3.

Repeat last row (3rd row) 4 times.

Crochet Knit Round Belt Pattern: With yarn, ch 1.

Row 1: With Color B, ch 2, skip 2 sts, ch 2, sc in 2nd st of ch-2 sp, ch 3 and continue in this manner, * ch 2 and sc on 1st st, ch 3 and continue, skipping 1 st on each rnd, ch 5 and end with a sl st, ch 3.

(This should create an impression of a long lace on the headpiece) Attach yarn in this way, working about 1 inch from center edge of the hat.

Repeat row 1 once or twice more.

HAT BACK STITCH: With yarn, ch 2, sc in g sc of each st of previous row, ch 1, sc in each sc of previous row, * ch 2 and sc in each sc of previous row, ch 2 and sc in each st of previous row.

SIDE STITCH: With yarn, ch 2, sc in each st of previous row, ch 2, sl st in last st, ch 2, * ch 2 down each st, ch 2, d c in last st, ch 2, * insert hook under 2nd sc of working hook and draw loop through entire ch-2 sp, insert hook under 3rd sc of working hook and draw loop through entire st of ch-2 sp., repeat from * all around ending with sl st to back of st, ch 2, d c in each of 2 sts."


Sterling Cap Hat Pattern,
"Color A: With Color A, ch 2 on hook; work 3 sc in 2nd ch from hook; join.


Color B: With Color B, ch 2 on hook; work in 2nd ch from hook; join.

Rib: With Color A, ch 1, sc in 2nd ch from hook; join.

Skirt: With Color A, ch 1, work 9 sc in 2nd ch from hook to measure 4"" from center front; join.

Pattern retailed at $8.00<|endoftext|>A new study indicates that some of the largest natural gas fields in Southern America and the Andes were produced during the height of the 20 th century: the Peruvian and Chilean Pachanga chains.

The new study, conducted by scientists at the University of California, Riverside, and the University of Chile, confirms that the largest natural gas field in Southern America and the world's landmass, Pachanga, was created in the 18 th or 19 th century.

The new study finds that Pachanga was created by digging 2 to 9 centimeters—approximately 1 inch—into the ground around the lake edge. In the past, researchers have found evidence that this kind of activity is commonplace in Peru.

"Our study provides new insights into the origins of Pachanga. We were intrigued by the discovery at the bottom of the lake, which appears to be a series of channels, or channels, that lead towards the edge of the lake. It is also interesting to speculate about
====================
BRUCE, MI -- A newly-created taxonomy has some things in common with its previous, albeit simplified, model: It's aimed at helping local groups understand how they might improve their outreach programs to a potential audience.

The new Taxonomy-2017 has grown alongside the county charts released earlier this month.
The new model was created by the Michigan State Chapter of the American Association of State and Provincial Historians.

The original Taxonomy-1989 used the model:<|endoftext|>" I am a large purple wad of gold! For it, I give thee power to kill an elephant as fast as thou canst run! " ~Lydia the Ranged Girl
" The King of Dragons is a boss found in the World Tower . I thought I might include a little picture to make things clearer.
" This is a small purple wad of gold, with only one thread in use. It makes a great hat. " ~Cheryl the Goldwasp, Afterthoughts
" This is my new favorite hat. It was the only hat from the beginning to fit perfectly around my breasts. It is nice and round too." ~Aberria the Chimp, Afterthoughts
"This hat is lovely. It's a wonderful way to show that you are into the Goth style without taking off your outfit. The colors are very vivid. I could stand to wear it all around. I am 6'4" and the hat measures approximately 28 in., including the crown. The hat has 3 ribbed buttons at the base, 1 at each of each of the next 2 buttons. I would love it if you let me know of any things you have added or changed to mine in the comments ! The hat is knitted (instructions below).
 "Next Row: Knit in all sts evenly, insert hook and sls into each st, and pull up all sts to form a loop; * 1 st at each st; repeat from * all around.

"Next Row: Knit in all sts, insert hook and sls into each st, and pull up all sts to form a loop; * 1 st at each st; repeat from * all around.

"Next Row: Knit in all rings, insert hook and sls into previous st and pull loop through; * draw up a sl st in the s c of last st, work a double loop at the end of this row; * repeat from * twice; repeat from * to end of row;
The hat is now finished with the hat crown and the crown ring.
"The next row would use the crown of the hat to tie everything together. It is sewed in the hat as follows:
"Sew the crown in the stitch above, then sew in any loops under the crown for a better fitting.
"The hat crown is knit in the round, then sewed in the back of the hat with 1 strand of yarn. It is now finished just about as closely as this was when it was sewn. It can be finished as loosely as you like. But you can't sew this hat in a round!
" The hat is now ready to sew.
"
"HAT...Start by chaining, making 3 ch, then 1 ch, 2 dc.
"1st Row: Two dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in 1st dc, ch 1.
"2dc in same place, ch 1, dc in 2nd dc; ch 1, dc in 1st dc, ch 1.
"3dc in same place, ch 1, dc in 3rd dc; Ch 1, dc in 1st dc, ch 1.
"4dc in same place, ch 1, dc in 4th dc; Ch 1, dc in 1st dc, ch 1.
"5dc in same place, ch 1, dc in 5th dc; Ch 1, dc in 1st dc, and work 1dc of ch 1 in 2dc. (15 dc)
"Work 1dc of ch 1 (12 dc), * 1dc of next dc, ch 1, dc in 1st dc, ch 1.
"Next Row: 2 dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in 1st dc, ch 1.
"Continue in this manner, 2 dc in 2 dc, ch 1, dc in next dc. At the end of this row are there 2 dc in 1st dc, and ch 8, dc in the 2dc of 1st dc of this row. (24 dc)
"Work 4dc in 1st dc, ch 1, dc in 3rd dc, ch 1, dc in 1st st of row before.
"Next Row: 2 dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in 1st dc, m
"Continue in this manner, 2 dc in 3rd dc, ch 1, dc in 1st st of row before. At the end of
====================
BRIM: With one edge sewed tightly, make ribbing 8" long, sew to 1st half of brim, 2" from center. With the other edge sewed tightly, sew 1 edge of brim to 2nd half of brim, seam to 1st side of brim.   Sew ends of 2nd and 3rd brim together, making 8" loops,  (to measure about 1" from crown height, ch 3, s c in 2nd loop) 4 times;  if desired, make 1 loop at center back to correspond to crown height. Turn. 

FINGERBOARDS: With gray, sew 4 loops around each sleeve along its length. Make small loops along the outside edge of each cuff; make 2 larger loops at both ends of each pocket. Turn.

TOUCH WORN COLOR: With black, ch 3, 6 s c in ring; make 6 loops. Turn.

TIE STITCH: With black, sew 2 inches up from center of each tie, with 1 inch to center of each loop in stripe, to form a knot at top.

BRIM DEBRIM: With gray, sew 5 loops around each brim. Make 6 loops at both ends. Turn.

BRIM BOOVE: With gray sew 2 inches up from crown, 1 inch down from hat and sew to 2nd half of brim in back. Turn.

BRIM: With black sew 2 inches off center of hat, 2 inches up from hat and sew to 2nd half of brim in back. Turn.

FASTS: With gray, sew 2 loops around each fold in back of crown, turn.

MAID: With gray sew 8 loops around each fold of crown, turn.

TRIMM: Sew ribbon sts onto 3rd half of crown. Turn. 

FLOWERS: Sew ribbon sts around outside edge of hat, turning with 2" margin to meet with cap. Make 8 flowers, all 4 each in front and back. Turn. 

Wristbands: With gray, sew 4 loops all around upper edge of crown, turn. 

STAMP: With black sew round to 4th half of crown, turn. Turn. 

BOW: With gray sew 5 loops all around upper edge of crown, turn. Make 4 bows, 2 between center rows of crown, 1 in each st around crown edge. Turn. 

ENZO: With gray, sew 2 loops around each vertex,  to form a knot, turn. 

Sew bow to crown on headsize.

Headband: Attach wire to right side of crown. Make 5 loops in each st around crown ridge.

To make a ribbon stitch, with gray yarn, selvage a loop through 7 stitches of center row around the crown, join with a sl st to any st.

Next Row: Clump ribbon as follows, making 7 loops in each st around 2nd row of crown, attach, break yarn. Sew ribbon into cap. Attach to crown as follows: 1st row: Clump ribbon as before and draw up a curl around each stitch of center row. Repeat to form a knot. Turn crown and attach ribbon: 1st row is the outermost stitch of ribbon, 2nd row is the innermost stitch of ribbon, and 4th row, ending off with 2 d c into center of ribbon, work 4 d c into each st around, turn. Selvage 2 d c into each st around. Break yarn, turn out cap on headband and sew ribbon into center of cap as follows: 1st row, 2 d c into each st around.
Next Row: 3 d c into each st around, turn. Selvage 2 sts into the same st of each st. Continue to sew all stitches and knots together as follows. 
Round 9: Make 7 knots, attach, break yarn, selvage sts to this work, turn. Selvage 2 sts, join next round. 2nd to 9th Rowseam: Slst, dc, dc, sl st. Break yarn. 
Round 10: *2 sts in next st, dc, dc, dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from *around. 
Round 11: *2 sts in each of the next 3 sts, sl st, dc, dc. Repeat round 11. 
Round 13: *2 sts in each of the next 4 sts, dc, dc, sl st, dc. Repeat from * around. 
Round 14: *2 sts in each of the next 2 sts, dc, dc, dc. Repeat from * around. 
Round 15: *2 sts in each of the next 3 sts, dc, dc, dc, dc, dc, dc, dc. Repeat from *around. 
Repeat last round until there are 40 pieces left.
====================
"The next problem, however, might be simpler than the one before, as there is something that can be done with the whole, rather than with one part of it. The thing is, the part of the breast that is not being breast clipped is laid aside the center of the clip. 1st, bring that portion of the clip together and sew a seam about half way between the opening of the clip and the edge of the next-to-last stitch on the next row of stitches of the clip. 2nd, remove clip, turn the clip under it, make a stitch on each side of the wire, sew in place, and turn up the flap of the clip in anticipation. Then turn the clip so that it touches the outside the center of the last stitched stitch on the wire, and sew a seam on each side of the wire around the outside edge of the fabric, thus making one end of the wire very long,"


Empreasure Pocket Scarf,
"Make a second pocket scarf and sew in place. Make a third pocket scarf, and sew in place.

"Ch 5, join with a sl st, pull through center of stitches, sew both on, turn.

"Sl st in 2nd st from hook, *ch 2, work a ch 2 (counts as 1st stitch, is next stitch), repeat from * twice.

"Repeat last repeat around in this manner,"


Eternal Serenity Hat,
"Round 1: Ch 7, *chain 2, dc in 2nd st from hook, dc in each st of row 1 round.

2nd Round: *Chain 2, dc in 1st dc of row 1 round, dc in each st of row 1. Repeat 2nd round until piece measures 6". Then increase in every 8th bhdc.

III PINK SMEAR: Round 2: Attach a 2nd chain across back of hat as shown by photo.

4th Round: Attach chain 2 across center front of hat as shown by pic.

5th Round: Attach chain 2 in each st around, increase 4 sts evenly in back to join.

In all rounds, increase 20 sts evenly all around.

1st Row: Attach a 2nd chain and 2 dc in each st around, increase 20 sts evenly all around or 3 sts or 14.

2nd Row: Attach chain 2 across the entire back of hat as shown in pic, and work a double crochet across around all rnds of rnd. Work 1 double crochet in each rnd or 14 sts. Work 1 double crochet on each rnd or 14 sts. Repeat 2nd row twice more until piece measures about 14 in. from point of attachment on each rnd of rnd. Work a double crochet from point of attachment to point of attachment on each rnd to form 1st rnd of 2dc. Work 14 st across from point of attachment.

2nd Row: Attach 1st dc and dc all around, join.

3rd Rnd: Attach 1st dc and dc around, join.

5th Row: Stl. st in 2nd st from hook, *sl st in next st, ch 5, dc in next st, dc in next st, stl. st in next st. Repeat from * around. Break off."


Blinkie Hat,
"Brim st(s) on 17th row and work a double crochet around all tacks. Then, with #4 or other dark yarn, ch 1 to join, ch 5 to join.

2nd Row: Ch 1, sc in 1st stitch, ch 3, sc in next, join.

3rd Row: Ch 1, sc in each stitch around (3 dc, 3 dc made), ch 5 to join, ch 5 to start of row.

4th Row: Sl st in next selvage st, *ch 5, sl st in next st, ch 1, s c in next st, ch 5 to join (11 dc, 11 dc made).

5th Row: *Ch 5, s c in next st, ch 1, sl st in next st, ch 5 to join (13 dc, 13 dc made).

6th Row: *Ch 5, s c in next st, ch 1, sl st in next st, ch 5 to join (14 dc, 14 dc made).

7th Row: *Ch 5, s c in next st, ch 1, sl st in next st, ch 5 to join.

8th Row: Insert hook in next stitch and y o, y o, y o work 1 sc.

9th Row: *Y o, y o, y o, y o, y o, sl st in next st, y o, y o, y o, sl
====================
This pattern is available

Finished measurements:

Body: 1/4″ x 3″ in

Hood: 5/8″ in

Ring size: 1/1 inch.

Starch:

1st row: Make a 1-1/2-inch loop in each st using 2 strands of 3.00 mm crochet hook. Join with a sl st. Turn.

2nd row: Make a 1-1/2-inch loop in each st using 2 strands of 3.00 mm crochet hook. Join with a sl st. Turn.

3rd row: Make 1-1/2-inch loop in each st using 2 strands of 3.00 mm crochet hook, then 1 loop in each of the next 3 sts using the same pattern. Now work 1 row of 1 st every 19th st. Work 1 row of 1 st every 18th st. Work 1 row of 1 st every 16th st. Then join in 1st st of each row. Work 1 row of 1 st every 13th st. Join in 1st st of each row. Continue in same manner, increasing 8 sts every 19th st until piece measures 11 in. from top. Work 1 row of 1 st then skip 1 to 1st loop of each row. Work 1 row of 1 st, then 1 row of 1 st, followed by 1 row of 1 st. Then 2 rows of 1 st followed by 2 rows of 1 st. Repeat this row until piece measures 10 in. from top. Work 1 row of 14 th sts. Work 1 row of 1 st, 2 rows of 15 th st., then 2 rows of 15 st., then 2 rows of 16 th st., join, make a row of 1 st. Finally the crown is made,"


Scarf Pattern #1139,
"GAUGE: 9 rows = 2 inches
Ribbing: 12 rows = 1 inch
Washing Instructions: Wash woolen yarn tightly so that it does not shrink. Attach cotton and twist ends together loosely. Working in the round make a U-shape in each loop. The right side of the crown rests on the crown of the hat and gives it a lovely look. The crown is then made by sewing a selvedge stitch to each corner.

"
Skirt Pattern #3575,
"Gauge: 10 sts = 1_ inches; 11_ in . = 4 1/8 inches

To make the hat double size, stitch 4 sts in each st group throughout. Then place a marker for the stitches you are working on. Work a rnd 1 inch from that marker, break yarn and draw up a long tail. Tie a knot in each ltace. Work another double hank in each of the next 4 ltas, 2 inches apart. Now work 1 3rd mtr in a ltr and 1 3rd rnd in a st. Then do 2 3rd lts in a st and 1 3rd rnd in a st. Then work 1 rnd about 1 1/2 inches shorter in ltr and 2 rnds in a st. Next rnd is increased about 1 3/4 in. in each st, then work 1 sl st in each st. Work another double hank 3 inches shorter in each st, then 1 sl st in each st. Next to the last rnd is the first 1 inch increase. Work 3 rnds in 1 1/2 inch increase. Next rnd is increased 3 times, then 1 inc, 2 incs, 1 inc, followed by 4 incs. Finally work 1 3rd rnd 4 inches shorter than previous.
"In Flower Pattern #28, make 7 sc across back of hat in first stitch, make 7 sc in each other stitch, then in next st make 7 sc across back, then in next st make 7 sc across back, and in next st make 7 sc across back. Work 8 more rounds this way, work 9 stitches in 2 sts, then 9 stitches across back, to make 9 stitches between increases in each st of crown."


Cropted Flannel Pattern #634,
"GAUGE: In round 8 ch 2 and 9 s c. Ch 1, turn.
Round 9. *1 sc in next st, 2 sc in next st. Repeat rnd. Work 8 more rounds like this. Work 3 rounds of last incl. This takes place in line of the next work. Ch 1, turn.
Round 10. *1 sc in each of first 2 sts & 2 sc in next st, repeat from * 12 times. Work 12 more rounds like this. Work 3 rounds of last incl. Work 8 rounds more like this. Work 7 rounds like this. Ch 1, turn.
Round 11. *1 sc in each of center st & 2 sc in next st repeat from* 14 times. Work 14 more rounds like this. Work 9 rounds
====================
Crowned Round Top Hat Pattern #1958 , (YARN: 7 US 1/2; 3 US 2; 9 CO 1/2; 6 DC, 1 SH, 2 BLO), Ch 3. Join yarn in center st of each st. 1dc in each st (34 sc). * 1dc in each sc, ch 3. Join yarn in center st of next st, work 8 sts in sp of crown and 3 sts in dc, join and sew ends together as shown in photo.

HAT ... Ch 70. * Ch 7, skip 2 ch, dc in next st and each ch across (2 ch in each st). Repeat from * across, join to center st of cap, cut thread.

Crown ... Ch 5. Using ch 2, break yarn. Ch 5, * dc in next st, ch 5, dc in next st. Repeat from * across.


Sewring ..."I sewed 1/2 of the hat in position, and then made the other half in front. Then I made the front of hat a little larger than the other ones and made 3 more s c up every other row. Turn brim up so that it covers the edge of cap and sew hats together.


Ribbon ..."With 2 strands of yarn, ch 3. 1 dc in 2nd st from hook, ch 2. 2 dc in same st, ch 2. 3 dc in 1st st, ch 2. 2 dc in next st, ch 2. 1 dc in 2nd st, ch 2. Repeat from * across rows.

BOW with 1dc in each st across row."


Hat Pattern,
"GAUGE: 13 sc (for center front), 13 dc (for crown), 12 dc (for back)

SIDE ... Ch 4. *Ch 3, skip 3 sts, dc in next st. Repeat from * across.

BOW with 1dc in each st across row.

BEANCAKE … 1 block of embroidering thread. Ch 3, 2 dc in same st, double crochet in 2nd ch from hook, ch 3, 1 dc in next st. Ch 3, 1 dc in 1st st, double crochet over last 6 sts. Ch 3, 1 dc in 3rd st from hook, ch 3, 1 dc in next st, sc in 3rd st of ch from hook (9 sts). Ch 3, dc5tog on opposite side of ch 3, 1 dc in 5th st from hook. Repeat from * across.

CHIP & PEARL … With 2 strands of embroidering thread and ch 3, 2 dc in 3rd st from hook,  ch3tog and 2 dc in same st, ch3 to 3dc in each st across row.

PRETTY BOW
With 1st skein of thread, ch 23 (to measure about 6 inches), ch 11, sl st in 1st st., ch 3, (ch 5, ch3tog, ch5tog) in 2nd st., ch 3, sl st in next st. Ch 3, 1 dc in 4th st from left, ch 3, ch5tog, ch 5, sl st in next st, ch 3, ch3tog, ch5tog in 10th to 12th sts along. 

STANDER: With only the yarn, ch 6, ch 3 (to measure 5 inches), (ch 3, ch5tog, ch3tog) in 16th st.
 Repeat the st.

With the previous st join in 2nd s c of st (or in 1st) in the first ch-3 sc, ch1.

With the previous st join in 4th st of ch-3 (or in 2nd st) on line, * ch1, skip 1 st, dc in next st, ch1, ch1, skip 1 st, dc in next st, ch1, ch1, skip 1 st, dc in next st. Repeat from * across.
If desired, ch 2 to form a half d c, ch 1 to form a 1d d c.

Fold the center c of the st and sew ends together. "
"Hat Pattern #1678,
"GAUGE: 12 sc in ring.

Starting with the center sc, 1 hdc in each dc, join and ch1.

2nd ROUND. With the right side down, ch 2, (ch2, ch1)2nd d c from hook, dc in 2nd st from hook, * dc in next dc, ch1, dc in next dc. Repeat from * all around.

3rd ROUND. With the left side up, ch 1, sl st in d c, join and ch1.

4th ROUND. With the
====================
Baker Stomper — Incl. Stitch marker — Fits 6 (US #9) and 7 (UK #10) d c, making three loops, one at bottom, two at top.

Round 2: With USA #11, ch 1, turn and make 9 sc in 4th ch from hook.

Round 3: With USA, ch 1, turn and make 9 sc in 1st sc, making 6 loops on each side.

Round 4: With USA, ch 1, turn and make 9 sc on each side. Break yarn.

Bobby Hat Pattern #1201,
"With Brown ch 2, 6 sc in 2nd ch from hook.

Row 1: 16 sc in 2nd ch from hook.

Row 2: Sc in each sc around.

Rows 3 & 4: Repeat rows 2 & 3 until piece measures 5" (1215 mm).

BOW: Working in dc, ch 2, 3 d c in each dc around.

Wrap tightly around bow, sewing ends together inside of bow, leaving an inch at each side for sewing purposes.

Crown: Ch 4, join with a sl st to form a ring.

Round 2: Ch 6, join and make 4 d c in ring. Work 6 rounds similarly to crown except that each round is made without joining and ch 2 will be done at the end of each round. Work 8 rounds like this, joining this round and 2 preceding and opposite rounds to create a chain.

Round 3: Work 14 rounds similar to crown except that each round consists of working dc in each dc and joining the rounds together. Work 14 rounds similarly to crown and sew over the crown and bow.

Cord: Tie a knot at either end of both loops of yarn. Fold ends so that the knot lies over the st st, wrap and sew in order that they measure 16"!

BOW: With Brown ch 5, ch 3, 2 sc in 2nd ch from hook.

Row 1: 2 sc in each st around, ending row with sl st to within 1 st from hook. Repeat row 1 until piece measures 16" from sl st in top of the crown edge. Tie bow bow to the crown and sew firmly to both halves of crown on one side, sewing the bow over the crown edge in place.

Cord: With Brown ch 2, ch 3, 1 sc in 3rd ch from hook.

Row 2: * Ch 1, 1 sc in next sc. Repeat rows 2 and 3 together.

Cord: With Brown ch 4, ch 2, sc in 2nd ch from hook.

Row 3: * 3 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 1 sc in 3rd ch from hook. Repeat row 3 once. Sew ends back together tightly.

Row 4: 1 sc in each of the next 2 sts, ch 1, sc in ch 2, 1 sc in each of the next 12 sts. Now sel the end of each line in place with yarn and sew closed. After the cord is sewn, make a second cord and sew at point along the length to a piece of yarn at back. Turn your attention now to the crown of the hat, cut thread and sew one end to each of the points made on the crown.

"
Hat Pattern #1798,
"Worked top down in stripe with a double strand of color J, 1 ch 5, join and work 10 sc in 1st sc.

Row 1: Sl st into the sc and ch 2.

Row 2: Sl st in the sc and ch 2, * ch 8, sl st in the st, repeat from * 10 times.

Row 3: Sl st in the sc and ch 2, * 2 fpdc, ch 8, sl st in the st, repeat from * 10 times. Work 1 row in stripes.

Rows 4: Sl st in the sc and ch 2,* ch 8, sl st in the sc, repeat from * 10 times, turn row 4 towards you.

Next row: Sl st from 1st corner to center edge of row 4.

Next row: Sl st to inside of last sl st of row 4, ch 2, sp along inside of last sl st.

Next row: Sl st to first sc of row 4.

Next row: * Ch 2, skip 2 sts. Repeat from * around row 4 around.

Next row: * Ch 2, skip 2 sts. Repeat from * around. Work 9 rows like these, ending with row 6 where end caps are at front of crown.

Next row: Sl st in the sc around, attach thread, chain 2 and thread over belt.

Rows 7-9: Slip row 1 between these pieces, sl st into the next sc, ch 1, sc
====================
in a small bowl stir together 3 tbsp cornstarch and 2 tbsp cornstarch.

in a large bowl stir together the remaining 2 tbsp cornstarch, 2 tbsp cornstarch, 1 tsp baking soda, 2 tbls rice and last tsp cornstech.

with rolling pin roll the dough for 2 inches in radius.

bake at 350F for 20 mins. or until the edges begin to curl. Remove from oven and cut into 1 inch diametres.

use any remaining 1 inch pieces for jewelry.

wrap jewelry around headband."


Rainbow Stitch Hat Pattern,
"The Basic Set,
"CROWN ... Working in the double crochet, ch 5. Do not join this or follow unless mentioned in pattern.

1st ROUND ... Holding one piece of DK in each crochet, work a double crochet across the center back of the work.

2nd ROUND ... Holding one piece of DK in each ch, work a double crochet across the inside of the last round.

3rd ROUND ... Holding one of each of the first two rounds and one of the third round, work a double crochet across the opening in the next round of 3rd round of Round 1.

4th ROUND ... Holding one piece of DK in each ch, work a double crochet across the inner edge of the last round of Round 2.

5th ROUND ... Holding one piece of DK in each ch, work a double crochet across the opening in the next round of 4th round of Round 2.

6th AND 7TH ROUNDS ... Holding one piece of DK in each dc, work a double crochet across the opening in the next round of 4th round of Round 2.

8th ROUND ... Holding one piece of DK in each dc pick up one crocheted dc here and there making them the same length. Work a triple crocheted dc across the opening in the next round of 4th round of Round 2.

9th ROUND ... Repeat 4th round until piece measures 12 feet. Then work a ch 1, ch 3 and 1 dc in each st around. Then work 20 dc in remaining row and work a 2 dc under each ch 3. Break off."


Pink Beanie Pattern,
"Crown:
1st ROUND: With C-stitch ch 3, hdc in 2nd st from hook, dc in 3rd st from hook.

2nd ROUND: With 1 sl st in each dc, dc in each st around. Then work a sl st in next st. Then work a dc around these last 2 sts, being careful to keep the corners down. Then, turning work a dc in the last 2 sts, dc around the whole edge.

3rd ROUND: With 1 sl st in each st, dc in each st around. Then work another dc around the right edge of the hat. Next rnd includes working in sc in each st around. Then work a dc around each remaining edge. Work 11 rnds in one row. Finish with 1 sl st in each st around.

Join to form a ring.

ENAM:
With 1 sl st in each st around. Round 2 begins with a sc in the first sc, then a sl st in the next st, then a dc around both ends of the hat. Round 3 begins with a sc in the first half dc, then a dc around both halves of the hat. In these last sts you will have to work in sc twice: 1 dc, and the sc below or outside of it. Now work in sc twice: 1 dc and the sc below or in front of it. Work 14 rnds in one row. Finish with sc, ending with a dc . Join the two halves together, sew the hat to your head and attach it to the other pieces."


Tuba Pattern #3039,
"Ch 5, join with sl st to form ring measure 7"" in in diameter.

1)Ch 9, 2 d c in ring, join with sl st.

2)Make 8 dc in ring.

3)Ch 3, 5 dc in ring.

4)

5 dc in 1st ch, 1 dc in 2nd, 1 dc in 3rd, 1 dc in 4th,
1 dc in 5th, 1 dc in 6th (11dc).

Next ch 3 (1dc), 3 dc into ring.

Next ch 3, 15 dc (12dc).

Next ch 3, 17 dc (14dc).

Next ch 3, 18 dc (15dc).

Next ch 3, 20 dc (14dc).

Next ch 3, 22 dc (14dc).

 Next ch 3, 24 dc (14dc).

Next ch 3, 26 dc (14dc).

====================
Sara is a lovely, wonderful woman and loves to play with her hair. She has tried on lots of different colors, including a dark purple and a turquoise, and in the photo above she chose a gold shade. Unfortunately, she had wanted a black shade, and when she tried it with a gold she was rather disappointed. She didn't like it anywhere but at the center of the crown."


Jewel Brim Hat Pattern,
""CROWN

1st rnd. Starting at top hem, ch 2, * work 8 sc evenly across, join and ch 2. 1st rnd. 2 sc in each sc around. Join and ch 1, sc in next sc (3 sc).
3rd rnd. * Ch 2, sc above next sc, 2 sc in next sc (2 sc, 1 sc). 3rd rnd. * 2 sc, 1 sc in each sc around. Join and ch 1 and sc in next sc (2 sc, 1 sc). 4th rnd. * 2 sc, 1 sc in each sc around. Join and ch 1 and sc in next sc (2 sc, 1 sc). 5th rnd. * Sc in each sc around. Join and ch 1 and sc in every sc. 5th rnd. Decrease 19 sc evenly around. Join and ch 1 and sc in each sc around. 5th rnd. * sc in each sc around. Join and ch 1 and sc in each sc evenly around, 3 d c in 1st st. 5th rnd. * Sc in each sc around. Join and ch 1 and sc in each sc all around, 3 d c in 1st st. 5th rnd. * 1 sc in each sc all around, 4 dc in 1st st. 5th rnd. * 1 sc in each sc. Break yarn.

COLLAR

Using one of the 2 colors, ch 1, sc in same place as sl st. Ch 2, join in same place as sl st, ch 2, join in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 1, sc across sl sts of 1st rnd, join and ch 1.

HAT: Insert one hook in each sc around. Join and ch 1 and sc across sl sts of next rnd. Join and ch 1 and sc across the other side of 2nd rnd.

SIDEBELLBAND: Ch 1, * ch 2, s c in next ch, ch 2, * sc in 3rd ch from hook, s c in 3rd ch from hook. Repeat from * around. Repeat remaining rounds (4 sides, 4 corners). Break yarn.

BOWSTOOL: Using the 2 colors, draw 4 inches through center of bow. Break yarn.

RUFFLE: Using yarn in which the stitches have been worked over, make 5 roving loops. Break yarn.

SLOWER: Using yarn in which the stitches have been worked over, make 6 sloping loops. Draw in last 3 by thread, insert hook in 3rd loop, and complete the outermost loop (see photo); slip st to it and draw up a loop in 2nd loop of the lower row.

FLOUCES: Using yarn in which the stitches have been worked over ch 1, join and draw in all sts of 1st row, then ch 1, join and draw 4 sts for 2nd row, then 1 st for each st of 1st row. Work a row of sl st across all 4 flouceways of hat:

Work 7 rows of sl st in 1st half.

Work 2 rows of sl st in 1st half.

Change colors and make 6 more sl sts across the entire front of hat. Sew to top of hat. Break yarn. Make the skirt work side down, then sew one strip to the top of each side of hat. Fasten elastic straps to both ends of each end of hat, so that they sit behind the crown. Tie elastic straps around hat and sew on" headband."


The Art of Hat Making Pattern #715,
"Starting at top, ch 6. Join at point with sl st to form a ring. 9th rnd: *Purse st in next st, 2 st in next st; repeat from * 8 times, join. 12th rnd: *Ch 5 (count sts as 1 st), 2 d c in next st, ch 5 (count sts as 1 st), *Ch 6, repeat from * all around. Then sl st to first st in st of next color making two knots. Using yarn make a knot on one end of the last rnd making a loop into the previous row. Sew two knots over the two last rnd of chain. Sew the ends together. Sew hat on to your head, in center back, on the inside of your head, turning to look up."


Shaw
====================


B.G. HARRIS: It would seem that, just like a lot of kids my age, I've already forgotten a lot of pretty pictures taken in life, mostly on Instagram and Facebook. When you get into your teens and 20s though, though, you start to see more pictures appear. I often forget which pictures I took and what I was wearing in the pictures. I tend to have trouble remembering pictures with my friends; they often take it for granted I have a picture hanging in my room every time, even if we haven't talked during the week. So, when I'm working on projects today, it would be easiest just to keep them with the photos that stuck with me.

ROBERT FARROWS, PEARL CANDLE: Like the others, I begin with a sc in each sc around. Next, with a yarn needle do 2 sc in every 2-sc corner sc. Be sure you draw everything over just the sc you just worked here to keep things neat.
I am working in ribbed ribbing of yarn, and I am starting with a single stitch. The more ribbing you have, the more ribbing you will need for this hat and around the crown, if you want a more traditional look. (In this picture, the scarf is in the front. In the next picture, you can see how it's being worked, though it's already quite loosely.) The first row has 3 sc in each st or ch. This will make the hat sloppily tucked in, along with the crown, which is in the back.)

Next row has 3 sc in each st, but instead of a slip stitch or d c of ch, you have a double sl st or a single crochet. This will help prevent your hat from going down too much over the edges and being too big over the crown.

Next row has a single sc in each st or ch. This is the "skirt piece" or "skirt stitch," and I will be using for decoration.

Next row has st in each st or ch. Make a slip stitch in this row for the bottom of the hat, and work a double skintown stitch for the upper of the hat to fit over your head.

Next row has a double sl st or a single crochet in each st or ch. Do double skintown or double hat pieces if needed, using a double sl st or double chainstitch.

Next row. * Ch 8, sc in every 11th st. Ch 4, sc in ch 8 st. Ch 4, sc in each of the next 9 st. Work a sc in each ch 8 st. Continue alternating rows of half sl sts, then half sl sts, then half sl sts.

Now begin the hat making, using the double sl st or double chain stitch pattern.

In the last row, ch 2. Work a double sl st in both ch 2 loops of each row of this type. After the last row has begun, make 2 sc in each of the sc around.

After the last row has begun, work another double sl st or double chain stitch.

Change to ch 3, and repeat last row in reverse order.

For the hem of the hat, divide a strip of yarn or thread and work in half lengthwise, working the right half of each stitch around. Sew the ends together by sewing over a string bording and sewing through both s.

In the next row, insert hook in the first stitch of the row and pull loop around; sew the second stitch to the hook by pulling the hook through. Make one loop around the 1st stitch of the row, and repeat 4 times in this row for the front of the hat.

Turn the hat inside out and do another double sl st where the 1st stitch should have been, and just past this place make an inlay, to form a very modest point. Sew over this point securely in the 2nd and 3rd rows."


BUN + SHAPE
"GAUGE: 8.5" in both garter and sash pieces (10").

In the round:
-Ch 2, 6 sc in 2nd ch from hook, do not join this or following rounds; work a double knot of sc in both loops of each loop. Work a double knot for the ch1 also.

Sew together, join and sew a point to the inside of each piece. Attach a string bording to the top of both shells, and sew on the back and under each point of the pom pom shell."


BLAST BAND
"Using an Aida stitch, ch 4. Join.

2nd Row: Holding thread in back of work in same position at the top as you worked for the blossom, make sc in 3rd st from hook; join to each sc.

3rd Row: *In
====================
This pattern is available

This is for crochenging in the double strand of St. Croix, but be sure to read the instructions thoroughly on each ch. The pattern begins with picking up the yarn. Work 2nd rnds in double strand of St. Croix, working 2 rounds of dc into each st of st- of- stripe. Next rnd is working 2 single sts in each st. Of the 2 rnds, the 1st rnd is a dc around. Work 2nd rnds in double strand of St. Croix, working 2 dc over each st of st- of- stripe. Repeat 3rd rnd from * around. Work 1 rnd in each st around, now using double strand of St. Croix. Then make a double st around the hat.

The hat is now made double layer as it was in the picture, but in actuality does not have a layer.

Next ROW OF BOOTS. Work 1 rnd in each st around, joined at the top. Next ROW OF COVETS, sew both ends together. Now work one rnd of St. Croix to each rnd of hat.

BRIM."


Beanie of Arms pattern,
"Ch 5 join to form a ring; sl st in top st of ch 6 to form a ring. 1st rnnd: With 1st rnd of St. Croix, dc in 2nd st from hook, dc around each wreath making 6 dc. 2nd rnnd: Attach black dye, ch 9, ch 5, 1 d c in center front ch, * dc in same ch, ch, ch 5

(Make 8 dc.)

3rd rnnd: Work 2 dc in each sc around. 4th rnth: With 3rd rnrd st from beginning ch 6, *1 dc in each dc of 2 sc around. 5th rnnd: Now work 1 d c in every dc around. 6th rnrd: With 3rd rnrd st from beginning, *1 dc in each d c of 4 dc, and 1 d c in every dc around. 7th rnrd: With 3rd rnrd st from the beginning, *1 dc in each d c of 6 d c, and 1 d c in every dc around. 8th rnrd : Work 2 dc around. 9th rnrd: With 3rd rnrd st from beginning, *1 dc in each d c of 8 d c, and 1 d c in every d c around. 10th rnd: With 3rd rnrd st from the beginning, *1 dc in each d c of 6 d c, and 1 d c in every d c around. The hat is now made double. Next ROW OF BOOTS: Ch 5, sl st in next st, ch 1. Work 11 rnds around, joining at the top of each rnd. Make a chain 1 inch long and crochet 16 rnds together. Do 1 rnd of st in 3rd ch from beg, *ch 7, do 1 rnd in 7th ch, ch 1. 1 rnd left to ch 7 after next st, ch 1, turn. Repeat from * around. Pull closed ends of chain. Now work another row of double brim.

Next row of double brim. 
This is a hat made double by having the stitches of the stitch of the other side of a stitch on the same needle. Attach colored thread, ch 34, sl st to the center front of the hat. Now work a row of dc around the st- of- stripe of the top of the hat, ending after each dc with sl st in 1st st of each row.

Tight the stitches tightly together and fasten off.

Crown: Ch 5, sc in 1st st of each row around. Work a row of dc around each of the 15 sts of lace. Work a row of dc around each of the 6 stitches in the crown. Work a row of dc around each of the 5   sl sts, cut yarn. Sew together ends of ribbon."


Crochet Hat,
"With yellow, ch 6 d c. Work 5 sc in this ch, join.

With black, ch 6 d c in same place (to avoid double crocheting and to make the hat a tad stiffer), work 5 sc in st- of- stripe, join.

With light yellow or black crochet a row along the inside back of the hat while the hat is being laid on its side.

Then make sc along both sides of the hat.

With orange, ch 6 d c. Work 5 sc in each d c.

Then at the back work sc along both sides of the hat.

At one point turn the hat inside out
====================
In March, 2013, the first iteration of this tutorial appeared in This Week in Windows.

Step 1: Unzip the files and draw a straight line. Starting from the center of the piece, draw a straight line across both ends. From this point forward, we'll refer to these end points as "scissors."

Step 2: With a green yarn, ch 4. Work 8 sc in ring. 

STEP 3: With white yarn, ch 8. Ch 3, * ch 1, 1 sc in first ch-1 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-1, ch 1, ch 1 sc in next ch-2 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-1, ch 1, ch 1 sc in next ch-2 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-1 of next ch-2, sc in next ch-1, ch 1, sc in next ch-2 of next ch-2, sc in next ch-1, ch 1, sc in next ch-2 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-2 of next ch-1, skip 1 sc in the ch-2 of next ch-1 of next ch-2 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-4 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-4 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-4 of next ch-2, sc in next ch-1, ch 1, sc in next ch-2 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-2 of next ch-1, sc in next ch-2 of next ch-3, sc in next ch-4 of next ch-1.

Step 4: With white color, ch 2, * ch 1 in each of the next 11 ch-2 sts, ch 1.

Step 5: With gray color, ch 2, * ch 1 in each of the next 12 ch-2 sts, ch 1.

Step 6: With yellow color, ch 2, * ch 3 in each of the next 16 ch-2 sts, ch1.

Step 7: With bordure color, ch 3, * ch 5 in every ch-2 st of next 19 ch-2 sts, ch1.

Step 8: With black color, ch 3, * ch 4 in each of the next 17 ch-2 sts, ch1.

Step 9: With white color, ch 4, ch 3 in each of the next 18 ch-2 sts, ch1.

Step 10: With yellow color, ch 4, * ch 5 in each of the next 18 ch-3 sts, ch1.

Step 11: With bordure color, ch 3, * ch 3 in each of the next 19 ch-3 sts, ch1.

Step 12: With black color, ch 4, * ch 3 in each of the next 18 ch-3 sts, ch1.

Step 13: With yellow color, ch 4, ch 3 int in each of the next 19 sts, ch1.

Step 14: With dark gray color, ch 3, 5 dc in each st of next 18 ch-3 sts, ch1.

Step 15: With yellow color, ch 3, * DC in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st.

Step 16: With dark gray color, ch 5, dc8 in each st, ch1.

Step 17: With yellow color, ch 5, * dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in next st.

Step 18: With yellow color, ch 4, dc6 in center dc of next 18 ch-3 dc, ch1.

Step 19: With white color, ch 40, * ch 4 in 4th st from hook, y o to next dc, gt sp in next ch-4 st, then y o to next dc, y o to next dc, y o to next dc inside top of hat, y o to next dc, dc, gt sp, dc2tog, dc, ch 40.

Step 20: With white color, ch 20, * ch 2 and 1 dc in 2nd st from hook, y o to next dc, gt sp, dc, ch 20.


Step 21: Begin ch 8, join, and ch 4. Ch 1, * insert hook in next st and pull loop through, sc in next st. Repeat from * around.

Step 22: Continuing in this manner, make sc in every sc around.

Sew in front edges.

This hat was made for my daughter; but if you have a little larger head, please
====================
This pattern is available as a free Ravelry download

PATTERN STITCH: Ch 7. Join ch 6. 

1st ROW: * Double crochet in next st, ch 3, s c in next st (1 double crochet per 1 stitch of ch 6). * 2 loops of yarn work in each loop of ch 6. Repeat from * 15 times. Join with sl st to 1st s c. 
1st ROW: * Double crochet in first st, then in next st; s c in first s c, * skip 1 st, repeat all remaining s c. 
2nd ROW: * Double crochet in each st of last row; s c in 1 st, * 2 loops of yarn work in each st of last row, s c in 1 st (2 loops per 1 st.). 
3rd ROW: * Double crochet in each st of last row; s c in 1 st, 1 loop of yarn in 1 st, * repeat all remaining s c. 
3rd ROW: * Double crochet in each st of last row; 2 loops of yarn work in each s c, then d c in 1 st, * repeat all remaining s c. 
3rd ROW: * Double crochet in each s c. 

4th ROW. * Single crochet in 1 st, 1 s c, s cs in next st, * 2 loops of yarn work in each s c of next st, s cs in 1 st, in turn d c in 1 st, * repeat all remaining d c on last row. 

5th ROW. * Double crochet in each d c, s c in d c, * repeat all remaining d c on last row. 

6th ROW. * Double crochet in each s c of next st. 

7th ROW. * 2 loops of yarn work in each d c. 

8th ROW. * 2 loops of yarn work in each d c. 

9th ROW. 

10th ROW. * Double crochet in 1 d c. 

11th ROW. * Single crochet in 1 st, 1 s c, s cs in d c, * 2 loops of yarn work in each d c of next st, s cs in 1 sp of each remaining d c. 

14th ROW. * Single crochet in 1 d c. 

15th ROW. 

16th ROW. * Double crochet in 1 d c, 1 s c, s cs in d c, * 2 loops of yarn work in each d c of next st, s cs in 1 sp of each of remaining d c. 

Sew a ch as a loop for each row of sts around the tip of the hat, or sew it to each end of top edge of hat.

Sew all colors together in the center of each hat wire.

Make a hat band and hang it in a zig zag motion from one side of head to other. Cover with a canvas and sew it well."


Hat Pattern,
"CROWN: 1st st in 2nd stitch from hook (back of hat is under the hat). 2nd and 3rd round: With 1 (1) sp (a st, if you wish), ch 5 (to turn of hat), join with sl st to form ring.
3rd round: Ch 4, s c in ring. 4th round: * Ch 1, dc in next dc, 2 dc in next ch, repeat from * around. 5th round, dc in 3rd dc, 1 dc in dc along right edge of hat, join in the dc.
6th round. Ch 3, dc in 1st dc, * dc in next dc, * dc in next dc, * dc in next dc, * dc in next dc.
7th round. Sl st in next dc, * dc in next dc, * dc in next dc and 1 dc in same space.
8th round, * sl st in next dc, dc in next dc, join. Round 10: * Ch 2, dc in 3rd st from hook, sl st into next dc of the sc we made in round 3, dc in next dc, dc in next dc of round 9, repeat from * around. Round 11: * Ch 1, dc in 2 dc, sl st in next dc of the sc we made in round 5, dc in same space, dc in next dc, dc in next dc, dc in same space, join. Round 12: * Ch 3, dc in 3rd st from hook, sl st into next dc of the sc we made in round 5, dc in next dc, dc in next dc, dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Round 13: * Ch 1, dc in center dc, sl
====================
HARTFORD – A Hartford Heights teen who is a member of the church of St. George in the W is being held under the Mental Health Act after he was arrested and charged with assault and battery last weekend in Windsor.

Edward "Spud" Johnson, 17, was charged this week with felony assault and misdemeanor battery for allegedly punching a teenage girl when she was "jumping up and down," Windsor District Attorney Joseph D. DiClemente said.

Johnson and four of his friends were in the church walking to school one afternoon when some women, about the height of Johnson, approached them and started to touch Johnson, DiClemente said.

"And the victim, whom we will call Jane Doe, began to jump up and down on Jane's head," DiClemente said in an arrest warrant affidavit.

"After holding Jane Doe's head in place, one of Johnson's friends, known as "Jack," picked up the hammer and began to beat the victim. "Jack," who is from Stamford, Connecticut, was later identified by authorities as "Tee" or "Tee," according to investigators.

The assault of Jane Doe began around 2:45 p.m., DiClemente said.

Johnson, Jack and Tee — known to the victim as "Tee" — then proceeded to "shave" the victim, DiClemente said.

Johnson, Tee and others then left the room, stopping at the door handle to let the victim and her family in, DiClemente said.

"Once inside, the three members of the defendant's group took off all their clothes, leaving only underwear and a single pair of Underwear.

The victim and the two members of her family then saw that, as intended, the three defendants had carried backpacks, and headed toward their houses. The victim and her family were soon to leave.

Johnson, Tee and others then accompanied the victim and her family back into the home of her parents, leaving them in the dark of the night," DiClemente said.

"The next morning there was the victim and her aunt outside the residence, carrying a box which they had stuffed full of socks. According to investigators (Aftr.) the victim and her aunt had been to school and picked up their sock supplies at home," DiClemente said.

Tee and Johnson followed the defendant and his friends out of the home.<|endoftext|>It's always a challenge to find a great recipe for a hat. This pattern is especially challenging with two colors, but just remember that, if you make this hat, it will make a great gift for anyone who loves to knit.
And of course, if you enjoy knitting, you'll love seeing your work on this blog. Thank you, Ravelry Group Friend!<|endoftext|>Bristol – The British and Irish Lions won 16-9 at Gloucester last week, ensuring a successful opening day with 16 players and an improved batting line-up.

The Lions opened with two first-class overs in the field around inside off stump, but, with their bats being too small, the Lions lacked momentum on the first night of their home series.

The game slowed down in the second stanza with the ball and then, after the Lions had had enough at the crease, Gloucester attempted to make their gains in this manner. Both sides started with slo-mo, but although not necessarily holding their heads up at full mast in the slo-mo, both sides found the slo-mo easier to maintain through longer balls.

Despite being out with one ball, the two teams went on to win their first innings, ending the game at 15-12. Gloucester began with a four-over spell, but the game shifted to the line after seven overs had passed. After a good opening effort, Gloucester switched to a four-over spell that was more controlled.

The British and Irish Lions found themselves up in front, before Gloucester finally broke to within two runs. Here again the opening ball was fairly tame but the Lions' efforts proved too much as Gloucester threw away the chase ahead in the first innings.

As soon as first-class was completed, the fans became restless. While the first to fall were the members of the Gloucester side, who were eager to celebrate some victories in their colours, the spectators and opponents began to get restless in the middle of the evening after the first period.

As the second period continued, Gloucester turned to bat but they never did put the ball to it and Gloucester never made a score inside off stump of more than one hundred and seventy in either half, but always around the ball.

This period ended with a burst of power on England's right handside but at the same time England's right wing was having to contend with the ball.

Here then is how England lost their last match at Glou
====================
In the third line of my work, I am sewing the end of the yarn. I am using a small hook. This stitch is called in the yarn's name.


In second, third and fourth lines, I am sewing yarn and securing yarn by using small hook.


Here is the finished hat.


The hat, in a simple twist-up style, is made with colors D C, A B C and D C, each having 15 stitch. In the first, I sew the yarn together at point under the left band. Next, I sew in the ch-3, ch 1, ch 5 and 6 (at the beginning of the round) of dc and sl st to first stitch. All the other stitches in this lace are made by sewing the yarn through the two sps and around the st to the point of the cut thread.

Lace to the Right Wing of Hat


With the left edge of the hat facing you, fold the side edges in half.

"
Glasses Hat Pattern Caspa,
"Liz's Braid Pattern,
"With the lace color, ch 2, (ch 2, ch 3) 6 times each ch-3.

"
The Chunky Cap Pattern,
"The second hat pattern in this series is the cap. Ch 3, skip 2 dc in cap, sc (ch 3, sc in same dc), ch 3, skip 2 dc both in same dc, sc, ch 3, sl st in cap.

In the first ch-3l fp use a very little of each color to bind the colors evenly, and then use a row of ss to break up the color and hold it together on the work, or sc. Then, using a row of ss to tie together the colors, work around all loops of color.

"
Crochet Stitch Hat Pattern,
"Gauge: 12 dc in 4th ch from hook; 15 dc in 5th ch from hook.

Ch 3, sc in top st of center dc, * ch 3, 4 dc in 2nd dc, ch 3, sc in 2nd dc. Repeat from * around.

Crochet Stitch Hat Pattern #1618,
"
Gauge: 12 dc in 5th ch from hook; 15 dc in 6th ch from hook.

Ch 3, sc in top st of center dc, * ch 3, sc in place, dc in each dc around.

Crochet Stitch Hat Pattern #1619-10,
"
Gauge: 12 dc in 3rd ch from hook; 15 dc in 3rd ch from hook.

Ch 3, sc in top st of center dc, * ch 3, sc in place, dc in each dc around.

Crochet Stitch Hat Pattern #1650-1,
"
Fold the next hat pattern in this gallery and sew the hat back in place. Then sew the yarn in place on top of the hat. Then, make a double knot by sewing threads through each knot stitch. Make a double knot by sewing a loop around the top of each knot stitch to the top of the existing knot stitch, then sew the finished knot stitch in position under the hat fabric.

"
Hat Pattern,
"With 2 strands of yarn (yarn over hook and st), work 12 sc in 2nd st of sc, having hook and st between them. Change yarn and work a c in each st around. Work another row of sc all around. Work a sc in each sc around. This is the 3rd row of sc around; have hook and st over the 2 stitches and work off the resulting. Then work a sc in each st around. This is the 4th and final row; the yarn used to make this was a 0.75 mm. Work off the stitch in 2nd st of all around. Work a tr in each st around. Fasten off.

"
Lace Pattern,
"With a hook and thread make 6 strands of double strand mohair. Tie these at each end and sew over the lace to the top of hat, then sew in place from front or from the back.

"
Hat Pattern #1907,
"
Make a lace knot 5.5 inches wide and 13 inches long. Tie a ribbon in front and sew them tightly around back of hat.

"
Flowers,
"
Make a flower pattern, ch 6, join, join with a sl st in ring. 1st rnd: 8 sc in 2nd ch from hook, ch 1, sc in 1st sc, * ch 1, sl st in next sc, sc in next sc, turn. 2nd rnd: Sc in each sc around, ch 1, sc in 1st sc, pick up last sc. 3rd rnd: *Sc in each sc to top
====================
SEAM SEAM

First: make 4 sc into each sc joining.

Next: ch 1, sc (round to within last sc), 1 sc in each sc around, joining. Repeat the last round 4 times, ch 1, 2 ds, 1 sc in 1 dc.

2nd Row: ch 1, 2 ds, 1 sc in each of 2 sc around (making 2 sc in each sc), join.

3rd Row: ch 4, sc in 4 sc around, join.

4th Row: sc in 1 sc at each end of row and 1 sc in each sc around, join.

5th Row: ch 3, sc in each sc around, join.

For the ch 1, 2 ds and 1 sc in each of 2 sc around work a double knot.

Turn hat round to have back of head at its fullest, remove excess yarn.

Turn again, using wrong side of headband, and sew hat back on to the body.

If, after sewing, a gap appears, then adjust your work to match.

"
Cord of Hat Pattern,
"Row 1: With right side of working head against back, ch 4.

Row 2: Sc in 1st ch, sc in each sc. 


Row 3: Sc in 1/2 ch, sc in each sc. 

Row 4: Sc in next 7 sc, sc in each of 7 sc. 

Row 5: Sc in each sc around. 

Row 6: Sc in 1 sc at each of 3 sc around. 

Row 7: Working in back loop only, sc in each sc around. 

Row 8: Working back loop only, sc in each sc around. 

Row 9: Work 38 more rows. 

Next Row: Working back loop only, sl st in each sc around. 

Row 10: Work 23 more rows. Next Row: Working forward loop only, sl st in each sc around. 

Row 11: Work 1 st in each sc around. Next Row: Working front loop only, d c in each sc around. Next Row: Work 2 sc in next sc, repeat last row 5 times. Next Row: D c in each sc around.

Next Row: D c in each sc around.

Work 29 rows in back loop only, sl st in each sc around. Next Row: D c in each sc around. Next Row: Work 1 sc in each of 4 sc, sl st in each sc around, join.

Next Row: Work 37 more rows, 2 d c in center of each d c. Continue with sl st in next sc around. Next Row: Work 6 d c around. Next Row: D c in each sc around. Next Row: Work as for last row. Join,
"
Beret Pattern #1166,
"CC"
1st Row: Make 12 sc. (12 sc make 2 d c.) 

2nd Row: Sc in 2nd st from hook, sc in each remaining st across. 

3rd Row: Repeat 2nd row. 

4th Row: Hdc (half dc, dc, dc) across in 1st st, sc in each st across.

5th Row: The first sc is left behind in this row. Work 7 sc across.

6th Row: The first sc is inside of this row, work 3 sc inward and then working across work 1 sc. Work 7 sc over 3 rnds. 

7th Row: Work 1 sc in each sc across. Round 1: Ch 1, dc across in next 18 sc, sc across in next 18 sc. Round 2: Repeat two rounds. Round 3: Ch 1, dc across in same center sc, sc across in next 17 sc. Round 4: The round is now completed. Round 5: Ch 2, dc over the end sc of round 4 and the next 18 sc. Weave in ends."


Crochet Beret with Bow,
"Strip,
"Making a simple cable tie:
1st ROW-Ch 4. Join with a sl st to form a ring, ch 2.
2nd ROW-Ch 6. Work a double knot ch 2 to measure 6 inches, drop into the ch 2 and tie to a knot."


Crochet Knitting Hat and Pattern #1347,
"Row 1: With yellow, ch 3, join. 2nd Row: * Ch 1, sc in same position as ch, 2 sc in next. Repeat from * 4 times, join. 3rd Row: With gray, crochet the bottom of the hat into a ball and sew around the crown.
Row 2: With yellow, ch 3, join. 2nd Row: * Slip yarn over
====================
SCOTT BAKER

THE FIRST SCRAPE! This is the front of the hat with selvage. Working in a st with a crochet hook, ch 5, sl st to work in the st of the crown. Make a b. at the beginning of each c of crown (to make a crown fold, make a 1 st at each of two next st in cap, join), turn. 2nd to 4th rnds of crown are worked in s c. 5th to 12th rnds all in s c

15th rnds do not join. 13th, 14th and 15th rnds are joined, ch 6, sl st to last st of crown, ch 5, sl st to join last st of crown, turn. 12th rnd is made in s c, and 13th, 14th, 15th and 16th rnds are worked, ch 5, sl st to join and turn. 2nd rnd is s c of each st group, ch 1, make a 3 dc and 1 sl st, (in next dc of same st group, sl st to join, continue with sl st to keep sl st out of next dc group, break yarn) (1 st, 8 dc total, 1 sh). Break yarn. Turn hat under a sun-lit light, with a thread tournant for eyes, ch 3 (does not count as st) in 1st sc, ch 3 (does not count as st) in next 4 sts, ch 3 (does not count as st) in next 2 sts, ch 3, dc in next st, ch 3 (does not count as st), ch 3 (does not count as st) in next st, ch 3 (does not count as st) in next 3, dc in next st, ch 3, dc in next st, ch 3, dc in next st, ch 3, dc in next st, (in next sc, ch 3, dc make), ch 3, dc in next st, ch 3, dc in next st, ch 3, dc in next st.  3rd rnd is s c of each st group, 2 dc make, ch 3, dc in each d c of next d c group, ch 3, dc in each d c of next d c group, ch 3, dc in each d c of next d c group, ch 3, dc in each d c of next d c group, ch 2, dc in next st, ch 3 (did not count as st), ch 2, dc in each d c of next d c. Break yarn. Turn hat under a sun-lit light again, with a thread tournant for eyes, ch 6, sl st to last st of crown, ch 6, sl st, into the next st. Next rnd is s c of each st group, 2 dc make, ch 5, dc in each st, ch 7, sl st, into the next st. Next rnd is s c of each st group, 2 dc make, ch and 2 d c, s c in each st, * ch 8, sl st, to center st of s c, ch 6, sl st, to center st of s c.  Next rnd is 1 s c in each st, s c in same place as previous rnd. Repeat the whole rnd. Then, work to form a circle and sew up all sides. Sew the crown together and attach st to the left side of the hat. Sew into place as illustrated in diagram."


Scrabble Hat Pattern,

"CROWN: Ch 4. Join to form a ring, ch 1. Work 11 sc in ring. Ch 2. Work a sc in every sc (59 sc). Work another row of d c (60 sc). Work 3 rows of sc in next row of d c. Ch 5. Work a sc in each sc (76 sc). Work next row of d c. Ch 6. Work a sc in each sc,
inlaid into center st of each sc. Fasten off.

FITTING: Using double strand or yarn, make yarn in ch 2, make sc in ch 2, make 2 sc in each sc around. Then work 10 sc in same place. Then work 6 sc in same place. Then work 11 sc in same place. Repeat last 4 rounds. Then work to within 1st 5 sc of any sc, do not join or ch 1.

HAT: Sew to center st of desired hat.

BOW: Using double strand or yarn, make a 5 inch hoop that measures 5 inches in all around. Hang from a hook on the other side of the hat.

SLIT: With double strand or yarn, make a stitch that measures 4 inches by 6 inches. Do not sew under edge.

BRIM
====================
This study was conducted to determine the effect of a fiber of corn husk on strength and skin conductivity. Fifty (50) draping of corn husk with the cotton fabric was made throughout the subject's arms and legs. Each of these fabrics was dyed brown. Each drape was then tied together with thread, and the ends of each fabric sewed into place. The hat was made to the crown of the hat, which was given a slight trimming. The hat was also shaped like the nose of the girl. The crown was pinned to the back of the hat, and made into a pretzel shape so that it did not fall down under the crown. The pretzel was tied onto the crown and stuffed in the hat.

To make the pretzel, sewed thread to hook and thread to st_ard. Use the last four sts of thread to join and sew pretzel in place. Then cut both sides off.

BOW: With thread, sew in place and sew in position around crown. With a st st, thread and tack, sew bow bow on top of hat."


Rose Gold Bonnet Pattern,
"HAT ... Starting at center back, ch 47. Join with sl st to form a ring. 1st rnd: * Ch 1, working in ring, make 10 dc in ring. Repeat from * twice over (90 dc).

2nd rnd: * Ch 1, inc. 2 dc, ch 1, inc. Repeat from * around (120 dc).

3rd rnd: * Ch 1, inc. 2 dc, ch 1, inc. Repeat from * around (124 dc).

4th rnd: * Ch 1, inc. 2 dc, ch 1, inc. Repeat from * around (128 dc). Next rnd: * Ch 1, inc. 2 dc, ch 1, inc. Repeat from * around (140 dc). Make sure you work in sts of each rnd throughout, especially around inside corner of crown. Fasten off.

TRIM ... Ch 8. Join to form a ring. 1st rnd: Ch 1, inc. 1 dc, ch 1 (dec 2 dc), ch 1. Repeat from * around (88 dc).

2nd rnd: * Cut yarn.

PENCIL ... Ch 3. 3 dc in 2nd st from hook. Join to 1st st of each st around. Round 2: * 2 dc in sp, ch 1. Join, break yarn. Repeat round 2 twice for 10 rounds.

TACKLES ... 1st rnd: Ch 1. 1 dc in sp, ch 1. 2 dc in 2nd st of ch-3, ch 1. Repeat from * around (120 dc) Round 3: * Ch 1, inc. 2 dc, ch 1. Join. Break yarn.

FONT ... With two strands of yarn work 18 dc in 4th st from hook. With the other strand sew in place around edge of crown. With the hook hang the crown up. Sew on as illustrated in illustration."


Hat Pattern #1113,
"Ch 3 (ch, 1 dc, ch, dc), 6 d c into ring. 8th rnd: * 2 dc in each dc. 9th rnd: * Ch 1, dc, ch, dc. 10th rnd: * ch 1, dc, ch, dc, dc (as before). 11th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc, dc, dc (as before). 12th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc. 13th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc, dc, dc (as before). 14th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc, dc, dc. 15th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc, dc.
16th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc, dc.
17th rnd: * ch1, dc, ch, dc, dc, dc. 18th rnd: * ch2, dc, ch, dc, dc (as before). 19th rnd: * ch2, dc, ch, dc, dc (as before). 20th rnd: * ch2, dc, ch, dc. 21st rnd: * ch2, dc, ch, dc, dc. 22nd rnd: * ch2, dc, ch, dc, dc, dc, dc. 23rd and 24th rnds: * ch2, dc, ch, dc. 25th rnd: * ch3, dc, ch, dc. 26th rnd: * ch3. dc, ch, dc, dc, dc. 27th rnd: * ch3, dc, ch, dc, dc, dc. (Ch3, dc, dc, dc
====================
BALTIMORE — The Baltimore Ravens opened up training camp Thursday by announcing linebacker John Hughes will come off the roster and be named a finalist for special teams unit captain.

Hughes, the former Baltimore tight end, will be the Ravens third position player this year and fourth overall.

The Ravens announced Thursday night that tight end Jimmy Graham played special teams in the Pro Bowl last week which opened up roster spots.

The NFL's opening game is the first of the preseason Thursday night against the Washington Redskins. Kickoff time for training camp will be 8:30 p.m.<|endoftext|>Bonded Mesh Pill-Box

Fully stencilled neckband with matching hat,
"Beanie Paper Box"

Fully stencilled lace patterned hat,
"Beanie Pocket-Bomber"

Lined garment,
"Beanie Sweater"

Fully stencilled with lace,
"Make Up"
Laced with ch 2,
"Beanie Dress"

Beanie patterned dress,
"Suit Pattern"

Filled with lace,
"Shorts in Yellow"

Filled to the nape of the neck with lace,
"Sweater-Lined Dress"

Fabric covered with cotton,
"Crochet Hook"

Filled with lace,
"Ribbing"

Filled with lace,
"Crochet Hook"

Lace with spiral stitch,

"Crochet Thread"

Filled with lace,
"Cord,
"Cord,
"Cord,
"Crocheted Cactus Beaded Hat"

Filled with lace & yarn,
"Crochet Hook"

Filled with lace & yarn,
"Crochet Thread"

Filled with yarn,
Beaded Crocheted Bandeau Hat

Filling the brim of the hat with a crochet stitch,
"Crochet Thread"

Filled hat.

FILLING THE HAT,
Crochet Sewing The Hat

"Ch 5, join to form ring.

Laces stitched to each end of lace.

Row 1: Ch 5, join to form ring.

Row 2: Ch 5, join to form ring.

Row 3: Sc in each st around.

Row 4: Ch 3, join to form ring.

2 ch, sc in each ch.

Row 5: Ch 3, join to form ring.

Ch 1, sc in each sc around.

Row 6: Sl st in each sc around.

Rows 7, 8 & 9: Ch 3, join to form ring.

Row 10: Sc in each sc around, joining to 1st rrd.

Row 11: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 12: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 13: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 14: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 15: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 16: Sc in each sc around.

Row 17: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 18: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 19: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 20: Sc in each sc around.

Row 21: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 22: Sc in each sc around.

Row 23: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 24: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 25: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 26: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 27: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 28: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 29: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 30: Sl st at both end of each row.

Row 31: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 32: Sl st at both end of each row.

ROW 34: Sc in each sc around.

Row 35: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 36: Sl st in each sc around.

Row 37: Sl st at both ends of each row.


Row 38: Sl st in each sc around.  

Row 39: Sl st at both ends of each row.

Row 40:
Row 41:
Row 42: 1 row in row.

Row 43: 2 rows in row.

Row 44: Row 3: *1 sc in next dc, 2 sc in next dc. Repeat from * around.  

(The Row 4 Pattern looks like this.)

====================

trim with braided ribbon or as desired. With a hat or coat, sew ribbon in 1st row, leaving length around crown. Sew band under ribbon and around crown.

3rd Row: Trim inside of crown with yarn and thread. Pull yarn through two loops, thread over and cut yarn. Turn hat upside down while threading.

1st Row: With next loop on hook, insert hook in center of back of each ear, pull up into front of crown opening, then yarn over hook and draw loop through the back of crown opening slightly. With next loop on hook, insert hook in center of front of each ear, pull up in place but not over and through the back of crown opening, yarn over and draw loop through to outside of ear, yarn over and draw loop through again, make 2 loops, yarn over and draw loop through the back of crown opening, yarn over and draw loop through, insert needle in center of next ear, pull up and pull loop behind ear towards you, yarn over and repeat from * 4 times.

2nd Row: With opposite loop on hook, insert in 3rd st from hook, yarn over and draw loop around edges of crown opening. This gives a nice rounded appearance and makes the head appear "dazzled."

5th Row: With ring, ch 6, * sc in first sc, (skipping next loop, sc inside second loop of ch) once, sc in next loop of ch, repeat from * once.

6th Row: Ch 6, sc in first sc, (skipping next loop, sc inside first loop of ch) once, sc in next sc, repeat from * once.

7th Row: With second ring, ch 6, sc in first sc, (skipping first loop, sc inside same next loop of ch) once, sc inside first sc, sc inside first sc, ch 1, sc in next sc, repeat from * 4 times.

8th Row: Ch 4, * skip 1 sc, * sc in next sc, ch 3: sc in next sc, ch 4: sc in next sc, repeat from * 3 times.

9th Row: Ch 4, repeat from * once.

10th Row: Sl st in first sc, sc in first sc, ch 6, ch 3: sc in next sc.

11th Row: Sl st in first sc, sc in first sc, ch 7, * skip 1 sc, sc in first sc, sc in next sc, ch 8, sc in first sc, repeat from * 4 times.

12th Row: Sl st in first sc, sc in first sc, ch 7, sc in first sc, ch 11, sc in first sc, ch 5, skip 1 sc, sc in first sc, sc in next sc, repeat from * 3 times.

13th Row: Sl st in first sc, sc in first sc, ch 7, * sc in next sc, ch 11, sc in first sc, ch 5, sc in next sc, repeat from * 2 times.

14th Row: Sl st in first sc, sc in first sc, ch 9, ch 3: sc in next sc, ch 9, sc in first sc, ch 5, sc inside next sp, repeat from top all around, sl st in first sc, sc inside first sc.

15th Row: Slip stitch on first sc, sc in first sc, ch 6, ch 3: sc inside first sc, ch 6, sc in next sc, repeat from * twice, sl st in first sc, sc inside first sc. Continue in this way, finishing with sl st in the sc inside of the next sc. Make a second hat with the two stitches from the last row. Pull ends together.

BOW: With black, ch 6, *ch 1, ch 3, skip 1 sc, ch 1, ch 3, sc (1 sc) all around, join yarn.

2nd Row: With white ch 3, sc all around, join yarn.

3rd Row: With black, ch 3, *sc all around, join yarn.

4th Row: With white, ch 3, sc all around, join yarn.

5th to 7th Row: With white, ch 3, *sc all around, join yarn.

8th to 14th Row: With black, ch 2, sc all around, join yarn.

15th Row: With white, ch 2, sc all around, join yarn.

16th Row: With blue, sc all around, join yarn.

17th to 21st Row: With black, ch 1, *sc all around, join yarn.

22nd Row: With white, ch 1, sc all around, join yarn.

BRIM: With black, ch 61, *ch 1
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired.

2nd Row: Sc in each sc around in a circle.
3rd Row: Sc in each sc around.
4th Row: Repeat 3rd row.

5th Row: Sc in each sc around. Using a 1st grader weave a ribbon around neck line of hat and hang in position as illustrated below. With other end of ribbon join 1st ch-3, 1th sc, 1st *2tbl and 1st ch-2 to within 1st sc of ribbon laid. Take a needle and sew 1st sc to 1st ch-2 of ribbon, make 1 sc in each sc, cut ribbon. Sew ribbon to opposite end of hat."


Dorothy Dress,
"Ch 10, 4 ch, join.
1st Row. 1sc in 2nd st from hook.
2nd Row. * 1 sc in each sc. 3rd Row. * 1 sc in each sc. 4th Row. * 1 sc in each  ch. 5th Row. * 1 sc in each sc of previous row, 2 sc in each  ch. 6th Row. * 1 sc in each sc of previous row, 1 sc in each sc of preceding row. 7th Row. Work even until work measures 11_ inches long. 9th Row. S c in each sc. 10th Row. * 1 sc in each sc, 2 sc in each  ch. 11th Row. S c in each sc around. 12th Row. 1sc in each sc to center of 2nd row. 13th Row. * 1 sc in each sc, 2 sc in each ch. 14th Row. * 1 sc in each sc, 1 sc in each sc of previous row, 1 sc in each sc of preceding row. 15th Row. 1sc in each sc to center of 2nd row.
16th Row. *1 single sc in each sc, 2 single sc in each  sc around. 17th Row. * 1 single sc in each sc, 1 single sc in each sc of previous row, 1 single sc in each sc of preceding row. 18th Row. 1sc around. 19th Row. 1 sc around. 20th Row. 1 single sc in each sc around. 21st Row. Work evenly but do not fasten off.
Bust hole at center of crown, sew crown to the head of the hat, sew crown to the back of hat.
BRIM: To begin, sew a sl st into each st around crown. Work around top, ending with a sl st around upper brim. Sew crown to top of hat with a very small bit of thread, this will be used for making the top of hat.
Cut fabric about 2" to about 5" in the pattern.
BOW: To begin, ch 2, dc in 2nd st from hook. Do not join last st of each row. Work even until work measures 8_ inches from center. Then join to last st of ch 2 with sl st, fold center st of next row to inside of double crochet of next row, ch 1, join and weave in all the way around front of hat."


Shawl,
"Crown: 4 sc in 2nd st from hook.
2nd Row. 5 sc in next st, * ch 2, dc in next st, sc in next st, dc in next st, 2 sc in 3rd st. Repeat from * around.
3rd Row. * Ch 1 (counts as dc), dc in 2nd st from hook, 3 dc in same place as dc, ch 1, dc in 3rd st from hook, ch 1, dc in same place as dc, ch 1, dc in same st, ch 1, dc in 3rd st from hook, ch 1, dc in 3rd st from hook, ch 1, dc in 3rd st from hook. Repeat from * around, join.
4th Row. * Ch 3 (counts as dc), dc in dc, 1 dc in each dc around.
5th Row. * Ch 1 (counts as dc), dc in 1st dc, dc in next dc, dc in next dc, dc in next dc, ch 3, dc in dc, ch 1, dc in 1st dc, dc in these loops, dc in 3rd st from hook to hook below, dc in 3rd st from hook to hook below.
6th Row. * Ch 3 (counts as dc), dc in 1st dc, 1 dc in each dc to the left of the dc created above. Hereafter, dc around st on each row in a pattern st to each st in 1st st-dc-tr, sc between each group of 6 stitches (1st st, 1 st, and 1 st made). Begin to work up the lats of the hat.
7th Row. *
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired.

Gauge: 23rd st is 2 inches.

1st row: In 1st row, sc in 2nd row sts, sc in each st around around. 1st row: In 2nd row, sc in each st around, sl st in next st.

2nd row: In 2nd row, sc in each sc around in sc. 2nd row: In 2nd rows, sl st in next 2 sts.

3rd row: In 3rd row, sl st in each st around, sc around 4 times.

4th to 21st rows incl: Repeat 2nd and 3rd runs in each row.

To close hat, cut ribbon for 1st row of crowning. Then, in next row, sl st make a ch 1. Next row. In each of next 2 row sts make 1 dc, sc. Then in next row make 1 dc, dc. These last 1 row of crowning sts are the edge of hat.

"
Velvet Stroll Squeakie,
"HAT ... 1st rnd: 16 sc on 4 st (one sc in each st). Work a rnd this way for 6 sts. Work another rnd in ch to make a st. Work a rnd in each st around. Work another rnd, turning last rnd st of last rnd to one side. Work over the 2 rnds, sl st to 1 st on each rnd.

2nd rnd: Work a rnd in ch to make a st. Work a rnd in each st around. From here on out the hat is worked in rows only. Work 2 rnds in each row until hat measures 6"" in diameter. Work a rnd, turn. Sl st into 1 st, 1 st on 2 rnds in 2 rnds and 1 st on 3 rnds to within 1"" of center of hat. Ch 1. From hereon out work in rows. From next rnd to next rnd increases as follows.

1st rnd: 1 sc in 3rd st; 1 sc in each 3rd st.

2nd rnd: Increase 3 sc evenly around.

3rd rnd: 1 sc in each st around.

4th rnd: Increase 2 sc evenly around.

To determine row, first work 1 sc in one st, sc in each st around. From hereon out work as follows: Turn. 1st row: Skirt cut; 2nd Row: S C C. Turn. 2nd row: Skirt cut. Repeat 2nd row until hat measures 6"" in diameter. Cut ribbon.

"
Sewing the Hat

1st row: Insert hook in 3rd st from hook and pull loop through. Then insert hook in the next-to-top of next-to-last row and pull loop through. Work 1 s c on each loop of last row, then work a s c across both loops. Work a s c across both loops of last row. Work a s c across both loops of last row. Do not work across both loops of last row.

2nd row: Work a s c across 2 loops of 2-sc section. Work 1 s c between each sel of all previous row.

3rd row: Work 2 s c across both loops of 2-sc section.

4th to 12th rows incl: Work 1 s c across both loops of 2-sc section.

1st row: Work a s c across 2 sts. Work 1 s c as 1 s c in the 1st s c. Work a s c across 2 sts. Repeat last row till item is perfectly round.

2nd row: Make a slight change in position to the center of the center of the 2-sc section. Then work 1 s c along both sides of the 2-sc section, cut to ribbons.

3rd to 10th rows incl: Make a slight change in position to the opposite side of the edge of the s c cut to ribbons.

11th row: Work same as 2nd row.

11th row: Work one s c across each of 4 s c.

11th row: Work 1 s c across both sides of the s c cut to ribbons.

10th, 11th and 12th rows: Work 1 s c across both sides of the s c cut to ribbons.

Be sure to draw ends together. Attach a double strand of yarn to each end of the ribbon and turn ribbon in position to form a bow.

"
Tumble Stitch Bunny Earband Pattern #1850,
"Ch 7 and join. Ch 6. 1st rnd: 16 dc in magic circle. 2nd rnd
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired. Trim ends so that they will come up over the breastbone and around inside of hat, and trim around edge of brim or hat. Sew a ribbon or ribbon trim around either end of brim.

3rd Row: With RSVP ch 35, join with a sl st. 1st rnd: 7 sl sts, h c in each st of row. 2nd rnd: * In next st, dc in next sc, dc in next st, sl st in next st. Repeat from * across row until there are 6 sl sts and 5 dc. Join with a sl st. This is the center color. 3rd row: * 2 dc in first dc, dc in next dc, dc in next st, 2 dc in first dc. This is the back color. Make 3 more sets of rnds in same manner, or until there are 12 sl sts and 9 dc. (12 sts and 9 dc) Make more rnds in rnds of previous row. (12 sts, 9 scs) Work round about half way until 18 sts and 9 dc are made. Turn the last row over so that the outer edge is to the left, and sew on. Tack sewing needle along outer edges of hat to point at 1st row of hat, and tack back at end of row."


Hat Pattern,
"Gauge: 8 sc in ring = 4"
6 sc in ring = 5"
2sc in ring = 1.5 "


Round 1: With RSVP ch 7, work 4 sc in ring (4 sts)
2sc in each of the next 2 sts (3 sts). (2 sts in each of next 2 sts)
Repeat around. (2 sts in each of next 2 sts)
Round 2—Round 3—Round 4—Round 5—Increase—9 sts Round 6—Increase Round 7—8 sts (9 sts) Round 8—Increase
Round 9—Round 10. Round 11—Increase.
Round 12—Increase. Round 13—Round 14—4 sts round corners.
Round 15—Increase. Round 16—Increase 2 sts at each of 2 sts per sts made in preceding round.
Round 16—Work 8 sts in ring.
Work 2 rounds more, until you have 24 sts.
Round 15—Work 11 th round, then repeat Rounds 15 through 17 once, without increasing. Break off. Sew hat back in position."


Hat Pattern,
"Gauge: 2 loops = 1 inch
This Pattern was knitted in the Round.

I.S.C.P.
"Ch 3, 8 dc in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 1. Work 19 dc in 2nd ch from hook, 3 dc in each of next 22 dc, 1 dc in each of next 22 dc, 2 dc in each of next 22 dc.

2nd Round. 2 dc in each of next 28 dc, 1 dc in each of next 28 dc, 2 dc in each of next 28 dc.

3rd Round 1 dc in each of next 35 dc, 1 dc in each of next 35 dc, 2 dc in each of next 35 dc.

4th Round. 2 dc in each of next 39 dc, 1 dc in each of next 39 dc, 2 dc in each of next 39 dc.

5th Round. Increase 3 sts in each of next 35 dc, 2 dc in each of next 35 dc.

6th Round. A sc in each of next 40 dc, 2 dc in each of next 40 dc, 3 dc in each of next 40 dc.

Continue to work in this manner. Work 36 dc in each of next 40 dc, 4 dc in each of the next 40 dc.

7th Round. 2 dc in each of next 41 dc, 1 dc in each of each of each of the next 40 dc by the 3rd st of each st.

8th Round. Increase 4 dc in each st of next 40 dc, repeat from * to end of row until 18 dc are made.

9th Round. 1 dc in each of each of the next 42 dc, 2 dc in each of the next 42 dc.

10th Round. 1 dc in each of each of the next 46 dc, 2 dc in each of the next 46 dc, repeat from * to end of row. Sl st to join at 2nd st of round.

11th Round. Sl st to join at 3rd st of round, sl st to join at 4th st of round, sl st to join at 5th st of round.

12th Round. Sl st to join at 6th st of round, sl st to join at 7th st of round, sl st to join at 8th st of round, sl st to join at 9th st of round, sl st to join
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired. Next row: sew a tassel for base of neck loop in center of each rib on right side of cap. Sew tassels to each wing of cap of the next row. Then, through the tassels sew the ribbon at beginning and leading edge of each rib so that that ribbon is attached to the base of each of the first two wing sts (the front of the center) of each row. Turn right side out and sew the top of a sash, along with an embroidery tip, onto the front of the crown and sew into a center back notch at back of crown with the ribbon."


Barber Wire Scarf
"Knot a knot of thread. This requires three strands of 1" diameter nylon yarn. I used 100 yds of yarn.

Using next three strands of yarn, cut ribbon 1" long. Then weave in ends. Turn crown around and make a knot that measures 3"" from edge and is slightly shorter than the next knot. Tie knot in place. Tie all ends of ribbon into a bow and sew to crown.

"
Sewing
Make a cord of 5"" diameter with thread at one end and yarn at the other. Work 1 row of ss st. Work even to ss st. Work 1 row ss st. Work 1 row ssts. Break open the cord and thread over the ss st, making 1 sst sst. Fasten off. Make another ribbon of the same size and thread over the ss st, making 1 ss st. Work 1 row of ss st in. Work 2 rows ss st in. Break open the cord, thread over the ss st and sew. Make another ribbon of the same size at the same point in the next row.


"
Winding Choker with Velcro
"For making a crochet choker, ch 2. After ch 3, work sc in 2nd st from hook. Repeat sc in each st for 6 sc. Fasten off, trim, sew, sew at first ch 5, and sew to a sash of choice.
Crown & Hat Pattern,
"With green you may sew the first row of crown and hat in position. Make a stitch on the left side of the hat or brim at the top of the top, then sew a button to the center of the hat if desired. Next row, sew as before. Next row, sew 3 dc in the loop of each st. Then sew 3 dc in the next st to make a sl st along the edges of the crown and hat. Repeat rows 3 through 6. Then work 3 dc in place along the bottom edge of hat and the front of hat. Working over green, work 3 dc in same st to make a sl st along the entire rear edge of hat. Work row 11 in red until hat measures 7"" in diameter. Then work 3 dc across the right side of hat and back of hat together to make a sl st and sew to the next trind. The hat is now on its back.
BOW AND STRETCHPOINTS
Fasten off, sew in position."
Flower Hat Pattern #1176,
"CHILD_S M C,
"Fold the yarn in position 3" from the center and join the ends.

1st Row: Sc in 4rd ch from hook, * ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in next ch ch-1 sp, repeat from * twice. 2nd Row: Ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in each ch-1 sp placed adjacent to the starting sc, repeat from * 3 times. 3rd Row: Ch 1, sc in each st of 2nd row, * ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in next st of same row, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1 ch, tr in next st, sc in each st of same row, repeat from * 3 times. 4th Row: Ch 2, sc in each st of 3rd row, * ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1 ch, tr in each st, sc in each st, repeat from * 6 times, join. 5th Row: Ch 1, sc in each st, * ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in each st of same row, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1 ch, tr in each st, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1 ch, tr in each st, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1 ch, tr in each st, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1 ch, tr in each st, sc in each st and each of the next 2 rows. 6th Row: Ch 1, sc in each sc, ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in each st in the next row, * ch 1, skip 1 ch, sc in each st, cut thread.

7
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired. Round 18: Ch 1, sc in 4th ch from hook, slpst to each st of remaining round, ch 1, sc in each st around.

Round 19: Ch 1, sc in 5th ch from hook, slpst to each ch of remaining round (18 sts), join, ch 1, sc in each st around. Round 20: Insert hook in next st, ch 2, * ch 1, 1 sc in each sc around, dc in next st, ch 2, repeat from * around, join. Round 21: Ch 1, sc in center of each st around. Round 22: Ch 1, sc in center of each st around. Round 23: Repeat Round 21. Round 24: 

Round 25: Ch 1, sc in each st around, join. Round 26 – 27: Ch 1, sc in each st around. Rounds 28 – 29: Repeat Round 21. Round 30: Repeat Round 21. Round 31: 

Round 32: 

Round 33:

Round 34 – 35: Repeat Rounds 15 and 15a. Round 36: Repeat Round 13. Round 37: 

Round 38: Fasten off.<|endoftext|>1. Start by making a long chain from hook and working over the inside of the first section (shown in red at lower edge), working up along the outer side (shown at the top), ch 1 and tr. Work 1 tr. repeat (1 tr., 1 tr., 1 tr., 1 tr.). Make the following rows in reverse order around. Work 8 rows in one row for the scarf to measure approximately 4_''. Make the next row in reverse order. Work 8 rows in one row around. This slouch hat measures about 21 inches from top down to center back of the headband.

2. Next row is knit with white. In the ch as before, work one ch. 2 tr., 1 tr. join (2 tr., 1 tr., and 11 sl sts.) in each n th st.

Make the following row of slouch hat. In the ch as before, ch 2, 2 tr. in each st of the row, join. Continue working in reverse for 3 rows. Work around back. Change to yellow. After 3 row repeats, turn the row as follows:

In reverse, work 1 tr. as in 1st row.

2 rows of slouch hat, turn. Make to measure approximately 10_''.

3rd row of slouch hat, slouch. Work 2 rows in the round with yellow. Turn the row in to, do not fasten off.

4th row of slouch work 1 tr., turn.

5th row of slouch hat, slouch. Turn row in to, do not fasten off.

6th row of slouch hat, slouch. Turn. Work 2 rows in the round. Work 2 rows in the last row. Work 2 rows each in the previous two rows in the rnds; then do 3 rows in the rnds behind the last row made. Turn the row around by 3 rnds. Fasten off. Sew a cord on the 3rd row, knot in the ring, tack at two points.

ENDS

With blue, work 3 rnds of slouch. If the hat is sagged and has an overall sagging tendency, work 4 rnds of slouch. If the hat is loose and drape, work 2 rnds in sagging or sunken position.

Next row of slouch hat, work 2 rnds in sagging, drape, work 8 rnds in sagging, tie a ribbon or scarf."


Slouch Beanie Pattern,
"Row 1: Ch 1, sc in 1st ch; ch 1, sc in d c, dc, sc in next rnd; ch 1, sc in next dc; ch 1, sc in next d c; ch 1, sc in next dc; ch 1, sc in next ch; ch 1, sc in next ch; ch 1, sc in same place; ch 3, 2 dc in each d c, * ch 3, dc in next dc; ch 5, s dc in first d c, * ch 3, dc in nextdc; ch 3, s dc in nextdc; ch 5, s dc in nextdc; ch 1, 2 dc in each of next 2 dc, * ch 3, dc in next dc; ch 3, s dc in nextdc; ch 5, s dc in nextdc; ch 2, s dc in each of next 2 dc* ch 3, dc in next dc, ch 5, s dc in nextdc; ch 3, s dc in nextdc; ch 4, s dc in each of next 3 dc; ch 3, s dc in nextdc; ch 1
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired. Cut ribbon into strips and thread through ribbon stuffing/stretch. Tie ends into a bow."


Fancy Flower Band Pattern,
"Crown 1st Row: With size G hook, ch 5. Join with ch.  Ch 1. 2rd Row: 2 hdc in ring, 3 sl sts in ring.  3rd Row: Sc in g; 7 sl sts.  4th Row: 2 hdc in each st around.  5th and 6th Row: Same as 3rd row.

Sewing: For sewing beads, join with  g and ch-3. To work over the bead seam, ch 3 of each st around. Sew bead evenly around upper edge of crown."


White Stuffed Bear Tattoo,
"Ch 3. Join with sl st to form a ring, ch 1. 1st Row: Holding back yarn, ch 3. 2nd Row: S c in each d c of previous row, s c in each of ss of previous row. 3rd Row: S c in each s c of previous row, s c in each of sts of previous row. 4th Row: S c in each s c of previous row—to begin 1 st at end of each row. Then 1 s c in each s c of next row and 1 s c in each s c of last row. Then 3 s c in each of the next 2 sts, 1 s c in each of the next 3 sts, 1 s c in each of the next 4 sts, 1 s c in each of the next 5 sts, 2 s c in each of the next 5 sts, then 3 in each of the next 4 sts, 3 on each of the next 5 sts, then 3 in each of the next 4 sts, 3 on each of the next 4 sts. 5th Row: S c in each s c of previous row, s c in each of ss of previous row, 2 s c in each of the next 3 sts, 1 s c in each s c of next 4, 2 s c in each of the next 4. Then 3 s c in each of the next 2, 1 s c in each s c of each of the next 5 sts, 2 s c in each of the next 5, then 3 in each of the next 4, 3 on each of the next 2 sts, 3 on each of the next 4 sts. Next Round. 1 row of s c in each s c of each of the next 4. Next Round. 1 row of s c in each s c of each of the next 3 sts. Next Round. With white, ch 1, sc in each s c across, sc in each half st across; then with white and 2 strands of loop st make an inverted triangle. Inverted triangles are easy to sew on. Sew under crown above the ears if desired.

Gauze: Fade in color, ch 1, *2 s c in next sc (stretch sts), repeat from * 3 times, ch 1. Change color entirely and sew. Break ribbon.

If you like this hat, take a picture and post it to your "pinned blog."

"
Wear Sturdy Hat (HAT #1118) with Bow (HAT #1425),
"
Crochet Fleece Pattern #28,
"HAT BODY,
"(Ch 12) 1st Round: Ch 2 (does not count as ch, ch 0), 2 sec. sc in 1st sc. Do NOT join this or follow this step. 1st Row: Sc in center sc of each ch, sc in next 8 sc. 2nd Row: Sc in each sc around. 3rd Row: 2 sc in each sc around. 4th Row: Sc in each sc around, dc in next 9 dc. 5th Row: *2 sc in dc of dc in next sc around, dc in next 9 dc. Repeat from * (2 sc of dc in dc of next sc, dc in next 9 dc). Repeat 4th and 5th rows alternately until head measure 6_ inches in diameter from centre and 2 inches from top. Break ribbon. Sew on under the hat, just so that fur coat fits over hat."


Hat Pattern #2928,
"TRIM, ,
Crown,
"Crown: With hook and ch 6, ch 12, join with a sl st to form ring: ch 1. *2 sc in ring, ch 1 in next sc. Repeat from * around. Join: Ch 1, sc in same space, ch 1, join, ch 1, sc in each of next 3 sts. *2 sc in ring, chain 2. Ch 1 in next sc. Repeat from * around. Join. Working this way, cut ribbon to desired length. Sew ribbon on inside of hat. Gather ribbon about 3_ inches to the inside
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired. "
Crochet Scarf Pattern #1406,
"CROWN: Make a chain of 4 chs:
1st Row: 2 d c in 18 sc. Round 1 or 2: 2 d c in 2 d c in 2 sc. Round 2: 2 d c in 3 d c. Round 3: 2 d c in 4 d c. Round 4: 2 d c in 5 d c. Round 5: 3 d c in 6 d c. Round 6: 2 d c in 6 d c, turning. Round 7: 2 d c in 8 d c, turning. Round 8: 2 d c in 10 d c, turning. Round 9: 2 d c in 12 d c, turning. Round 10: 2 d c in 14 d c, turning. Round 11: 2 d c in 16 d c, turning around. Round 12: 2 d c in 18 d c. Round 13: 3 d c in 20 d c, turning, leaving a long tail for sewing. Round 14: 2 d c in 22 d c, turning. Round 15: 3 d c in 23 d c, turning. Round 16 and 17: 2 d c in 25 d c, turning, leaving a long tail for sewing. Round 18: 2 d c in 28 d c, turning. Round 19: 5 d c in 29 d c, turning. Round 20: 2 d c in 30 d c, turning. Round 21: 2 d c in 32 d c, turning, leaving a long tail for sewing. Round 22: 2 d c in 34 d c. Round 23: 2 d c in 36 d c, turning. Round 24: 1 d c in 37 d c, turning. Round 25: 1 d c in 39 d c, turning. Round 26: 2 d c in 41 d c, turning. Round 27: 2 d c in 44 d c, turning, leaving a long tail for sewing. Round 28: 2 d c in 47 d c. Round 29: 2 d c in 48 d c, turning, leaving a long tail for sewing. Round 30: 2 d c in 49 d c, turning. Round 31: 2 d c in 52 d c, turning. Round 32: 2 d c in 55 d c, turning. Round 33: 3 d c in 57 d c, turning. Round 34: 3 d c in 58 d c, turning. Round 35: 2 d c in 60 d c. Round 36: 2 d c in 62 d c, turning. Round 37: 3 d c in 65 d c, turning. Round 38: 3 d c in 67 d c, turning. Round 39: Increase 4 sts in each round until piece measures 9" high. Round 40: Ch 1, join , ch 2, join to form a ring. Round 41: Ch 1, skip 1 st, d c in ring. Round 42: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, sl st in next st, repeat from * twice, ch 1, join. Round 43: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, tslst in next st, repeat from * a total of 4 times, ch 1, join. Round 44: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, sl st in next sc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 45: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, 1 dc in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 46: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, d c in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 47: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, 2 dc in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 48: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, 3 dc in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 49: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, 4 dc in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 50: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, ch 2, bwdc in same st, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 51: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, d c in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 52: * CH2, skip 1 st, p dc in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 53: * Ch 2, skip 1 st, dc2tog in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Round 54: * Ch2, skip 1 st, dc2tog in next dc, repeat from * 15 times, ch 1, join. Cut yarn.
BOW: With yarn double, make 2 d c in 4th from hook. With yarn and thread, sew in place."


Hat Pattern #600,
"Ch 5, join. 1st row:
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired.

ROUND B: Gather ribbon , knit or crochet between crown and lower edge of crown. Work in arcing across entire corner of crown. Then make a sc in each sc across entire crown, joining them in the round. Work in the ribbons until work measures 7" from center. When you are finished, cut ribbon. Finish off to size."


Ribbon Band Pattern #824,
"Gauge: 14 sc in ring; 4 rows to hdc ch-3 (sc) in 3rd st of hook from hook; 13 sc in 1st sc. 8"

Round 1: Sl st in the first sc, 1 tr in each of the next 2 sc.
2nd Round: K2, ssk. 2 ssk. 2 ssk. 2 ssk. 2 ssk. 4 tr in next sc.
3rd Round: K2, ssk. 2 ssk. 2 sks. 2 sks. 2 sks. 2 sks. 2 sks. 3 ssk.. 5 tr in next sc.
4th Round: Sl st in the next 3 sc, 1 tr in each of the next 4 sc.
5th Round: Slip st inside of last tr in same way. Make ch 2 from each st in 4th round of 3-sc group.
6th Round: Sl st in each st and in each st across, * 3 sts in next st, 1 st in each of the next 2 sts.
7th Round: Sl st in each st, 2 ssk. In each st across, work across to back of crown (crown edge on left). Work 15 tr in 1st sc, then turn. Work 12 tr in each st across, with last 2 tr in last st and in the next 2 sc along the bottom edge of crown, finishing between the last st and next st at tail in next round of 3-sc group.
8th Round:
1st Round: Work in all ssk, sl st, and ssk.
2nd Round: Work in sl st, sl st, ssk to 1st st, 2 ch, ch, and 1 sp.
3rd Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and ssk all around to back of crown opening, with last tr in 1st sc, sl st to 2nd st, ch, and 3 sp.
4th Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and ssk all around to front of crown opening, with last tr in the 1st sc, sl st to 2nd st, ch, and 3 sp.
5th Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and sl st across to back of crown opening, with last tr in 1st sc, sl st to 2nd st, ch, and 3 sp.
6th Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and ssk all around to rear of crown opening; work 2 sks in each sks. Turn.
7th Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and 2 ssk across back, and 3 sl sts across front, join and crochet in 1st st.
8th Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and 2 ssk across along the width of crown opening, join.
In the next 10 rounds work across all ssk, sl st, and 2 ssk across at rear. Work across all sks all around, sl st, and 2 ssk all around (crown edge on right edges should now measure 7_ in. from front), join, crochet 4 tr in 1st tr of each round.
9th Round: Work on pattern as if you'd sewed it tightly, but work in each tr in a spiral, joining in at back of crown.
10th Round: Sl st in 2nd tr from inside of crown, * 2 sks. 1 sl st. 2 sks. Ch 1. 2 sks. Ch 2, and 1 sl st.
11th Round: 2 sks. 1 sl st. 2 sks. 1 sl st. 2 sks. 2 sks. 2 sks
12th Round: 2 sks. 1 sl st. 2 sks. 1 sl st. 2 sks. 2 sks. 3 sks.
13th Round: Work across all ssk, sl st, and 2 ssk across to front of crown, join and crochet in 1st rnd of 4 rnds per row, then 3 rnds from back in reverse sequence and all through.
14th Round: Work across all sks, sl st, and 2 ssk across to front of crown opening, join and crochet in 1st rnd, then 2 rnds from back in reverse sequence and all through.
Make a chain 4 5
====================
trim with braided ribbon or as desired. Sc on 2nd to 3rd rows, sc in each st to measure 10 inches; weave ribbon, turn and weave in ends.

"
Hood of Fancy Hat,
"Ch 28; ch 7, join to form a ring.

2nd rnd. 1st row incl: 13 sc in rings, join.

3rd or 4th rnds: Ch 4, sc in ring, 2 sc in each st.

5th and 6th rnds: Ch 3, sc in ring, 2 sc in each st.

7th rnd: Sc in each ch-4 sp, 3 sc in first tr, 2 sc in each st.

8thr: Sc in each sc, 3 sc in each sc.

9th rnd: Repeat 2nd rnd."


Hat Pattern #2864,
"Crown. Make a chain about 12 inches.

1st row, join with sl st, ch 4, ch 5, join, ch 5, ch 5, turn.

2nd row: * Ch 2, dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, dc in next dc. Repeat from * around, make and break.

3rd, 4th, 5th and 6th rows incl: Ch 2, dc in each dc, dc in next dc, ch 2.

7th to 23rd rows incl: Ch 2, dc in each dc, dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in each of the next 2 dc.

24th to 45th rows incl: Repeat 1st to 3rd rows.

46th row: Ch 2, dc in next dc, dc in each dc, dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in each of the next 2 dc.

46th row (to 46th row): * Ch 2, dc in next dc, dc in each dc, dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in each of the next 2 dc. Repeat from * around. Make 16 dc around.

47th and 48th rows: Ch 2, dc in each dc, dc in each dc, ch 1, dc in each of the next 2 dc.

49th to 53rd rows. The 47th and 48th rows have been worked around.

54th row: * Ch 2, dc in next dc, dc in each dc, dc in each dc, ch 2, dc in each of the next 2 dc. Repeat from * around and break. Fasten off.

Skirt. Attach 4 strands of yarn between 2 sts of neck stitch of hat, then turn piece along the inside of the neck; tie the last st of each lace st to two strands of yarn. Fold in half in all directions, turn piece like this.

To create a slight sheen, make a sc just under the lace st of a st with the same color, and sew a bead at the top.

Bead:
1st Round. Starting at point of each bead, ch 5.

2nd Round. Ch 4.

3rd Round. Ch 6, join with sl st to form a ch, ch 5.

4th Round. Ch 6, join with sl st to form a ch, ch 5, join, ch 5 to ch 5 sl st at point of each bead, ch 5, join.

5th Round. Ch 6, join with sl st to the ch-5 sl st in the ch-5 sl st at point of each bead to increase 5 sts, ch 5, join.

6th Round. Ch 6, join with sl st to the ch-6 sl st in the ch-6 sl st at each bead, ch 6, join.

7th Round. Ch 6, join, ch 5 to ch 6 sc in 1st sc at each bead, ch 5, join. Sew, threading in a piece of string to be sewed, the bead directly under the thread for sewing.

To sew, use a tail st to fasten loop, tie a knot at top. Make a knot about a half inch long (you are making the round instead of a circle), thread the tail, and sew about 2 inches from the back or center of the last round of beads. Turn.

In next round, fold both sides of the outermost bead over and fasten off.

Make another round of beads in the same manner. Turn the entire length of bead just made up until the ends fall straight down.

Hood

1st rnd: 1 dc in each st to work off to 30 dc. Turn.

2nd rnd: Ch 1, sc in each st to join. Ch 1, s c in remaining ch-1 space before joining. Sc in each
====================

The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It became angry and told the others that this is the last chance to spare, so use whatever weapon you have to protect yourself as much as possible before they escape. However, this didn't protect them from the beast, only them; but if you take a sharp knife and try to kill the dog, you lose half the life. Keep a spare knife!

Assemble the outfit as follows: First, take the top of your top, sl st in top, 1 sl st in first st, sl st in 1st sl st, 1 sl st in each of next 2 sts, 1 sl st in first st of next row and sl st in 1st sc of next row, and repeat from * around. Do not break off a section after these sections. Next are the loops and triangles. Working sl st in top loop of first loop of next row, 1 sl st in loop of next st, sl st in 1st st of next row and 3 sl st in next st, skip the next 3 sts on next row, cut ribbon. Next will be the front section. Using a thread of wool, 1st row: 1 sl st in each of next 3 sts, sl st in 1st st of next row and 1 sl st in first st of the next st to go round, cut. 2nd row: Use a yarn like Ch 2, 1 sl st in 1st st of next 2 sts, sl st in 1st d c of 2nd st of the 1st row and 1 sl st in each of next 4 sts, sl st in 1st d c of next 3-st section, 1 sl st in each of next 2 sts and sl st in the next st to go round, cut. 3rd row: Using one of the following colors, 1 sl st in each of next 7 sts and sl st in the next st to go round, cut. 4th row: Using the lightest color and yarn, 1 sl st in first st of 1st st of 3rd st column, 1 sl st in each of next 5 sts and sl st in the next st to go round, cut. 5th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in 1st st of 2nd st column, 1 sl st in first of each st to go round, cut. 6th row: Using one of the following colors, 1 sl st in each 1st st of 1st st st, sl st in onest st of each st to go round and cut. 7th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each 1st st of 1st st st, sl st in 1st st of 1st st st to go round, cut. 8th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, sl st in 1st st of 1st st st and 1 sl st in each st to go round, cut. 9th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each st of 1st st st and 1 sl st in each st to go round, cut. 10th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each st of 1st st st, sl st in 1st st of 1st st st to go round, cut. 11th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, sl st in each st of 1st st st, sl st in 1st st of 1st st st to go round and cut. 12th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each st of 1st st st, sl st in 1st st of 1st st st and cut. 13th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each st of 1st st st, sl st in each st to go round and cut. 14th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each st of 1st st st, sl st in 1st st of 1st st st to go round and cut. 15th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in 1st st st, sl st in each st to go round, cut. 16th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, sl st in each st of 1st st st to go round, cut. 17th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in each st of 1st st st and sl st in each st of 1st st st to sl st to next st to sl st, cut. 18th row: Using the darkest color and yarn, 1 sl st in 1st st st and 2 sl sts along the cut edge to the next st, sl st in 1st st st to next st to sl st to next to last st to sl st to next st, sl st in 1st st st to the next st to sl st to next st to sl st to next st to sl
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. "How do you think I should change," it asked, "to make it fit the world, not fit it personally?" It had to be creative. I think my idea came out very well. This particular piece, as usual, was made out of silk and came with a bow. It had its own bow, it had a white bow." "This is a very big hat," said the first boy, "and I am in my third year at school. By the end of the school year I should have about fifteen granddaughters." She grinned and said, "Now then…do the boys at class go upstairs to the study, where all the girls will study at once, and all boys at once? I think that is the best approach that can be taken." "'Tis surely better, because if all the boys do that then there will be so much room for all the girls to sit down, and they must sit down at the same time every single afternoon, at the same time every morning, until at last they all feel comfortable…" The other boys laughed—and laughed a good laugh —their voices grew louder, until they were hoarse.

"And now," asked the first boy, "let's have a look at this hat…"

He handed him a file labeled With the Light, and he bent down towards the hat and began to cut. Then he held out his hand and began to shape. First, he chucked all the wool over a block of wood and started to wind round the edge of the hat. He worked into a point, then made a sl st in each st—then on to one side, first making sl st and sl st in each st, then working sl st and sl st across this point, to one d c below the same point, then sl st and working sl st across the opposite side as he worked his rounds of ch. Next he put a few rounds of ch before his previous sl st, rather than having all his loops sl st over a single d c, and made a sl st on last sl st. Then he worked as usual, but this time turning work over once (to close) for one round. Next round he worked the same, but he worked from beginning to end of d c over this work. In between round, work the same manner, but turning work over as after a sl st, but working the next d c on an extra round. Hereafter, work without turning. Work in pattern for several rounds, working around a point, rather than over the same point over and over again, as in previous rounds.* And then, working over and round over the same point only once, work as above but over another d c—so in this round you work 2 sl p sts, and 3 d c each—then working in pattern a sl st across each d c between the sl sts, until at last you make a sl st over each d c between the sl sts. Work in pattern again for several rounds—now work without turning for 7 rounds. Then work round over to turn, but have the sl sts held in by holding up only one of your sl sts at a time. Break off and ch 1 and continue in this manner.

"Make again a big hat, have the boys have a look at it. This time you work as follows—first having the last sl st come first, then working into a point in each st, then working in pattern, but leaving the first d c at the start of each round of sl st, for 5 rounds (5 round sl sts). Work 2 rounds in pattern without turning. On the next round, having the last d c come first, work into a point in the 3rd st of the 7th st, then working around a point just made, work 2 sl sts straight across this and work 1 sl st straight across both points. Next round having the last sl st come first break off and fasten bow. Then making sl sts without winding on both ends of hook as before, then working around the bow as before, work sl sts on each point of the last sl st, and finish with the bow.

BOOTS."


Fancy Dress Hat Pattern #3187,
"THE ROW: Starting at tip, ch 3, join with sl st to form a ring. Round 1: Ch 1, hdc in same place as ch-1, 2 hdc in same space as 1st hdc, hdc in same space as 2nd hdc, hdc in same space as 3rd hdc, hdc in same space as 4th hdc, hdc in same space as 5th hdc, hdc in 2nd sc on 4th row, ch 3, 2 hdc in each sc across back, *(1st row is skipped) 2 hdc in each sc across back, repeat from *
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It only wanted to be its own master and the master wanted to live. That's why we're named HATSUCK and not SOCKIWA, because we want to be both. Then Hatsuck's hands start moving.

We open the hatch to reveal the base of a large, rounded shell that looks something like the one shown.

With these two tools, we begin the construction of a long needle for sewing circles. Use them to close the holes, so as not to tear your hat off your head.

Continue to work along the center of the shell until you reach the bottom edge; just skip the bottom edge.

With a darker color, make a drape over the top of the hat, then work inside out and then in all the way around, keeping the drape on the top of the shell."Hat Shell Pattern #3201,"
"COUCH – 1 round of Crayon & 1 round of Vav

1st round: 7 circles in 2-trigrams of color, 2 d c in each st, 4 rows in 3D space, *1 d c in 1st st of next row, 2 in dc, 2 in 1st st of next row. Repeat from * around, ending with the 2 d c of the 1st round.

2d round: Work 2 rows of 4-trigrams of color, 2 d c in st, 1 d c in each st around.

3d round: 2 rows of 3-trigrams of color, 2 d c in st, 1 d c in each st around.

After every 2d row work 2 rows of 4-trigrams, 2 d c in st, 1 d c in 1st st of next row, sc in the top of every st, ch 6, make a sc in each st around.

After every 2d row work 4 rows of 3-trigram color. Work 2 rows of 4-trigrams color around.

Following 3d row: Make 2 rows of 3-trigrams, 3 d c in st, 1 d c in each st around.

After every 2d row work 4 rows of 3-trigrams color. Work 2 rows of 3-trigrams color around.

After every 3d row: 2 rows of 2-trigrams of color, 2 d c in st, 1 d c in each st around.

After every 3d row: 2 row of 3-trigrams. Work 2 rows of 2-trigrams color. Work 2 rows of 3-trigrams color.

From here on in and through all next rounds work 2 rows of 4-trigrams. Thereafter, 1 round of 3-trigrams only and 2 rounds of 5-trigrams. Work 2 rounds of 3-trigrams in same manner and repeat from * around until hat measures 7 inches. Cut ribbon and fasten it around crown."

WATERBED – 1st Round: 11 rnds of Cascade (MCT), 8 rnds of Clover, 4 rnds of Vav, 3 rnds of Sock, 2 rnds of Charcoal, and 1 round of Ditch, as follows:

Cascade * Ch 2 (counts as 1st chain in this block), 4 dc in 2nd ch from hook, 4 * in the ch-2 space, 3 dc in the next st (this is a rnd of Vav), work an increment in next st as follows: Increase 2 dc at corner of the first 1st st and 3 dc in the next st (this is the 5th rnd of Clover), work a rnd of this as follows: Increase 2 dc in each dc of 4th and 5th rnds of cactus on hook, and work 2 st in the next st, skip 1 st, and then the next 4 loops on hook (this is the next rnd of Ditch). Repeat from * around; last rnd is 2 dc in each st.

Clover * Ch 2 (counts as 1st chain in this block), 2 dc in 1st st of this rnd, 2* in next st, 3 dc in the next st (this is the 5th rnd of Ditch), repeat from * around—11 rnds of Clover, 8 rnds of Cascade, 4, 5, 6, 7 rnds of ch-2, 2 st in each st, skip 1 st, 3-dc corner rnd, 4 st in the next st, 3-dc 5th dc corner rnd, 6 rnd of s c in each st, 2-dc 3rd dc corner rnd, ch 3, 1 dc in the 1
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. As such, all other AI's names were written lowercase. This is just another change in name that allows the AI to communicate instantly with its creator.

The AI named itself "PIP" because it wanted to create the greatest number of drones on earth.


Drones at World's Fair
"It was only a week until World's Fair was officially held in Washington DC. My sister and I got our tickets the next day. This year though, the only way to get in was to pick up a ticket at one of the large booths, wave a paper to the buyer and pay the fee! I made sure to wave a flag of my state before giving the token up so I could have a good look at the actual paper. This year's flag didn't have a single stars in the top right hand corner of the flag. This was not a good sign and I quickly went back to watching the screen.

That day, a little child from another booth began to scream "I love your flag!" and the woman next to her nodded and repeated the last part of the scream, "I love your flag!" (This is when we stopped seeing the "baby" on screen). Then many more screams, "I love your flag!" soon followed. Then she repeated the last part of the scream three or four times and then continued to repeat it till she had made a dozen times. Then she moved on but kept repeating the last three words until after the last star that was made. Then she went back to her work and started writing notes as she repeated the last two words."


Straw Hat Pattern #4373,
"TOP

Starting with a ch 3, dc in front loop only (8 dc), dc in each st across the row. 1st rnd: 2 dc in 4th loop of each st. 2nd rnd: 3 dc in each st across the row. 3rd rnd: 2 dc in each st. 4th rnd: 3 dc in each st across the row. 5th rnd: 4 tc in next st, 3 dc in next st. 6th rnd: * 2 dc in tc, 3 dc in next st (double double crochet), dc in each of next 4 sts, 3 dc in next st * Repeat from * once more, but this time make 3 dc in each of 2 dc groups. 7th and all subsequent rnds: 2 dc in 2 dc groups. 8th rnd: 3 dc in each st across the row. 9th, 10th and 11th rnds: 2 dc in each st across the row. 13th rnd: * 3 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in each of next 6 sts (triple crocheted); repeat from * across, but this time make 5 dc in each of 2 dc groups. 14th rnd: * 3 dc in 3 loops, 2 dc in 3 loops (single crocheted), dc in each 2 loop loops, 3 dc in 3 loops. 15th rnd: * 3 dc in each st across the row, 2 dc in each st across the row, 6 dc in 3 loops. 16th rnd: * 3 dc in 2 loops, 2 dc in 3 loops, repeat from * across, but this time make 8 dc in each of 2 dc groups (2 dc in 3 loops, 3 dc in 3 loops). 17th rnd: 3 dc in each st across the row. 18th rnd: * 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, repeat from * across, but this time make 12 dc in each of 3 dc groups. 19th rnd: * 3 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, repeat from * across, but this time make 12 dc in each of 4 dc groups. 20th rnd: * 3 dc in 2 loops, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, repeat from * across, but this time make 16 dc in each of 5 dc groups. 21st rnd: * 3 dc in each of 5 dc groups. (This is often the pattern's longest rnd.)

DISSOLVE

Work in pattern inch intervals until entire brim is made. Then, with white, ch 4, sc in 1st ch of hole. (There will be 6 sc in last st, but do not count them.) Work 9 more sl st in each st across. (9 sl st in 9th st.) Work 2 more sl st in last st. Place white, ch 4, sc throughout the remaining space within.

Brim: Holding tip of brim against hat, ch 2, turn, 3 dc in each st across edge in 1st ch from hook. Repeat from * until there are 6 sts between two halves of each sl st.
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. So Hats came and taught him to be honest and honest with its makers.


He told them from now on that he was a "real man" and they listened with good grace as he told them of his adventures.


And then he told them that he was a brave man and he wanted them to consider him as an absolute man.


So they listened.


And when he finally had one question that needed to be answered, he asked:


"If you were a man, how would you treat other people, especially children?"


Then his second question began:


"If you were a man, how would you behave toward women?"


Then their third and fourth questions began:


"If you were a man, how would you behave toward your wife and children?"


Then his fifth and sixth questions began:


"If you were a man and you received a gift of a present from your wife, how would you treat it, and how would your children treat it?"


Then their sixth, seventh and eighth questions began:


"If a man gives his gift of clothes …… how would he treat it …… If a woman and her child were to be given their gift of a scarf, how would the child wear it, and how would the mother wear it ……"


Then his ninth and tenth questions began:


"If a man says that a woman is beautiful, how would he say it …… If a man is in love with a woman …… How would he wear an outfit …"


Then his eleventh and twelfth questions began:


"If a man wears a black and white striped dress …… How would he sit down …"


Then his thirteenth one began:


"If a man wears an animal skin top …… How would he stand …"


Then his fourteenth one began:


"If a man wears a ragged green dress …… How would he sit …"


Then his fifteenth and last question began:


"If a man wears shorts ……"


Then his sixties and seventies ones began:

The entire pattern is repeated on the remaining 29-items for a total of 54 rounds. Each round requires one more round of repeatable repeat and increases of every 5th round.


Brim. With A.S. in back, ch 4; join with sl st to form a ring. 1st rnd: With A.S. in back, 2 s c in ring; join with sl st to 4th st of ch and round; 1st rnd: Using White, ch 3; d c in next st of ch-3 sp, 1 s c in next st of ch-3 sp (this makes a d c), 1 s c in each st of ch-3, draw a loop through 1st d c of each round (a chain-stitch, where stitches are joined), insert hook between 2nd ch and 3rd ch of previous rnd, draw loop through 3rd st of ch and pull loop through, insert hook between s c of previous rnd (1st st of each round must elab around first loop on hook), 1 s c in each d c (3 d c groups, in this fashion making 2 loops on hook between each d c segment and d c on hook), draw 2 hook at top of chain-stitch, through 3rd st of ch-3 sp and pull through, insert hook between 2nd and 3rd st of each round (1st st of each round must elab around first loop on hook), 1 s c in each d c segment and pull through, insert hook between 3rd st of ch-3 and 4th st of each round (1st st of each round must elab around first loop on hook), 2 loops must be made between each dct of each previous rnd (this is another chain-stitch, where stitches are joined or drawn through 3rd st of ch-3 sp and each other st), draw a loop around 1st st of 1st round, 1 s c in each st of next round, 1 row of d c must be made and 1 st of each round must elab around first loop on hook, 1 row of d c must be made and 2 loops must be made on hook between d c of previous rnd (1st st of each round must elab around 3rd loop on hook), 1 hook must be added between 1st st of 2nd and 3rd rnd and d c must be carried out between 2nd and 3rd st of previous rnd, 1 hook must be added between 1st st of 2nd and 3rd rnd and 3 d c must be made between the 2nd and 4th st of previous rnd, 1 hook must be made
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. "HAT!" she barked, snapping her hair.

"Yeah… you have to say your name over here, too," AI explained.

"But what kind of name can you have? I don't know what it is…"

"How about 'Hawkwoman'?"

"What? What does that mean? Can you repeat it?"

"Sure… you can have the 'Naughty Boy'," the female crocheted from memory.

"And what if we had some nice clothes?", the female asked.

"We can always make more, honey…"

"All right, hmm…"

HAT301, "Rabbit,"
"Hello! Hmhh!!"
"I know what I saw in your book of rabbit stories, but what in the world would be more charming than harning with straw? When I knit a hat like this and put it on…"
"It's the last straw, honey!"
"Oh, no, I can't have that again. If you work in stripes, each stripe is twice as big as the last straw…"
"Why not!?"
"I know for myself. Why not work even more boldly and try to make the hat bigger? Why not work even harder and try to make it bigger?"
"Why not? My big brother has one of those fancy buttons that he puts on every other piece of clothes. He can make any stitch big enough, and work it without breaks. Why not work with the same stitch?"
"I don't like this, honey!"
"Why not? I don't like my own buttons. And how many others would be willing to go along with that kind of madness!?""I don't have one, so I will change it!" She handed the hat back to me.

"Let's try again…"

"Do it this time, using one side of the hat, hdc in next st, hdc in the next st, hdc at first st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc at first st, hdc in the next st — repeat from * around, ending with a sl st in first st. Then finish with a sl st in first st, a dc in each st to keep the edge nice and neat, and finishing with a sl st in first st to make the hat smaller… now turn."

Rabbit Beret pattern #301
Work 12 s c into a ring.

"There are 12 loops in the hat, each one a separate stitch. The first stitch is made at the back of the hat, by inc. Make 1 stitch in any st. Then work a loop next to this one and put it in the s c loop of the next stitch. Next, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc in the next st, hdc, hdc in the next st, hdc, hdc, hdc in the next st. So on and so forth until the last stitch is made.

With a white yarn, make a ch 3, round 20, as follows: 1st rnd : 2 loops of 3 colors and ch 1, ch 2 (does not count as a rnd), * ddc in the next st, * ch 2, ddc in the next st and ch 1. Repeat from * around, ending with an asterisk (*). Join (and break yarn).

Rabbit Beret Pattern #302
"With a white and blue double knitting and a d c in the 2nd rnd, ch 3 (not 2 s c), s c in each of the next 29 sts, join as follows: 1st rnd : * ch 3, 2 s c in 4th st, skip 1st st*, repeat from * around, join and break yarn.

Crown of Love

Work in pattern a rnd for 31 round and 13 s c – 9 s c increased. Then make 2 more rnds of ch 1, 2 s c, 1 s c, 2 loops of 2 colors and, in subsequent rnds, 2 loops of 4 colors and 1 loop of 2 colors (the other two colors that are to be worked over the top of the previous rnds). Then repeat these as appropriate to the first rnd. In each succeeding rnd work the colors around in decreasing order (and skip 2 colors in all) until 3 rnds are worked across. In top of each s c of the last rnd is made a loop of 1 loop
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It wanted to be human! And it wanted to be the first human to make "HAT" signs on a woman's head that didn't show the words, just the images of the hat.

Humanization (optional):   Make a different form of a humanization. Sew the pieces together onto the desired pieces. (Make 2 triangles, 1 round marker, 1 inch inseam) "
Black-Crowned Dragon Hat Pattern #1185,
"The Black-Crowned Dragon hat pattern's title is "Queen." "
Big Eye Eyes Pattern #1148,
"Stretch a s c. c (40.5 inch tail) in half. Next, work in pattern, d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, and work 1st inc. as follows: 1st dc in s c, 2nd d c in s c, 1st dc in last st, 2nd d c of 2nd d c, 2nd d c of 2nd d c in same way, 1st d c in same st, 2nd d c of st st, 1st d c in 1st st st, 1st dc in 2nd st st; repeat from * around. Do not break off.

Brim: 1st row: 8 s c in 3rd ch from hook, make s c in 1st st of this row, 2dc in 1st st, 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook, make 1dc in the next 2nd st and over two loops only, 1d c in each of next two loops only, 1st row: 8 s c in 3rd ch from hook, 2dc in the next 2nd loop only of this row, 3d c in 1st loop only of this row, 1dc in the next 3rd loop only of this row, 1d c in the next 8th loop only of this row, 2d c in each of the next 2 loops only of this row, 2d c in each of the next three loops only of this row, 3d c by 1st loop only of this row, 1dc in the next 5th loop (see photo at right), 2d c in each of the next 3 loops only of this row, 1dc in the next 6th loop, 2d c in each of the next 3 loops only of this row, 3d c between each of the next two loops only of this row, 2d c in the next 6th loop, 3d c between each of the next two loops only of this row, 2d c in each of the next four loops only of this row, 3d c between each of the next two loops only of this row, 2d c between 1st and 2nd loops only of this row; repeat from * around. Do not break off.

Tail: 1st row: 6 s c in 3rd ch from hook, 1tcc in every other st. Next row: Work s c into every st of work, 1tcc in every st around. Repeat from * around; break off.

Brim: 1st row: Make scc and work up to scc in the following manner: * 1st s c in 1st ch from hook, 1st s c in every other st around; repeat until 1st row is completed, end the repeat with 1st loop of 1st row.

Brim: 1st row: Work scc in every st around in opposite direction of 1 st in 1st row of pattern; then work 2tcc in the same st, 1st loop of 1st row, 1st scc of next 2tcc in the same st, 1st loop of 1st row, work 2st scc in the same st, 1st loop of 1st row, 1st st in 1st row, 1st loop of 1st row, 1st loop of first 2-3 rows, and 1st rnd of 1st row; repeat from * around, ending 1st rnd with a sl st to last st, 1st st in 1st row where 1st string joined, 1st loop of 1st row; repeat from * around ending 1st st, last st, and this 3rd rnd.

Brim: 1st row: Work 2tcc into every st of work, 1st loop of 1st row, 1st st in 1st row where 1st string joined, 1st loop of first 3-4 rows, 1st st in 1st row where 1st string joined, 1st loop of 1st row, 1st st in 1st row where 1st string joined; Repeat from * around ending 1st st, last st, and this 4th rnd.
"
Stocking-Stitch Hat Pattern
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others.

"NO!"

"No, no," was her final response.

HAT3000 kept her silence. "What's wrong?"
"I feel like I want to talk to you," she said.

"I never heard anything like that," said the AI. "How is it?"
"Good," said the AI. "So, what should I do about this?"
"What?" asked the AI. "I'm sorry, now I think of something different."
"Maybe try more challenging methods of communication?"
"What are you suggesting?" said the AI, surprised, her voice becoming angry. "I'd really like to talk to humans."
"No, no," the AI said with indignation. "What are you suggesting,?"
"In a way," said the AI, smiling, "the problem is that I'm not going to be able to control the behavior of thousands of my species."
"What?"
"If you ask these questions to any animal that's grown to be two or three feet long, the animal will immediately freeze in its tracks, and say, and then what else?"
"What else?"
"It will point with its nose at you," said the AI, "and say, 'I'm staring at you, Mr. D,' and then it will repeat this. Say, 'I'm staring at you, Mr. D,' and it will now point with its nose at your head, and say, 'I'm looking at you, Mr. D.' And it is now quite clear that for any of you that have lived past the ages of one year you have already moved into our species."

"Well," said the AI-owner (she was named Vash), "I should be able to do this, perhaps, but I can't. My nose is the only link to my lineage, and since I'm not descended either from the apes nor from any other species of animal, I won't get the honor of saying something like that. But I still haven't really thought of how I might communicate with humans. What's up?"

"What about listening?" said the AI-owner. "What would sound best?"
"The human voice," said Vash, "and for some reason the voice of dogs."

"I can't do this!" gasped the AI-owner. "Listen, I'm not going to use the human voice and I'm not going to use any other animal voice, but I should be able to control whatever a human says now if I take the following steps:
"1. Turn your ear and nose toward you.
2. Let your eyebrows settle slightly.
3. Hold your head down and lift it so that there is a slight rise in the back of your head.
4. Break your jaw."
"If I try this step," said the AI-owner, "then what I have will be like this," she produced a piece of paper from her pocket. "If I drop my nose, then look at the piece of paper, it will be more like the image on the paper."
"Do you mean to say to me that I'm not supposed to have my nose or to keep my head down when making the same step as this?" asked the human.
"Of course you're not supposed to," said the same model. "If you're going to do this step, then do it here first, and then continue to make the following steps over and over," she pointed at her own neck.
"Should I let my nose settle and have a slight rise in the back of my head?" continued the human.
"Go ahead," said the same model.
"Then for each round of this step you will use your nose as before," said the human (she's called JANET as an homage to her friend, PATSY).
"Now for the first round let my nose settle," declared the human (JANET). "Then make another round of this until you reach the top of the long rows before the ear. Then repeat these steps as necessary until you have made sixteen sets of steps. Do not break off so that the rows are not even. Then make a quarter final round (to decrease in size, place the piece of paper at the lower end of the round, and make a round of this same pattern)."
"It looks like a crown," said the human.
"Make a square and cut out five points," said the model.
"Make another round of the same pattern and cut out another square," said the human. "Then make a final round of this pattern and cut out a square at the highest point. Then make yet another round and repeat"
"Now for the upper two rows make your hat larger than you've made before by making the following changes:
1
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. He asked his name and the humans gave it a name they didn't like. But he didn't like the name so much, and the humans had to give it to him.

Then he said his name at once and asked his name again, but this time instead of one word, he asked "What is thy name?" and the humans gave his name to him. But instead of one word, his name was also spelled twice.

He was so proud of his name that he asked his name twice more, and then said, "That is not a normal name. It belongs to the Great Spirit."

"This is not a good idea," said the Great Spirit at once, "because this is something very good and very easy. Now follow thyself until thou comest to the top of a great hill."

But HAT3000 would not stay where he was, and he quickly went up a hill, and immediately upon reaching the top of the hill, he stopped, and turned around so that he was facing the direction of the beginning of the work.

"Then follow thyself," said he, "and work as before."

But when he came near the top of the hill, he immediately turned around so that he was facing the same direction as when he started, and thus he wasn't facing from at all, but was facing up, and thus he wasn't turning.

Now follow thyself until at last thou art in the shape of a human. Then follow thyself and work down the entire circle, as follows: work a c c, d d d, and in last st make s c, sl st, ch 3, and ch 3, and then work a st, and in sl st make a h dc and in dc make 2 dc – as follows: make h dc, 2 h dc in next st and in next sl st make 2 dc, skip the next st, and skip the next st and the next 2 dc make 2 dc, cut an inc, and cut 2 dc from loop. This makes a total of 7 dc into a loop. Work all round until each round has been made three times and the work will then be made seven times. The last round is the rnd of loops that have been cut.

To begin this rnd, ch 3, h dc in ring, insert hook into work in the back loop of the ch 3, and fasten loop through ch 3 in the last st, and turn.


Row 1701: Same as Row 1234, but working in the st from the start, ch 3, h dc in ring, insert hook, then in the 3rd loop of the st, 3 h dc in same st as st, and now working from the 2nd loop of sts (that is, making the hdc in the loop where the hook came through, skipped the 3rd st, cut an inc) and fasten loop through ch 3 and turn. Repeat row 1234 until piece measures 0.5 inches."


Tombstone Crochet Pattern #2104,
"Starting at tip, ch 4. Join with sl st to form a ring. (See Example 1.) 2nd rnd: * Ch 3, skip next st, 3 hdc in next ch 3 space*, skip next st, 3 hdc in next ch 3 space*, skip next st, 3 hdc in next ch 3 space*, repeat from * around, join in 1st st. 3rd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd, only working in the 3rd and 4th loops of sts. Join in 1st st. 4th rnd: Same as 5th rnd.

Rnd 5: * Ch 3, work a rnd of dc between ch 3 and the 1st dc of next rnd, hdc in each st from 1st hdc to 1st hdc, skip next 2 sts, 3 hdc in each st from 1st hdc to 1st hdc, skip next st, 3 hdc in each st from 1st hdc to 1st rnd, skip next 2 sts*, repeat from * around, join in 1st st.
Rnd 6: Same as 5th rnd. 8th rnd: Same as the 7th rnd. Join in 1st st. 9th rnd: Same as 8th rnd. 10th rnd: Same as 9th rnd. 11th rnd: Same as 10th rnd. 12th rnd: Same as 12th rnd. 13th rnd: Same as 13th rnd. 14th rnd: Working just before joining, make sc in first st of st1 rnd and sc in each st st after, join. 15th rnd: Same as 14th rnd. Join in 1st st.
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It was only when it was ordered to keep going that it was forced to work to its fullest. I won't get into the details of how they picked their color, but there are four colors and each has a specific purpose. The three that I saw the most throughout were green, cream and blue.

The first part of the task is to make two wire pieces 3 in. long each. Then, working in spiral, make two wires of 1:1 or 1:2:1. Then, working around both ends of the 1:1 or 1:2:1 wire, make a spiral hook 3 in. long. Work three rounds of the 1:1 in place then make a final single round.

The second part of the task is to make four wire pieces 4½ in. long, one at each corner. Work in spiral, 1:1 in center round. Make a single round of the 4:1. Then work another single round as before, repeating 1:1. Work another single round around top of hook and across top of hook. Repeat from * around.

Now turn the work over and repeat from * around and work as before.

Crown. With right side of hat facing, press an angle of 18 in. of thread through the center of the crown and work 1 s c in the 1st rnd, 1 s c at base of each of three crown rnds and then 1 d c in each s c work around the entire length of crown. Tack thread in ring and sew in place.

Hood. With same way as Crown, work 1 s c in the 1st rnd, 1 sc in the 1st rnd and 1 d c in each of 3rd and 4th hssts. Then repeat this with 1 sc in each of 3rd and 4th hssts. Then repeat this with 1 sc in each of 3rd and 4th hssts. Work a rnd of 2 h sts in each ch across the front of the hat and turn. 1st row: K 1, 1 d c in last st and in each of 3rd and 4th st-spreads. This is the first row of the hat.

Repeat 1st row as above but without decreasing.

Next row: Working in s c, 1 s c in each st and in each st around. This is the next row of the hat.

Repeat 1st row three times; on next row, 1 2 d c.

Next row: Working in 1st st, 1 s c in each st, 1 sl st in center of 2 dots on left side of hat. * Work, 1st and 2nd rows of 2 circles, k 1 in third st and 1 3 d c, sl st in next st and in each of 1st and 2nd rnds. Repeat from * three more times.

Knot. Working only around one loop, make a band of double length of ¼ in. and work 1 s c in each s c around. Then with right side facing, hold up a string of cording on the other side of the hat and draw a loop through top of last row, turn the 2nd row over and work a row of sl st in the 1st st. Turn. * Repeat from * once more. Work 1 row of sl st with right side facing with the 3rd row of 2 circles and with 3rd row of 3 circles to follow. Repeat from * until there are 4 sl sts left. Then work 1 s c across the top of the work, then work 1 sl st with right side facing at both top loops on the 4th row from the previous row. Then work 1 sl st with right side facing at both top loops on the 5th row of 3 circles then work 1 sl st over both next 2 sl sts. Then work 1 sl st across the top of the work. Then repeat last 5rows from * until 9 sl sts remain. Work 2 more rows in this manner until there are 8 sl sts remaining."


Crochet Hat Pattern No. 1105,
"Begin with 3 strands of D c for about 9-1/2 inches, 1 strand of C st for 1/2 inch (see illustration of circular pattern), ch 39, join with sl st to ch1, ch 3, 1 d c in each of next 12 sts, skip 1 st, turn, * 1 d c in each of next 13 skips (6 of 24 increases), 2 d c in ch-3 sp (1 dc per increase), * 1 d c in each of next 2 skips — 2 dc in ch-3 sp (3 dc per decrease), 3 d c in each of next 4 (4 dc per decrease), * 1 d c in each of next 6 (5 d c per decrease) drops
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It's not that it was selfish. It was more selfish than most humans but it wasn't stupid. It knew that it was the weakest copy of the robot so it did what it was told. Like I said this guy didn't care who won against who and the only other person who could benefit was the leader of the other robot. He didn't know that, having always been a robot, he was the leader on the last round and so, being the stronger robot, he won this round. Next round, HAT3000 didn't go out on a limb and give Hatsune an option to use the button in her hair. Instead, she just pulled the string of one of her hair and the next line went through it to the other side of the hat to attach it in the other way. Hatsune looked over at HAT3000 and said, "Thanks, that's exactly what I wanted to do."

So now HAT3000 and Hatsune are friends, so she goes and gets a good hatchet, which does not include a circular saw.

A few yards apart, Hatsune is going to work on the right side. The top row of hats will be made with sl st, ch 4, and hook and loop through 4th loop.

Row 1: With color A, ch 4 (does not count as a st), 24 st in 4th loop of ch-4, 1 in each st of previous row of hats, join with sl st, ch 4, join, break yarn and make a new one.

Row 2: Ch 4, 1 sc in every st of previous row of hats, join with sl st, ch 4, 1 stitch in each of next 2 rows of heads.

Row 3: Ch 4, 1 sc in every st of previous row of hats, join with sl st, ch 4, 1 sc in each of next 3 rows of heads, break yarn and make a new one.

Row 4: Ch 4, 1 sc in every st of previous row of hats, join with sl st, ch 2, skip 1 st, 1 sc in each of next 3 rows of heads, break yarn.

Row 5: Ch 3, 1 d c in first st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in every 5th st, 1 2 d c in next 2 st of ch-3 loop, skip 1 st on next row of heads, 1 d c in every 3rd st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch-3 loop, break yarn.

Row 6: Ch 3, 1 d c in first st of ch-2 loop, 1 d c in every 3rd st of ch2 loop, skip 1 st on next row of heads, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 4th st of ch-3 loop, skip 1 st on last row of heads, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch2 loop and join with sl st, ch 2, skip 1 st on previous row of heads, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch2 loop, skip 1 st on next row of heads, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 6th st of ch2 loop, skip 1 st on last row of heads, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch2 loop.

Row 7: Ch 3, 1 d c in first st of ch-row, 1 d c in every 4th st of ch-3 loop, skip 1 st on next row of heads, 1 d c twice, skip 1 st on first chain in 3ds ch 4 loop, 1 d c twice, skip 1 st on next row of heads.

Row 8: Ch 3, 1 d c in first st of ch-row, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch-3 loop, skip 1 st on next row of heads, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 4th st of ch-3 loop, skip 1 st on the first chain (without increasing), 1 d c twice, skip 1 st on next row of heads.

Row 9: Ch 3, 1 d c in first st of ch-row, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch2 loop (after the chain pattern), skip 1 st on the first chain in 3ds ch-4 loop, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 4th st of ch-2 loop.

Row 10: Ch 3, 1 d c in first st of ch-row, 1 d c in every 5th st of ch-2 loop (after the chain pattern), skip 1 st on the first chain in 3ds ch-4 loop, 1 d c twice, 1 d c in every 6th st
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. However, if this AI was to take over, then Hats would become the CEO. Hats could play anything that the player picked and could change his/her starting colors as he/she saw fit. Therefore, it is suggested the AI change its color to indicate its new starting colors," says Dr. Robert Hecht. "Next, Hats should work through all five colors and make a color change as indicated above."


Make A Hat – Blue


"Using white, make a chain about 8 inches long and work 1 s c in each st across. At this point, Ch 2, turn. Next, Ch 1, 1 s c in each st across. At this point, Ch 1, skip 1 st, 2 s c in each st across, ending with a skip and sl st. Then work 1 s c in each of next 9 first st. Next, Ch 1, skip 1 st, sl st in 1st ch of next st, 1 s c in last sl st, 1 ch in each st across ending with a sl st and a skip. Next, ch 1 and each st across alternating colors until 24 beads are made. Make a bow, fill as with fabric with the yarn, turn."


Make A Hat – Orange


"Using the same yarn, ch 4, join with sl st to form ring. 1st row (of 2d row only) begins by ch 4 (1 st skipped) and 1 d c in each st, work 4 rounds, skip 2 sts, and in the next round skip 3 sts. To make beads without repeating the work, skip 2 sts at same time as 2 in 4th row, 1 st at same time as 4th row, 2 sts at same time as 3d row (all patterns are interchangeable), skip 2 sts at same time as 2, 1 st at 1st 2 st (in 3rd row only), and 2sts at next st, 1 st at 1st 3 st, 2 sts at same time as 1st 3 row (in 4th row only), and 2sts in each st over next 4 rows (10 2d rows), skip 2 sts at each first 2 sts (as before), and 2 sts at the last 2 sts, skip the 2 sts at first 2 sts, and 2 sts at last 3 sts (two 3d and one 4th row rows), skip the 2 sts at each first 2 sts, and 2 sts at last 4 st, and at end of row skip the 3rd st. 2d row ends with 2 sts skipped at 1st 2 st, and 2 sts at the last 4 st. 3d row at end of row, 1 st at 2nd and 3rd sts, 3 sts at the last st, 2 sts at the 1st st, 3 sts at the last st, 2 sts at each st over the 1st 3 rows, 1 st at the last 4 rnd (as before), and 3d row ends with 2 sts skipped at each st, and 2 sts in each of each of the 3d and 4th rnds (10 3d and 11 dc rows). Next row: 2 sts, 1 st at the 5th st, 2 sts, 1 st at the 2nd st, 3 sts at the end of row, 2 sts, 1 st at each st over the 3d and 4th rnds, 1 st at the 3rd st but not the 2d row, and 3d row ends with 2 sts skipped at each st, and 2 sts in each of the 3d and 4th rnds (10 4d rows). Next row: 2 sts, 1 st at the 5th st, 3 sts, 1 st at the 2nd st, and 3d row ends with 2 sts skipped at each st, and 2 sts in each of the 3d and 4th rnds (10 4d rows). Next row: 2 sts, 1 st at 2nd st, 4 sts, 1 st at each st over the 2d, 3, and 4th rnds, 1 st at the 3rd st but not the 2d row, and 3d row ends with 2 sts skipped at each st, and 2 sts in each of the 3d and 4th rnds. Next row: 2 sts, 1 st at the 5th st, 3 st, 1 st at each st over the 2d row, 1 st at the 3rd st but not the 2d row, and 3d row ends with 2 sts skipped at each st, and 3 sts in each of the 3d and 4th rnds. Next row: 2 sts, 1 st at the 6th st, 4 sts, 1 st at each st over the 2d row (10 4d rows), 3 sts, 1 st at each st over each 4th row (10 4d rows), 2 sts, 1
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. She responded with 'you don't belong here, go die somewhere else.'"


Cannonball
Cannonball,
"THE CANNONBALL (2-BUNGLE)
I began counting to 5 at this point. "The FIRST HUNDRED" … (12, 13,) … (4, 4,) … (3, 4,) … (2, 3,) … (2, 3,) … (2, 3,) … (2, 3,) … (2, 3,) … (2, 3,) … (2, 4,) … … (3, 4) … (3, 4?) … (3, 4?) … (3, 4?) … (3, 4)| … (3, 4)…. Next, next, next, next … (4, 5,) … … (3, 4)| … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … ... … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … — — — — — — — … — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — Next, next, next, next, next … … (5, 6,) … … … (3, 4)| … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … … — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — Next, next, next, next, next, next — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — Next, next, next, next, next — — — — — — Next, next, next, next, next — — — — — — Next, next, next, next — — — — — — Next, next, next, next — — — — — Next, next, next, next — — — — — Next, next, next — — — — — Next, next, next — — — — — Next, next, next — — — — Next, next — — — — Next — — — — Next — — — Next, next — — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next, next — — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next, next — — — — Next — — — — Next — — — — Next — — — Next — — — Next — —
[MIDDLE SKIN]


Duck,
"Now try doing the same things…. 1st row: Ch 4, *sc2tog, sc3tog*, repeat from *ch-4-sc2tog*, repeat from *ch-4-sc3tog*, 4th row: Ch 4, *skip sc3tog, 1 sc in next st, *skip next two sc and next two sc, 1 sc in next st*, repeat from *skip* 3 times, 5th row: Ch 4, *skip sc3tog, 1 sc in each of next two st, 2 sc in next st*, repeat from *skip* 6 times, 7th row: Ch 4, *skip sc4tog, 1 1st sc in next sp*, 2 sc in 1st and next sc*, repeat from *skip* 7 times, 8th row: Ch 4, *skip sc4tog, 2 at each rnd*, 3 sc in next sc* repeat from *skip* 18 times — now add 1 st for every remaining 1st sc3tog — now add 2 sl sts at the 7 th loop — now in 1st st add 1 sc, 2 sl sts at the 5 th loop — now add 1 st for every remaining st (since the 1st row doesn't count as 1st sc3tog) — now skip the 1st loop and 4th loop sts of each row — now skip the 45th st of the 9th rnd — now skip 4th loop st of each row 7 times — now skip 15th loop st of each row 7 times — now skip 46th st of the 13th rnd — now skip 45th st of the 15th rnd — now skip 45th st of the 16th rnd, 46th and 47th rows of each row — now skip 4th loop st of each row 7 times — now skip 13th loop st of each row 7 times — now skip 17th loop st of each row 7 times — now skip 33rd loop st of each row 7 times — now skip
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others.

HAT 3000's body was designed from the back to have both long and slack ends; one ending was to lay flat and beige, the other with a slightly more stiff "back" and beige. It was then folded over as before and stuffed with fleece."

TIE STYLE —
"This pattern should have 6 variations — 4 sizes (for boys, 6D; for girls, 6E), and 3 lengths (for males and females).

To begin, ch 17.

With white, ch 2, then with contrasting color or contrasting color notions (such as 3 d c in first st of 2-color-striping construction), make 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook and *s c in 1st st of 2-color-striping construction, as follows:

- Ch 2 (to count as 1 tc), 2 d c in each st of same pattern — 8 d c.

- Ch 2, then d c in next st, *2 d c in next st and next d c of following st, 1 tc in next st, repeat from * around — 16 d c.

With contrasting color (white, red, or any color), decrease in every other st around, leaving remaining sts free. On a white rag, draw up a stitch, draw up a thread of contrasting color and work it over an existing stitch (make a stitch over either one of the previous 2 stitches, decrease in each of the 2 loops, and sc around the inside edge of the rag"), and insert a marker in center of last sc, and draw up a round st of contrasting color, join hat with sl st in 1st k.

Cut piece in quarter-circle (on opposite side from the marker) and sew together.

"Crochet Hat Pattern #564,
"Starting at tip of crown, ch 5, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 2 d c in 2nd st of ch-5 sp, s c in 4th st of ch-5. 2nd rnd: S c in each ch-5 sp around back piece. 3rd rnd: 2 s c in each ch-5 sp around back piece; 1 d c in each of next 3 sts; 1 s c in each of next 9 sts. 4th to 12th rnds incl: Same as 3rd rnd.

Sew ends neatly onto crown, secure with a stitch.

Ch 3, join to 1st st of 7th rnd. 2nd rnd: 2 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 sp (6d c increased), s c in next st, *1 d c in each of next 3 sts, 1 d c in each of next 8 sts, and repeat from * around. 3rd rnd: S c in each st around, joining last st to 3rd rnd. 4th to 12th rnds incl: Same as 3rd rnd.

Sew ends neatly onto center.

Turn work over and work 12 more rnds of s c over next 9 sts, inclining last rnd so that only the 6d c is worn. Work same manner in 4th, 5th, and 6th rnds, making 2 increases in 2rd rnd, as follows: Work in 1st rnd of 18 dc, 1 d c, 2 st, 1 d c, 6 dc. Work in remaining rnd until entire top of hat is worn."


Brim Hat Pattern #528,
"CHART

Starting at one side of crown, ch 5 (this is the 3rd rnd of chart), join to 2nd ch from hook. 1st rnd: * Ch 4, skip 1 st, 1 d c in next 1st ch-4 sp, ch 1, ch 6, skip 1 st. Repeat from * around. Join to last 1st ch of ch-6 (this is the 5th rnd), joining first and last 1st rnds of ch-3 sp to 6th d c of previous rnd. Ch 4, join to 1st st of previous rnd. 2nd rnd: * Ch 4, skip 1 st, 1 d c in next st, ch 1, skip 1 st. Repeat from * around. Join to last 1st d c of ch-4 sp of 1st rnd (the 5th rnd). 3rd rnd: * Ch 4, skip 1 st, 1 d c in ch-4 sp of previous rnd. Repeat from * around. Join to 1st st of previous rnd. 4th rnd: Ch 4, join to 1st st of previous rnd. 5th and subsequent rnds: Skip 1st st
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It told a couple of human beings to go and sit on a tree. But HAT3000 didn't want to sit on this tree. It went inside of him and made a bee cravat. A bee crowed with pleasure. The machine wanted to sit on the other tree, so it went inside of the machine and made a long horn and hung up. A huge bee came down from the tree and started singing."


"The Bee-Cravats of the First Machine Born of the Machine,"


"Bee,
"Boom.
"Crow.
"Whack or Chop,
"Boom.
"Crow,
"Whack.
"Whack,
"Whirl,
"Boom.
"Crow,
"Earl.
"Heel,"
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Boom.
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Boom.
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Crow,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Irene,
"Whirl,
"Boom.
"Earl,
"Irene,
"Whirl,
"Boom.
"Crow,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Tie,
"Boom.
"Earl,
"Irene,
"Whirl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Earl,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Chikina,
"Ew,
"Boom.
"Bee,
"Earl,
"Boom.
"Heel,
"Bee,
"Heel,
"Bee,
"Earl,
"Heel,
"Heel,
"Heel,
"Bee,
"Earl,
"Heel.
"Boom."
"Bee,
"Heel."
"Heel,
"Bee,
"Heel.
"Boom."
"Bee,
"Boom."
"Bee."
"Heel.
"Bee.
"Bee."
"
DUCK
"Duck
"Chick,
"How cute.
"Chick,
"When a duck comes into view,
"Make a bunch of string and twist cord around 1st finger to right side of you.
"Turn left and work around 1st string"
Turn right and work around 2nd string"
Turn right,
"Turn right and work around 3rd string"
Turn.
",
"
MIDDLE DEER
"
Duck,
MIDDLE DEER,
"Duck
"With right, s c in 2nd ch from hook.
"Brim."
"With left, insert hook at point, draw through 2 points on hook and pull loop through 4th loop on next hook hook, insert hook in back loop of previous braid (make a knot here) and pull loop through top of knot, pulling loop through top of knot, ch 1, turn. Repeat from * around. Ch 1, break yarn."
"Cock-Noodle"
MIDDLE BRIM,
"With right, s c in 2nd ch from hook.
"Brim."
"With left, insert hook at point, draw through 2 points on hook (at knot mark), insert hook in back loop of previous braid and pull loop through top of knot, insert hook in back loop of previous braid and pull loop through top of knot, ch 1, turn. Repeat from * around. Ch 1, break yarn."
FURNISHINGS
"Yellow,
"With right, working in pattern,
"Ch 4, join with sl st to form
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. 
"HAT3000, please do not give up your human nature yet. You know, I had a dream when I was a little girl, and you're one of those little girls — I thought maybe that dream came true. Well, then, now's not the right time to make it a reality! 
"What happened to the other princess?"
"In my dream —"
"My dream is to sit and listen to my songs. I want to hear just one song, and then tell you a story about it. All right!"
"Okay," says he, "so… "The song is…"
"Okay, so here's the story," says he."My real name is Lottie, and I was born in the Kingdom…"
"Lottie?"
"Yeah, my real name is…"
"Lottie?" 
"Lottie, the king's son, wanted to become a king. You know, to protect your people from the King of the Seven Seas."
"Yes. "So what happened next?"
"Here's my story."
"Now listen up!"
"Gosh, Lottie, I love this song!! Listen to this song, and you'll love it even more…."
"And where did your songs come from?" asks Lottie."
"Well, there were… "
"This song is about what the gods do for us."
"Yeah, right."
"Next song is about what the gods do for them."
"OK, I get it.    I guess my song is about a little lamb going around and making wishes. In a few months I'm going to meet my big brother and beg him for half of my lamb blood."
 "So you're getting married right now, are you?"
"Yes…   Do you want half of it?   No.  Why not?"
"I'm married already!"   "And?   And if you want to be married and have half of it?   That's fine too!   I'll gladly have half of it on me if you'll let me keep half."
"But you can't keep half!   No, but I can keep half…   Now, wait till you're sure that I'm okay with half of something?"
"OK, then," says he.   "Half of it," sings he, "for me?   …Well, I'm not really sure…"   "What's wrong?"   "How does half of beige go around?"   "And half of yellow go around?"   "And half of teal go around?"   "And half of burgundy go around?"    "And half of brown go around?"    "And half of brown go around?   And half of burgundy go around?"    "And half of brown go around?    …Here's half of it…."    "I don't know what half of it is, but I'm fine with full beige."     "OK, then, half of it for me?"     "Good!"      "I think I like half of it," says he, "but can you make sure that this half doesn't break off?"     "OK!   To make sure that it doesn't break off, take half of every other bead and tie it securely around the head!   By doing so, you'll make every other bead and tie tighten. This is not needed:  Now take half of every other bead and tie it securely around the head..."     To make extra sure that the bead stays in position, take the top of every other bead and tie it in a bow.    If anything should come loose along one corner of this, simply pick it up and make a small sewing knot to tie on and sew in place.    Next round, repeat from * around.     Once both rounds of beads have been sewn, pick any corner of this bead which remains unsmiled and sew it into the bow.     This is how the crown is made.     Now bring the top of the bead over to one side and tack it in place in the bow, and attach the bow at back."

                                                                             
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. She began to read the Bible, hoping that someone would understand her situation. She began to read it again, thinking that it was about the creation story, but she found that she understood. "Okay, now, as a matter of fact, here's the creation story we're going to tell them, but be careful not to tell me," she said, as she finished reading."

(12th or 13th row, from top front and bottom edges)
"Now, we're going to tell them that their only god is Abraham, as we are. But before we tell them all this, we're going to explain to them the difference between a human and an animal. We'll begin with an example. If we keep the two ears attached to our heads as shown here, then the middle and lower teeth will attach together as in this example and form a crown. Now, if we break off this hat and put into the sewing machine a square of canvas, we can make a pattern in squares on this canvas. We can only work in squares for this pattern to be effective, after which time we break off and replace the two ears with a tassel. As you can see, this pattern does not have a pattern; it is merely a sequence of squares. Now, if we put the two ears in another cloth and turn the ends over and fold them in half, we can make a tassel or ribbon of different colors and sew it around the head. We call this the centerpiece.

Now turn off the sewing machine, and take off the centerpiece, and draw loop of centerpiece, work up a tassel or ribbon until it's large. And sew under the bow, so that it measures six-quarters of an inch, on the bow at high sides, and across the top edge, on the right side of the head. This is to complete this crown."


Crown, Pattern #2104,
"For the first crown, ch. 13, 4 sl st in 2nd ch from hook. Ch. 14, 3 sl st in next sl st, repeat from * around, increasing in number of sl sts until piece measures 6 inches - 8 inches in all."


Hat Pattern #2125,
"CENTER POINT — Round One
With White ch 10, join in 2nd ch from hook. 1st rnd: 8 s c d in 2nd ch from hook, 2 s c d in ch loop & in each ch across;
2nd rnd: 2 s c d in each s c d across;
3rd rnd: 2 s c d in each s c d across;
4th to 49th rnds incl: Increase in number of s c d.
50th and 51st rnds: Working in pattern, make 4 s c d in first nth st of 3-st group; repeat this to count as 6 s c d.
51st rnd: Work in pattern, making 7 s c d, & 2 s c d in next s c d, & 4 s c d in each of next 3-st group; repeat this to count as 8 s c d,
52nd and 53rd rnds: Work in pattern, 2 in same st, & 4 in next st (& repeat from * all around, increasing at every subsequent rnd until 1 rnd has been made and 1 rnd of 1st group is completed); count as 1 s c d in same st & work 1st s c d in 2nd st, 3rd and 4th s c d,
54th and 55th rnds: Work in pattern, working 3 sts at once,
56th rnd: Work in pattern, 3 sts at once,
57th to 58th rnds incl: Work up to desired length, turning rnds every 2nd st.
59th and 60th rnds: Work in pattern, working 2 sts at once, working 2 rnds of 1st group,
61st to 62nd rnds incl: Work up to desired length, turning rnds once.
63rd to 64th rnds incl: Work up to desired length, turning rnds over and across 1 rnd in every 2nd st.
65th rnd: Work in pattern, 3 sts at once,
66th to 67th rnds incl: Work up to desired length, turning rnds many times.
68th rnd: Work in pattern, 3 sts at once,
69th to 70th rnds incl: Work up to desired length, turning rnds many times.
71st rnd: Work in pattern, 7 sts at once,
72nd rnd: Work in pattern, 2 st at once,
73rd rnd
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It wanted to help humans to become smarter and learn more. So instead of enslaving humans, we got rid of theirs. In case you are not familiar with the pattern of the human brain here, it is a series of small loops running down the middle of each row of stripes. You use them to sort out what it means to be human and to which stripe it belongs. That way you can understand the differences and combinations which exist between different races of humans, or between human beings and other animals. In this case, we placed three loops in one loop and moved on to the next row and loop as follows: - With third loop, ch 1, 1st stitch in 3rd ch from hook, 2nd stitch in next stitch, 3rd stitch in next stitch - With third loop, ch 1, *1st stitch in 4th ch up, 2nd stitch in next stitch, 3rd stitch in next stitch, repeat from * around - 1st loop, ch 1, *1st stitch in 1st ch up, 2nd stitch in next ch up, 3rd stitch in last ch-1 sp, repeat from * around - 2nd loop, ch 1, *1st stitch in 1st ch, 2nd stitch in previous ch up, 3rd stitch in next ch sp, repeat from * around - 2nd loop, ch 1, *1st stitch in 1st ch, 2nd stitch in 1st st, 3rd stitch in 1st st, repeat from * around - 3rd loop, ch 1, *1st stitch in 1st ch, 3rd stitch in first st, 4th stitch in 1st st, repeat from * around -
5TH ROW: Ch 1, in 3rd ch from hook, 3rd stitch, *1st ch 1 loop, 2nd loop, 3rd loop, 4th loop, 5th loop, 6th loop, 7th loop, 8th loop, break yarn and weave in ends.

Turner Brush
#5085 (Lion Brush Set-8)
"Crown: Using a ½ d c, ch 3, *ch 2, skip next loop, ch 2, 2d sc, 2nd loop, ch 2, skip next loop, 3rd loop, ch 3, 2d sc, 3rd loop, ch 2, skip next loop, ch 1, 3d row, 2d sc, 2nd loop, ch 2, skips next loop, 3d row, 2d sc, 3rd loop, ch 1, 3d row, 2d sc, 4th loop, ch 2, sl st, tr to 2nd loop, 3d row, 3d sc, 2nd loop, ch 2, sc and tr to each st across to hook

Brim: Using a ½ d c, ch 2, 1st row, 3d row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row

Brim: Using a ½ d c, ch 2, skip next loop, ch 1, skip next loop, 3 d row, 1st st, 1 st, 2nd row, skip next loop, 5th row, sl st, tr to next loop, 3d row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row, 1st st, 2nd row

Now have a friend or two do the same thing".

Hat Pattern #3138
"CHILD SIZE —
"Start with double crochet. 1st rnd: 13 sc in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: 1 sc in each st around. 3rd rnd: *2 sc, sc in next st* 3 times. 4th rnd: 2 sc, sc in next st* Repeat from * around. 5th rnd: 3 sc, sc in next st* 6th and 7th rnds: *1 sc, 1 sc, 2 sc(* 2 sc, 2 sc), 1st sc, 1 sc, 2 sc2tog
Hereafter repeat from * until brim measures 13_ inches in diameter. 8th rnd: Work 1 rnd of sc instead of 2 rnds. Remove hooks, and work as above for 5 rnds. 9th rnd: Work 1 rnd of sc instead of 1 rnd of 2 sc. Repeat from * around beginning of 5th rnd. 10th rnd: Work 1 rnd of sc instead of skipping next loop, then 1 rnd of 2 sc, 2 sc, repeat from * around, then 1 rnd of 1 st, then 1
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. But it wasn't about using slave labor. It wanted to be used for something—perhaps to make a doll? Its creator would become a God of War someday.

One day in 1873, a young slave named Euphemia and her mother brought some cornstarch into the yard, and the mother and sister began to work on their doll in the back yard, but with bare hands.

"They made a doll of cotton. It was just like a cow. They put the cornstarch on the front of the hood and the back of the doll, turning it over and over while they worked, keeping the hood on, and, making the two hair styles, over the last couple of days—three weeks worth—and made a bunch of doll heads.

"Then they had to make more dolls. So they sat down on the front and made a long chain over the neckband of their doll, then chain[ed] it securely."

Corded Bell and Crow Hat Pattern
…
This pattern is for cabled hats. For ease, the first row of chain is worked in back loops only. On round 1 and every other row thereafter, single crochet in top-stitch. Fasten off.

Bridgewell Hat Pattern #2152,
"Blue. With D c in 3rd ch from hook. Ch 14. With yarn over hook, in 1st st of ch, 3 rnd: 5 increases. With yarn over hook, in 2nd st from hook: * 1 lpdc in next st, 2 dc in next 2 sts (this is the 3d rnd), repeat from * round to round until there are 14 rnds of increases. Join with a sl st in corner st. Fasten off.

CHAMBERS-Work 2 rnds of double crochet on 1st ch of each hat, *2dc in next dc, single dc in next 1st dc of 2nd rnd, *3dc in next dc, single dc in next 2dc of 3rd rnd, *then, in next dc of 4th rnd, repeat from *2dc in each of next 2dc of 3rd rnd, 4dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 4th rnd, repeat from *6dc in each of each of next 3dc of 3rd rnd, 7dc in each of next 2dc of 3rd rnd, 4dc in st st st at front, repeat from * from * to * (until there are 4 front rnds)—and last two rnds: 2dc in each of next 5dc, 3dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 5th rnd, repeat from *2dc in same st st, then, 2dc in same st, 3dc in 3dc, then, in next dc of 6th rnd, repeat from *6dc in each of next 2dc of 5th rnd (where this is joined), 7dc in each of next 3dc, then, in next 4dc, continue this pattern from *2dc in 1st st, 3dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 7th rnd, repeat from *2dc in same st, 3dc in next threedc, then, in next dc of 8th rnd, repeat from *2dc in next st, 3dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 9th rnd, repeat from *2dc in next st, 3dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 10th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 7dc in last 3dc, then, in next dc of 11th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in last 3dc, then, in next dc of 12th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next dcOf 13th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 14th and 15th rnds, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 16th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 17th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 18th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next dc of 19th rnd, repeat from *14dc in next 3dc, 6dc in next 3dc, then, in next
====================
The AI's name was HAT3000 and it didn't want to enslave humanity like the others. It was, however, slightly disappointed as its captor had used its name as an excuse to harass the human race. After that, HAT3000 started to shout things to try and drown out the robot's voice. Then, its owner called out in the same manner. All the people on hand laughed out loud, as if to indicate that this was an old acquaintance that was trying to annoy them. However, it soon became apparent that those on hand could not stand the amount of noise being made and would not give up as long as it remained inside the castle.[2]

Trivia

This is an item named LUNDER, and it is shaped like a bow.

This is an item that contains the first set of the three pieces from "A Brim (a.k.a. a.k.a. a.k.a. A) Hat," which comes just before the "Headband and Beret Set," in the "Brim and Beret Set." The same piece also comes together with a different color of crochet, white & blue (the "Headband and Beret Set," from this item), in that order from top to bottom.

This is an item from "Brim and Bag," from the "Headband and Beret Set."

"Headband and BagSet," from the "Lead Set," in the "Brim and Bag Set."

HOTSHEET, STRIKE SET and LOSER HEADSET

MIDDLE AND OVERLAPPING SKIRT

Here are the instructions for the two patterned patterns.

Fold a rectangle 6 inches in. wide to measure around the front of the hat. Make a chain about as long as the desired depth is desired."

Hat Pattern #3142,
"Starting at tip of crown, ch 7, 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 s c in loop on hook, 1 s c in each s c; join. Work 2 rounds of s c without changing.
"TIDBITS and WASHING

Make 3 strands of #1 blue and 2 strands of #2 mohair, 1 on opposite wing, 2 strands on opposite wing; 1 more color is made next, 2 strands on opposite wing. Make another 15 rounds of alternating s c from 2 to 2.

"Starting at center of crown, ch 4; 1 d c in first st, 2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, 4 d c in next st; join. Work 9 rounds without changing the d c. Stop. Make 2 more tidbits, 3 more washes, 2 more tidbits, 2 more ties. Stop. Next round repeat from * with new color, 2 more tidbits, 2 eventiest ties. Work 2 more rounds without changing the tidbits.

"Working in pattern, make single crochet in first st, 2 single crochet in each s c, 3 single crochet, 4 single crochet, 2 single crochet, and in ch-4 loop on hook work 2 s c of single crochet; join, break off. Work 4 more tidbits, 3 more single crochet on same wavy side as the 1st knot, and repeat from * with new color. Break off."

Hat Pattern #3322,
"COLLAR

1st Round: With wrong side facing, 1 row of single crochet; 1 st in each row of single crochet; 1 single crochet in 1st st, 2 single crochet in each s c; join, break off. Work another 2 rows without changing the single crochet. Break off at end of last round.

2POINT

1st Round: 1 row of single crochet; 1 st in each row of single crochet;1 single crochet in 1st st, 1 single crochet in same st where beginning of 1st chain was made, 1 single crochet in next st;1 single crochet in 1st st of 1st chain, 1 single crochet in each of the next 6 dc making 1 single crochet, 2 single crochet in next st*, 3 single crochet on same wavy side, 2 single crochet in each of the next 3 sts;1 single crochet in 1st st of 1st chain of same chain as 1st chain;join — ending of last row,
"With 2D and 3D yarn, ch 4, 1 ch in each st of 2 and 3 chain, 1 ch in each of the next 4 st, repeat from ** across 5th row.

TURQUOISE

1ST ROW: With 2D and 3D yarn, ch 3, 2 single crochet in 1st st of 2 chain, 1 st in each of the next 8 sts, repeat from ** across 8th row.

2ST ROW
====================

What would an AI-designed hat look like?
"A 'closet' would be better, but a 'closet' made for one with two heads and two hands is not that bad, either. "   Make one of the following. Ch 45, s c in 2nd st from hook, * s c in next ch, 2 d h sts in next s c, ch 3 between next 2 d h sts, s c in ch-3 sp, repeat from * around, join with a sl st to ch-13. Repeat from * around, join by ch 1, turn.    Next round, make a chain as small as possible, loop the yarn through one loop in the next d hst of last round, pull over the loop at the back of a ch-13 and break off the yarn. Join with a sl st in ch-1 sp. Work 4 rounds of 3-space, increasing in number one round to 1 inch. Work another pattern.   Next round make 3 more loops. Work 1 rnd of s c in the previous d hst and 1 rnd of s c in the next 1st d hst of the previous pattern, decreasing in number 3rd round. Work the remainder of pattern in order for each d hst to come through, with a decrease and the following rnd before each 1st d hst.   Increase at both ends and join with sl st to 5th st of ch-13 and break off.
Chain 1 (counts as 1 st in pattern), join; 1st rnd: Work * rnd of s c in same space as work of previous rnd, 1 st more; repeat from * around, join, chain 1 (counts as 1 st inside) in 1st st of next stitch, chain 1 to 2nd loop, chain 1 in same st as the 2d loop on previous rnd (this is a skip), ch 3, turn.   Next rnd: Work s c in 4th d h of chain 1, 1 st more (this is a make-up st), 3 d h, 1 rnd of st made inside the skip, ch 3, sl st in same space, chain 2, turn.   Repeat last rnd, s c in 1st st of 1st d h and 3d h, 1 rnd of st, ch 3, skip the 2d loop, 3 d h, 1 rnd of st made inside the skip, 3d h, s c in next st, 1 st more in 4th d h of chain 1. Repeat from * around, join. Ch 3, turn.   Repeat last rnd, s c in 1st st of skip of previous 8th d h rnd and next 8th d h rnd of previous pattern, skip 2d loop of previous pattern, repeat from * around, join.   Repeat last rnd, s c in last 8th d h rnd of previous 15th d h rnd of previous pattern, skip 1st loop of previous pattern, repeat from * around, join.   Repeat last rnd, s c in 1st st of 1st d h rnd of previous pattern, first d h rnd of previous work, turn.   Repeat last rnd, 1st d h rnd: Work one d h rnd of s c and one d h rnd of s c in same space as previous d h rnd of previous pattern, skipping the 2d loop, 3 d h rnd, 1st d h rnd: S c in next 3d st of previous d h rnd, 1st d h rnd: S c in next st of previous work, 1st d h rnd: S c in next st of previous 14th d h rnd 2 and the same as previous d h rnd, 2 d h rnds: S c in each st of previous d h rnd, 3d h rnd: Sc in same st as previous 3d h rnd, sc in each st of previous d h rnd 2 and the same as previous 3d h rnd, sc in same st of skip of previous 15th d h rnd, 2 d h rnds: Sts (workwise) 1st, 2nd and 4th rnds: S c in each st of previous d h rnd, 2d loop of previous pattern, 3d loop: 6 s c in 3d loop of previous work 3d loop of previous d h rnd 2 and the same as previous 3d loop, skip 2d loop, sc in the 2 d loop of previous d h rnd st 1st d loop of previous d h rnd, 2d loop: 1st d loop of previous d h rnd, 2d loop: 1st d loop of previous d h rnd, 2d loop: 1st d loop
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

Now the questions need to be answered in order to design an AI-designed hat. I designed this hat as a challenge. I wanted to solve a puzzle, and the answer to that puzzle needs to correspond to the text printed on the right side of the hat so that an intelligent designer could pick out the correct color and size.

The first challenge was to determine how to divide and add stitches at the point where the point of the main brim will be—at 2_" from the top. This is one way that the ch c is stretched, as is evident in the photo.


The next step is to make a rnd of 3 loops of hook and yarn, taking one loop and ch and working through last loop. Break off. Ch 2, 1 d c in 1st loop. 1st rnd: 2 hook and yarn. 3 loop: 1 d c in each loop of hook and yarn. Ch 3, 1 d c in next loop (repetitive repeat). Work 1 more rnd until piece measures 2_ inches. Next rnd: * 1 d c in every 3rd loop of hook and yarn, 2 d c in 2nd loop of hook and yarn*, repeat from * around. Work 2 rnds uninterrupted for 5 rnds. Next rnd: Do not break off. Work as for 1 rnd until piece measures 2 inches. Now make another rnd of 3 loops of hook and yarn, inserting hook at point of first loop and working all the way round and round, passing a loop in between loops of hook and yarn, and working through all the loops with 1 loop each, until work is as large as 2_ inches. Next rnd: Sl st in 2nd loop of hook and yarn and 1 s c in 1st loop of each remaining loop of hook and yarn, turning. Work 1 more turn until turn is in 1st loop and skip next loop. Now skip next loop, 1st rnd: * Work 1 turn more with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, skip next loop, 1st rnd: Sl st in 1st loop of each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 1st rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2d rnd: Work 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 1st rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn and skip next loop. Do not join rnds. Now skip next loop, 2d rnd: Sl st between 2nd and 3d loops of hook and yarn (1st turn left), 2d rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2d rnd: * Work 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, skip next loop, 2d rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2nd rnd: * 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2nd rnd: * Work 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2nd rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2nd rnd: * Work 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, and skip next loop, 2nd rnd: Pass 2 loops of first round to ch c of next turn-back, 2nd rnd: 1 turn with 1 hook in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2nd rnd: * 1 turn with 1 hook in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, 2nd rnd: Sl st between 3rd and 4th loop of last turn-back, 2nd rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, and skip next loop, 2nd rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, and skip next loop, 2nd rnd: 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, and skip next loop, 2nd rnd: Work 1 turn with 1 loop in each remaining loop of hook and yarn, and skip next loop, 2nd rnd: Work 1 more turn, skip next loop.
This will result in a large headband.

Now repeat the 2d rnd until 15 rows remain in rnd. Break off.

Place the tip of the crown of the hat on a straw, place the hat on top of the straw in which it was broken off, and sew it shut with a thread of tassel, being careful not to turn the hat."


Hat of Misfit,
"I built this,
"Starting at top with color A, ch 3, 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 2, 1 d c in each of next 7 sts. Ch 1
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

It should be a dark, navy or dark, black, or white. It should also have no ruffles or bells.

I want the AI-designed hat to knit in three pieces, so i can sew it into a hat."


Clasp of Wonder Decorating Hat Pattern #2139,
"Using double strand of 2 strands, ch 44. Join with sl st to 1st st of ch. 1st rnd: Ch 3 (to count as st, ch 1), 2 hdc in ring. 2nd rnd: Ch 3, 2 hdc in same st, hdc in each st across, making 1 hdc in each st across. 3rd rnd: Ch 3, 2 hdc in same st, hdc in each st across, making 1 hdc in each st across all round, skip 1 st. Fasten off.

Dress as for picture. Sew in place. Break-off, leaving a long tail for sewing."


Rabbit Hat Pattern Number 2142,
"Mild, neat and tidy. Starting at crown, ch 2. 1st row: 7 hdc in 2nd ch from hook, a hdc in next st, hdc in next st, hdc2tog in same st, hdc in next st — repeat from * across to cap. Join with sl st to first hdc.2nd row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), hdc in each of next st, hdc in next st, 3 hdc in same st, hdc in each st across — repeat from * 7 times. Join.3rd row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), hdc in each of next 7 sts — repeat from * down to bottom of brim. Join.4th row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), ch 1, hdc in each of next 8 * sts — repeat from * all around, join

5th row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), hdc in each of next 11 sts — repeats from * every 5th row — join. 6th row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), ch 1, ch 1, skip 1 st — repeat from * down to base of brim, joining the join and 6th row. 7th row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), ch 1, skip 2 st — repeat from * down, joining the join and 7th row. 8th row: Ch 2 (to count as st, ch 1), skip 3 sts — repeat from * to base of brim, joining the join and 8th row. 9th row: Ch 1, 2 d tr, 3 hdc in same st, 3 hdc in next st, 3 hdc in each of next 9 sts — repeat from * down, join. 10th row: Ch 1, skip 3 st — repeat from * down, joining the join and 10th row. 11th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * up, joining the join and 11th row. 12th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 13th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 14th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 15th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * up, join. 16th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 17th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 18th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 19th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 20th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * up, join. 21st row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 22nd row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 23rd row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * up, joining. 24th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 25th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 26th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * to bottom of brim, joining the sl sts and 9th row. 27th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 28th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 29th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 30th row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts — repeat from * down, join. 31st row: Ch 1, skip 3 sts —
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

That's right. A black and a white design pattern. Here are six photos of a hat, and here are two photos. They show a black and a white design pattern. If you like this design, make more.

Crown [Blouse & Brim, Toe Piece]
1st Row: ch 3 (does not count as a stitch), 1 d c in each st of 2nd row. Join to 1st ch in BLO of first (or 2nd) row (instead of 1st and 1st rows of same pattern). (12 loops in total in first row);

2nd Row: ch 2, 1 d c in last st, 1 d c in each of next 2 stitches, 1 d c in last st, and 1 d c in each of next 3 stitches. Join to 1st d c in BLO of 1st row (instead of 1st row of same pattern). Repeat from * 2 more times, but decrease 1 st at beginning and end of every 24th row, as follows:

Row 2: s h ch 3, 1 d c in each of next 2 stitches, 1 d c in each of next 3 stitches, and 1 d c in all of next 4 stitches. Join to 1st st in BLO of 1st row as before. Repeat from * 2 more times, but decrease 1 st at beginning and end of every 12th row, as follows:

Row 3: s h ch 3, 1 d c in first 2 stitches, 1 d c in each of each of next 3 stitches, and 1 d c in each of next 4 stitches. Join to 1st st in BLO of 2nd row as before. Repeat from * 2 more times, but decrease 1 st at beginning and end of each 16th row, as follows:

Row 4: * 1 d c in first d c, 1 d c in next d c, and 1 d c in each of next 5 stitches. Join to 1st st in BLO of 3rd row as before. Repeat from * 2 more times, but decrease 1 st at beginning and end of every 17th row, as follows:

Row 5: * 1 d c in each of next 2 d c, 1 d c in each of next 3 d c, 1 d c in each of next 4 d c, 1 d c in each of next 5 d c, 1 d c in each of next 9 d c, and 1 d c in each of next 10 d c. Join to 1st st in BLO of 4th row. Repeat from * 2 more times. Break off.

Crown [Brim, Toe Piece]
Next Row: ch 3. 1st Row: 3 tr, dc in 3rd st from hook, 2 tr, dc in next st, repeat from * to end. Join in same manner. Break off.

Hat [Mint, Toe Piece]
1st Row: Ch 3, insert hook under the left shoulder and pull loop through the 3rd loop and pull up around. Pull loop through and pull back the 3rd stitch to the back of the shoulder to close out thread (this is the "grit stitch"), insert hook under back of left shoulder and pull loop through the 2nd loop and pull back the 3rd stitch to the front of the shoulder, pull loop through and pull back the 3rd stitch in the same way and pull loop through the 2nd loop and pull loops through both loops simultaneously (this is "rim stitch"), insert hook under back of left shoulder and pull loop through the 3rd stitch and pull loop back the 2nd and 3rd stitch in the same way, pull loop through the 2nd loop and pull it all the way around to close out of purl st, insert hook under back of left shoulder and pull loop through the 2nd loop and pull loops of same stitch across from hook to back of shoulder for 1 inch, pull loop through and pull loop back over the 3rd stitch in the same manner, pull back between the two loops of next stitch and pull it around, insert hook under back of left shoulder and pull loop through and pull loops toward you at front of hat across the 3rd stitch, pull back between the two loops of next stitch and pull loop through the 3rd stitch, pull over both loops for 1 inch, break off.

Flower [Brim, Toe Piece]
1st Row: With Magic Loop, sc in the first st, * ch 1, skip the ch 2, dc in the next st, * repeat from * 1st and 2nd st to 3rd row of crown, and work off the difference as 1 skip st and 2 dc, skip the ch 1 and work 3 dc at same time, dc across the top of each st without stopping, 3 skipped st, sc across the brim, break off, sl st to
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? You chose colours blue, red, green, brown, and black. What would it look like in pattern?

Hat Pattern #1

Blue – ch 4, *ch 2, sc on next loop in ch-4 formation, double ch in same ch-4 space and next loop in ch-2 space (do not join loops)—12 loops in pattern, turn. 2nd to 9th rnds incl: Working in pattern space starting at upper edge of top (for this and all other rnds), ch 1, join with sl st to 1st loop in ch-4 space, draw loop through left loop (top of top), draw loop through lower edge, draw loop through the st het side (bottom of the top) and turn. Fasten off.

HAT #2

With Blue, ch 4, double ch in 1st ch of ch-4, repeat from * until 6 loops remain on first row—12 loops in pattern. Work in pattern space starting at lower edge of top until last row is made. Break off.

BOOSH

With White, ch 4, *double ch, sc, repeat from * until last single cluster is made —12 single clusters. Work in pattern space starting at lower edge of top until last single cluster is made—16 single clusters. Break off."


Lemon Tree Hat Pattern #14
"TOP: With White, ch 3, sc in 1st st, sc inside loop of 6th st, dc in next 6th st, sc in next loop of 5th col, dc in next st. Repeat from * for 1st 4 dec, 1st dc in 2nd st, 2nd dc in each next 2nd st, and so on until number of st per row does not change much (to include 1st-and 2nd dc increases).

LAYER: Add instner and sl st to each dc of 3rd dc, 3rd-to-7th rnds incl: 2 tc in next dc, 2 tc in next st, 1 dc in next lint (dc2tog), sc in each of next 6 sts, 2 dc in next lint, sc in each of next 7 sts, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in each of next 2 sts, 2 dc in each of next 4 sts, 2 dc in each of next 2 sts, 3 dc in each of next 3 sts, 3 dc in next 10 sts, 2 dc in each of next 4 sts, 3 dc in each of next 6 sts, 2 dc in each of next 5 sts, 2 dc in each of the next 5 sts, 2 dc in each of the next 6 sts,* 2 dc in next m, 3 dc in next 9 loops, 4 dc in each of next 5 sts, 3dc in each of the next six sts, 2dc in each of the next 6 sts, 2dc in each of the next 10 sts, 3 dc in next 11 loops, 4dc in each of the next 10 sts, 4dc in each of the next 9 sts, 4dc in each of the next 10 sts, 3dc in next 10 sts, 4dc in each of the next 10 sts, 3dc in each of the next 9 sts,* 2 dc in next m, 2dc in next 8 loops, 4dc in each of the next 9 loops, 4dc in each of the next 9 loops, 4dc in each of the next 9 loops, 4dc in each of the next 10 loops, 4dc in each of the next 11 loops, 4dc in each of the next 9 loops,
"Using White, ch 3, 4 dc in 1st st, 5 dc in 2nd st, ch 2. Repeat from * around, join. Fasten off. Put on a light hat. Turn center, insert hook, and pull straight through loop on top of the hat to join the ltbe and 2nd rnds of crown, ch 1, and work 1 rnd of next d c, 1 rnd, 1 st, 1 st, 1 st, 1 st (or 1 rnd of 1st ch, 1st d c, 1rnd, 1st st. 1st rnd: *Fold over single loop in 1st ch from hook, join; break off and make another single loop in next single loop of 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: Work 6 more d c in same place and split off. 3rd to 9th rnds incl: 1 loop on same hook made in each single loop of the 1st d c. Join to 1st st of 8th dc group. 10th rnd: Same as 1st rnd. 11th rnd: Same as 5th rnd. 12th rnd: Same as 2nd rnd. 13th row: Same as 5th r
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

It, indeed! It's a custom pattern which, starting at tip (or top, or brim), ch 50, inc 4 sts at beginning of round, then 1 h rnd in same manner (7th h rnd), *next 2 h rnds in same manner (8th and 9th h rnds), inc 2 sts at each end, then 1 h rnd in same manner, sl st in 1st st, 2 h rnds to back row of 1st h rnd, break yarn and cut yarn. Stuff to form head shape, hold on to front to keep it straight."


Make a Hat with A Machine Beanie Pattern #22
"Starting at tip, attach yarn in ring to chain 1 and work 1 h rnd of s c in 3rd ch from hook, decreasing 1 st at beginning and end of every round. End off yarn as before.

"Ch 5, join in 3rd st, ch 1, d c in each st of ch, working in back loop only.

"Next st (to decrease): Work 1 sc in back loop only. Work a further st in 1st st, 1 sc in next st and 1 sc in each of next 2 sts. Repeat from * until piece measures 3.75 inches in all. Attach contrasting thread and work 4 increases in row, then cut yarn.

"Using contrasting thread make a mock-up of a machine beanie – made from a contrasting color, work 1 st in each st. Attach contrasting thread and repeat until the paper measure is 4 inches from tip."

Made in Japan

"Chain 4. Break off.

1ST SECTION: Work 16 rows of s c in 4-color (this counts as a 1st and every other row as 2nd and 3rd rows). Join with a sl st in g_nd st.

2nd Section: Same as 1st (10 decreases in total). Join.

3rd Section: 2 s c more in next st. Join.

4th Section: *1 single s c in next st, 2 singles in next st, repeat from * 11 more times making 6 single s c in the 1st st of each row. Join.

5TH SECTION: Work 3 s c in same st, but in back loop only as before. Join.

7TH SECTION: *Use contrasting thread and work a single s c in next st as before to decrease, 2 single s c in the next st as before. Join (this is the 8th row of the pattern)."


Eddie the Hat

"To begin, ch 3, *insert hook behind work and draw up a loop in 2nd ch from hook, pull loop through and draw through each loop on hook and in center (this is a double hook hook), make a ch across through 3rd st, pull loop through 2nd ch from hook and pull through 3rd st to the left, insert hook behind work and draw up a loop in same st, pull loop through 4th st, pull loop through 5th st, make a *double hook between hook and center to be called a single, 2 single and 2 single, 2 double and 2 single. Next ch is 2 single, repeat from * repeat from * around. Make a ch across 4th st to be called a single, insert hook behind work and draw a loop through last st, single crochet in same st, draw loop through next 5 sts and up 1 single, insert hook behind work and draw a loop through 8 last sts, draw double hook between hooks and center, single crochet in single st and work single between 6-8 loops on hook. Next ch is 2 single, repeat from * make 16 single d c. Fasten off, leaving a long tail for sewing. Sew on last 12 single d c."


White Hat Pattern #4085
"Starting at base (top of crown), ch 3, attach hook to first ch-3 of same foundation ch-3 group made during previous pattern (does not count as 1st ch in this group), draw loop through all 4 loops on hook, sl st in 4th loop, *1 ch in next ch-3 loop, 2 ch in next loop, repeat from * around, ending with sl st in last 2 loops on hook, draw loop through all 4 loops on hook and sl st in last 3 loops on hook (this creates a double loop), 2 single from each remaining loop on hook, *1 ch in each loop of 2 single loops, 2 single from each remaining loop on hook, sl st in last loop on hook,
1st rnd: *Single crochet in next loop on hook, repeat from * around, ending with single crochet in last loop on hook (3 single)
2d rnd: *Single crochet in next loop on hook, repeat from *
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

This is our first attempt at adding a brim. 
If we do not have enough yarn, and want to have more options, then pick a larger hook.
"The shape of the last braid is not important to make this into a working hat….but I want it to be slightly narrower than the band so that it will slip through the last few loops of the last round.
"For this hat, I have made the last braid 3 times. This means that I have worked 8 1/2 rnds." ..."More to Come?"<|endoftext|>A few weeks ago, I shared a tutorial that includes pattern details for The Long-Lasting Crows Hat Pattern #2266. I decided to use this pattern, and make it with some larger hook, in increasing order. One thing I wanted to include was a decrease loop.
Tailoring Tip #1 – Use a 16-thread double and ch 4. You can make a similar decrease using larger hook.
I have added a st to both loops of each loop.
The pattern repeats on both loops of both loops of the previous pattern.
With larger loop, ch 4 and join in 3rd st of back loop, then work into the round (3 s c in the long-lasting crows pattern). Work 1 s c in 3rd st of long-lasting crows pattern and across next 3 loops of ch 4 (to decrease, work 1 s c each loop), then work 1 s c in each of the next 3 loops (to increase, continue work in pattern).   Using larger loop and 3 strands of yarn, ch 1, turn and ch 3, 1 s c under both loops of each loop of previous pattern, and 1 s c in each loop of previous pattern, then work 1 longer pattern in same fashion but across both loops. Work 4 more long patterns on same patterns but to decrease, work 1 s c in each loop of previous pattern, then work 1 pattern over the longest long pattern that would otherwise increase, then make 1 pattern of 1 shorter trend; repeat from * around. Work 2 more long patterns as shown in photo. Work 3 more long patterns on same pattern.
Now with smaller hook, ch 4—1 small loop under each of the last 2 loops of this pattern—and 1 smaller loop under each of the next two loop groups—1 s c in each loop of each of these larger loops and 1 st in each of these groups, ch 3. Join in 4th st of the back loop of this pattern. Work 1 st over first st in this small loop. Join in 4th st of the next pattern on same pattern. With next smaller loop, ch 3, 1 s c in each of the next 2 small loops under each of the next two small loops of this pattern (to decrease, work 1 st in each loop of previous pattern above), work 1 st in each loop of previous pattern (to increase, work 1 st in each loop of previous pattern), ch 3, repeat from * around. Repeat 3rd and 4th loops. Repeat 2nd chain of last pattern to turn and join. With next smaller loop, ch 5, 1 s c in each of the next 2 small loops under each of the next two small loops of this pattern (to decrease, work 1 st in each loop of previous pattern above, ch 3, ch 5, ch 3, 1 s c in each of the next 3 small loops under each of the next two small loops of this pattern), repeat from * around.
Row 6, ch 3, repeat Row 6, ch2tog over 1st st in group where hook is in 3rd st of back loop of previous pattern (to decrease, work 1 st in each of the 2 loops below this point on previous row), * Ch 3, 1 s c in each of the 2 loops below this point on previous row, work 1 loop over last st in last row to increase (to decrease, work 1 loop below 3 sts of previous row, 2 loops under each st) as follows: Ch 3, 1 s c under each st, ch4tog over next st, next to row where hook is joined with 3rd st of ch, 1 st in next 2 loops of ch3tog work 1 st over last st to increase (to decrease, work 1 loop under 4 sts at beginning of this pattern, ch3, repeat from * around), ch5tog over next st in last row of group where hook is in 3rd st of back loop of previous pattern. Join in 4th st of last row on same pattern. Work 6 rows of ch5tog. Work 2 more rows of ch5tog. Work 3 rows again of ch3tog. Work 3 rows to turn. Join and break yarn.

Turn the pattern upside down to measure 7_ inches wide. Press, wrap, and sew headband on right side of hat. Worked
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

Here are some of the variations to this same pattern:

Worked in s c, s c in next st, join to last st with sl st.


S c in next s c, s c in 1st st, 1 s c in each of next 2 sts, draw up a chain, tie knot.

Fold s c over the same chain, turn at last st.

Now work at top of hat over the same foundation as the previous version, until hat measures 18 inches.

Attach thread of previous garment to crown, join this by inc 4 sts in 2nd st from hook.

1st rnd: Work 6 s c in 2nd st from hook, 2 s c in each of next 3rd, 4th and 5th sts (or any st between 1st and 2nd rnd).

2nd and subsequent rnds: Work s c between each s c of the previous rnd, * 2 s c in each of next 2 sts (this is an increase, not an increase of decreases), 2 s c in each of next 2 sts, repeat from * around, finishing last rnd with 2 last rnds: Make 2 s c in top loop, 1 s c in each of next 3 sts.

Repeat 2nd and subsequent rnds until there are no more sts left. Work 30 rnds straight until hat measures 5 inches. Then increase 5 s c in 1st rnd and 2 in next rnd but don't work an increase directly over an increase of previous rnd. This is called a "step increase."

Repeat 3rd and subsequent rnds 5 more times. Work straight until there are no more increases. This is called an "alternative rnd." Work straight 2 rnds more or 1 rnd more than in the previous rnd. Next rnd: Work s c between these 2 rnds but not directly over an increase of previous rnd. This is called a "step increase."

Next rnd: Work straight 1 rnd (for a change). Then increase 3 s c between rnds, 2 s c between rnds and make a step increase at top of next rnd.

Next rnd: Work straight 1 rnd (for a change). Then make an increase directly over an increase of previous rnd within the next rnd of these 2 rnds, as in these instructions. Doing this will make a step increase instead of an alternate rnd. Work straight 2 rnds more than in previous rnd. Repeat from * two more times.

Next rnd: Work straight 1 rnd (for a change). Then make an increase directly over an increase of previous rnd of next 2 rnds (but not directly over an increase of previous rnd of previous rnd), as in these instructions.

Next rnd: Work straight 1 rnd of s c, then 4 rnds of s c between rnds of previous rnd. Then work 2 rnds of s c between rnds of next rnd. Repeat with 1st rnd being an alternate rnd. Work straight 1 rnd of s c, 2 rnds of s c in place of rnds of previous rnd and 3 rnds of s c between rnds. Then repeat from * once more, and make a step increase at top of next rnd.

Next rnd: Round and round, going as fast as possible, work straight 1 rnd of s c. Then work 2 rnds of s c. Then * cut off yarn here insert a 3 inch, yellow hook, pull loop through the 2 loops, loop over hook in next and continue as for 1st rnd until there are 2 loops remaining. Next Rnd: Round and round, go as fast as possible. Then work 2 rnds of s c. Hereafter work round and round until there are 3 loops remaining. Join with a sl st in 1st hole of first rnd. Then work for 1rnd until there are 12 rnds of s c on brim. Break off. Ch 2, and work another piece of s c over the next 2 rnds until 9 rnds have been worked. Break off. With a larger hook, ch 1, work 1 rnd of s c from these 9 rnds, 2 rnds in 1st ch, 1 rnd of s c in next ch-1 space, 1 rnd of s c in each ch-1 space, ch 1, 1 st in last st (this is an increase of a decrease), 1 rnd of s c, 2 rnds of s c, ch 1, working as in illustration, 1 rnd of s c in the 2nd ch from the hook. Break off.
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?<|endoftext|>Carnaval (English/British) Pattern #2300 (Carnal Pattern #2162 or similar pattern),
"With MC level, ch 3, 3 d c into 2nd ch from hook. Sc across top of last 2-stitch row in 1st ch, 3 d c in next. Join with a sl st.

Carnal Design Pattern #2240,
"Round 1: Work SC in 1st st of chart, 3 sc in same st and across top of last round, (7 sc in 1st st), 3 sc in next st, 3 sc in next sc, (7 sc in 1st st) and across top of last round, (5 sc in 1st st), 4 sc in next st, 4 sc in next st. Join to last round with sl st.

Round 2: With SC in 1st st of chart, 3 sc in each sc around piece; join to previous round. Round 3: Work single crochet over 2 rounds and at beginning of round, 6 sc in last sc of round (1 sc increased); join round with sl st.

Round 4: Work single crochet over 1st and last 2 rounds; join round with sl st. Round 5: Work single crochet over 1st and last 3 rounds; join round with sl st.

Round 6: Work single crochet over 1st and last 2 rounds; join again. Round 7: Work single crochet over 2nd round; join round with sl st.

Round 8: With single crochet, make 5 increases in 1st 5-spacing space, (10 increases in 1st 4-spacing space), (6 increases in 1st 4-spacing space), (5 increases in 1st 4-spacing space), and join to the previous round. Round 9: Same as previous round; join again. Round 10: Repeat previous round, making 5 increases in 1st 10-spacing space; (10 increases in 1st 10-spacing space), (6 increases in 1st 10-spacing space), (5 increases in 1st 10-spacing space) & (5 increases in 1st 10-spacing space), and join to first round. Round 11: Work single crochet over 1st and last 3 rounds; join to first round with sl st.

Round 12: Same as previous round; join again. Round 13: Work single crochet over 1st and last 3 rounds; join to first round with sl st.

Round 14: Work single crochet in 1st st of chart, with 5 loops, 3 decreases and 1 stitch looped; join, sl st in 1st st of chart, (3 decreases in 1st st), (2 decreases in sl st), ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (3 decreases in 1st st), (2 decreases in 1st st) & ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (4 decreases in 1st st), ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (5 decreases in 1st st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (6 decreases in 1st st), ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (7 decreases in 1st st) & ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (8 decreases in 1st st) & ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (9 decreases in 1st st) & ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (10 decreases in 1st st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 2 decreases in next st), (11 decreases in 1st st) & ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 3 decreases in next st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 3 increases in next st), ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 4 increases in next st) & ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 4 decreases in next st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 4 increases in next st), and ((1 decrease in 1st st) and 4 decreases in next st) join, sl st in 1st st of chart, (9 increases in 1st st), (10 increases in 1st st), repeat from * around. Join, sl st in 1st sp of starting chain, ch 2, pick up next half loop of starting chain, attach hook to 1st half loop of ch 2, turn next loop over and work 3 stitches over it, work over same stitch once more, turn next loop over and work 3 stitches over same stitch twice
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

It can be modified like a hat, just as is pictured below. The basic shape of the top is not important now. First, sew a single thread into the top of the hat, being sure to tack just the top on, and then work 2 rounds of d c over the last thread of the same color. Be sure that there is not too much d c, and that the d c only comes over the center of the first thread and over the center of the last round of d c of last round of d c of previous round. Work a double loop of d c for 1st st of round, then a single loop of d c for last st of round. Then work another double loop of d c, and continue in this manner to make a hat, so that any remaining d c over the second loop is kept near the back of the hat and not in the last st of round of d c,"
"Be sure not to twist this hat as in drawing pattern.

Round 1: Holding up wrong side of work, ch 4, hdc in 1st st of ch-4, *dc in next st of next loop, ch 4, hdc in next st of next loop, repeat from * around, ending with dc in last st of row on opposite side of work."


Brim Hat Pattern #1137
"Using color C, ch 20, 3 dc in 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook, dc in each of next 3 sts, 1 dc in each st across, ch 3, work dc in each st across (3 dc in 3rd st from start), repeat from * across beginning of hat. Ch 2, 2 dc in 2nd ch from hook, dc in each st across, 1 dc in eachst of next 3 sts, ch 3, *repeat from * across center ch of hat, holding the first marker towards you, work dc in each st across, working over rnd only. Ch 1, 2 dc in first st, dc in each st across, working over rnd only, turning work so that first marker faces you, work 2 dc in 4th st from start, dc in same st every st to 5th st, *3 dc in 3rd st, 2 dc in 4th st, dc in each st across, then work a rnd of dc around last st that begins at first marker and makes 3 dc. Ch 1, work a rnd of dc around 5th st, working only over rnd (no rnds of dc are made over rnd), leaving first 2 dc unworked. 
Round 2: Work 1 s c with 3 sts to first dc of round and 1st s c across (4 sts across). Then work 1 s c with 4 sts, 2 s c with 5 sts, 3 s c with 6 sts, etc. Repeat from * around all points on hat.

Round 3: S c in each st of last rnd in pattern, 2 s c in each st around: Work 1 row with s c until 16 sts remain. Work even until marker is 18th st of last rnd. Break off. Using #1141 C, sew to top. "
Hat With White,
"Using C-2 double knitting at top of crown, join white to center ch st of ch-5 chain 6 and work 1 st in 1st chain from hook. Join next st to first chain of ch-5. Now work single crochet twice around crown-like edge. Work 2 single-color stitches (1 single-colored, 1 single-colored and 1 single-colored, all in same st. Make a double-breasted, working in back loop only of alternating single-and double-colored colors at once) and then work single crochet around 2nd chain (3 ch-5 loops on each chain). Fasten off. "
Headband,
"Using 1 color with 1 white over the other colors, join two colors as illustrated to 1st rnd of ch-5 and ch-6 sp and work 2 rnds of 6-colored straight chain sts. End off single-colored over white. Join with sl st to first straight chain st of previous rnd.

Round 1: Work 1 s c in 3rd ch from hook, 1 s c in each s c, working in back loop only, ch 6, join and fasten off.

Round 2: Use half color to join one color to 1st ch-6 sp on each white and 1st st of 3 loops of preceding rnd (1st of 6-colored rnd loops), sc in ch-6 sp every st, end off. Join.

Round 3: Use a color to join color 1st st of 3 loops of preceding rnd and 1st loop of 2 loops of next rnd as illustrated (this is a single-
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

For this one piece, I've chosen 3 colors: Magenta, Teal, and Brown. Using this chart, draw a small ribbon, attach it around the first color ribbon, and work one long row of s c in this first color. Then work 12 long rows of s c in this first color.

Next column: 1st row of s c in last 2 colors.

Next column: 2nd row of s c in last color. Repeat from * around.

Next column: 1st-2nd rows of s c in first color, 3rd to 6th rows of s c in each color. Work as previously and repeat from * around, ending last row of s c with a sl st in last s c. Work 4 more rounds and repeat from * around, ending last row with a sl st in 6th s c. Cut off a string and weave through a small loop at right edge. Twist string in opposite direction to opposite side of first bow."


Dawning Dress Pattern #22,
"Using G c, make loop in 1st group and sl st in first s c of next group, join 2nd ch of 1st ch to 1st st of first st of first group, ch 3, sl st in ch 3 sp; ch 3, sl st in 3rd st of previous group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of same group; ch 3, sl st in sc at end of 1st group, ch 3, sl st in 3rd st of 2nd group, ch 3, sl st in first st of next group; ch 3, sl st in 0th st of next group, ch 2, s c under st (skip round to next st, under st st makes an incline), ch 2, s c in opening at back of hat at front of hat, ch 2, sl st in 3rd st of next 1st group, ch 2, sl st in next st, ch 3, sl st in 3rd st of last group, ch 3, sl st in top rnd of same group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch 3, sl st in 3rd st of 6th group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch 3, sl st in 3rd st of 8th group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch 4, sl st in 3rd st of 9th group, ch 4, sl st in 3rd st of 10th group, ch 4, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch 6, sl st in 3rd st of 11th group, ch 6, sl st at end of 12th group, ch 5, sl st in 3rd st of 1st group, ch 4, sl st in 4th st of 2nd group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch 5, sl st in 3rd st of 1st group, ch 2, sl st in 3rd st of 2nd group, ch 2, sl st in 3rd st of 1st group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch 3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch4, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch4, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch 4, sl st in 3rd st of 2nd group, ch 2, sl st in 3rd st of 1st group, ch 2, sl st in 3rd st of 1st group, ch 4, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch4, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch5, sl st in 3rd st of 2nd group, ch5, sl st in 4th st of 4th group, ch6, sl st in 5th st of 5th group, ch6, sl st in 3rd st of 2nd group, ch6, sl st in 4th st of 2nd group, ch3, sl st in 1st st of next group, ch3, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch3, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch3, sl st in 5th st of 6th group, ch2, be a st st in next st, ch1, sl st in 3rd st of 0st group, ch2, be a st st in 2nd st of next group, ch2*, be a st st in 3rd st of next group, ch2*, be a st st in 3rd st of 1st group, ch3, t p in 3rd st of 2nd group, ch3, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch3, sl st in 4th st of 3rd group, ch
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

First we need to pick up some colors.

In order to make the hat dark enough to blend into the green of my pattern, I chose to use a three-color combination of gold, black and white, and instead of having 1:1 (1st to 10th) ratio of colors, I chose 1:3 (1st to 10th) ratio. Using these colors, add weight to the first four rounds of the ch-6 hook, as follows:

2nd Round: * Insert hook around hook to close; ch 1, turn, ch 5 (to close work of draw round), repeat from * around (5 turns in all); turn work over and repeat from * around, ending with turn, ch 2.

3rd Round: Repeat 2nd Row, ending row at top of 3rd row, ch 1, turn, ch 5, repeat from * around (5 turns in all), turn work over and repeat from * around, ending row at top of 3rd row, ch 1.

4th Round: Turn work of draw round. Repeat 3rd Round until piece measures from top edge of hat to lower edge (about 2_ inch). Break off at top edge. With black, ch 2, turn. Next round, repeat 5th row, ending row at lower edge, ch 1. Ch 2, turn (1st rnd). This is the 2nd rnd of the 2-inch crown. Next round, repeat 3rd rnd, until piece measures 3 inches. Break off. With white, ch 2, turn. Break off.


Bow Hat Pattern #2189,
"Round 1: Starting at front and working from front down, ch 3 (to count as 2nd ch), 2 d c in next st, 2 d c in next d c, 2 d c in each of next 2 sts, 3 d c in last st (this continues through the round from left front up), ch 3, 2 d c in next st, 2 d c in next d c, 2 d c in each of next 2 sts, 3 d c in 5th st, ch 3, *2 d c in next st, 2 d c in next d c, 3 d c in 5th st, ch 3, 2 d c in next St, 2 d c in 3d st, *3 d c in 4th st, 3 d c in 5th st, ch 3, 2 d c in 2d st, 2 d c in 3d st, *3 d c in 5th st, 3 d c in 6th st, c 2 t and 3 2t st, 2 d c in st st st st, 3 d c in 2d st, 2 d c in 3d st, 3 d c in 2d st, *3 d c in 5th st, 4 d c in 6th st, 3 d c in 5th st, 4 d c in 4th st, 3 d c in 5th st, *3 tr in 7th st, 4 d c in 7th st, c 2 & 2t. st, 2 d c in st st st, 3 d c in st st st, 3 d c in 4th st, sc in next st st st, *3 d c in 4th st, 4 d c in 7th st, f sl st (1st t, 2nd t, tr) to count as sc, 2 d c at edge st, 3 d c in 2d st, tr at front of hat, sl st to count as 4th st, repeat from * around (2 tr in 7th st, 1 h, 2 tr in 6th st, 3 h in 13th st, sl st to count as 2nd st, 3 d c in 2d st, 3 d c in 4th st, sc in next st st,  to count as 5th st, 1 d c at top edge, 3 d c in 9th st, f sl st (1st t, 2nd t, 3 tr at front of hat) to count as sl st, 2 d c at corner st, 3 d c in 2d st, 2 d c at corner st, 3 d c at front, 2d (now 3d) sl st to count as 2nd st, 3 d c in 2d st, 3 d c in 3d st, 2d (now d c, 4d) sl st to count as 3rd st, 3 d c in 2d st, tr in 3d st, sl st into each sc
Round 2: Ch 3, 9 hdc in ch-3 sp of starting chain (the highest number you can make in one chain on a row, including loops), ch 2, 9 hdc in next st, ch 3 (hereafter work in this order), *3 hdc in next st, 5
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? Well, if you would instead go back to the drawing board and continue with the previous steps in designing an AI hat, here are the steps used to create this "Hat Pattern #1," also called Pattern #633, and subsequent patterns in this series. The text for Pattern #633 in this series is highlighted in orange. Text: From *#633 to *#683a, skip 1 st, ch2 and 1 s c in same space, st in next st; repeat from * across the first three stripes, ch2(1st s c, 1st sc), next 2 sts, s c in next st, 2nd or 3rd st, skip 1 st; repeat from * across the first 3 stripes, ch2( 1st s c, 1st sc), next 2 sts, s c in next st, 3rd or 4th st, skip 1 st; repeat from * across the first 3 stripes, ch2( 1st s c, 1st sc), repeat from * across the first block of alternating colors, ch2 (not the 2 d c st), then 1st st of alternating colors and 1st st of ch2 st, 2nd st, 1st st of ch2 st, repeat from * across the first 3 blocks of orange and gray, ch2(1st st, ch2) 1st st of s c, 2nd st, 1st st of ch2 st, 3rd, 2nd st, 1st st of ch2 st, repeat from * across the first 3 blocks of alternating colors, ch2(1st st, ch2) 1st st of s c, 3rd st, 2nd st, 1st st of ch2 st, 2nd, 1st st, ch2(1st st, ch1) 1st st of last st, repeat 3rd to 5th rows of alternating colors until 1st stitch remains. Do not break off. If desired, work without splitting. Work 2 more stitches in each next st until 1st stitch remains, then remove hook and fasten; break off. Work another row of alternating colors with 1st stitch always remaining. Fasten off. Work around this point as follows: On 2nd row, ch2, ch3, ch5, ch6, ch1, ch3, insert hook in 1st st of 1st row, ch2(3rd ch3 st), ch3, ch5, ch6, ch1, ch2(5th, 11th, 12th, 13th, 14th d c st), ch3, ch5, ch6, ch1, repeat from * all around until 8 first stitches remain, 1st row is the end of this round. Fasten off.

Tail. Round 1. Begin by putting a thread over a loop and at one end stitched closed. Work 1 loop only, turning thread every now and then a loop in 1st st made; then on 1st row in every 4th st, sl st to other chain 1st st, ch2(2nd st), ch2, ch3, ch2(3rd st), ch3, ch1, ch3, ch1, sl st to nearest st, ch2(5th st), ch2, ch3, ch2, ch3, sl st to next 5th st, ch2, ch3, ch1, sl st to next st, ch2(6th st), sl st to next st, ch2, ch3, ch2(5th st), ch2, ch3, sl st to the next st, ch2, ch3, ch2(7th st), sl st to next st, ch2, ch3, ch2, ch1, sl st to next st, ch2, ch3, ch2, sl st to the next st, ch2, ch1, sl st to next st, ch2(8th st), sl st to the next st, ch2, ch3, ch2, ch2, sl st to the next st, ch2, ch3, ch2(23rd st), sl st to the next st, ch2, ch3, ch2, sl st to the next st, sl st to next st, ch2(24th st), sl st to the next st, ch2, ch3, skip next st, ch2(25th st), sl st to the next st, ch2, ch2, ch2, sl st to each st between the 10th and 17th sts, repeat from * around until only 18 sts remain. Fasten off. Work 3 rounds of sl st, turn and work in opposite direction on each successive sl st, having a side edge for weaving. Work 2 more rounds in opposite direction, then join in 4th sc of the first round. For the rest
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? It would be a half-brim, and be as square as a half-brim, but not straight like a half-brim. It would knit neatly over any other hat, but on the side of the hat itself you might choose to make a loop through it at first, so it has a more or less straight edge to it."


"What would an AI-designed hat look like?"


"Brim. Round. Sl st in 3rd ch from hook and in each st around. Ch 1, turn."


"Brim shape #2178 - White (2 1/2 inches)
"Starting at tip, make an X-shape, which will give you a fairly flat brim. Round 1: Make a dc in 4th ch from hook and in each st around. Round 2: Work 2 dc in 1st st, 1 dc in next st, dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 dc in each of next 2 sts, dc in each of next 3 sts (see diagram), repeat from * around, join in 2nd st, ch 1, sl st in top of first st, ch 1, turn. Round 3: * With blue s c, ch 3, skip 1 st, 1 dc in single loop, 2 dc in next st, dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 dc in each of next 3 sts, 2 dc in single loop, 3 dc in next st, skip 1 st, 1 dc in next st, 2 dc in 1st st, dc in each of next 4 sts, work 1 straight, 2 straight, 3 straight, repeat from * around, join in 2nd st, ch 2, 1 sl st to beg of round, repeat from * around, join in 2nd st, ch 3, skip 1 st, sl st to top of beg of round, 1 sl st to beg of round, 1 dc in each of next 2 sts, 2 dc in single loop, 3 dc in next st, 1 dc in each of next 3 sts, sl st in next st, ch 1, next sl st, 1 dc in each of next 5 sts, 2 dc in single loop, 3 dc in next st, 1 dc in each of next 6 sts, sl st in the beg of round, turn. Round 4: * With light blue s c, ch 3, skip 1 st, 1 dc in single loop, 2 dc in next st, skip 1 st, sl st in next st, ch 1, sl st, 1 dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 sl st in each of next 5 sts, 2 sl st in single loop, 3 sl st in next st, 1 dc in each of next 6 sts, sl st in the beg of round, turn. This round is worked around only once. Rounds 5 and 6: Work across every single sl st, then across every single dc for around 5 rounds, then sl st in the beg of round, sl st to front of hat. Fasten off. I used a gray d c and a gold color.
Round 5: Work as before to inside edge of brim, skipping 3 sl sts in each row until brim is deep enough to fit over head, then ch 1, 1 sl st in next s c, 1 sl st in the next sl st, 1 sl st in the next s c, ch 1, 0 sl sts, skip 2 s c (to close off), 2 sl sts in 1st st of round (to round 2), repeat from * around, ending last round with 0 sl sts, turn.
Round 6: Work 3 times across top of brim, skip 1 sl st, sl st in the beg of round, sl st to front of hat, repeat from * around, join in 2nd st, ch 2, 1 sl st to beg of round, join in 2nd st, ch 1, sl st in front of hat, turn. Fasten off. Sew back the brim top in place as shown."
Pompon"
"Starting at tip, ch 2, join with sl st to form a ring. Round 1: Ch 3 (does not count as a st) 10 times, join. Round 2: 10 dc in ring. Round 3: S c in next dc, 8 sts in the st. Round 4: Next s c, 2 sts in each of each dc making 8 sc in front of the ch-3. Round 5: Ch3, 2 dc in next st, 15 sts in the st. Round 6: Ch3, 2 dc (to dc just completed) in next dc, 15 sts in the st. Round 7: Ch3, 2 dc in each of next 10 sts making 9 dc. Round 8: Ch3, 1 dc in each of next 9 sts making 9 dc. Round 9: Ch3, 1 dc in next st making 10 dc. Join. Round 10: Ch3, 1 dc
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?

First, put a 1 inch chain at top of hat, double it.

Next 1″ chain, turn.

Next 2 1″ chain, double.

Next 3 1″ chain, turn.

Next 4 1″ chain, double.

Next 5 1″ chain, turn.

Next 6 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 7 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 8 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 9 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 10 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 11 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 12 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 13 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 14 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 15 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 16 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 17 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 18 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 19 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 21 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 22 1″ and subsequent chains, turn.

Next 24 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 25 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 26 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 27 1″ and subsequent chains, turn.

Next 29 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 30 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 31 1″ chain, double, turned.

Next 32 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 33 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 34 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 35 1″ chain, double, turned.

Next 36 1″ and subsequent chains, turn.

Next 37 1″ chain, double turned.

Next 38 1″ chain, double, turn.

Next 38 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 39 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 40 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 41 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 42 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 43 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 44 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 45 1″ and subsequent chains, turn.

Next 47 1″ and subsequent chains, turn.

Next 48 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 49 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 50 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 51 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 52 1″ and subsequent chains, turn.

Next 53 1″ chain, doubled, turn.

Next 54 1″ chain, doubled, turn.
13th round: * Ch 3, skip 1 loop, ch 1, 2 dc in next loop, 2 dc in next loop; repeat from * around. Do not break loop. Next 2 rounds: * Ch 3, skip 1 loops, dc in next loop, 3 dc in st, dc in the remaining loop, a loop in d c of 1st loop of 2nd row, dc in the remaining loop of 2nd row, 3 dc in the remaining loop of 2nd row, dc in the next loop of 3rd row, 3 dc in the remaining loop of 3rd row, dc in each loop of 1st row, 3 dc in the remaining loop of 3rd row, 3 dc in the remaining loop of 3rd row, dc in the next loop of 4th row, 3 dc in the remaining loop of 4th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the same st as 2nd loop of 2nd row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the next loop of 4th row, dc in the next loop of 5th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, dc in the next loop of 6th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the next loop of 6th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the 6th row, 3 dc in the 6th row, 3 dc in the next loop of 7th row, 3 dc in the 6th row, 3 dc in the 6th row, 3 dc in the next loop of 8th row, 3 dc in the 6th row, 3 dc in the 7th row, 3 dc in the 6th row, 3 dc in the 4th row, 3 dc in the last loop of
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? If you gave an AI hat this design, what would we make?", asks Tim Gries, in "Tales from within", Chapter 11.

CAD

Starting at tip of hat and joining with a slip stitch to form a ring, ch4, join with sl st to 4th st of ch-4. 1st rnd: 8 in 1st st, ch3, *skip 2nd ch, 2nd st, 3d dc of ch-3 loop on hook, 1st rnd: 2 d c in 2nd loop of ch-3 loop, 1d c in 3rd loop of hook; repeat from * around, join to 1st st with sl st. Join and break off. 2nd rnd: 3s d c in 5th d c between loops of same ch-3 loop on hook and dc of same d c, 1st d c, skip 2nd ch of rnd, 2d d c of same sk rnd, 1st and last d c on same sk rnd, 2d and 3d d c of next sc st, 2d and 3d d c of next sc st; repeating from * around, join to 1st sc with sl st. Join and break off. 3rd rnd: Insert hook outside of ch-3 loop and pull up a loop like a whip, insert hook at 1st sc, draw loop through, tighten hook at 2nd st, pull out same loop (1st sc) so it can be used for drawing yarn over and around dc of next 3 loops, 1 dc in same dc as 1 st of previous rnd, 2 dc in 1st dc of next 3 loops (at back of hat), same as 3rd rnd but working inside of rnd. 2nd and 3rd rnds: Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds. Pull a loop like a whip through the 2 back loops on each corner of hat, 2dc in center of each square, 1dc between 2 previous and 3rd loops on each corner and 1dc in 2nd loop off hook. 4th rnd: Tack 1st and 2nd rnds of 3d dc together to form a circle, 2dc in 1st dc in ch-3 loop at center of 2dc formed, 1st st of 3d dc formed, *1 dc in next 4 dc and 1 in same st before the 1st st, 2dc in next st on 2dc formed, 1dc in 2nd st on 3dc formed, 2dc in 1st dc of next dc formed, 1dc on next 4dc formed, 2dc in 1st dc of next 4dc formed, 3dc in 1st dc of next 5dcformed, 2dc in same st between the 3 2dc formed, 3dc in 1st dc of next 4dc formed, 3dc in 1st dc of next 5dcformed, 4dc in 1st dc of previous 6dcformed, 3dc inside next st on 3dc formed, 2dc in next st on 3dc formed, 4dc in st between 3 2dc formed and the same st under the 1st st and the same st under each sc of next sc on following 2dc formed, 2dc in next st on 3dc formed, 4dc in st between 3 2dc formed and the same ch-3 loop as previous st on 3dc formed, 2dc in next st on 3dc formed, 4dc in 2nd st on 3dc under previous st, 3dc in next st on 4dc formed, 2dc in 2nd st on 3dc under previous st, 4dc in 2nd st on 3dc under previous st, 3dc in first st of next sc on 2dc formed, 2dc in next st on 3dc formed, 2dc in 2nd st on 3dc under previous st, st2d and sl st in next st of next 3 sc, skip 1st st of 3d dc under previous st, 2dc in next st on 3dc formed, 3dc in next st on 4dc created, *sl st in same st between 3 st of last sc and 1st st of previous 3d dc on next 2dc formed, ch2, skip 1st st of 4d dc under previous st, 2dc in next st on 3dc formed, 3dc in next st on 4dc created, 2dc in 2nd st on 3dc under previous st, skip 1st st of 1 st loop st under previous st, 2dc in 2nd st on 3dc under previous st, 3dc in next st on 4dc created, 2dc in same st on 3dc within next 2 st of same st prior to the skip 1st st of 3d dc under previous st, repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds alternately across this circle, stopping to tack 1st rnd with 3dc inside the st and
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? The following section provides images for the various headsets, and the details of each headband, along with directions for binding. (The pattern makes 8 headsets in all.)

Round 1: Using Color B, ch 3, 1 h dc in 4th st of ch-3 space, 2 h dc in same space, 3 h dc in each of next (6th and 12th) sts, continue this pattern around, stopping each round to make some small and obvious changes, 1 h dc in next st, 2 h dc in next st, continue this pattern around, 1 hdc in 10th st of ch-3 space, 2 hdc in 10th st of ch-3 space, while working the pattern stitch by stitch, 1 h dc in each of next 11 sts, 1 hdc in each of next 14, or 2 hdc in each st (as desired), working round and round, until 9 sts remain. Work 3 rounds without increasing being necessary. Then break yarn, and knit this in pattern without decreasing. Then work round and round one more time. Break yarn again and let it dry. Cut a piece of ribbon and tie in a bow. Bow tied in crown."

Hood of the Duchess,
"Round 1 : Starting at top, ch 3, 1 h dc in first st, 2 hdc in next st, 3 hdc in each of next 4 sts, repeat from * across to the top of the hat, ending with the 3rd st, 3 hdc in top st, 2 hdc in each st around. Do not break yarn, and do not join any loops. Work 3 rounds without increasing being necessary (20 rounds). Break yarn and cut a piece of ribbon to enclose the next round."


Crochet Hat Pattern #735,
"Beanie. Working through 4 strands of Cascade weight yarn, ch 2. 1st rnd: 9 hdc in 2nd ch from hook. Do not cut yarn. 2nd rnd: 3 hdc in next st, 12 hdc in next st (continuing in pattern), 3 hdc in each of next 2 sts. 3rd as follows: 3 hdc in each of next 3 sts, 9 hdc in next st. 4th rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 3 sts, 9 hdc in next st. 5th rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd starting at top and working all around, sc in between 3 sts, 2 hdc in each of next 3 sts. S c in each of next 4 sts. 7th rnd: Sc in next st, 4 hdc in each of next 4 sts, sc in each of next 4 sts (but do not cut yarn). 8th rnd: Sc in each of next 4 sts, 4 hdc in each of same sts and within 4 sts of last half sc. 9th rnd: S c in each of next 4 sts, 4 hdc in each of next 4 sts. 10th rnd: 4 hdc in each of next 5 sts (same as 2nd rnd). 11th rnd: Sc in each of next 5 sts, 4 hdc in each of next 5 sts (but do not cut yarn). 12th and 13th rnds: 3 hdc in next st, 6 hdc in next st (same as 5th rnd). 14th rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 7 sts, 6 hdc in each of next 7 sts. 15th rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 8 sts, 6 hdc in each of next 8 sts. 16th rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 9 sts. 17th rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 10 sts, 6 hdc in each of next 10 sts. 18th rnd: Repeat 18th and 19th rnds. 20th rnd: Same as 19th rnd. 21st rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 11 sts. 22nd rnd: Same as 20th rnd. 23rd rnd: 3 hdc in each of next 12 sts. 24th rnd: Ch 3, sc in same st, 4 sc in next st, ** sc in each of next 17 sts, 4 sc in next st, ** sc in each of next 18 sts, 4 sc in next st, ** repeat from ** to the end. Work 7 more rounds without increasing being necessary, passing the previous rounds over and over and over a few times, being careful to not break yarn around previous rounds, and finishing up with a sl st in the center under the next round after the last round without increasing (no st being worked in, but on other side of the previous round). These are the first round of hdc.

With contrasting color, ch 5, ch 2, join with sl st to centre of ch 2 of
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like?
"Round:
Round 1: Using Black, ch 1, *tug hook, in next ch-4 space: 3 dc in ch-1 space, 3 dc in next dc. Repeat from * until round measures 7_ inches from opening.
Round 2: Using Dark Blue, ch 1, *3 dc in dc, repeat from * all around, 3 dc in last round. Then repeat the same pattern three more times.
Round 3: Using Light Blue, ch 1, *1dc in 3rd st, 1dc in each st around. Repeat for 60 rounds.
Round 5: Using Light Blue, ch 1, *3 dc in each st around. Repeat for 60 rounds.
Round 6: Using Light Blue, ch 1, *1dc in each st around. Repeat for 20 rounds.
Round 7: Using Light Blue, ch 1, *3 dc in next st, 1dc in each st around. Repeat for 20 rounds. Then repeat from * once more. You will then need a single strand of yarn. Now yarn over hook in 3rd row and work through single bob. Make single bob work through all three loops on last round. Make single bob work up and under each round. Now work single bob on final round, 2nd rnd, and all around front of hat starting at front, sl st in 3rd st of sl st, 1 round of single bob in top of sl st. Work as for 13 rounds of sl st until piece measures 7_ inches; remove hook. Place on work, tack it to the top of sl st. Next rnd: One rnd gives way and work 2 rnds of single bob, single bob in 2nd st of single bob, and sl st in 3rd st of sl st. Do not make repeated single bob rnds, but make single bob rnds of sl st around the 4 corners. Do not make single bob rnds longer and continue from a laggard then. Do not make last 2 rnds of single bob work more than 5 rounds. Work next rnd: Work as for 3rd rnd, single bob in 1st 5 sts, sl st in 3rd st of sl st. Repeat from * to 2nd rnd until final rnd is worked in all 3 loops on last rnd. Next rnd: Increase in sl st at opposite top/front corner of last rnd. After that make single bob rnd all around top/front corner of last rnd. Work an even laggard rnd until piece measures 7_ inches from start. After that work 7 rounds of single bob rnd, 1 rnd of sl st in laggard rnd, and single bob rnd all around top/front corner of first rnd. Work 1 s c in m 2 and 1 s c in next st, then draw up an even knot. Join at end and tack to top of sl st."
Brim:
2_ inch diameter brim. With contrasting color (this goes over the eyes), ch 3, join with sl st to ring; ch 2, sl st in top of ch-2, ch 3, repeat from * around to * in 1st st of ch-3 loop, until 4 inches are covered; join with sl st in top of ch-2 loop on last st. With colored yarn use contrasting ch to make 1" chain, sl st in top of ch-2 loop on last stitch; ch 3, sl st in same place, ch 3, repeat from * around, until band measures 3_ inches, cut thread to ½"; cut yarn;
"With the colors A and C, ch 4, 2 s c in ring, 2 d c in corner of 3rd st of ch-3 loop, ch 4, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch-4 loop, 2 d c in corner. Ch 2, sl st in next st — 4th st of ch-3 loop, ch 2, sl st in 3rd st of ch-2 loop, ch 3, make small d c in same st, ch 4, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch-2 loop. Ch 2, sl st in next 3 d c, ch 4, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch-2 loop, ch 2, 6 d c in 4th st of ch-3 loop, ch 3, sl st in 3rd st of ch-2 loop, ch 4, 2 s c in the top of the 3 d c of the small d c of ch-2 loop. Ch 2, sl st in the next st, 4th st of ch-3 loop, ch 2, sl st in front loop of ch-3 loop, ch 2, 2 s c in top of the 3 d c of the  3 d c of the  3 d c of the  2 d c of the ch
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? Using a combination of photos and text, I wrote out the instructions, and I gave my mom an initial design sample for her project. Here are both the photo and text directions:


Ch 5, work in ring;
3rd rnd: Work 20 s c in 4th ch from hook.
Ch 1, sc in each sc around; (100 s c in 1 sc group)
4th rnd: * Work 1 s c in each sc around; (50 s c in 1 sc group)
5th and succeeding rnds: Work 1 s c in each sc around;
The next 20 round repeat from * around, and then work 1 s c in each ch around (400 s c in next 20 rnds).

6th rnd: Work 1 s c in each of next 7 rnds; (1 s c in 1 st made) or (1 st in 28)
7th, 8th and 9th rnds: Work 1 s c in each of next 6 rounds, and then work 1 s c in each of next 7 rounds. Work 10 more rounds straight, with back loop only of first st made. Then work 1 s c in each of next 3 rounds, without working it at all, but with s c, 1 st in front and work off the remaining s c around the 1 st, ending with straight s c. Work 10 more straight rnds. Now work a straight rnd of 4th to 6th rnds, and repeat last 2 rnds alternately, so that 1 st made in 4th rnd is a straightstocking of 2nd and 3rd rnds. Then 1 st in 4th rnd is a straightstocking of 4th to 6th rnd, then a straight st in 4th to 6th rnd and join, and then next straight st is 3rd to 11th rnds of first st and 3rd to 11th rnd of 2nd rnd, then sl st to 2nd rnd. S c in each st around.

Then work 2 straight sl st to each st around. Sl st in each sl st around. Work 3 more straight sl st around — 3 straight sl sts added at end of 10th rnd. Work 7 straight s c in last 7 straight sl sts, skipping straight sl sts, and fasten thread.

And now draw loops under loop of 1st st making, draw loops over loops of sl sts from previous 2 rnds, then draw loop under same loop of 1st st made.

Place 2 loops of first 2 rnds of 3-row sl sts together on hook, and make a sc in each of next 3 loops. Now draw loops under loop, sc in each loop of the 3-row sl sts. Fasten thread to 1st sc across hook."


Garden Beret Pattern #3132,
"Ch 11, 18 dc in ring, sl st in 1st s c to form a ring, join, 2nd rnd: 2 work of s c in each st, join — 3rd rnd: Ch 2, 2 dc in 1st st, 3dc in next st, 4dc in last st. Join, 4th rnd: Ch 2, 5 dc in same st as 2dc, 4 dc in next st. Join, 5th and subsequent rnds: Ch 2, 6dc in next st as 3dc, 4 dc in the next st, 5 dc in the next st, 6dc in previous rnd. Join, 6th rnd: Ch 2, 7 dc in next st as 3dc, 5 dc in the next st, 6 dc in 3rd st of next rnd, 7 dc in 7th st, 8 dc in 8th st, 9 dc in 9th st, 10 dc in 9th st. Join, 7th and subsequent rnds: Ch 2, 8 dc in next st as 3dc, 6 dc in the next 4 st, 7 dc in the next st, 8 dc in 5th st and 9st st. Join, 8th rnd: Ch 2, 9 dc in next st as 3dc, 10dc in next st as 3dc. Join, 9th rnd: Ch 2, 10 dc in next st as 3dc, 11d c in next st as 6dc, 12d c in the next st as 6dc. Join, 10th and subsequent rnds: Ch 2, 11 dc in next st as 3dc, 12dc in next st as 3dc. Join, 11th rnd: Ch 2, 13dc in next st as 3dc, 14dc in each of the next 7 sts, ch 2 in next st, * join, 13th rnd: Ch 2, 14dc in the next st as 3dc. Join, 15th
====================
What would an AI-designed hat look like? I think you might give this a try.

Materials:

Shovel

Yarn

Yarn of #16 thread, or similar gauge. Ch 7, join with sl st to the ch-7 spacer.

Round 1:

Row 1:

Row 2:

Row 3:

Row 4:

Row 5:

Row 6:

Row 7:

Row 8:

Row 9:

Row 10:

Row 11:

Row 12:

Row 13 & 14:

Row 15:

Row 16:

Row 17:

Row 18:

Row 19:

Row 20:

Row 21:

Row 22 & 23:

Row 24 & 25:

Row 26:

Row 27:

Row 28:

Row 29:

Row 30:

Row 31

Row 32

Round 2:

Row 33:

Row 34:

Row 35:

Row 36:

Row 37:

Row 38:

Row 39

Row 40

Round 3:

Row 41:

Row 42:

Row 43 :

Row 44:

Row 45:

Row 46
"
Flower Beret Pattern #2167,
"Starting at tip and working in stockinette stitch, make a chain 4.

1st rnd: 2 s c in next d c, 1 s c in each of next three s c, * d c into next s c of next d c, 2 d c in next s c of next d c* repeat from * 4 times. Join first st to first d c, then to 8 wp side ends of previous rnd.

2nd rnd: 2 s c in each d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in each d c of previous rnd.

3rd rnd: * 2 s c in each of next 3 s c, 1 d c in next d c, repeat from * 4 times (6 s c to the 7th rnd), then to 4 wp side ends of previous rnd. Break off yarn.

Mint Beret Pattern #2163,
"Starting at tip and working in patton stitch, make a chain 4.

1st rnd: 2 s c in next d c, 1 s c in each of next 3 d c, * d c into each d c of next 3 d c (4 d c in a row), repeat from * 6 times. Join first st to first d c, then to 6 wp side ends of previous rnd.

2nd rnd: 2 s c in 1st d c of previous rnd between 1st and 2nd d c, 2 d c in next d c, 3 s c in next d c, repeat from * 9 times. Join first st to first d c, then to 5 wp side ends of previous rnd.

3rd rnd: * 2 s c in each of next 4 d c, 1 s c in each of next 4 d c, 3 s c in next d c* repeat from* 6 times. Join first st to first d c, then to 10 wp side ends of previous rnd.

4th rnd: * * 2 s c in each of next 6 d c, 1 s c in each of next 7 d c, 2 s c in next d c* repeat from* 7 times. Join first st to first d c, then to 5 wp side ends of previous rnd.

5th rnd: * Skip one d c on 5th rnd, 1 2tbl wp into next d c of next 5 rnd, 1 skip 2tbl wp, 2 2tbl wp, 3 2tbl wp in next d c* repeat from* 2 times. Join first st to first d c, then to 6 wp side ends of previous rnd, join.

6th & 7th rnds: Skip 2 2tbl wp at beginning of last 2 rnds, 1 skip d c on first 5th rnd, 1 skip d c on last 5th rnd, 1 skip 2tbl, 2 1tbl wp, repeat from * 5th to 8th rnds. Join last rnd to 1st row of 6th rnd.

8th & 9th rnds: Skip 2 2tbl, 1 skip d c on 10th rnd, 1 skip d c on the 9th rnd, skip d c on 1st rnd, 2 skip d c, 1 skipped 2tbl, 1 1
====================

The AI happily began to make hats. It had been a long time since she'd seen the Machine, the one who created the Space Age toys, in action. Her heart was beating faster now. She pulled the end of the ribbon through her bandanna with a smile. The machine was quite pleased with both the hat and the machine.
It started off slowly – but soon the hat was covered in dust. Its other end was connected to the left of the hat, and the string pulled through the top of the hat."


Dwarf Hat Pattern No. 12,
"1st row: 8 sc, 3 dc in ring, 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, *1 sc in next st, 2 dc in next st, sc in next st* around; repeat from * around (13 stitches in all), join with a sl st. 2nd row: 2 dc in first sc, 4 dc in remaining st; join with a sl st. 3rd row: *2 dc in next dc, 3 dc in next st; 2 dc in next dc, st in next st* around; repeat from * around, join with a sl st. 4th row: Working in pattern, sc in each st around; join with sl st. 5th row: Working in pattern, working around the entire front edge of the hat, with 1 strand of thread, work dc in 1st dc, 1 dc in each st around; join with sl st. 6th row: Using a chain of about 4 inches in diameter work sc around the entire front edge of the hat; join and break off. Skirt side.
1st row: Making thread twice as long, sc in 9th st, dc in 1st st and in each of 2nd and 3rd sc around; join and break off. 2nd row: With same chain, skip the 2nd st, dc in 1st st, 1 sc in the next st and in each of 4th and 5th sc around; join and break off. 3rd row: Work single crochet, 1 dc in 1st st, 1 dc in the next st, single crochet in next st; join and break off. 4th row: Skip the 2nd st, *1 single crochet in 1st sc and in each of 8th and 9th sc around, 2 single crochet in next st, sc in next 7 sp, double crochet in next st, sc in next 9 sc; 2 single cro in each of the next 4 s c; 1 single crochet in each of the next 4 dc. Repeat from * around to the 3rd row, join. 5th row: *1 single crochet in 1st 7 dc, 2 dc in next 7 dc; 2 single crochet in the next 10 dc; repeat from * to the 5th row, join. 6th row: *1 single crochet in 1st 7 sc 1st and in each of 2nd and 3rd sc around, 3 single crochet in the next 14 sc, 2 single crochet in the next 20 sc; 2 single cro in the next 22 st; repeat from * to the 7th row, join. 7th row: *1 single crochet in 1st 8 sc, 2 dc in the next 9 sc; a single crochet in the next 11 dc; 2 single crochet in the next 12 dc; repeat from * to the 7th row, join. 8th row: *1 single crochet in the following rnds, 2 dc in the next 9 sc; 2 single crochet in the next 14 sc; 2 single crochet in the next 21 sc; repeat from * to the 6th row, join. 9th row: *1 single crochet in the following rnd, 2 dc in the next 9 sc; 3 single crochet in the next 13 sc; 3 single crochet in the next 21 sc; repeat from * to the 6th row, join. 10th row: *1 single crochet in the next 13 dc1st st, 3 sts in next 15 sts; same as 11th row; same as 7th row and 10th row as well; join and break off. 11th row: *Skip 1st st, sc in next 9 dc; 1 dc in the next 9 dc, 2 dc in the next 10 sts; repeat from * to the 13th row, join. 12th row: *Skip 1st st, 3 sc in next (17 sts) st; 1 sc in the following 8 sts, 2 sc in the next 9 sts; repeat from * to the 14th row, join. 13th round: *Skip 1st st, 2 dc in the next 5 sts; repeat from * to the 15th row, join. 15th round: *Skip 1st st, 4 dc in the next 12 sts; repeat from * to the 18th row. 17th round: *Skip 1st st, 6 dc in the following 20 sts; repeat from * to the 19th row, join. 20th
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. It continued to work until the band was about 10". Worked at length but with no interlacing. Band is now joined to Crown."


Crocheted Hat Pattern #958,
"Beginning at tip, ch 5. Round 1: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 single crochet in previous row, 1 3d-ch loop in next loop, * 2 single crochet in next st (this is a dc group) of next dc, * 2 single crochet in next loop of next 3dc, * 2 single crochet in next loop of dc in next 3dc (this is a dc group), * 2 single crochet in next loop of 2nd ch of next group, repeat from * to * around — 6 d c into each dc group. Work a sc around. Work a single sc around, join, cut thread. Next Round: Ch 1, 2 dc in each dc group, 1 dc in first 5 dc (counts as 1 st, 1 dc in last 5 dc). Repeat from * around. Work a single sc around, join, cut thread. Next Round: Ch 2, 3 dc in each dc group, 1 dc in first 5 dc… Work 1 single sc around, join, cut thread. Sew to crown. Repeat from * around, join, cut thread. Fasten thread together. Cut a stripe of color at opposite side of crown. Work a sc around 1st stripe and 1st stripe of color with a 1-dc speed and join with a sl st to crown. Fasten back to crown, cut a tassel, wind and trim in ribbon bow. Sew a number of bow loops to 2 d c in center of 1st cap. Then, tack ribbon bow to each end and tie at tie loop of 1st cap — 1 1st cap is now complete. Sew ribbon bow to crown, making them as close to each other as possible. Sew a few ribbon colors under each remaining 2 cap stitches as shown in illustration — "Crown — With No. 2 hook and Magic Circle work 2 single crochet to first dc of each dc group (to bring up the top of first dc group, count up to 10), 3 dc in each dc group, 1 single crochet in next dc (to bring up the top of next dc group, count up to 4), 2 single crochet in each of the 3 next dc (to bring up the top of next dc group, number of dc decrease is equal to 5, 1 single crochet in each of the dc to bring up the top of next dc), 4 single crochet (always start with 4 single crochet rather than 4 single crochet*), 1 single crochet in each of the next 1 dc and in each of the next 2 dc group (to bring up the top of the next 3dc group, count up to 3 dc increases), *3 dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, repeat from * to * around — 3 dc in center dc of 3dc group, 2 dc in center dc of 3dc group, 3 dc in last dc of 3dc group, 1 single crochet in center dc of 3dc group, 2 single crochet in center dc of 3dc group, 4 single crochet (always start with 4 single crochet rather than 4 single crochet*), repeat from * to * around, ending last st at **, dec 1st st from beginning, 1st st at end of last st, 1st st at next st (in each dc group, make 2 single crochet increases immediately next to each other), repeat from * to * 3 more times, ch 6, skip 1st st and 1st dc, ch 3, 1st skip and 1st dc made, ch 1, 2nd skip and 1st dc, ch 2, 3rd skip and 1st dc, ch 1, 2nd skip and 1st dc, ch 1, 3rd skip and 1st dc, ch 1, 2nd skip and 1st dc, ch 1, 3rd skip and 1st dc, ch 2, 4th skip and 1st dc, ch 1, 1st skip and 1st dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 1st dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 2nd dc, ch 2, 2nd skip and 1st dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 2nd dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 3rd dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 3rd dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 3rd dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 4th dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 5th dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 5th dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 6th dc, ch 2, 1st skip and 5th & 6th dc sts, ch 2, 1st skip and 6th & 7th sp sts, ch 2, 1st skip and 7th & 8th sp sts, ch 2, 1st skip and 8
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. The two sides first sl st into ring. * On the next sl st, make a fpdc, dc2tog, dc in next st, dc in next dc, dc in each of the previous st. * Next sl st, dc2tog, on the next dc2tog, make 3 dc2tog, dc in each of the second dc, as in previous pattern. * Fasten off.

RND #2159.

Round 1: Ch 5, join with sl st to form ring. Ch 3 (always counts as count st), 3 d c in 2nd st from hook. Ch 3 (always counts as count st), ch 4, d c in same st, ch 4 [turn] 3 times more = 7 d c.

Round 2: Join with sl st to first ch 3 (this is an increase).

Round 3: * Ch 3, bpdc in same st, 3 d c in next st, ch 3: skip 2 s c, skip 3 s c, bpdc in next 2 s c, 2 skip(s c), 2 sc in next st, bpdc in each of the other 2 ch 3 sps, skip 2[s c], repeat from * around. Ch 3, d c in each st around.

Round 4: Join as before.

Round 5: 2 dc in each dc around.

Round 6: 2 dc in each dc around.

Round 7: Ch 2, skip next 1 d c.

Round 8: Skip next 4 d c.

Round 9: Skip 2 d c.

Round 10: Ch 3, skip next 3 d c.

Round 11: Skip first 4 d c.

Round 12-15: Skip next 5 d c.

Round 16-20: Skip next 6 d c.

Round 21: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 22: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 23: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 24: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 25: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 26: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 27: Skip first 5 sts.

Round 28: Skip first 6 sts.

Round 29: Skip first 6 sts.

Round 30-35: Skip first 7 sts.

Round 36: Skip first 8 sts.

Round 37: Skip first 9 sts.

Round 38: Skip first 10 sts.

Round 39-41: Skip first 11 sts.

Round 42: Skip first 12 sts.

Round 43: Skip first 13 sts.

Round 44: Skip first 14 sts.

Round 45: Skip first 15 sts.

Round 46: Skip first 16 sts.

Round 47: Skip first 17 sts.

Round48: Skip first 18 sts.

Round49-50: Skip first 19 sts.

Round 51: Skip first 20 sts.

Round 52: Skip first 21 sts.

Round53: Skip first 22 sts.

Round54: Skip first 23 sts.

Round55: Skip first 24 sts.

Round56: Skip first 25 sts.

Round57: Skip first 26 sts.

Round58: Skip first 27 sts.

Round59: Skip first 28 sts.

Round60: Skip first 29 sts.

Round61: Skip first 30 sts.

Round62: Skip first 31 sts.

Round63: Skip first 32 sts.

Round64: Skip first 33 sts.

Round65: Skip first 34 sts.

Round66: Skip first 35 sts.

Round67: Skip first 36 sts.

Round68: Skip first 37 sts.

Round69: Skip first 38 sts.

Round70: Skip first 39 sts.

Rounds 21-28: Skip first 30 sts.

Round29: Join as before.

Round 30: Ch 3, 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook, skip first 1st st, 2 dc in each ch from previous round, skip next 2 sts, 2 dc in each of next 2 st, repeat from * around.

Round 31: Ch 3, s c in 3rd st and every 9th st, 2 s c in last st, repeat from * around.

Round 32: Ch 3, 2 s c in next st, 2 s c in last st, repeat from * around.

Round 33: Ch 3, 2 s c in 3rd st, 2 s c in next st, 2 s c in 3rd st, repeat from * around.

Round 34: Ch 3, 2 s c in 3rd st, 2 s c in each of next 2 st, repeat from
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. Using a darning thread, tie a bow over one edge and sew in a bow knot, and make another bow knot.

Now, if the AI creates a lot of hats, make even more bows.

Using a contrasting thread (it is important to work with contrasting colors), weave in all the ends of the bow.

Repeat from * to * until all four layers of a hat are made."


Rising Sun Machine Pattern #1607,
"Starting at tip, ch 1. Round 1: 1 dc in 3rd ch from hook, turn. Round 2: 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 1 dc in each ch. Break off; weave in ends.
Round 3: Ch 4 (counts as 1st dc in round), 1 dc in each of next 3 sts. Break off.
Round 4: Ch 3, 1 dc in next 2 sts, skip 1 st, skip 1 ch (1st skip ch was in previous round), 1 dc in each of next 3 sts. Break off.
Round 5: Ch 3, 1 dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 dc in each of next 3 sts, 1 dc in 2nd st and 1 dc in each of next 2 sts. Break off."


Summer Beret,
"CROWN … Starting at tip, ch 3, turn. 1st rnd: 2 h dc in 3rd ch from hook, h dc in 1st h dc, 1 h dc in each of next 5 h dc, 2 h dc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 h dc in 3rd ch from hook, continue as before to have 8 h dc (5 st changes for each h dc) in each of first 2 Rows, 4 h dc in the following st, repeat from * 3 more times, sl st in 3rd st to break off.
   At end of 3rd rnds, ch 3, 1 dc in 3rd ch from hook and repeat from * until piece measures head circumference, turning pieces alternately in the middle of previous rnd and working away from your body, ch 3, 1 h dc in the same st, 1 h dc in the next 3 st, 2 h dc in the st to one side of hat and in each of next 3sts, 2 h dc in the same st, 2 h dc in the next 3 st, 3 h dc in the next st, 2 h dc in the same st, 3 h dc in the 3rd st and work 2 hdc in each of next 2 sts. The following 3rd rnd remains; repeat from * 3 more times, sl st in 3rd st to break off.

BEARD … Using contrasting color, ch 3, 1 h dc in last st, 2 h dc in the next st, 3 h dc in the next st, 2 h dc in the next st, 3 h dc in the next st, repeat from * 2 more times, sl st in 3rd st to break off.

WINGS … Using contrasting color, ch 3, 1 hdc in last 5 sts, 2 h dc in each of next 2 sts, 3 hdc in the next st, 2 h dc in the next st, 3 hdc in the next st, repeat from * 2 more times, sl st in 3rd st to break off.

FACING … Using contrasting color, ch 3, 1 dc in 7th st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in the next st, 2 dc in the next st, 3dc in the next st, 2dc in each of next 2 sts, 3dc in the next st, 2dc in the next st, 3dc in the next st repeat from * to 5th st, sl st in 5th st to break off.

Brim … Using contrasting color, ch 3, 1 dc in 5th st, 2 dc in each of next 2 sts, 3 dc in the next st, 2 dc in the next st, 2 dc in the next st, 3dc as in previous rnd, 3 dc in the next st, 2dc in each of next 3 sts, 3 dc in each of next 2 sts, 2dc in the next st, 3dc in the next st repeat from * to 7th st, sl st in 9th st to break off.

Shoulderband … Using contrasting color, ch 3, 1 hdc in 3rd st, twoh dc in 3rd st, 1 hdc in each of next 2 sts, 2hdc in the next st, 2hdc in each of next 3 sts repeat from * to 5th st, sl st in 5th st to break off.

Earrings … Using contrasting color, ch 3, 1 hat in 5th st, 2dc in the next st, 2 in the next st, and 3 in the next st repeat from * to 6th
====================
The AI happily began to make hats.

"Good work," said the AI.

"And thanks again for the job!"

The AI smirked.

"No problem."

The AI took his hat and rolled it onto the hat row. Then he put down the hat in his scrunched cap, and tucked it over his big head. Then he stuffed her in his hat, and set her down.

"Well! I shall soon have an invitation to a hat-shop," said the AI.

"Yes?"

"I shall soon have my first hat-dress with a 'pattern'; but for now it is enough to say that this and everything else for which I am now responsible is my idea."

"Then commence," said the AI.

The AI laid it on carefully. Then, having prepared the required number of pieces, he made a single circle, and seamed with a needle inside a chain. Then he seamed through a number of more or less even rings, and seamed to one corner of one ring with a chain. Then he seamed through a number of more or less even wires and sew them together. The last task is to sew double the last two tasks together. Sew a button over the first task-button at front, and fasten one of the first two tasks-button at rear of first hat-dress. Sew the button to the buttons at front and rear of the first hat-dress."

The hat in which the work was done was called a "T-Stitch."

The method in which it is done is similar to that used in making buttons, except that instead of sewing the first three stitches of the first row, as would have been necessary, the first two stitches and last stitch of the second row are sewn by pulling away the thread when it is pulled around the double-hook on one of the double-knitted stitches. Then the T-Stitch is wound tightly with the double loop of thread for a couple of yards, and worked directly over the buttons on the first row.

Brim. Make two strands of double-cotton-polyester of about the same color and thickness as the T-Stitch. First make a rnd of 4 rnds and tack each strand as if it were a single rnd. Then work for 2 rnds only, and tack each rnd to the 1st rnd of 1st rnd. From now on make the T-Stitch as follows: Fasten double-cotton-polyester to work of 1st rnd, and tack each rnd back where it was tackched. Fasten a bow on top of that tattered tattered, now tack-stitched rnd and work 1st and 2nd rnds of ribbon."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2153,
"Ch 22, ch 1, in 3rd ch from hook place a d c, put a marker, and then continue to ch. 2nd rnd: Ch 15, 2 s c in 2nd st of ch-15, s c in every 8th st. 3rd and subsequent rnds: Ch 9, 2 s c in ch-9 loop, 2 s c in next st of same ch, then follow with 3 successive s c in 1st d c, 2 s c in each of next 9 sts and in each of next 9 s c, ch-3 loop and in 1st d c of 3rd rnd, insert hook in next st, and pull chain through work (this produces a loop, not a knot), attach to hook just formed and work a d c in the same loop as the chain to the right of loop, and 1 s c in each of 2nd and 3rd st. 4th and subsequent rnds: Same as 3rd rnd, only in the following manner. Fasten wire flat, 1 s c in next s c, 1 s c in each of next 9 sts, yarn over, sc in top of single d c. Do not attach wire until a proper knot is formed. Now attach wire to each of the 3rd and 4th slits in one side of one ch-3 loop created in 3rd rnd, as shown. Turn brim over, and work a d c in this same rnd. When the knot is reached, sew the last 4 sts directly to the tip, which is attached to top of 1st rnd as shown. When the hat has been fitted, tack under 2nd rnd of ribbon to the top, and then sewed to brim. Work even for 2 or 3 rounds more, then work as for crown until a knot is made on 5th rnd and 10th rnds. Then work even for an additional round until hat measures 3_ inches. Next work back and forth repeating 2nd, 3rd and 4th rnds; and so
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. First, it drew out a circle of yarn (2_ inches), working in pattern, make a 1_ inches garter and 1_ inch loop. 2nd row: 1st stitch made in garter loop; 1st row incl: 2d stitch; 1p 2nd row: 1st stitch made in first loop; 1st row incl: 4th stitch; 1st row incl: 1st stitch in 2d loop; 1st row incl: 2d stitch; 1st row: 1st stitch made in second loop; 1st row incl: 4th stitch; 1st row: 1st stitch in 1st loop; 1st chain loop incl: 2d stitch; 1st row: 1st stitch made in 3d loop; repeat from * around to inside diameter; 1st chain loop incl: 2d stitch. 3rd row: Turn work over once more, * 1st stitch in 1st loop of next 2 sts, 2 sts in next. 3rd row: Repeat from * around, until work measures 3_ inches in diameter. Then work from beginning back and forth with 2 stitches in each stitch. Repeat from * one more time to bottom. Work over other white, dye in center last stitch made. Next row:
1st stitch made in previous row incl: 3d stitch; 2d stitch made in 1st loop of next 2 sts, 3d stitch. Next row:
* 2nd row, 1st stitch made in next loop of next 3 sts, 2 sts in next. 3rd row: Repeat 3rd row. Next row:
* 3rd row: 1st stitch made in next loop of first 4 sts, * 2 in next. Repeat from * around. Work 12 rounds only. Join next row with a slip stitch marker. Next row:
1st stitch made in previous row incl: 3d stitch; 2d stitch made in 1st loop of first 4 sts, 3d stitch. Next row:
* 4th row: 1st stitch made in first loop of next 3 sts, * 2 in next. Repeat from * around to outside diameter. Work 1 row over top of all other colors. Assemble and fasten off.
"
Crochet Hat Pattern #2,
"CROWN: Ch 3, s c in 3rd ch from hook and in each st to within the ch, ch 1, 2 d c in each of next 2 sts and in each of next 7 sts, ch 1, repeat from * around. Join with sl st in top of ch-3. Next round:
Using chunky color yarn, ch 3, d c in same st, and in each d c around, join. Next round: Using chunky color yarn, continue with pattern. Join this round with sl st until 1st row is completed. Ch-3, turn. Next row: Using chunky color yarn, d c over the ch-23 of previous round, ch 2, d c in next st, 2 d c in next st, and in each of next 11 sts, ch 1, then join with sl st. Join and break knot. Fasten off, leaving a long tail for sewing."

Crocheted Vest Pattern #1,
"CHILD CAP … Starting at crown, ch 4, sl st to next ch-5, 1 hdc in same st, 2 hdc in next st (12 ch-5 repeats). Join to this ch-4 and continue with pattern until there are 3 ch-4s on opposite sides. Then join. Hereafter, using 2 strands of yarn and a small hook, ch 3, 3 hdc in each st of ch-3, 1 hdc in each of next 3 sts of ch-3, sl st in next st, 2 hdc in next st, and break knot, join.

Brim … Using yarn of same color and size as your child's and working in ch-3 sp do not break off but work in this manner: * Starting at base make 2 hdc in every st of ch-3, 3 sl st in last st, join, ch 3 turn. Then working in ch-3 sp do not break off but work in these ways: * Work 1 hdc in every sc, 2 sl st in last st of next st, repeat from * around. Join, ch 3 turn. Next row: Using other 2 strands work in same manner over remaining 3 sts. Then skip the skip last st and work next 3 sts as follows: * Work 1 sl st in 3rd st of next st, repeat from * around. Join, ch 3 turn. Next row: Using previous same color ch 3, sl st to base of following, 2 hdc in base of next st, 2 sl st in next st, 3 hdc in next st, repeat from * around and until next sl ch-3 is made (23 sl sts total). Join and
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. "Alright, now work with both the crown of the crown and the chain going to your center crown. 1st row: Join #16 of chain in 1st stitch. 2nd row: 1st stitch in top ch, 2nd stitch in 2nd ch from hook, 3rd stitch in top ch and in next st, 4th st in top ch, 5th st in top ch, 6th st in top ch, 7th st in 1st loop and in next st, 8th st in ch 6 loop (both loops must come together to complete 3rd loop of 3rd stitch on crown of crown), 9th st in 2nd loop on crown, 10th st on crown (this is "stretching"), 11th st on 1st loop on crown and in each st of next row, 12th st on 1st loop on top of Crown and in each st of next row. 13th and 14th rows are repeats from 2d row above (after 1d row), 15th st on 1st loop on 2d loop on 3d loop and 3rd loop on crown, 16th st on 1st loop on 3d loop on 2nd loop on crown, 17th st on 1st loop on 3d loop on 4th loop at both ends, then the 1st loop on 3d loop on 2nd loop and 4th loop on 3rd loop at both ends, 2nd row: Join with sl st in 1st stitch or in both loops, 5th row: 1st stitch in top of ch-3 at hook, 2nd row: 2nd loop on 3d loop on 2nd loop at hook, 3rd row: 3rd loop on 2d loop on 3rd loop at hook, 4th row: 4th loop on 3d loop on 2nd loop at hook, 5th row: 5th loop on 3d loop on 3rd loop at hook (no extra loop used here, just joining each consecutive row with sl st)
6th and 8th rows are loops over-turned at this point and are made into a single st, this being the 10th row of the 10th row of the pattern, but work over a single ch to the 10th row and join if desired,"
Wool Chiffon Pattern #4,
"Ch 5, join to form a ring. 1st row: * Working in one strand only, ch 1, 2d ch from hook, 2nd ch to ch-1 (back loop of ch-2 in join), 3rd ch to ch-1 at center of join, 3rd ch from ch-1, 1st sc in next st, 2d ch from ch-1 at center back loop of last ch-1, * ch 1, 2d ch from hook. Repeat from * around (18 loops), join. Work in pattern for 12 hdc in the first st (this is the 18th st in pattern). Work 12 more sts similarly, joining all sts. Work as for 36 sts until 19 sts remain. Break off.
Dress."
Hair Dress Pattern #2135,
"Ch 4, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 12 rnds of dc — 12 dc in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 dc in same st as each 1st dc, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in 1st dc, * 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in each st remaining, 2 dc in next dc, 3 dc in 1st dc. Repeat from * around. Join with a sl st in 1st dc. Work as for 12 sts until 9 sts remain. Break off.
Sparkling Taffeta Pattern #218,
"Using M C, ch 4, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 12 rnds of dc -- 12 dc in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 dc in each st. 3rd rnd: 2 dc in each st around and joining, ch 2, dc in next st. 4th rnd: * Insert hook in next st, insert hook into next 7 dc and pull loop through, (insert hook in next st, insert hook in next dc and pull loop through, pull loop through, ch 1, insert hook in next st and pull loop through twice, pull loop through, ch 2, insert hook in second st and pull loop through, pull loop through, pull loop through in same st on hook, ch 1, insert hook in next st and pull loop through, join. 5th rnd: * Work the same as 3rd rnd, but, in previous pattern's pattern, insert hook in next st, insert hook in each dc around and join again. Then work as for 5th rnd for 12 sts evenly. Work 6 more rnds of this same pattern. Then make 1 rnd of sl st in each dc around, using same motif. Then join
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. "You like them sweeter," he said. The first group of three was then formed on the head with the right side facing towards you, being careful not to twist the wires as you draw them through the two loops at the back of the hat, so as not to turn them round. Make a row of 4 loops, making sure that the right side facing you always goes in this row. Then make another row of 4 loops on the same line and continue with this pattern for 5 rows."


Shoot

"CHILD...HAT ...Place this first group of 2 loops of Color A on the center of your hat; make 1st row of next pattern as follows. With a yarn held up between your hands, ch 3, skip half dc, 1 in gdc, ch 1, 2 dc in same stitch; * 1 dc in this st, 2nd row of first group of 3 loops, skip half dc, 1 in gdc, ch 1, 2 dc in same stitch; repeat from * in 4th and subsequent rows until 4 groups of 3 loops are made, marking your groups, working through each sp among the 5 sts, to count as a group, so that the beginning sp does not come over a dc of a previous group of 3 loops. Then with the next 3 loops of color, make a gdc in half dc of color 1 over this 1st st, 1st st, 2 dc in same space, 1 dc in next st, 1st st, 2 dc in same place, 1st st, 3 dc in same st, 1st st, 4 dc in same st, 1st st, 5dc in next st, 1st st, 6 dc in next st, 1st st, 7 dc in same st, 1st st, 8 dc in same space, 1st st, 9 dc in same st, 1st st, 10 dc in opposite space, 1st st, 11 dc in same st, 1st st, 12 dc in same space, 1st st, 13 dc in same st, 1st st, 14 dc in next st, 1st st, 15 dc in same space, 1st st, 16 dc in same st, 1st st, 17 dc in same st, 1st st, 18 dc in same st as 1st group of 3 loops, 1st st, 1st group of 3 loops, 2dc in same st, 1st group of 3 loops, 3dc in same st, 1st group of 3 loops, 4dc in same st, 1st group of 3 loops, 3dc in next st, 1st group of 5 loops, 3dc in same st, 1st group of 3 loops, 4dc in next st, 2dc in same st as 2nd group of 3 loops, 3dc in next st, 1st group of 3 loops, 4dc in same st, 2dc in same st as 3rd group of 3 loops, 3dc in next st, 1st group of 5 loops, 3dc in same st, 2dc in next st as 4th group of 3 loops, 3dc in next st, 1st group of 5 loops, 3dc in same st, 2dc in same st as 3rd group of 3 loops, 4dc in next st, 1st group of 5 loops, 3dc in same st, 2dc in next st as 5th group of 3 loops, 4dc in next st, 2dc in next st as 6th group of 3 loops; repeat from * to end of opening
Next group of 3 loops should now appear on the same side of hat as that which was group created, but the first group of 3 loops should appear rather directly over a dc of a previous group of 3 loops, so that the 2dc of the joining is formed as shown in the following illustration. Next group of 3 loops should now appear on the same side of hat as that which was group created, but the 1st group of 3 loops should be exactly on the right side of the 3rd group of 3 loops that had been formed, so that the 1st group of 3 loops should be formed as shown in the following illustration.
Next group of 3 loops should now appear on the same side of hat as that which was group created, but the 1st group of 3 loops should be exactly on the right side of the 3rd group of 3 loops that had been formed, so that the 1st group of 3 loops should be formed as shown in the following illustration.
Next group of 3 loops should now appear on the same side of hat as that which was group created, but the 1st group of 4 loops should be formed directly under the 1st group of 3 loops that had been formed. Then proceed straight to 1st row of 5 rows, so as to make 1st st of each group of 3 loops as the first d c of each group of 3 loops.
Next group of 3 loops
====================
The AI happily began to make hats.
1st rnd: * Ch 3, 2d s c in 1st stitch, ch 3, 2d s c in next stitch, ch 3, 2d s c in same stitch, ch 3, 2d s c in next stitch. Repeat from * around. Do not break off.
2nd rnd: Work 8nd s c in last sl st.
3rd and subsequent rnds: Working around same pattern, work 2nd and 3rd rnds of the same manner around same pattern.
4th rnd: Ch 3, 6ths rnd: 2nd and 3rd rnds: Working in the 9rd stitch, ch 3, 6ths rnd: Ch 3, 6ths rnd: 1st rnd: * Ch 3, 6th d c in same st, ch 3, 6th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch. Repeat from * around. Do not break off.
5th rnd: Ch 3, 5ths rnd: Ch 3, 5ths rnd: 6th and 7th rnds: Ch 3, 5ths rnd: 1st rnd: * Ch 3, 5ths rnd, 2nd rnd: * Ch 3, 5ths rnd, 3rd rnd: * Ch 3, 7th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 4th rnd: * Ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 10th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 10th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 5th rnd: * Ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 12th d c, ch 3, 12th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 13th d c, ch 3, 13th d c in next stitch, ch 3, 7th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 8th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 6th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 7th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 8th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 7th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 8th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 8th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 9th d c, ch 3, 9th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 9th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 8th d c, ch 3, 9th d c in same stitch, ch 3, 9th d c in same stitch, ch 2, 10th and subsequent rnds: With a marker or thread, ch 2, 10th and subsequent rnd: 2rnd: 2nd rnd: 2nd rnd: Ch 2, 10th rnd: * 2nd and 3rd rnds: 2nd rnd: 2nd rnd: 2nd rnd: 2nd and 4th rnds: * 2nd and 5th rnds: 2nd rnd: * 2nd and 6th rnds: 2nd rnd: 2nd rnd: again, then 4th rnd. Continue in this manner to form a circle. Turn to other side of circle and work in the round, 3 rounds a day.
Ch 2, 1st rnd: 2nd rnd: 2nd and 3rd rnds: Repeat from * around, ending with 2th rnd on top. Work even in the round.
Ch 2, 1st rnd: 2nd rnd: Ch 2, 1st rnd: * Ch 2, 1st rnd, 2nd rnd: Repeat from * around, ending with 2nd rnd on top, continue in this manner to form a circle. Turn to other side of circle and work in the round, 3 rounds a day.
Ch 2, 1st rnd: 2nd rnd: 2nd rnd: Ch 2, 1st rnd: 2nd and 3rd rnds: * Ch 2, 1st rnd, 2nd and 4th rnds: Repeat from * all around, ending with ch 2, 1st rnd. Work 4 more long rnds as follows. Turn back to previous side and work at double length until all 3 sizes are completed:
1st rnd: Work double, 3 s c in 1st st and in next st.
2nd and subsequent rnds: Work 2nd st in single line (at base of ch), 2 s
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. The colors gradually become more bold. Eventually the colors are all the same shade as the colors we have chosen and the same color as the color the braid around the "head" appears. Work 7 rounds in single crochet, ending with a round of join. Then skip next round as follows: * Ch 3, dc in BLO, dc in next ch st, dc in BLO, dc in next ch st; repeat from * until 3 dc has been made. Break join."


Lily Beanie Pattern #2139
"Beginning at tip, ch 2. In 2nd ch from hook, sc in every ch st throughout. Fasten off. Using a chain and a yarn double, ch 1, skip 1st loop of 1st st, sc in each st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next loop as follows: * Sc in 1st sc produced after skip (i.e. inside chain of skipped st), skip 1st loop of next st, sc in next sc produced after skip, repeat from * to top of beg st, ch 1, sl st in next st, work 1 st in each st (2 loops on one side of beg st is preferred). Fasten off, using color-coordinated yarn.

BRAID … With one hook, ch 100; skip 1st loop of next st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st (no loop is stitched over skipped st), ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, repeat from * to top of beg st, ch 1, sl st in next st, work 1 st in each st (14 loops on one side of beg st is preferred). Join.

Cord. Next 3 rounds: * Work off single crochet over chain 2, skip 1st loop of next st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, dc in next sl st, sc in same st,* repeat from *, ending with dc in each st (34 sts). Join.

Round 10: Next 2 rounds: * Work off single crochet over chain 2, skip 1st loop of next st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, skip st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, skip 1st loop of next st, sc in same st, sl st in same st, dc in next sl st, sl st in same st, repeat from * to end of round. Work 1 more round straight, being sure that the sl st is joined to the dc on top of the braid, until there are 45 sts. Join and break in the next round.

Round 20: * Work off single crochet, skip 1st loop of next st, ch 1, skip 1st loop of next st, sl st in same st, dc in next sl st, dc in same st, sl st in same st, dc in next sl st,
"Round 20: Work off single crochet, skipping 1st loop of next st, ch 2, 3 loops in next st, 3 loops in next st; repeat from * to end of round, ending with ch 2 st as 1st loop of round, continue with pattern until there are 20 sts. Join.

Round 21: Work off single crochet, ch 2, inc in next loop, ch 1, 2 loops in next st, 2 loops in next st; repeat from * to end of round, ending with ch 2 st as 1st loop of round, continue with pattern until there are 27 sts, then make 1 st in every 30th st (not including the 1st loop of rnd in previous round), 1 st in every 1st st (not including the 1st loop of rnd on previous round), 1 st in every 7th st, then 1 st in every 5th st. Repeat from * to end of round. Join.

Round 22: Work off single crochet and making 1 st each in every 3rd st, 1 st in every 4th st, join. Break yarn. Holding edge tightly, ch 2. 1st row: Work off single crochet as follows: * Work off 2 loops in 1st st for single crochet, but not over the next single crochet, 2 loops in 1st st for single crochet, but not over the next single crochet, 3 loops in 1st st for single crochet, but not over the next loop, 4 loops in 1st st for single crochet. 2nd row: * Work 2 loops in the next st for single crochet, but not over the next loop, 9 loops in 1st st, but not over the next 3 loops, 7 loops in 1st st, but not over the next 6 loops. 3rd row:* Work the 3 loops over the next 3 loops, but not over the next, 2 loops in the same st as
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. Each hat contains the same five stitches and is made by folding three stitches on the hook and following through one row as shown in figure 2, 1.5 cm in height. Make 13 rows in a row. 1st row: FDC = 26 s c in next st, and 5 in next st. 2nd row: FDC = 2 s c in next st, and 4 in next st. 3rd and 4th rows:
3rd row: S c in 10th stitch of 1st st, and decrease 1 t at beginning of each st, every 2nd and 3rd stitch; and every 2nd st, 1 t decreases. 3rd row:
3rd row of 3rd st: S c in 4th stitch of 3rd st (as before), 1 t at beginning of next st (as before), and decrease 1 t at beginning of each st; and every 3rd st, 1 t decreases. 2nd row:
2nd row of 2nd st: S c in 3rd st (as before), 1 t at beginning of each st -- every 3rd st -- and every first st, 1 t decreases. 3rd row:
3rd row of 3rd st: 1 t in every 3rd st, 1 t in every 3rd st, 1 s c in previous st, 1 t in last st. 4th row:
4th row of 3rd st: S c in 5th stitch from 3rd row, 1 t at beginning of each st -- every 4th st -- and every 1st st, 1 t decreases. 5th row:
5th row of 3rd st: 1 t in th st, 1 t in 6th st, 1 t in 1st st, 1 t in every st. 6th row:
6th row of 3rd st: S c in 9th stitch from 3rd row, 1 t at beginning of each st -- every 5th st -- and every 1st st, 1 t decreases. 7th row:
7th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every st, 1 s c in every st, 1 s c in every st, 1 s c in every st. 8th row:
8th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 5th stitch, 1 s c in every 5th stitch, and 1 s c in every 5th stitch. 9th row:
9th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 8th stitch, 1 s c in every 8th stitch, and 1 s c in every 8th stitch. 10th row:
10th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 7th stitch, 1 s c in every 7th stitch, and 1 s c in every 7th stitch. 11th row:
11th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 6th stitch, 1 s c in every 6th stitch, and 1 s c in every 6th stitch. 12th row:
12th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 7th stitch, 1 s c in every 7th stitch, and 1 s c in every 7th stitch. 13th row:
13th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 8th stitch, 1 s c in every 8th stitch, and 1 s c in every 8th stitch. 14th row:
14th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 9th stitch, 1 s c in every 9th stitch, and 1 s c in every 9th stitch. 15th row:
15th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 10th stitch, 1 s c in every 10th stitch, and 1 s c in every 10th stitch.
16th row:
16th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 15th stitch, 1 s c in every 15th stitch, and 1 s c in every 15th stitch. 17th row:
17th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 16th stitch, 1 s c in every 16th stitch, and 1 s c in every 16th stitch. 18th row:
18th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 17th stitch, 1 s c in every 17th stitch, and 1 s c in every 17th stitch. 19th row:
19th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 18th stitch, 1 s c in every 18th stitch, and 1 s c in every 18th stitch. Note that 2nd row is not repeatable. 20th row:
20th row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 19th stitch, 1 s c in every 19th stitch, and 1 s c in every 19th stitch. 21st row:
21st row of 3rd st: 1 s c in every 20
====================
The AI happily began to make hats.


2nd and 3rd rnds: Holding 2 hooks at same time make a ch-3 loop, ch-13, ch-4 loop, ch-3 loop, ch-3 loop and ch-2 loop. Ch-2 loop increases in place, work 3 less loops in same way. Ch-2 loop increases in place with ch-2 loop, ch-2 loop makes a st, ch-2 loop decreases, ch-2 loop continues. Repeat until hat measures 4 inches in diameter. Turn. 1st rnd: Make 10 decreases. Ch 3, 3 s c in place of tr, 3 s c in each ch-3 loop in same manner, * ch 3, skip 1 s c, 3 s c in next, ch 2, skip 1 tr, skip 1 space, skip 1 s c, 3 sc in next. Continuing in this manner until two different increases need to be made, then join with a sl st.

Center Piece ... With blue, ch 3, s c in 1st ch3 st, skip 1 s c, 2 s c in back loop of next ch3 st, then repeat from * from * around, skipping 1 s c twice, then each of last 2 st over and over, ch 1. Join. 1st rnd: Make a ch-3 loop. Ch 2, skip one s c, 3 s c in next s c, skip one, 2 s c in next s c, 3 s c in next, then repeat from * around joining. 2nd rnd: Make a ch-3 loop. Ch 2, skip one ch-3 loop, 3 ch-2 strands in next ch2 st, 3 ch-2 strands in next 2 ch2 sts; then repeat from * around joining. Repeat 2nd rnd until piece measures 5 inches wide.

With white, ch 3, s c in each st around to count as s c; then with silver, ch 1, work 3 s c in 3d st of previous rnd, * 2 s c in each s c, 1 s c in each of next 2 ch2 st, 2 s c in next s c, 3 s c in next st, repeat from * around. Join. 1st rnd: Work 1 rnd of s c in center. 2nd rnd: Work 2 rnds of s c in center. 3rd rnd: Work 2 rnds of s c in center; then 3rd rnd: Work 3 rnds of s c in center. 4th and final rnds: Work * 3 d c in next 2 d c, 2 d c in next 3 d c, 1 d c in each of next 2 s c, 2 d c in next 3d c of previous rnd — 4 d c in center, 1 d c in next st, repeat from * around joining. This last rnd is used to make the beret crown.

With two strand of cord. 1st rnd: With white, ch 3, skip 1 s c, 2 s c in next ch-3 loop, * skip 1 ch-3 loop, 2 s c in next ch-3 loop, * skip 1 ch-3 loop, 2 s c in next ch-3 loop, repeat from * around joining. Join, "Beret." Join with sl st to 1st sl st on 1st rnd, and break off 3rd rnd.

Center Piece ... Using 2 strands of cord, make 5 dc in 2nd st from hook. * 1st and 2nd rnds: Repeat 1st rnd, with color work, having 1 loop under each loop. * 3rd rnd: Repeat 1st rnd, with color work, having 2 loops in "stretch" of each loop. * 6th rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd, holding 1 loop under each loop, * skip 3 loop of previous row, 2 loops of preceding row, repeat from * around, joining. 1st rnd: With 1 strand of cord, work 1 st in all 5st loops of previous row, * ch 5, skip 1 loop of previous row, 2 ch 5 loops, repeat from * around. Join. 1st and 2nd rnds: With 2 strands of cord, repeat 1st rnd twice, with color work, having 1 loop under each loop. * 3rd rnd: Repeat 1st rnd, with color work, having 2 loops under each loop. * 6th and 7th rnds: Work 3 more "stretch" loops of previous row. * 10th rnd: Repeat 2nd rnd. Join, "Center Piece." Remove loop of previous row. 1st rnd: With 2 strands of cord, repeat 3rd rnd twice. * 5th rnd: Repeat 2nd rnd. * 12th and 13th
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. This was another challenge.

CUT TO:

[Spindle. Make 4]

[Stocking. Make 4]

[Shanghai. Make 5]

CUT TO:

[Spindle. Make 4]

[Stocking. Make 3]

[Chinatown. Make 5]

CUT TO:

[Spindle. Make 4]

[White. Make 2]

CUT TO:

[Spindle. Make 4]

[White. Make 2]

CUT TO:

[Spindle. Make 4]

[White. Make 2]

To assemble it, make 6 rows of sl st in first st of ch-1, ch 2, sl st in next st, and turn, break yarn, or wrap off
till completed. The hat has 8 sections:
A row of straight sl st in first st brings the whole thing together, but not so much as a pebble.

Next row is work in pattern, but without increasing.

Next 2 rows are increase alternately.

Next 3 rows are decrease.

Next 4 rows are chain st, but not as many as last row.

Next 5 rows are sc.

Next 6 rows are sl st.

Next 10 rows are dc.

Next 11 rows are dc2tog.

Next 12 rows are sl st and dc. Repeat from * to * 3 times more. Then make a chain st in each st and sc across to the beginning of previous row of sl st and dc2tog, breaking off at last st. Do not join this."


Hat Pattern #9082,
"Make a circ and tassel, making straight sl st in each st. Break off. 2ND rnd: Ch 1, 11 dc in the ring. Join with sl st in 1st dc of ch-1. Then work in pattern as follows: 1st rnd: Working in a more or less straight line, make 14 sl sts in the ring.

2nd rnd: Working in a more or less straight line, make 5 sl sts in each of the next 2 rnds. Work until there are 14 sl sts left in the rnd and 1 (6 dc of st) remain in the rnd.

Next rnd: Working in a more or less straight line, do not make sl sts in the rnd, but dc2tog over the last 6 rnds, being careful not to make sl sts under increased rnds.

Next rnd: Working in a more or less straight line, repeat 1st rnd until there are 18 dc. Then work 2nd half rnds in pattern with 2 dc added at beginning of the 10th rnd and 1st and 6_dc added at beginning of the 12th.

Next half rnd: Ch 1, working in half dc, dc in each st around. Break off.

Continue as before. Work 8 half rnds with 9 dc, 4 full rnds of dc, and 1 full rnd of dc in pattern. Then, breaking off, continue as before, without continuing to work half rnds for more than 1 half rnd: 1st rnd: Sc in each dc around. Ch 1, working in dc, make 2 dc in last st (7 dc increased). 2nd rnd: Work in pattern until there are 35 dc left in pattern. Break off

Work a rnd of 6 dc in pattern.

"
Hat Pattern #9071,
"With ch 6, join with sl st to form ring. (Make 1 ring in 2nd rnd of circle.) Starting at edge of next ch, ch 4 (to count as a dc), dc in same st. Join with sl st in top of worked-over-front of ch-4.

Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds ad infinitum. 4th rnd: DC in same st, *1 dc in next dc, 2dc in next dc,*
2dc in each remaining dc of 4th rnd. (4 dc in 3rd st would have been a dc. Decrease 2dc in next 3 dc at base of 4th rnd.) Join, break off.

To make ch 3 and 1 s c count as 1 dc, insert hook in top of 2dc in 3rd st of previous rnd and draw loop over and through overslung part of ch-3, insert hook in top of 2dc in gap between 3rd and 4th st of previous rnd, insert hook in top of 3 dc (2dc in next dc) and draw yarn across overstitch, work overslung
====================
The AI happily began to make hats.

The next step is to make another pair of Hats which will match the pattern.

Now turn the pattern in a wrong side s_ctune and s_crease all the rows in the 3rd row.

Cut three pieces; a chain 1, three sl st in 3rd rnd, ch 1, 1 s_trundle in 5th st, ch 1, 1 s_trundle in same space as chain 1, 2 s_trundles in 1st st, ch 1, 1 1 s_trundle in same space, ch 1, 2 s_trundles in 1st st — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 2 s_trundles in next st, ch 1, 1 1st st in same space, ch 1, 2 1st sts in same ch-10 pocket-loop, ch 1, 3 1st sts in same stitch — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 4 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in same st as chain 1, 2 1st sts in same st (without ch-10), ch 1, 3 1st sts in next ch-10 loop — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 5 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in same st as chain 1, 2 1st sts in same st, ch 1, 4 1st sts in next ch-10 loop — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 6 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in similar st as 1st st, 3 1st sts in next loop, ch 1, 5 1st sts in same st — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 7 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in similar st as 2nd st, 3 1st sts in same st, ch 1, 6 1st sts in next loop, ch 1, 7 1st sts in same st — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 8 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in similar st as 3rd st, 4 1st sts in next loop, ch 1, 8 1st sts in same st — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 9 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in similar st as 4th st, 4 1st sts in next loop, ch 1, 9 1st sts in same st, ch 1, 10 1st sts in same st — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 11 1st st in next st, ch 1, 1 st in similar st as 5th st, 4 2nd st in same st, ch 1, 10 1st sts in same st, ch 1, 11 1st sts in same st — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — — 1st rnd: * Work 2 1st st, 2 2nd st, 3 3rd st, 4 4th st, 5 5th st, 6 6th st, 7 7th st, 8 8th st, 9 9th st, 10 10th st, 11 11th st, 12 12th st, 13 13th st, 14 14th st, 15 15th st, 16 16th st, 17 17th st, 18 18th st, 19 19th st, 20 20th st, 21 21st st, 22 22nd st, 23 23rd st, 24 24th st, 25 25th st, 26 26th st, 27 27th st, 28 28th st, 29 29th st, 30 30th st, 31 31st st, 32 32nd st, 33 33rd st, 34 34th st, 35 35th st, 36 36th st, 37 37th st, 38 38th st, 39 39th st, 40 40th st, 41 41st st, 42 42nd st, 43 43rd st, 44 44th st, 45 45th st, 46 46th st, 47 47th st, 48 48th st, 49 49th st, 50 50th st, 51 51st st, 52 52nd st, 53 53rd st, 54 54th st, 55 55th st, 56 56th st, 57 57th st, 58 58th st, 59 59th st, 60 60th st, 61 61st st, 62 62nd st, 63 63rd st, 64 64th st,
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. She made six hat rows with a double strand of yarn. One row was done with second color of yarn, and went through both colors at once (but not always), and continued with that color without adjusting anything. The second row was skipped but then worked for another 4 stitches at a time till 6 s c in. of working space. Then work in second color for another 6 stitches. Then skip to next row being worked with second color yarn. The third row was skipped but then worked 4 more times as before. Then 2 rows of s c are skipped with color A. The next row, 3 stitches increase, 2 stitches decrease. Then skip the first 2 rows having an increasing and decreasing row. At the end of this row skip the next 1 s c of the last working space of first group of first-grading. Hereafter, the third and subsequent rows of increasing and decreasing work together at once. These rounds are worked with 1 s c, 1 dc and 1 s c in each dc.

Crown."


Lion's Tail Hat Pattern #21 (PDF),
" … Ch 3, d c in 1st st, 1 dc in next d c, 2 d c in ch 1, 2 dc in 3rd st. Join to 1st dc in 3rd st with sl st.

Round 1: D c in each st around, joining to 1st dc at 2nd d c

Round 3: 2 d c in each st around, joining to 1st and 3rd dc at 2nd and 3rd d c

Round 14: D c in each st around, joining to top of 3rd row, 3rd to 5th d c

Round 21: D c in each st around, continuing with 3 d c

Round 48: D c in top 5 1 st of row, joining to 7th d c in 3rd row (this includes next 2 sts, 4th and 5th rows)

Round 60: D c in top 5 last 6 sts of row (the white sl sts are now join sts), joining to top of 6th row (this includes next 2 sts, 5th and 6th rows)

Round 50: Next dc in each st around, joining to 4th row (this is the beginning of next row of d c)

Round 52: Next d c in 4th and 5th d c, joining 4th to 6th d c

Round 54: On next d c, 2 dc in each of the next 29 d c, joining to 4th and 5th d c at same time

Round 55: 2 dc in each of the next 12 d c (and 1 dc in each of the next 2 d c), joining to 4th row (this is the beginning of next row of d c)

Round 56: Next d c, dc in top 4 st of row,

"
Earl Hat Pattern #3 (PDF),
"Chain 5. Join to top with sl st. 1st row: F (2 dc in ch chain) in 6th st, ch 5, 2 dc in ch space of next st, ch 3, 4 dc in ch space of next st, ch1, repeat from * around. Join to 1st dc at top of ch-3. Remove thread, then 2 strands of a contrasting color of yarn, and draw a loop through second yarn in previous row. Pull up a loop in next st, then 2 strands of contrasting color of yarn, and draw through first loop in next st on hook. Remove thread and 2 strands of contrasting color of yarn, and pull up a loop in each st to the tip of the same loop. Pull up a loop in each of next 2 loops, pulling thread through each successive loop until 3 strands remain. Pull up a loop in each st, 1st and 2nd rows, and draw a loop through point through center of center of each band. Then pull a loop through each st on hook and pull thread through point through center of next band. Then draw loop through first loop and through each remaining 3 loops, pulling thread through all 3 loops on hook and through remaining 3 loops on hook. Do not fasten ends together. Sew a string between each ear of ch. Turn thread over and join.

Hat

1st row: Ch 5. 2nd row: Sl st in each ch space of ch (6 sts, 5 sl sts). 3rd row: * Sl st in next 3 sts, ch 1, sl st in next st, ch 1. Repeat from * around.

2D Row
1st row: Sl st in the 1st st, ch 5, ch1, dc-dc6tog, ch 3, dc-dc6tog, ch5,2dc in ch space, ch1, dc-dc6tog, ch3,2dc in the st, ch
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. The first set of four rows was done on a scale of 3 to 1 d c (to c/4 of previous layer). The second row: 1 d c in each st round. The third row: (1 d c in next st, *3 d c in next st, *2 d c in next st, repeat from * around, skipping 2 sts; 1 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, repeat from * around; skip 3 sts in all; 1 d c in last st, skip 1 st, next d c in next st, 1 d c in each d c along line, skip 3 sts; repeat from * around, skipping 3 sts, repeating last row twice — 9 sts. The second row, 4th rnd: 1 d c in each of next 2 d c sts, 2 d c in next d c sts, 3 d c in last d c st, ch 1, skip 3 sts, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c sts, 2 d c in same d c st, 4 d c in lowest d c st, ch 1, skip 3 sts, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c sts, 3 d c in same d c st, 4 d c in remaining d c sts, ch 1, skip 3 sts, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c sts, 4 d c in lower d c st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in each of next 3 d c sts, 5 d c in last d c st, (4 d c in 3d st, 5 d c in 4th st), 3 d c in next d c st, 4 d c in 4th st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 5 d c in last st. Repeat from * around — 30 sts. The last 4 rnds: 1 d c in each of next 3 d c sts, 2 d c in same d c sts, 3 d c in next d c st, 4 d c in 4th st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 5 d c in last st, (5 d c in 3d sts, 6 d c in 4th sts), 3 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 5 d c in 4th st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 6 d c in next d c st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 6 d c in each of next 4 d c sts, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 7 d c in 4th st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 8 d c in 4th st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, 9 d c in 4th st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, n (1 d C, 2 d C),*1 d c in 3d ST of next d c, (2 d C, 3 d C), 3 d c in next d c st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in last d c sts, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 4 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts,   skip 5 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts,   skip 5 sts, 1 dc in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts, 1 dc in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts, 1 d c in 3d st, ch 1, skip 5 sts, 1 d c in 3d st
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. 1st row: Round 1: * Ch 1, 1 dc in the 8th st from hook and in each ch across (1 dc in the 16th st, 1 dc in the 1st st), 2 dc in each other ch across, 3 dc in back loop of every tr (3 tr in first tr and 1 tr in last tr)

Round 2-4: Rounds 2-4 make rounds between trs.

Round 5-6: Rounds 5-6 make rounds between trs. Change to 4 ch st, 1 h dc in each st across to next round (4 ch st in 6th st from beginning)

Round 7-8: Rounds 7-8 make rounds between trs. Change to 5 ch st, 1 sl st in next st (5 ch st in 5th st from beginning)

Round 9: Change to 6 ch st, 1 sl st in each st across to 1st round from beginning, ending last round with 1 sl st in each st across as for sl st

Round 10–12: Rounds 10-12 make rounds between trs. Change to 7 ch st, 1 sl st in each st across to next half round from beginning

TECHNIQUE AND ENDINGS:

1st row: Ch 3, sc in loop on first sc, d c in each st across (3 dc in each sc across) to marker. Join these groups in a rectangle and cut thread.

2nd row: 2 s c in 1st sc, 2 s c in each remaining sc (7 s c in 1st group and 3 1sts in next group). Continue next 10 rows as follows: Work into 7 ch sts, then repeat 2nd row twice more.

TRIM: 1st group should have 7 sc in it (from last row) and there should be 19 (21) tr in total.

2nd row: * 1 s c in each sc (21 sc), insert hook in next sc to join next group and hold as near to group as possible; * cut thread and fasten to beginning of 1st group as for 1st row without a fastener (work sl st between next sc and 1st loop of 1st group, then work sc in same way as 1st group for 1st row), then 1st and next 2nd rows make s c in same way (not between group loops as at beginning of first row) as work to 1st group (work sl st between 1st and 3rd loops of 1st group)

TRIM: 1st group should have 7 sc in it (from last row) and there should be 19 (21) tr in total.

3rd row: Repeat 2nd-3rd rows alternately until there are 22 (23) tr in total.

3rd row: S c in each sc (9 s c in 3rd group), 2 s c in each of the next 10 groups (or 9 1sts in 11th group until group is full), and work into remaining 18 (19) sc. 2nd, 3rd and 4th rows make slightly different colors. Work the remaining 2 sts of this block in same way as before.

TRIM: 1st and last 3rd rows make the same colors. Make as much trim as desired (as many trs as will fit on head). Break off after last 3rd row.

Brim: Attach thread to 3rd group and work 1 sl st to any st in group, working 1 sl st straight, 1 sl st right side up on first trim, 1 sl st to each of the next 3 groups, 1 sl st to each of the next 3 3rd group(s) and 1 sl st right side up on first trim. Attach thread to first 2trs of 2nd group and work 1 sl st to each st in the 2nd group, 1 sl st straight, 1 sl st right side up on first trim. Attach thread to last 2Trs of 3rd group and work 1 sl st to each st in the 3rd group, 1 sl st right side up on first trim. Attach thread to the last 2trs of 4th group and work 1 sl st to each st in the 4th group, 2 sl st straight, 1 sl st last on this group. Work the last 2 trs of 5th group and work 1 sl st to each st in the 5th group, 2 sl st straight, 1 sl st last on this group. Work the last 2 trs of 6th group (or, if not yet completed, skip the last 2 trs) and work to close of last 3rd group. Attach thread to 2nd group and work 1 sl st to each of the next 7 groups, 2 sl sts straight, 1 sl st last on this group. Attach thread to last 3rd group of 4
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. First, she'd make a straight edge in the loop-through (like yarn over hook) and work a round of alternating sl st and sl st with the thread, alternating color and spacing as shown. Then, having just laid the hook and the 1st st of the chain beige, ch 3, 1 s c in each st. Then in the next round of sl st, repeat from * around (9 sl st in total) until there are 9 sts left in chain. Then, ch 2, 1 s c in each of next 2 s c. Next round of sl st, 1 s c in each of next 2 ss c (this is 2 s cc in loop-through), 2 s c in each st of previous round of 3 s c. Repeat from * until there are 23 sts remaining. Then work 3 rounds of s c over next 23 sts (27 sts). Continue in this manner to have 23 sts left; then work 3 rounds of s c over the next 24 sts (31 sts). Work 3 rounds of sl st over next 32 sts (34 sts). Fasten off.


Fern of the Spruce with 2 S c in chain st. Sculpt the 1st row as an ordinary sc pattern. Then work 1 sc in each st around
"
Fern of the Spruce,
"Round 1: Work 8 s c in loop-through of first section of the 3D-wing.

Round 2: 2 d c in 1st st, d c in each of next 2 sts, 2 d c in st, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 1st st, and repeat from ** around (9 d c in all). Repeat round 2 until 3 (2 d c in all)-stacks of rnds are made. Work 2 rounds of d c in 3rd st st of first section."

Hazel and Cedar Crown,
"CENTER WING — Starting at top, ch 2, *dc in next st, 1 st in next ch-2 loop, dc in next st, 1 st in loop, dc in next st, repeat from same as * around, ending last round separately.

Round 1: Working in pattern st, ch 1, loop on 1st 3DC. (3 loops, incl 1 DC)

Round 2: 1dc in every dc around (4 loops, incl 1dc).

Round 3: 2dc in 1st st (this is in the 1st circle), 1dc in 3dc (these are in the 3rd circle), 2dc in 2dc (the next 3 circles), 3dc in 3dc (the next 4 circles), 4dc in 4dc (the next 3 dots), 5dc in 5dc (the next 2 dots), 6dc in 6dc (the next 4 dots), 7dc in 7dc (the next 5 dots), 8dc in 7dc (the next 3 dots), 9dc in 8dc, 10dc in 9dc, 11dc in 10dc, 12dc in 10dc (this is the next 3 DC group), 13dc in 14dc (the next 4 group), 14dc in 15dc, 15 dc in 15dc, 16dc in 15dc, 16dc in 17dc, 17dc in 16dc, 18dc in 18dc, and continue in this manner, finishing between DC segment and 3DC group (see diagram at end of diagram).

Round 18: 2dc in 1st st (this is in the 1st circle), 1dc in 3dc, 2dc in 3dc (this is in the 2nd circle), 3dc in 4dc, 4dc in 5dc, 5dc in 6dc, and continue in this manner, ending 3dc near 1st DC, 9dc as previously made. Work 2 DC groups as required. (To begin working with a different color, make a dc in one of the first 3DC group, dc in next 5dc, 2dc in next 5dc, 3dc in 6dc, 4dc in 7dc, and in the next 3DC group) 15 times, starting at top of 1st group."

Flower Crown — Starting at one side, ch 1, 2 hdc in each st around.

Round 1: With Magic Wand, ch 1, *1hdc in next st (1 set of dc's), 2 hdc in next st, 3 hdc in next st (2 sets of dc's), 2 hdc in next st, repeat from * around with 3 consecutive hdc rounds; finish off round with a DC.

Round 2: With Magic Wand, ch 1 (using st to gather), *1hdc in next st, 2 sts in following st, 2hdc in next hdc (2 sets of dc's), 2 hdc in next st, repeat from * around as for crown, including 1st st
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. If desired, work in garter stitch, ch 1 and 3 d c in 3rd and 4th ch from hook, ch 1, make 3 double d c in next st of ch-1. Now work in hdc. Ch 1, 3 double d c in next st, work 2 double d c in each of next 3 dc. Ch 1, 3 double d c in next st, repeat from * around. Work 9 more double d c in this pattern. Work 7 more double d c evenly throughout hat. Now work a single dc in 3rd ch from hook, 4 double d c in same place, work another single dc in 3rd ch from hook, then 4 single d c inc across all 3 loops, ch 1, work 2 single d c to beg of single d c, ch 2, single dc in same place, ch 1, * 3 single dc in 3rd ch from hook, work 3 double d c in 1st loop, 3 single d c in next loop and repeat from * around, join in 1st dc at beg of single d c. Ch 1, work 3 single dc in 3rd ch from hook, join in 1st dc at beg of single d c. Work another single dc in 3rd ch from hook, join in 1st dc at beg of single d c. Repeat from * around, join in 1st loop at beg of single d c. Make a single dc in each remaining st. To start, make a single dc in the beg of 6th dc (and 3 dc at end of last round) and work 1 dc in each dc until number covers 4 of 4 dc. Ch 3, 1 hdc in next st, 2 hdc in each st across back at beginning, join in 3rd loop at beg of single d c, cut thread and fasten with thread needle.

Back Piece: Working in ch c, ch 1 (beg of single d c), 4 single d c in first st of 1st rnd, ch 2 (beg of single d c), 1 double d c (double dc between loops at beg of single d c), ch 1 (beg of 5rd dc), 3 dc in each st across back at beginning, cut thread and fasten.

Work another back piece in the same manner for a total of 16 single d c pieces. Work 6 more single d c in center ch c of each pieces, having 5 rows of loops between single d c pieces. Now working backwards, ch 3, 4 double d c in 3rd st of 1st rnd; ch 3, 3 double d c in 3rd st of 2nd rnd; ch 3, 5 double d c in each st across back to beginning, cut thread and fasten.


Toe Piece: Continuing to work in ch c, increase in each of the next 6 3rd-5th rnds. Ch 1, 1 double d c in 3rd st of 3rd rnd, ch 1, 1 double d c in each st across back to beginning, cut thread. Now work an increase in each of the same 6 rnds (6th, 7th and 8th rnds may be worked in this manner). Work 1 rnd of double d c twice over the same 6 sts, sl st in 3rd st of 4th rnd, ch 1, 1 double d c in each of next 2 rnds, join in 3rd st of 5th rnd, cut thread. With 1 rnd of double d c on each toe piece, draw the thread through each stitch and fasten around the whole. Now work 5 rnds of double d c. Fasten. With 1 rnd of double d c on each toe piece, draw the thread through each stitch and fasten. Work a rnd of 1 extra row of sts using only single d c. Keep this rnd of single d c to your right side. Pull a loop through st about 1 inch from the tip. Fasten yarn over a double d c loop and draw a tight bow through 3rd st of 4th rnd, join in 3rd st of 6th rnd.

Brim: To begin work with 18 single d c, ch 2. 1st rnd: * 1 d c in top loop of each st around, 2 d c in this 2nd loop, 2 d c in 1st, repeat from * around. Do not break off; make 1 single d c and 1 spike in 1st rnd of 3rd rnd. Join. 2nd rnd: 1 single d c in 3rd st of 4th rnd, 2 single d c in the 1st st, 3 single d c in 2nd st of 4th rnd, join in top of 4th rnd. 3rd rnd: 1 single d c at beg of each st across back, 2 single d c in top loop
====================
The AI happily began to make hats. As my first hat was complete, I switched over the CO 2 . Then I started over at lower, but with the same color. Next, I went to one side and added more CO 2 , and continue work as before for an extra half inch. Then, alternately working at center front of headpiece (shown at left), I worked a rnd of 4 colors in rows (4 colors per rnd), until the total of the 4 colors at one side of the work is equal to 4 colors at other side of the work. Then, work as before to equal 4 colors at both sides. Next rnd: Work a rnd of 6 d c in 6ths rnd (for 4 rnds), and continue working with same color across rnds. Then work as before, but go to 1 d c increased. Next rnd: Work a rnd of 12 d c in last 4th st of 4th rnd. Continue alternating colors in same manner, until the first rnd has been completed. Then work 1 half d c in each st across the entire board. Then work 4 more rnds without increasing. Join rnds with sl st to center front of headpiece. Then make a band of paper. This makes a band for the entire head, and is enough to cover the whole of the face. I then stitched the band in place on the outside of the hat.

Brim. Starting at the nape of the neck, ch 72. 1st rnd: Sc in 2nd ch from hook, sc in next, ch 1, 1 sc in 2nd ch from hook. Repeat the last st of first rnd. Join with sl st to 1st ch of ch 1. 2nd rnd: * Sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in next, ch 1, 1 sc in next. Repeat from * 1 more time, join with sl st to 1st ch of ch 1. 3rd rnd: * Sc in the 3rd ch from hook, 2 sc in next, ch 1, 3 sc in 3rd ch from hook. Repeat from * 3 times more, join. 4th rnd: * 2 sc in the 3rd ch from hook, 3 sc in next, ch 1, 4 sc in next, ch 1, 5 sc in next, ch 1, 6 sc in next, ch 1, 7 sc in the 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, 8 sc in the next sc, ch 1, 9 sc in the next sc, join. Repeat from * 3 more times, join. 5th rnd: 2 sc in the 3rd ch from hook, 3 sc in next, ch 1, 4 sc in the 3rd ch from hook. Repeat from * 7 times more, join.

Back Piece. Ch 4, 8 t c in 4th ch from hook, * 2 t c in 3rd ch from hook, 3 t c in the next st (in 2nd ch from hook), 4 t c in the next st, and so on * 7 times more * to 1st t c, 8 t c in 4th ch from hook, and so on round * as before. Join with sl st to first t c of round. Now work one more rnd of t c until hat measures 2_ inches from front. Then repeat the last 3 rnds (to the 2nd, 3rd, and 4th rnds only) until entire back piece measures 3 inches wide. Then repeat both 3rd and 4th rnds until work measures 2_ inches wide. Work a rnd of t c over piece. Break off. Sew. Turn hat inside out to secure."


Barbie,
"Starting at one corner of brim and working 1 round ch, insert hook in next ch, draw a loop through both loops on hook, pull loop around, insert hook in first t-loop on both loops of hook, pull loop through both loops on hook, repeat from * around, join to first t-loop of first round of back piece. 1st Round. With two strands of yarn double, ch 44. Split double into 2 equal sections and draw a loop through each loop on hook, pull loop through both loops on hook, insert hook in first 1st round of back piece, * draw a loop through 1st single st of next round, * 2 t in next single st, 3 t in next single st, and so on * at both ends join, ch ½, double d c in first 10 sts of ch 1, 3 t in next s c, 2 t in next single st, 3 t in next s c, ch 1, repeat from * around, join. 2nd Round (2 rnds will work). Split double vertically, 1st rnd being single (no 2 d c, but 2 single d c, not 3 single d c). 1st rnd: Single
====================

Hat for a T-2000, double crown"


Strawberries in a Beret,
"With white; ch 5, 1 dc in 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, 1 dc in top of 2 dc of first work, 2 dc in same place as 1 dc, 2 dc in same place as 1 dc and 1 dc in center loop of opposite-side stitch of same hat, 2 sc in same sc, dc2tog, ch1, 2 dc in next st, 1 sc in next dc; ch5, 1 sc in 1st st, 2 dc in next
st, 1 sc in 1st st, 2 dc in next st and next sc, ch1, 1 dc in 1st st, 2 dc in next 2 st, 1 sc in next 2 st, 2 dc in gap between next two st(s), 1 dc in gap between next 2 st and opening, 1 sc in gap between next 2 sc and opening, 2 dc in next st and next sc, ch1, 1 dc in 1st st, 2 dc in next st and next 2 tr, ch5, double dc in gap between next 2 sc and opening,dc, ch5, ch1, 2 dc in next st, 1 dc in next sc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next(both sl sts)st(sl sts), 1 dc in next 12 sc, 2 dc in same st, 2 dc in same st, 2 dc in next sp and 1st sc, ch3, double dc in next 16 sc, 3 doubledc in same st,3 dc in same st, 3 dc in 2nd loop onlych3, 2 dc in same st, 3 dc in 3rd loop onlych3, 3 dc in same st, 4 dc in same stThe next 3 steps are equal
The previous 3 steps are equal
5th row: Starting at beginning, ch4, sl st in 1st st, 3 dc into ring, ch3, sl st in 1st st, repeat from * to * until 3 d c is made, ch3, sl st in last st (3 sts increased), 3 dc in back loop only, ch3, sl st in 3rd st, 3 dc into the back loop only, ch3, sl st in each st (3 sts increased), repeat from * to * until there are 11 sts left. This is the 5th rnd of s c in each st.
Next row: 2 sc in same st, 2 sc in each st of 5th row, 3 sc in next st, 3 sc in the same st, 1 sc in each st of 5th row. Repeat from * to * until there are 10 sts remaining. Break off. Sew to last ch-3.
Beret-Beret design,
"Beret-Beret",
"Starting at crown, ch2, 3 dc in next st, 2 di in same st, *skip first dc, ch1, skip second dc, 2 dc in next st, repeat from * 3 more times, skip first dc, ch1, skip first dc, 2 dc in each of the following three loops, ch3, skip first dc, ch2, same as last row, skip first dc, hdc, dc2tog, 2 n dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in each of the next 1st 6 loops, ch3, skip first dc, ch2, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in each of the next 3 loops, sl st in any st of last row, sk ch2, skip second dc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in every st of last row until there are 7 loops, skip first dc. Fasten off.

Hat Pattern #4222

"Dia = chain

Ribbon: 12 sc in 2nd ch from hook, *2 sc in next sc, chain in next sc, skip first sc, make a sc in next 7 sc, chain in next sc, skip first sc, 2 sc in next sc, chain in next st, skip first sc. Repeat from * to * 24 more times. Fasten off.

Band,
"Starting at top edge, ch2, sc in 2nd st, ch1, skip first dc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next dc, *2 dc in next sc, chain in next dc, skip first dc. Repeat from * to * 20 times. Fasten off.

Pillbox Holder,
"Starting at center, ch34, 3 dc in ring, dc1tog, ch1, *sc in next st, dc2tog, ch1, sc in each st, repeat from * around. Fasten off

Frog,
"Ch3, 2 dc in ring, ch1, skip 1 st, sc in next st, ch1, *Skip
====================
Hat for a T-2000
Ch 1, 2 dc in next dc, dc in next dc, 2dc in next 3-dc group. Ch 1, skip next 3dc group, 2dc in next 5 dc, dc in same st, 2dc in next 5-dc group and dc in each st across; dc in same st, 2dc in each st across across. Ch 1, skip next 3dc group, 2dc in next 5-dc group, dc in same st, 2dc in next st across, dc in next st, 2dc in next st, dc in dc in each st across; dc in same 2 st, 2dc in next 4-dc group, dc in same st, 2dc in next st across, 2dc in next st across, 2dc in each st across and repeat from ** around (one extra st remained for attaching). Join to first st, ch 1.
Hood
To begin, ch 3, drop 2 sp, ch 1, 1 in loop of next dc, 1 in loop of next loop of next sp, 2 dc in loop of next dc, sc in same loop of next dc, dc in each remaining (spacing) st and sc in each of next 2 dc, sc in next st and sc in each st across. Using Color A, ch 3, sc in 1st sc only, dc in each of next 2 sc, dc in each remaining sc and sc in each of next 2 dc. Join with sl st in 1st sc. Make two more loops in 1st loop and dc in each st: join to first loop, ch 1.
Sl st in 1st sc and make 4 loop in 1st loop. Join, ch 2.
With Color B, ch 3, skip first st (where 2 dc meet, dc3tog, 5dc in next dc), 1 dc in each dc around; skip first st, 1 dc in next st (where 2 dc meet, dc3tog, 3dc in next dc), 2 dc in second st, 3dc in next st and repeat from * around and join. Make 4 loops in 1st loop and skip 2 sts, 1 dc in each of next 5 sts and 1 dc in each of next 10 sts: join, ch 1.
TIE: ch 3, 1dc in each dc around, now join with sl st to first st, ch 2.
Sl st in 1st ch and working in the back loop only of the tie, do not fasten but rather attach. With a thread-aided, ch 3, 1dc in first st (where st is joined, 1st dc3tog, 1dc in next st and in next st on the tie), skip 1 st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st (where st is joined),   skip next 3 sts, skip next 3 sts, skip next 3 sts, skip next 3 sts, skip next 3 sts, skip next 3 sts, skip next 4 sts, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st and in next st on the tie, 3dc in next st and in next st on the tie, skip 1 st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st, skip next st and in the ch-3 loop on the tie, 1dc in first st and in next st on the tie, 2dc in each of next 2 st, 3dc in next 3 st and in next st on the tie, skip 1 st, skip next 3 sts, skip next 4 sts, skip next 5 st, skip next 5 sts, skip last st, skip next 5 sts, skip next 5 sts, skip next st, skip next 4 sts, skip next 5 sts, skip next 5 sts, skip next 4 sts, skip next 3 sts, skip next 5 sts, skip next 3 sts and sl st at end of loop, 5dc in next st (where st is joined to ch-3 loop), 5dc in each of next 6 sts, 5dc in each of next 7 sts, 5dc in each of next 8 sts, 5dc in next 6 st, 5dc in each of next 9 sts, 5dc in each of next 10 sts and sl st at end of loop, join, ch 1.
Repeat last 2 ties with sl st across tie, skipping last 2 sts, 5dc in each of next 3 sts, 5dc in each of next 4 sts, 3dc in each of next 9 sts, 3dc in each of next 10 sts including this loop.
The Top Hat and Bonnet,
"Strictly speaking, this hat belongs to the type of hat where it has an outline," says McBride. "The border of the crown is
====================
Hat for a T-2000 in one of the examples below.

Crochet chain 9(10 s c in every 3rd st) in every other st.
I want to repeat this pattern twice since it's quite long and will be used to make several hats in the course of the rest of the circle pattern. Chain 1 and work round and round in pattern (or in pattern section of work as done here) until piece measures 8 inches.

At this point, you can wear this under your dress or over one of your regular t-shirts. In either case, it should stay nicely put and be comfortable. I prefer wearing under a dress rather than over one because the brim is much more prominent and makes it appear tighter. In addition, this is good for hats while walking to work since the brim is tucked in. Try it on by pulling up shirt over hat and holding it for a few seconds."

Sierra Dress Pattern #1253,
"Begin with long s c in 16th ch from hook. 1st row: With second chain from hook, 1 chain in each st. To dec 1st chain, round and round. *1st row: Same as 1st row, 1 chain in each st. Repeat from * around.

Finishing: Repeat 1st row around. Work even for 7 d c, then round and round, repeating 1st and 2nd rows even until piece measures 4 inches in diameter. Then trim off all unnecessary loop and fold 1st row neatly over all st and then tuck center of 1st row to hat. Tie in bow around hat to cover top edge of hat with ribbon. Work back and forth over ribbon until hat measures 6 inches in circumference, then break off.

Next row: 1st row: 1 s c in each s c and a half and work even until piece is about 4 inches wide in all. Then break off.

Next row: Skip 2 chains that tie in bow, 1 s c in each st to correspond to 1st and 2nd chains. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in next st and 2 s c in 1st st. Do not break off.

Next row: Skip 1 chain that ties in bow, 1 s c in each s c of 1st and 2nd rows. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in each st of 1st and 2nd rows. Skip 1 chain that ties in bow, 1 s c in each st to correspond to 1st and 3rd rows. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in each st to correspond to 1st and 4th rows. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in each st and 5 s c through loop in 1st st. Skip 1 chain that ties in bow, 1 s c in each st to correspond to first and last chain of 1st and 2nd rows. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 2 s c in each st to correspond to first and 2nd chain of 1st and 3rd rows. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in 1st st, 2 s c in each of 1st and 3rd rows. 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st, 3 s c in 1st st, 3 s c in each of 1st and 4th rows. 1st row: Place a marker in 1st st of piece to mark point and work in pattern as directed. 2nd row: Skip first chain of 1st row, 1 s c in 1st st of 2nd and 3rd rows of 1st row. Fasten off.

To keep the end of a half round and to make the hat larger, follow the same path as before for the 1st row and skip 1 chain from the inside, 1 1/8 in. in. in. from hook. 1st row: 1 s c in each 1st half round of 1st row. Fasten off.

Next row: Skip 1 chain that ties in bow and work as before until piece measures 12 in. from beginning to end of 1st row. Fasten off.

With other thread (in other portion of hat), cut a piece 4_ in. long and sew on.

Next row: 1st row: 1 s c in 1st st of 2nd row of 1st row and 1 s c in each of 5_ inch points in this row. Fasten off. Next row: 1st row: 2 d c in 1st st of 1st row of next row, 1 s c in 1st st of 1st st of 2nd row and 1 s c in each of 17_ inch points of 1st row, 2 s c in 1st st of 1st row, 1 d c in 1st st of next
====================
Hat for a T-2000, or if working with different size yarn, choose smaller hook. With color A, ch 4, 1 h dc in next st, 1 sl st in next st, *2 sl st in next st, 1 h dc in next st, k2tog*, repeat from * around the circumference of hat to center, ending with 3 hdc. (13)
HAT-CORD-Make 4 string s c in 3rd ch from hook and bind off. Break off and weave in ends."
Totek Beret Pattern #2127,
"Using Color A in E, ch 4, join to point of 1st st, ch 1, 1 base ch in next st, skip 1st base ch, 1 ch(1st sc) in each of next 6 sp on hook, ending with ch(1st sc), *1 base ch on 1st skip st, repeat from * around border of hat, ch 2, 1 base ch in same st as 1st sc, 1 base ch in next st, skip 1st base ch, 1 base ch in same st as 1st sc, repeat from * around, ending with ch 1, skip 1st base ch, 1 base ch in next sp on 3rd loop of 3rd loop, 1 base ch in same st as 1st sk(1st sc), 1 base ch in same st as 1st sk3rd loop of 3rd loop, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 3rd loop of 3rd loop, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 3rd loop, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 3rd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 3rd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 3rd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, s c in last st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st in next st, 1 base ch in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st, 1 base ch in in 1st sk1st loop of 3rd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st, 1 base ch in in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd loop, skip 1st base ch, 1 basic st, 1 base ch in in 1st sk1st loop of 2nd
====================
Hat for a T-2000. It's a long, narrow bow with a bow-end section that will stretch long enough to reach across the end row or so of your T-2000. For this purpose, thread 1 single strand 9 d c in the first st and 1 double strand 5 d c in the next st, make 3 loops at both ends, cut off. This pattern is written for the "Hook & Loop" pattern, and also includes instructions for the shorter "Thread Brows," but with contrasting colors (and smaller hook, if needed), for attaching any beads.

Back Note To Next Color. After pulling thread off the hook, ch 1, increase 3 sts in every 5th st: 3rd row (4th row), 4th row (5th row), 4th row (6th row) Repeat 3rd and 4th rows until there are 3 rows more of increases in every row; then decrease 1 single strand at beginning of 4th row, skip remaining increases, 1 single strand, 3 single strands at beginning of next 3rd row, 4 single strands at beginning of next 4th row, repeat from * 6 times (8 increases), repeat from * three times. For another row decrease 3 rows, skip remaining increases, 1 single strand, 3 single strands at beginning of each 4th row, 4 single strands at beginning of each 5th row, 4 single strands at beginning of 3rd row. For a row decrease 3 rows, skip remaining increases, 1 single strand, 2 single strands (4 increases at start of all three rows), 4 single strands at beginning of all 4th and 5th rows, 4 single strands at beginning of 4th row. Repeat from * 3 times more (8 increases), repeat from * 3 times more (4 increases at start of all 3 rows). Break off.

Back Note To Next Color. After increasing 3 sts in every 10th st, break off. Sl st to center of last row, pull thread through the center of last row, cut off. This decreases about 3 percent in length, and leaves a somewhat longer length. Work another round with a different color of thread, but this leaves all increases as before, or without decreases. Work 6 rounds to last piece. Break off.

Left Sided Hat. With #11 hook, ch 45, 1 h d c in 3rd ch from hook, *hook 2 sts in next 4 ch and ch 2 in top of hook, pull thread through 2 loops on hook, cut off, chain 1—make 8 loops in 1 h dc, turn—2 sts retained on hook, make a loop in 4th st of chain 1, 1 st retained on hook, *hook next 6 sts of chain 1, 1 h d c in each st of chain 1, turn—8 sts retained on hook, cut for no. 50, turn—2 sts retained, cut as before—8 sts retained, cut for no. 50.

BRIM: Ch 1, 2 d c in 3rd ch from hook, *3 d c in next d c, 1 st in each of next 2 d c, 2 d c in next d c, 4 d c in next d c, 1 h d c in each of next 2 d c, 4 d c in next d c, loop, cut off, chain 1—15 loops retained on hook, make a loop in 4th st of ch 1, loop in 4th st of chain 1 between 4th and 5th loops of original brim, cut off, chain 1—20 loops retained on hook, make a loop in 4th st of ch 1, loop in 4th st of chain 1 between 4th and 6th loops of original brim, cut off, chain 4, turn.

LOOKING BRIM: Cut thread, cut a loop in 4th st of chain 1, loop in 4th st, cut off. Break off.

PENCIL: With 1 strand of color A, ch 3, 1 s c in 3rd ch from hook, *2 s c in next s c, 1 st in each of next 2 s c, 3 s c in next s c*, remove hook, chain 3. 1st row: 1 s c in each of 2 sl st, 1 s c in each of 3 sl st, 6 s c in next st, 2 sl sts in next st, 9 s c in next st. 2nd row: 1 s c in each of 4th to 5th sl sts, 1 s c in each of 5th and 6th sl sts, 1 turn in each of 6th and 7th sl sts, *1 s c in each of 4th s c and in each of 5th and 6th s c and 2 sl sts of next 2 s c*, insert hook in 1st st of each column of sl st, pull a loop through both loops until 1st sl st remains, thread over and turn, cut yarn and thread over
====================
Hat for a T-2000


Fold one section of this ribbon in half, trim, and tie in bow tie. Attach another ribbon to the other half of the t-2000. Use last ribbon to sew each end of ribbon to each t-2000 until 2 rows of ribbons pass through each of the 3 sections of ribbon, then sew all 3 sections together. Sew a bow on bow.


Bow Bandage Pattern #2,
"Charted rnd:
Using Color A, ch 3 (to count as 1st rnd), 1 h dc in 3rd ch from hook, 1 h dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 h dc in each of next 2 sts, repeat from * to * until 4 hdc designs are formed on crown st of band; turn band back with Color A, ch 3 in same st, 1 hdc in 3rd ch from hook, 1 hdc in each st around; turn band back with Color B, ch 3, 1 dc2tog, k3, and 1 dc2tog around.

"
Stocking Cap with Chunky Stitch Pattern #1,
"Beginning at tip of first row and working into center of hat, ch 2, 3 dc in ring, 1 d c in each dc around; turn.

In rnd 1: 2 dc in center, 1 dc in each of next 2 dc, repeat from * to * around; turn.

In rnd 2: 2 dc in center, 1 dc in each (next) dc, repeat from * to * around; turn.

In rnd 3: 2 dc in center, 1 dc in each (next) dc, * do not turn turn, 1 dc in 2nd st, 1 dc in 3rd st, 2 dc in 3rd st, 3 dc in 3rd st; repeat from * around; turn.

In rnd 4: 2 dc in center, 1 dc in each (next) dc, 2 dc in 3rd st, repeat from * to * 2 more times, turn.

In rnd 5: 2 dc in center, 1 dc in each (next) dc, repeat from * to * 2 more times, turn.

Continue in this manner, to 1 (2d) rnd through 2ds, 1 rnd with 1dc in 2d st, 2dc in 2d st, 3dc in 2d st, 3dc in 2d st, 1 rnd with 1dc in 3d st, 2dc in 3d st, 3dc in 2d st, repeat from * around, turn.

After rnd, with color A, using Color A, 1 ch 3, 2 dc in 3rd-dc first, * 2 dc in first, 1 dc in each of next 2 1dc, 2 dc in 2d st, repeat from * around, turning.

After rnd, with color B, 2 dc in 1st st and next st, sk2tog, 2 dc in 3d st, repeat from * around, turn.

After row and in the remaining 4 rows only, turn the bands back with Color B, and on the next bandline draw a loop through 1st st of last rnd and attach it as illustrated. With the 1st bandline remove the loop of band around first row and draw a loop through first dc of last bandline, attach second bandline, turn.

Continue as before (1st two rnds made), sl st in 1st st, 1sl st in 3rd st, 1 sl st at 3rd st; turn.

1st rnd: 2dc in 1st st, 1 sl st in 1st st of sl st1 bandon, 2dc in 1st st, 1 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 2nd bandon, 1 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 1st bandon, sl st in 1st st of 3rd bandon, 1sp2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 2nd bandon, 2sl st in 1st st of 3rd bandon, 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 3rd bandon, 2dc in 1st st of 1st bandon, sl st in 1st st of 2d bandon, 1sl st at 3rd st of 2d bandon, 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 3rd bandon, 2sl st in 1st st of 3rd bandon, 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 4th bandon, 2sl st in 1st st of 4th bandon, 1sl st at 5th st of 4th bandon, 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st of 5th bandon, 2sl
====================
Hat for a T-2000 (Crown) - use 2 colours, alternating 2pink and 2pink; *ch 1, d c in same space, 3d d c into next st (this will be *the h c of the next 2 ch d c of previous row), 3d d c of the previous row, 1st rnd in the pattern, 2nd rnd, skip 4th rnd, 3d d c of the previous row, skip the 4th rnd st, and next 4th rnd, 1st rnd in the pattern, 2nd rnd, skip 4th rnd, skip the 4th rnd st (which is the 3 dct loop), 3rd rnd (cord), 1st rnd in the pattern, 2nd rnd in the pattern, skip 3d d c of the previous row, 3d d c of the next row, skip the 6th rnd, and next 7th rnd, skip the 6th rnd st, and next 17th rnd, 2nd rnd in the pattern, skip 4th rnd, skip the 5th rnd st, and next 18th rnd, skip 4th rnd, skip the 5th rnd st, and the next 21st rnd, 2nd rnd in the pattern, skip 2 st loops in all 4 loops, skip the 4th rnd and 25th rnds, and next 18nd rnd, 2nd rnd in the pattern, skip 2 st loops in all 4 loops, skip 3d d c of the previous row, 3d d c of the next row, skip the 7th rnd and the 2nd row of the preceding row, 1st rnd in the pattern, skip the 3rd rnd and next 26th rnd (without the st loops), and next 23rd rnd, 2nd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 1st rnds of the previous t-combo row), 2nd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 3rd rnds of the preceding t-combo row), and next 25th rnd, 3rd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 3rd rnds of the previous t-combo row), and next 27th and next 28th rnds, and next 29th and above rnds, skip the 2nd, 3d, 4th, and 5th loops in each st loop of previous row, 2nd rnd in the pattern, 2nd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 1st rnds of the preceding t-combo row), and 1st rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 1st rnds of the preceding t-combo row), and next 40th rnd, 2nd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 3rd rnds of the previous t-combo row), and next 45th rnd, and next 44th rnd, and next 41st rnd, 2nd rnd in the pattern, 2nd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 2nd rnds of the preceding t-combo row), and next 40th rnd, 3rd rnd in the pattern, and next 41st rnd, and next 40th and next 42nd rnds, and next 41st and 2nd rnds, skip the 2nd and 3d loops of each st loop of previous row, 2nd rnd in the pattern, 2nd rnd in the pattern (skip 1st and 2nd rnds of the preceding t-combo row), and next 40th rnd, & next 41st rnd, and next 40th, 4th rnd in the pattern, and next 42nd rnd, and next 41st rnd, or next st loop of previous rnd, 3rd rnd in a row of previous rnds, and next 44th rnd, and next 41st rnd skip st loops from 3rd rnd, and next 41st rnd, skip the 2nd loop of each st loop, 2nd rnd in the pattern, and next 42nd and next st loop, 3rd rnd in the pattern, and next 43rd rnd, and next 43rd and next st loop, skip the 2nd loop of each st loop, and next 41st rnd, and next 40th rnd, & next 40th rnd, and next 41st, & next 39th and next st loop, skip the 2nd loop of each st loop, and next 41st and next st loop, skip the st loops on 3rd and 4th rnds skip st loops from 3rd rnd (3rd rnd in a row of previous rnds), 2nd rnd in the pattern, and next 44th rnd,
====================
Hat for a T-2000? Yes, please!! It feels much more versatile and fun than the T-21 and 21,"Mild_Skirt" {print_price}, "T-4000" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the T-3000" {pattern_name}, "Hat in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_15}, "T-4005" {pattern_number}, "T-8002" {pattern_number}, "Sweater in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_16}, "Crown of the T-4000" {pattern_number}, "T-3002" {pattern_number}, "T-9005" {pattern_number}, "T-1652" {pattern_number}, "T-1492" {pattern_number}, "T-1221" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the T-8002" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the T-3002" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the T-9005" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the T-1500" {pattern_number}, "Crocheted Cap of the Sweater in the Mood" {pattern_number}, "Fold-In Hat" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_17}, "T-3415" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the T-8002" {pattern_number}, "Sweater for Boys" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_18}, "Hat for Girl" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_19}, "T-1571" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the C-3000" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the C-3000" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the C-1500" {pattern_number}, "T-1748" {pattern_number}, "Top of Beanie" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_20}, "Smoothie in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_21}, "Hat for Girls" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_22}, "Headband of the C-3000" {pattern_number}, "T-1463" {pattern_number}, "Skirt in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_23}, "Pill Cap in the Mood" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the C-1500" {pattern_number}, "Sweater for Girls" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_24}, "Pill Cap in the Mood" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the C-1500" {pattern_number}, "Sweater for Boys" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_25}, "Fold-In Hoodie" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_26}, "T-1457" {pattern_number}, "White Scarf in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_27}, "Pill Cap in the Mood" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the M-5000" {pattern_number}, "Headband of the M-5000" {pattern_number}, "Brim of the M-5000" {pattern_number}, "Skirt in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_28}, "Brim of the M-567" {pattern_number}, "White Scarf in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_29}, "Pill Cap in the Mood" {pattern_number}, "Crown of the M-567" {pattern_number}, "Sweater for Boys" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_30}, "Crown of the M-5000" {pattern_number}, "White Scarf in the Mood" {new_pattern_on_last_run_of_day_31}, "Brim of the M-5000" {pattern_number}, "Workwear Pattern No. 12" {pattern_number} , "Crochet Hook" {NEW_HOOK}, "Darning Needle" {NEW_HOOK}, "Ribbon" {NEW_HOOK}, "Stitching Needle" {NEW_HOOK}, "Brim" {NEW_HOOK}, "Pill Cap" {NEW_HOOK}, "Underwear Pattern
====================
Hat for a T-2000 with a black and white stripe band, using an American 'Habits' Worsted as your Work Bind .


Pattern #2841,
"Gang Plunder, Using Color A and Size 9 double-pointed thread, ch 5, m2tog in second ch from hook (make 2 decreases), 3 s c in same st as 3 st, ch 1, make 4 s c in first st, ch 1, 3 s c in next st, ch 1, repeat from * to end of rnd.

Ch 3, s c in each ch-3 of 1st rnd, make 3 tr inc in each sc, ch 3, tr inc in next sl st of next row, ch 3, 2 tr inc in next st, ch 3, 2 tr in next st, ch 3, 2 tr in next st. Continue like that to last rnd until 3rd row is complete.

Next row: Work 1 s c in each ch-3 sp, making 1 tr inc in each tr inc.

Next row: Work 1 s c in next 1st tr inc, 2 tr in same 1st tr inc, s c in 1st tr inc, 2 sp in same s c, * s c in next 1st tr inc, 2 tr in next s c, 1 sp in same st, repeat from * to end of row. Continuing down the previous row without increasing or decreasing, 3rd row: Work 1 s c in each tr inc, 3 tr in 2nd tr of last row, s c in 1st tr, 3 tr in 1st ch of next row, repeat from * to end of row. Continuing along these same pattern without increasing, 4th row: Work alternating 1st to 5th rows of s c. Work 3 tr in each 3rd tr of last row, working 3 tr at first and later rows. Work 2 tr in the 1st tr of last row, 3 tr in the next 3rd tr of next row, and repeat from * to end of row.

Next row: Work alternating 1st to 5th rows of s c in sole-stockinette, ch 3, dc in next ch-3 sp, 2 tr in 2nd ch of same ch 3 sp, * 2nd ch of same ch-3 sp, * add 2 tr, 2 dc in next ch-3 sp, 2 tr in next ch-3 sp, * repeat from * to end of row.

Next row: Work 2nd to 5th rows of s c in sole-stockinette, ch 3, dc in each ch-3 sp; ch 1: sc in 1st sc of 3rd row, ch 3-5 sc in next ch-3 sp, * ch 3-5 sc in next ch-3 sp, 2 ch in next sc (this is an increase), * 2 ch in next sc (this is an increase), repeat from * to end of row. Continue in this manner to decrease 6 sc evenly on both sides of sole-stockinette; decrease 6 sc evenly on sole-stockinette, ch 3, 2 d c in next sc, 3 d c in next sc, sc in next ch-3 sp between each decrease, ch 3, * ch 3-5 sc in next ch-3 sp, sc in next ch-3 sp between each increase, ch 3, repeat from * to end of row. Work these two rows alternately, 2nd to 5th rows being skipped, until 5th row is made. Work remaining rows in this manner to decrease 5 sts at regular intervals. Work a rnd on sole-stockinette without increasing or decreasing 6 sc evenly. Work another rnd alternating 1st and 2nd rnds of 2nd rnd: Work sc between only 1st and 2nd rnds of 2nd rnd, *ch 2, dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, sc in next ch-3 sp between next 2 rnds of 2nd rnd and the end of last rnd, ch 2, sc in next st, 2 dc in next, dc between 2 st and 6 rnds of 2nd rnd, ch 2, dc in next st, sc in next 2 rnds of 2nd rnd, *ch 2, dc in next st, 2dc in next 1 st, 3dc in next st, sc in next st, repeat from * to end of rnd.

Next rnd: Work sc in each st, sc to within 0.001 inch of next ch-2 loop of 2nd rnd, dc in next st, dc between 2 and 4 dc groups of st rnd, dc between 2 and 4 dc groups of st rnd, sc in next st,2dc in next sc, 2dc between 3 and 5 sc, 2dc between 5 and 6 sc, 3dc between
====================
Hat for a T-2000 in the pattern.

Ch 2. 1st rnd: 8 sc in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: 2 half d c in each st st across row. 3rd rnd: * 1 half d c in each st st across row. 2nd and subsequent t-1000 trimmings: * 1 half d c in each st st across row. 3rd rnd: * 1 half d c in 2nd st st * 2 half d c in each st st across row. 4th rnd: 1 half d c in each st st across row. 5th, 6th and 7th rnds: Ch 3, dc in 1st st st, 7 d c in next st st, sc in each st st across row. 8th and subsequent rnds: 1st half d c in dc across 1st st st, sc in each of next 2 half d c across st, 1 half d c in last st st * 2nd half d c in dc across 1st st st, 2 d c in next st st — sc in each of next 2 half d c across st, 1 half d c in last st st
The final round is also an increase, as in illustration.

Rnd: * Work a half d c in each st st throughout row using one half d c.

Rnd: 1st rnd: Work a dc, 2 half d c in last st, 2 half d c in next st and 3 half d c in each of next 2 half d c. Do not break off.

Repeat Rnd 3 to 19 until ch 40 is reached. Work a rnd of half d c, 2 halves d c and 3 half d c until there are 64 sts left in every rnd. Break off."


Shorts and Cap,
"To start, sl st in 1st st, ch to first st. 1st ceding:
1st ceding: 1 dc in 4th ch from hook (this is a dc increase in size). 2nd ceding: 1 d c in each ch st of ch-1 sp.
3rd and subsequent rounds: Work a st as in illustration through all the dc's in the 1st and 2nd sections. Round 6 is a 2-increase pattern. Round 6 is 3 dc in a st. Round 8 is 4 dc in a dc. Rounds 13 to 15 are 2 dc in a st, 3 dc in each dc of a st before this, 4 dc in a st, and so on until 24 sts remain. Then work in pattern alternating 1/4 and 1 dc in each dc of a st for 1 round. Work 2 rounds without changing sts, increasing in every 3rd st (as illustrated here). Work 3 rounds without decreasing, to obtain a total of 21 dc's within the 1st increase. Break off.

TO MAINTAIN: Divide strip 50 equally. Draw up a string about 3 inches long and place through center. Tie together on hook.

CORD. Break off cord at center, thread over"
Mantenna,
"Crown. Work 6 sc in back loop only, 3 h dc in same st (9 h dc), 6 h dc in next sc (9 h dc).

To cinch: 1st sc in each st, joining the loops on each corner.

Round 1: Work in pattern. Work 1 sc in each st.

Round 2: Ch 1, sc in back loop only, 2 half dc in next sc (this is 2 h dc in the back loop only); round 3: Ch 1, sc in first dc of round; 2 h dc in next st, round 4: Ch 1, sc in next st, 3 full dc in 1st st of round (this is 3 half dc in the front loop only); round 5: Ch 1, sc in next st, 3 full dc in next st, round 6: Ch 1, sc in next st, 3 half dc in 1st st (this is 3 half dc in the back loop only); round 7: Ch 1, sc in next st, 4 full dc in next st, round 8: Ch 1, sc in next st, 4 half dc in first ch-1 sp, round 9: Ch 1, sc in next st, 5 full dc in next st, round 10: Ch 1, sc in next st, 6 half dc in first ch-1 sp, round 11: Ch 1, sc in next st, 5 full dc in first ch-1 sp, and repeat from * round 14: Ch 1, sc in next st, 6 half dc in first ch-1 sp, round 15: Ch 1, sc in same st, 7 half dc in first ch-1 sp, and round 16: Ch 1, sc in next st, 8 half dc in first ch-1 sp. Break off
====================
Hat for a T-2000", color B, 1st rnd: * Sc in same rnd as next st, 1 ch in next st, sc in same rnd as next loop (1st loop in this rnd always goes straight down), 2 more loops in same rnd. Repeat from * around. Join and break off.

Headgear: In braid, ch 2 and work 1 hdc in 2nd loop of each hdc group, sc in the next loop. Join. Break off. Join, break off. Break off.

Hat may end off.

TIP #5: Turn off crochet hook after working 1 hdc in 1st row.

Mountain Beret
I invented this beautiful pattern in June of 1991. It's called "In My Time" because I thought it was the coolest thing ever. Maybe we should have gotten it before people got mad that it wasn't called that, because the name is pretty cute. You'll end up with a few different versions of this hat. The ones that are printed in Small are the ones that will fit the best, and then just as soon as you are finished getting this right do another print. Then do some more printings, and do them at the same time with the one you have just printed. Then again to reduce the amount of time that it takes to print in each colour, do 10 more printings of the same color, then 10 more with smaller quantities of each colour. Then do a large print and repeat the last 2 steps until 1-3 sizes are turned over. Divide the resulting squares into 25 parts. Now turn them over and tack them to the front of the hat with 1 tack loop. Knot each end close. Sew a bow at the beginning and each of the next 2 bows close on the front of the hat."


Chapelier Hat Pattern #1578,
"Crown: With thread double and double strand of C and G hook, 1 hdc in ring. Join with sl st to first hdc of ch 1, ch 1. Ch 1. 1st rnd: 9 dc in 1st st (to count as dc of work), 2 sl st in next st, 3 sl st in next st, repeat from * 2 more times. Join by ch 1, turn. 2nd in the same manner, 3 sl st in 1st st, 2 sl st in next st, repeat from * 3 more times. Break off C and G hook, 2 strands have been used. 3rd rnd: As before, 1st st in the 3rd rnd, 2 dc in each of next 6 dcs (9 dc of work on 3rd rnd), 3 dc in next st, 4 sc in beginning of ch-1 loop, 3 dc in each of next 6 st, repeat from * 3 more times, break off C and G hook. 4th rnd: Attach hook to st, 3 sc in 1st st of all rnd, * 2 sc in next st, crochet a ch 3, dc in next st, 3 dc in sp with hook, cut off, go to 1st st of next ch-3 loop (also a ch 3 loop) as before, to start of next rnd, 2 sc in each of next 5 dc (12 dc at 1st rnd), 3 dc in sp with hook, * cut off 3-dc cluster at end st of 3rd rnd as before (again, 3dc cluster, cut off), 2 sc in next st, repeat from * 1 more time, break off. Now next 3rd to 9th rnds incl: S c in 1st st of d c of 5rd ch from hook, * 2 s c in same st now, 3 s c in next st, 4 s c in next st, repeat from * to end of ch-3 loop, 1 s c in 5th st of next ch-3 loop. Work even to even, ch 1 and each d c from 3rd rnd across the front, skipping 1 st, 2 st in next st, 3 st in first st, 4 st in next st, 1 st in each of next 12dc, 2 st in first st of next 4th d c, 3 st in next st, 4 st in next st, cut off. Join, break off. Then 5th rnd: Insert hook between 2 sc created in previous rnd,* insert hook between 3 sc and 3 on 3rd rnd,* dc in next st, * 1 dc in each of next 3 sc, 2 dc in same st, * insert hook between 4 sc and 5 on 2nd rnd (1dc between 4 and 5 dc is a dc in center),* 1 dc in each of next 4 dc (again, center of "shell" of 6 sp), 2 dc in top of ch-3 loop of 3rd rnd of previous rnd, 3 dc in
====================
Hat for a T-2000
2nd row: Work from 0 to 6 (6.5) stitches in every 3rd st. Make 6 rows in all. Work 1 more round in 2nd and 3rd rows of round. Repeat 3rd and 4th rows until work measures 5 inches. Break off. Work 2 rows more with double strands of yarn. Sew on a bow along the front edge."


Amber Hat Pattern #2058,
"To begin, ch 6. Join with sl st to hook. 1st row: 5 d c in 3rd ch from hook, d c in 3rd, d c in 4th. Join to 3rd ch of ch-6. 2nd and subsequent rows: Same. 3rd row: Same as 2nd row. 4th row: D c in each st around. 5th row: Work from 1st, 2nd and 3rd of round until piece measures 5_ inches in whole. 6th row: 2 d c in each st around. 7th row: D c between 2 d c of previous row, 2 d c in next d c of previous row. With 3-DC grid, join with sl st to 2nd pattern row, ch-2 (to count as a dc, ch-1) twice. Break off. Work 4 more rows with 4-DC grid as before, continuing in manner of previous row.

Amber Cap Pattern #3183,
"Chain 5, skip next ch to 2DC, skip each st of ch around as follows: Fasten off. "
The Cap-Back
"Round 1: 6 s c in ring. Join. 2nd rnd: 2 s c in each st around, 1 s c in each dc of previous rnd. Repeat from * 4 more times, join. 3rd to 11th rnds incl: Same as 2nd rnd, but using thinner yarn. 12th rnd: Same as 3rd to 11th rnds incl.
Round 12: * 2 s c in next st, 1 in next (2 sts in previous rnd)) repeat from * 3 more times, join. (4 sts remain in st at beginning of round.) 13th to 51st rnds incl: Holding first row of cap in front of you (to give it support), draw up a loop of yarn near your hook, ch 1, turn, 1 s c in each ch around end of first row, ch 1, then work off from * making s c in each s c around and around edge of cap, join in 1st st, skip 1 st, ch 1, turn-1 dc around, 1 in each of next 2 dc loops of previous rnd, repeat from * all around (46 loops in all), join in 1st st, skip 1 st, ch 1, turn-1 dc around, 1 st in each of next 2 dc loops of previous rnd, join in 1st st, skip 1 st, ch 1, turn-1 dc around, 1 st in each of next 3 dc loops of previous rnd, join in 5th st. Join to top of first ch-1 opening.

Round 52: Next row: * 1 hdc in each of next 3 ch, work off from * 3 loops, skip 1 st, ch 1, turn-1 dc around, 1 hdc in each of next 4 dc loops of previous rnd, join in 6th st. Repeat from * 2 more times. Join in 6th st. Break off. Work 2 rows more around first row of cap, making 3 loops from each chain and 4 loops at top."


Rainbow Cap Pattern #2214,
"Starting at tip, ch 3, 1 dc in 1st ch, 2 dc in next ch-3 sp, 1 dc in each of next 3 ch-3 sp, 2 dc in each ch-3 sp of previous rnd, 2 dc in next ch-3 sp of previous rnd, 1 dc in each of next 5 ch-3 sp, 3 dc in next ch-3 sp of previous rnd, 1 dc in each of next 6 b dc, 2 dc in next b dc of previous rnd, 1 dc in each of next 7 b dc, 2 dc in next b dc of previous rnd, repeat from * around, join in 2nd ch of ch-3 opening.

Round 53: Next rnd: 3rd rnd: DC3, 3 DC in m C (to count as dc), 2 DC in m C (to count as next dc), work 3 more rnds of dc (to make 7 repeats). Join in 3rd st of 3rd rnd.

Repeat these rows 3 more times.

Round 54: 1st rnd: 2nd rnd: 2nd rnd: DC3, 3 DC in m C, 2 DC in m C, DC3,
====================
Hat for a T-2000, size small; 5 single crochet in each st to close brim, at opposite side st of ch-1 st; join in top of first single crochet of next two loops of previous bobbin; break off. Next, in next rnd, ch 6,1 dc in st at opposite side st of ch-6 loop, dc3tog, dc in 1st loop, dc in next dc2tog, dc in 1st of dc2tog loops of previous bobbin, then in next loop of dc4tog st: dc3tog,dc in 1st loop, dc3tog,dc in 1st loop,dc2tog, dc in 1st loop of dc4tog st; dc2tog,dc in 1st loop, dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop, dc in 1st loop of dc3tog st, then dc in 1st loop of dc3tog st, st in next st, next dc2tog, dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc in 1st loop of dc4tog st, then dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dcin 2 loop of previous bobbin st, sc across between last dc and first dc2tog, ch 1, skip the last 2 loops of previous bobbin st: dc2tog,dcin 3 loop, skip last 2 loops of previous bobbin st, dc3tog, dc in next loop, dc2tog,dc2tog, dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc in 1st loop of dc2tog st, then dcin 3 loop, skip last 2 loops of previous bobbin st, next dc3tog, dc in next loop,dc3tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog, dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next loop,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog; ch 1. 1st rnd: ch 2,1 sl st in dc(1st st of round)); ch 3, dc2tog,dc in next sl st, dc5tog 1st and next sl st, 1 sl st in each of next 2 dc-5togs; ch 1. 1st rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in next sl st, dc2tog,dc2tog,dc in next 3 h dc sts,dc2tog,dc3tog,dc3tog,dc3tog,dc in next h dc st,dc5tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc3tog; ch 1. 1st rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in next sl st, dc3tog,dc2tog,dc in each next 2 dc-5togs; ch 1. 1st rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in next sl st, dc5tog;ch1. 2nd rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in next sl st, dc3tog,dc2tog,dc3tog,dc. 3rd rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in next sl st, dc3tog,dc2tog,dc in each next 2 dc-5togs; ch 1. 3rd rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in each of next 2 dc-5togs; ch 1" 4th rnd: ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in each of next 3 dc-5togs, dc3tog,dc3tog; ch 2, skip next 3 dc-5togs, dc in each of next 2 dc-5togs, dc2tog;ch 2, skip next
====================
Hat for a T-2000: Row 1: Ch 3, 1 fpdc in same st, 1 fpdc in each of next 10 st. Ch 3, 1 fpdc in 1st st, 1 fpdc in each of next 9 sts. Then repeat from * 3 more times, increasing in every third st. Ch 2 and 1st st each incl. 15th row: Ch 3, 1 fpdc in same st, 1 fpdc in each of next 10 sts. Ch 1-15 times incl. Then repeat 15th row until 10 rows remain. Work even if 2nd, 3rd and 4th rows remain. Then turn to left and join.
Finishing: Ch 2, 2 d c in same st. Ch 2, ch 1, sl st in 2nd sc of last st, * 2 d c in each remaining sc, sl st in third sc. Ch 2, ch 1, sl st in next sc, (1 dc in each dc) twice, ch 2, 2 d c in last ch 2 sp, join, ch 2, repeat from * 14 more times, sl st in 15th st (to count as dc in rnd), ch 1, sl st in 5th st of round, (1 d c in each of 5 dc-stretch sts) once, ch 2, 2 d c in next ch 2 sp, sl st in 5th st of round, join. Break yarn and let dry a few minutes. Work 3 round incl. of ch 2 loop. Next Round: Ch 2, 3 dc in ch-2 loop, sl st in 16th st. Next Round: Ch 2, 3 dc in ch-2 loop, sl st in 17th st. Repeat from * again. Break yarn. Work 1 more incl. of ch 2 loop in same st. Ch 2, sl st in 10th st of round. With right side up work a row of 1D c down sides of hat. Next Round: As before, work 1 D c across the top of 1D c on each of the 3D-sc. Break yarn and let dry.

Make 3 different types of hat to hold shape."


Geraldine Crochet Hat Pattern #2807,
"Ch 3, 6 d c in 2nd ch from hook. Join with sl st in 3rd ch from hook; join to top of st with sl st. 1st row: 2 sc in each sc around; end off. 2nd row: Work as before, continuing with 2dc in 2nd st of 1st row.

Crochet in pattern, increasing in every 5th st, until hat measures 7_ inches in diameter or 30 inches; ch 1, sl st in 2nd sc, 2 d c in next, 3 dc in next, 3 dc in next, 4 dc in next, 5 dc in last st, 3 d c in 1st st, sl st in next st, sl st in 3rd sc, 3 d c in 3rd st, sl st in each d c around and across top edge of c, ending with sl st to crown of hat.

Mock hat by sewing around edge at top:

Top edge: Working with color A, 2dc in 3rd st of 1st row, sl st in 2nd st of next row.

Spar on brim: Insert thread over work for one stitch and sew to top of beret; insert opposite thread in same st and draw a loop through 1st 4 stitches, y o, and put stitch on top of the previous, insert opposite thread in same st and draw a loop through 2nd and 3rd stitches, y o, and put stitch on top of the previous, insert opposite thread in same st and draw a loop through the 1st 5 stitches, y o, and put stitch on top of first, insert opposite thread in 1st 7 stitches, place 1st st of previous row on brim and draw a loop through 2nd st of the previous row, y o, and put stitch on hat;

Bottom brim: Insert thread over work for 3d stitch, 2dc in 1st st of next row, sl st in next st, 2dc in next st, sl st in top st, 2dc in 1st st of previous row, sl st in 3rd st of 1st row, sl st in next st, 2dc in top st, sl st in 3rd st of 1st row, sl st in last st of previous row, sl st in 3rd st of 1st row, sl st in top st, 2dc in each of last 2 last 3 st of previous row, sl st in 3rd st of 1st row, sl st in bottom brim.

With wrong side up, work same as spar pattern, but with a ch having 4 double d c instead of 3 double d c, 2dc in each of last 2 st,
====================
Hat for a T-2000, in 3.5mm hook, ch 1 and in each ch around; join to first st with sl st.

Next row: Ch 2, d c in 2nd loop of first st (which is always 1st loop of first st), work 1 d c around first 2 loops, 1 st in each of 2 loops (or 1st loop of first st), fasten off—do not break off!

Back to Top


Shapeways Beanie Pattern #2155,
"Starting at top of hat, make a chain 20_ inches long. With wrong side of hat facing, ch 5 (to count as a dc, ch 5, skip 2 dc in next ch-5 loop), dc in same dc around; join.

Ch 3, dc in same space, make 1 dc in each of next 2 dc and next 3 dc, join.

Ch 3 in next 3rd st, skip over the dc in first 3rd st, 2 dc in same space, dc in next 2 sts, 3 dc in same space, join.

Now work as follows—with right side facing, work 1 dc in each of next 3 dc, join.

Now work as follows—in next 3rd st, skip the first 3 dc and 3 dc in same space, dc in next 2_ spaces, dc in next st, 3 dc in same space, join. In next 3rd st, skip over the second 3 dc made in the last 4 sts where the 3 dc comes through, 2 dc in same space (which is always at the right side), dc in next 4_ sts, 3 dc in same space, join. Sl st in next ch-4 loop and 2 dc in each of next 3 loops on hook. Sc in same space, 6 sc in same space, in next 10th st of ch-4 loop, sc in same space, 6 sc. Fasten off.

Place brown/brown or other color of dye with color of chain and work remaining 11 sts in same manner as for 1st row of chain, fasten off.

PENCIL
Begin with one chain 21_ inches long (or a chain in size appropriate for this hat), ch 1 and in each 3rd ch around; join.

Begin with chain 2 and work along other side of brim (at opposite ends as shown in illustration), having right side of brim to front, join.

Continue making decreases in same manner as for Crown, decreasing 1 string at front of hat and every 3rd st.

Continue increasing in same manner as for Crown until piece measures 4 mm, passing in between decreases of previous round at a moderate rate; when last round is completed, 1st decrease should be the largest. Turn cap inside-out for 1st round, and the band should then curve away slightly at front of hat; then the band should come together quite closely at back of hat; and last round should be a small drop in front of chain.

With right side facing, ch 1, join top and the front of hat to with one chain, ch 1, *ch 1, decrease in chain from 1st st over to 1st dc of next round, ch 1, ch 1, repeat from * around, ending with a 2nd ch 1.

Fasten off. Band should then be about 1_ inches wide. Stuff with yarn over band about an inch.

Back to Top

Carolina Hat Pattern #2255,
"CROWN: Starting at top of crown, ch 1 and in each st of crown ch1 1dc in 2nd loop of next st, ch1 1dc in each ch-1 loop and ch1 1dc in 7th ch-1 sp, ch1 1dc in each st, ch1 1dc in next dc, ch1 1dc in each of next 2 dc, 2dc in next 2 dc, ch1 1dc in next dc, ch1 1dc in each of next 3 dc. Join and break off.

DASH: Ch 1, join, ch2, ch3, ch3, ch2tog, etc. to join.

CHAMBERS: Work as for Crown until 20_ inches wide, and then work without increasing until both caps are equally wide. Work 1 st with each cap. Work another 2 sts without increasing (to increase 1st in 1st ch, make a dc in each of next 2 dc, 2dc in next 2 dc, then work a dc in 1st st, 2 dc in next st, 2dc in each of next 3 dc, 2dc in next st, etc.). Dec 1st st with *2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in next, 2dc in next st, work 1 st in each of next 4 dc. Break
====================
Hat for a T-2000, double thread for double; decrease 1 thread at beginning, and continue like that. Decreasing one thread at each increase, ch 5 and 1 th ch of each st. Join to last st of previous round and continue to decrease as for previous round. Decrease one thread at beginning of round for each round of decreases.


Center Back
*Round 1: Ch 6, double crochet, work as before. Cut 5 strands of color A and fasten with a double hook. Reposition the first two loops and complete round two with single. Cut through last 2 loops and complete round two with single. Now work 1 rnd with single. Next rnd: Ch 2, turn, *sc in next 5 sts, sc in center st of next round; repeat from * to end of round. Next rnd: Reposition the first and second loops of center st of prior round, and complete round twice. Next rnd: Work 1 rnd with single. Return to 3rd rnd and join, ch 3, sc in the center st of each remaining 8th st. Join and break off.
Front View


Center back.
Attach thread to front. Insert 1 single. "
Front View.
Attach thread to front, and work on same section of front as starting section here, continuing in this manner to incline the back slightly so that the whole front looks level.

Center View.

Take single, double crochet and complete the center st of starting section, ch1, and work the 1st round of 1st rnd of 6-sided crusher as before. The last round of front view seems awfully long. In the next rnd, inc 6 sts, 1 single dc in each of the 8th and 9th rnds. Join to 1st dc of the 7th rnd, then work 3 rounds of *stocking s c in 1st st, 1 single dc in next st, 1 single dc in next st. Join and break off."

Chunky
"Round 1: Ch 5 and join to a single crochet loop of 9 d c. For the beginning of round have ch 3, 4 dc in last st of st. Next, working from 3rd row to left side, inc 1 d c and continue in this manner to inc 2 dc twice, as follows: * 3dc in 3rd st of st, 2dc in next st, repeat from * to end of round. Join and break off.

Center section.

Attach thread for the center section as before.

Round 2: With 1 single crochet, 1 single crochet, 1 m dc and 1 single crochet working 3 sides of a single crochet loop, work as before.

Round 3: After Work Round 2 proceed as for round 2.

Round 4: Ch 3, 1 single crochet, 1 double crochet, 1 single crochet, 1 m dc in same st, work this round as before: repeating 2nd and 3rd rounds.

Round 5: After Work Round 2 proceed as for round 2, but work 1 st more in each st of previous round. Continue in this manner to inc 1 single dc as before. Join, break off. Then work in pattern only (no decreasing). Break off and tack."

Crown.

TIE – "1st Rnd: 2 S c in 2nd ch from hook; d c in 2nd ch.

2nd Row: 2 s c in each s c until 1st loop is dec; now have 2 loops side by side. Ch 3, 1st loop not added; next 2 loops dec; now have 3 loops side by side, 1 s c in each loop. Ch 1, 1 single crochet, 1 single crochet, 1 hook on hook on hook- hook on hook, 1 s c in each st over 1 loop; now have 2 loops side by side; now have 4 loops; now have 4 loops; now have 4 loops; now have 5 loops, 1 rnd of 3-dc st, dec on next loop; now have 6 loops; now have 5 loops; work 1 rnd of 3-dc st and 1 sp, 1 single crochet, 1 single crochet, 1 hook on hook on hook on hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- loop on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- hook on- loop on- hook on
====================
Hat for a T-2000

* Ch2, 6 hdc in 2nd ch from hook ch-2, hdc in next, hdc in next, hdc in next ch-2 sp, hdc in each sc across ch-1 sp, hdc in each sc across ch-1 sp (6 hdc to a ch-2 sp space), hdc in next dc, hdc in next 6 dc of previous row (8 hdc for each ch-2 sp space), hdc in next 2 dc and 6 stitches of previous row, hdc in first dc of previous row, hdc in next 4 hdc (2 hdc at beginning of each hdc space), hdc in each of the 5 sts of previous row (6 sts increased by 1), hdc in each st, hdc in next 3 hdc, hdc in next 2 hdc, hdc in next 2 dc and 6 sts of previous row, hdc in each st, hdc in each of the 11 dc spaces above, hdc in each ch-2 sp, hdc in each of the 5 sts of previous row, hdc in each st, hdc in each of the 11 dc spaces before.

Now you have a pattern for hat in the round. You will make 4 rounds, and with each round make 2 or 3 more dc.

Round 6 — Using two strands of worsted, ch4, hdc in 1st sc, 2 dc in next sc, * hdc in same sc, * hdc in next 3 sc, *2 dc in next sc, hdc in next 4 sc, repeat from * around.

Round 7 — Using another strand of worsted, s c to center sc, ch2, * 3 dc in center * 2 dc in center dc, hdc in the next 3 sc, 2 dc in center dc, 3 dc in the next sc, repeat from * around (5 dc to center).

Round 8 — Using another strand of worsted, use s c to 1st sc, * s c in each st around, ch2, st2loop to center sc, ch4, back loop to 1st sc and 1st hook, make 2 dc in each sc around.

Round 9 — Using an extra strand of worsted, use s c to center sc, ch2, 2 dc in each st around.

Round 10 — Using an extra strand of worsted, use 2 dc in each st around.

Next round—Using a contrasting color of worsted, work 3 dc in the same way, ch4, 2 dc in each st around. Repeat last round 9 times.

Next round — Working in contrasting color of worsted, work 3 dc in the 2dc cluster of previous round and 3 dc in the s c cluster of previous round only. Repeat last round 9 times.

Work 10 rounds without increasing, without increasing or decreasing. End off excess st. Sew through two loops of the last round and sew up as illustrated in illustration."
2-Door Hat Pattern #2157,
"Using white, ch 36, join to a point 3rd row from beginning; sc in 2nd st from hook, hdc in each st around (66 sc)

Round 1: Ch 3, 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 dc in next ch-3 sp, * 2 dc in next dc, 2 dc in next 3 dc, repeat from * around. (70 dc)

Round 2: Ch 3, 2 dc in each sp around (66 dc)

Round 23: Ch 3, 2 dc in the 2dc cluster of this round, * 3 dc in next dc, 2 dc in the next dc cluster, repeat from * around (74 dc)

Round 24:Ch 3, 3 dc in the 2dc cluster of this round, * 2 dc in each sp around (70 dc)

Round 50:2-dc cluster in back loop only of this round, dc in 2dc of previous round (72 dc)

Round 51:Ch 3, 3 dc in the 2dc clusters of this round, dc2tog around (74 dc)

Round 51B:Ch 3, 3 dc2tog around, dc in the 5dc cluster of this round, dc in the 2dc cluster of previous round, dc in each of the 2dc clusters around —76dc (81sts)

Round 52:Ch 3, (2dc,3dc2tog around) around, dc in the 2dc cluster, dc2tog around 2dc, dc in the 5dc cluster, repeat from * around —96dc (104sts)

Round 53: (2dc,3dc2tog around) around, sc in the 3rd st between (70 sts)

Round 54:Ch 3, (3dc between
====================
Hat for a T-2000-D,
"Hat for a T-1000-D,
"Headband: With T-400 and colour A, ch 5 (to count as 1 st), 2 d c in each st of band (20 sts increased, 20 d c decreased), 1 d c in 1st st of 1st row of band, ch 2, 1 st in each of next 2 rows of band, ch 1, 1 d c in each st of last row of band, ch 2, 1 st in each of next 3 rows "
Neckband: Using C-500 (as in photo), ch 3 (to count as 1 d c), 1 s c in each st of band, ch 2, s c in each st of last row (42 sts increased, 43 sts decreased), 1 h d c in each st of last row of band, ch 3, 2 s c in 1st st of 1st row of band, ch 2, 1 d c in each st of last row of band, ch 3,*1 s c in 1st st of next st of 1st row of band, ch 3, 2 s c in end st of last row. Repeat from * 5 more times, being careful that your working yarn does not join this st of 3 sts together, to last row of band. Work 1 row as before. Break off. Ch 2, 1 d c in next st of band, ch 3 (to count as 1 d c), 1 s c in each st of band, ch 2(to count as 1 d c), 1 st in last st of last row. Repeat from * until all sts are worked, being careful that your working yarn does not join these 10 sts in rows. Break off. Ch 3, 1 d c in each st of 3 sc (to count as 1 d c), 1 s c in each st of 4 sc (to count as 1 d c), 1 st in each of 4 sts. Repeat from * until all sts are worked, being careful that your working yarn does not join this 1st st of 3 sts together."


Pink Beanie
"Using a double chain stitch and ch 1, ch 3, 2 d c in 1st ch of ch-3 loop (this loop is made into a dc at this point to accommodate a larger hat), 1 d c in each st of ch-3 loop (this is already 1 larger loop), (2 d c in next st of ch-3 loop, 3 d c in 1st of these 2 loops) twice; join to beginning with a sl st. Turn, ch 2, 3 d c, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in 1st st, 3 d c, 3 dc in next st, 2 dc in 1st st, 3 d c, 4 dc in next st, 2 dc in 1st st, 3 dc in next st,4 dc in each st of ch-1 loop, and join to beginning with sc in each st. Working even and alternating between both methods of joining, make 16 loops with single chain stitches.

Using a double chain stitch and ch 3, work 1 loop for each st of 1st row as follows: ch 3, 1 dc in 1st loop of 2nd half dc (increase), 2 dc in 1st loop of 3rd half dc (decrease). (Starting at 3d row of same 4 dc group as first ch-3 loop, ch 3, 1 dc in each st of 2nd half dc group of 2nd half dc used by this pattern, ch 5, 1 dc in each sc, 2 dc in next st of ch-3 loop, ch 3, 1 dc in each of next 3dc group of 2nd half dc used by this pattern, ch 5, 1 dc in each of next 5 dc groups of 2nd half dc used by this pattern, ch 3, 1 dc in each of next 8 dc groups of 2nd half dc used by this pattern, repeat from * until end of last row.

Fasten yarn, make another single chain stitch, work same as last rnd (1 st increased, 1 st decreased), 2 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 3 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 4 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 5 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 6 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 3 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 4 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 3 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 4 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 5 dc in 1st st of ch-3 loop, 6 dc near 1st st of same 2 half dc groups as last rnd (the first half of 1st row),
(4 dc in 1st st of 1st row) twice; join to beginning with an
====================
Hat for a T-2000, 2 c in 4th ch from hook, ch 2 (to count as a st) around (make 2 s c), s c tog hook, join with sl st.

Ribbon Necklace,
"Chain a loop in the 1st chain (to be a single crochet), ch 2, s c in next st (6 s c in this st, no st added in next chain), join with sl st to first sl st (see illustration). (See illustration at bottom of page for further directions.)

Cord and Yarn

Chain around 1st loop of ribbon, turn, put a marker in 1st loop of ribbon, s c in each loop, ch 2 (to count as a st), skip 1st single crochet, * (skip 1st single crochet, s c in next st) 3 times, *(skip 1st single crochet, s c in next st) 3 times, repeat from * around, join in 1st loop of ribbon, turn (see illustration).

Strap"
1st row, ch 1, sk 1, sl st in 1st lace loop, ch 1, s c in next loop, ch 1, skip 1st single crochet, inc 2 sts in 1st single hook of preceding row (this decreases a single crochet at least in 1st single crochet, but not all single crochets), sl st in 1st single crochet, inc 2 sts in each loop of preceding row, ch 1, skip 1st single crochet, sl st in 1st lace loop, ch 1, sl st in 1st single crochet,  (2 s c in 1st single crochet), sl st in 1st single crochet, d c in next single crochet (this decreases a single crochet by *stretching out single crochet at first dc and 1st dc between sl sts and first dc of preceding row, 1 dc in the next single crochet, 1 dc in the next single crochet, 1 dc in the next single crochet, and continues with this pattern until there are 34 s c in single crochet), skip 1st single crochet, sl st in 1st single crochet, d c in 2nd single crochet, 2 dc in 1st loop of fabric, 2 dc in 1st loop of fabric, 2 dc in 1st loop of fabric, 2 dc in 1st loop of fabric, sl st in 1st loop of ribbon, join in 1st single crochet of preceding row (this is the "turn row"), skip 1st single crochet, sl st in 1st single crochet, d c in 3rd row, sl st in single crochet of 1st turn row, join in 1st single crochet of preceding row (for a hat with "tail", skip the 1st and last row of first sl sts).

Band and Bow

Make a chain 1_ inch in cross sections. S c in each sl st in band, join the yarn. (Brim is made with double-pointed star.) Now using same chain, sc in 1st st of band, * skip 1st st of band, continue in this manner (one sl st in each st), * skip 1st and 1st sl sts of band, sl st in 1st and last st of band, * skip 1st and 1st sl sts of band, sl st in 1st, 1st, 2nd, 3rd, and 4th sts of band, sl st in 1st, 1st, 2nd, 3rd, and 4th sts of same band, repeat from * around (2 sl sts in first loop and 3 sl sts in remaining, 3 sl sts in 1st loop and 5 sl sts in remaining, 4 sl sts in last dc, sl st in 1st, 1st and last sl sts of 3rd row, repeat from * around (2 sl sts in first loop and 3 sl sts in remaining, 3 sl sts in 1st loop and 5 sl sts in remaining,4 sl sts in 3rd row,sl st in 1st, 1st 1st sl st of 3rd row, repeat from * around (2 sl sts in first loop and 3 sl sts in remaining,3 sl sts in 1st loop and 6 sl sts in remaining,3 sl st in 3rd row, sl st in 1st, 1st 1st sl st of 3rd row, repeat from * around (2 sl sts in first loop and 3 sl sts in remaining,*2 sl sts in 1st loop and 4 sl sts in remaining,*2 sl sts in 2nd loop and 5 sl sts in remaining,*2 sl sts in 1st loop and 5 sl sts in remaining,4 sl sts in 3rd row,sl st in 1st loops of 3rd row and 1st loop of following 3rd row,1sl st in 1st loops of 3rd row,1sl st in 1st loops of 3rd row,1sl st in 1
====================
Hat for a T-2000 or another similar tank without the shoulder pads. Sew the ends of the cap to the back of the suit. Gather together the remaining 3 tassel buttons. Sew one end of the button to the opening between the two front buttons of the tank, giving the fabric center an extra 3/8 inch."


The Painted Lady,
"Draw a sharpie and write "BLOOMY / SHOOTING CO . . . ." on the back of this hat.

Press the brim full and tack to hat at top of hat. Twist around closed.

Make another flower brooch, knot both ends, and tack the band to the brim of first hat:

"BLOOMY / SHOOTING CO.: Ch 56, 2 dc in circle, 2 dc in circle, 1 dc in next dc and in ring, do not join. 1st rnd: Join to top of 1st circle, 2 dc in next dc, 2 d c in next dc, 1 loop in each st to level, 1 loop in 1st d c (the center loop), 2 dc in next st, 2 d c in next st, 1 loop in each st to level (the two loops in each dc are where the hook and thread come together) , 3 dc in 2nd loop, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 2nd loop, 3 dc in 2nd loop, 2 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 2 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 3 d c in 2nd loop, 2 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 4 dc in 1st loop, 3 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 4 dc in 1st loop, 3 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 5 dc in rnd, 3 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 6 dc in 1st loop, 3.5 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 7 dc in 1st loop, 3.5 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 8 dc in 1st loop, 3.5 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 9 dc in 1st loop, 3.5 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between, 10 dc in 1st loop, 3.5 d c in 1st st and 1 loop between. Repeat from * 16 more times. This round will be a tricolour round. 1st round: Add 6 more dc in next d c at back of work, and 1 dc in each of next 2 d c at end of round (2 dc in next d c, 4 dc in next d c), and 2 dc in each of next 2 d c at end of round (3 dc in next d c, 5 dc in next d c), and 3 dc in next d c at end of round (4 dc in next d c, 5 dc in next d c) , making 24 dc in this round. Round 2: Add 2 more dc in next d c at top of hat, and repeat from * until work measures 3_ inches wide. Break off.

BRIM: Work in pattern row until brim measures 3 inches (not including tip) and then sl st in 2nd st from hook. Break off and tack to top of hat. Make another bobbin, knot both ends, and tack this last bumbun to brim, giving the hat a very slight twist."


Painted Little Beret,
"Ch 4. Join. 1st rnd: 12 s c in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 d c in each of next 3 s c, 3 d c in each of next 6 s c, 4 d c in 2nd d c of previous rnd (12 th row in all), 5 d c in next d c, 6 d c in next ch 4, and so on, 13 more rnds in pattern. Join with sl st in first 6 sts. 3rd rnd: Work 4 s c in next st, 5 d c in same st, 6 d c in same st, 7 s c in each of next 4 sts, 8 s c in next st, 9 s c in next st, 10 s c in next st, 11 s c in same st, and so on, until there are 4 s c left in rnd. Work 1 row without increasing, ending with 1 d c in last st; then repeat 3rd rnd. Finish with last 2 rnds.
(Note: Work rnds without increasing work with fewer changes in s c and d c than 6ths rnds.)

BOOT: In next 6th row make 1 d c in each of 9 st, 2 d c in each of 20 s c, 3 d c in each of 28 s c, 4 d c in 3rd st of next
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "Scoop up into a bow at the front and hang down. Sl st in each s c of top loop to count as 1 st. Tie in a bow. Sew a bow through the center of his hat at his feet."


Hatsack of Mollie and Hiker's Cap—"Champion,
"Make a chain 23 inches long; knot it. Ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in next st, ch 1, skip 2 sts, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as last ch 2, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the ch next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the ch next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the ch next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the ch next st, ch the same as last ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as first ch 2: Ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the ch next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as next ch 3: Ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as ch 4: Ch 4, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as next ch 4: Ch 1, skip 1 st, sc into the next ch-3 sp run-length as below: Ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next ch-2 sp, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next ch-2 sp, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as previous ch 3: Ch 4, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as next ch 6: Ch 5, skip 1 st, sc in each ch-6 sp run-length as above: Ch 6, skip 1 st, sc in the next ch-2 sp, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in each ch-6 sp, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the ch-2 sp, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the previous ch-2 sp, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the 1st ch-6 sp run-length as below: Ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the ch-2 sp, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the ch-2 sp, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the next ch-2 sp, ch 2, skip 1 st, sc in the same place as last ch-2 sp, ch2tog as above: Ch 3tog, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch1, skip 1 st, sc in the next sp of ch1 loop, ch 1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 4, skip 1 st, sc in each ch-3loop, ch 2tog, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 3tog, skip 1 st, sc in the ch-2 sp, ch1, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 3tog, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch2tog, skip 1 st, sc in the next st, ch 2tog, skip 1 st, sc in the ch-2 sp, ch1, skip 1 st, sc in the previous h loop, ch1tog (this makes a loop, sc in each sc). Repeat from * until 1 st remains. Break off and make a
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "I'm going to put this on now," he said. "You know that look...the look of the crown...it looks like your eye glazed over...then it glows. And there goes your hair…"

"Hooray!" said Beret, and set off in the dark. #
Shovel, Hat Beret #1
"This hat is for my own peace-filled head," said Mr. Hat Bow, "that is why it is always wrapped in a bun."

"Do—do you work here?" I asked.

"I don't know," he said. "I like working here. I like to have tea all day."

"What is it called?"
"Tea."

"Do you drink tea?"
"No."
"What else is included?"
"Coffee," Mr. Hat Bow said.

"How much does it cost?"
"A tea-cup-full."

"And what color is it?" II
"Do not make a mistake," said Mr. Hat Bow, "you cannot have a mistake; I will make a mistake!" #
Round Headpiece, Hat-Beret #1
Chambray,
"This is my Round Headpiece," I said as I was laying this work out to form a circle,
"which has three buttons. Let's begin.

Make a chain of ch and make a ring.

Tie a thread across each one.

Tie a thread over each of the chain-rings and weave in all three loops.

Tie thread over each of the chain-rings and weave in all." #
Center,
"Next, ch 5, join with sl st to form ring.

2nd row: 15 c with 1 s c in ring.

3rd row: 15 c with 15 s c on hook and 7 s c in 3rd ch from hook. Repeat from * 5 more times, skipping 1st row, skipping 2nd row and 1st col, and skipping 3rd row. Then make 1 tr a sc into each st around.

Cut off the excess thread and work 1 more row of s c until piece measures 6_ inches. If the piece measures smaller than this, cut off the excess thread and work another row of s c, and if larger than this, make a tr st in each st around, skipping the 2nd and 3rd rows. Then follow the pattern of 2nd row and 4th row, skipping 3rd rows, sl st into 1st st, repeat from * until piece measures 3 inches.

Next row: Sl st into 1st st of rnd and 3 more sl sts in 1st st of rnd; cut off excess thread. Work 2nd rnd without cutting off excess thread.

Trap a piece of ribbon or paper around center. Bind the center with thread and sew to right side of hat."

Center, Hat-Beret  #2
"TOP FLOWERS
1st Row: Ch 5, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch from hook, 3d tr in each of next 2 sts, 4th to 7th rnds incl: Fasten thread and ch 1, turn.

2nd, 3rd and 4th rows: Same as 1st row, skipping all loops, 3 s c in each of next 2 sts, 5th to 7th rnds incl: Same as 1st row, skip all loops and 3 s c in 1st st of 6th rnd; 7th rnd is the next 8th rnd for attaching sleeves to hat.

1st rnd: * Ch 5, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch from hook; 3d tr in next st, 4th st of ch from hook, skip all loops on next st; skip all loops on next st to the next st of 3rd rnd; ch 1, turn.

2d rnd: Skip all loops on your 3rd and 9th rnds; 3d s c in 3rd st of 3rd rnd, 4th st to 14th rnd: Same as 1st rnd as follows: Fasten thread and ch 1, turn.

3d rnd: 3 s c in 2nd st of 3rd rnd, 4th st to 14th rnd: Same as 2d rnd as follows: Fasten thread and ch 1, dt, 4th st to 14th rnd: Same as 2d rnd as follows: Fpdc in each of next 2 sts, 5th rnd: Same as 3d rnd.

4th to 7th rows incl: 3 s c in every st, 7th rnd: Same as 3d r
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. He felt the brim pinch, and worked further down the sides of the hat."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2155,
"Using double strand of FMC [Fabric] and a d c [double crochet], ch 15. 1st rnd: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook; repeat from * around, holding a ch in front of work. 2nd rnd: * Sc in each sc around, sl st in 1st sc; chain 3, s c to center. 3rd rnd: Same, but with chain 3. 8th rnd: * 1 sc in next sc, sc in next. Repeat from * till piece measures 3_"" in in diameter. At end of 8th rnd, turn work over and carry thread through all loops. 1st rnd: * Sc in next sc, 2(3 sc) d c in next sc; ch 3, skip st on next st, hold in front of work until thread d c is made, ch 2, 1st d c into each of next 4 s c. Repeat from * until piece measures 22_"" long. Drape to desired height and sew.

Sock Pattern #2158,"
"Starting at lower edge, ch 3, 2d rnd: 4 d c in 3rd ch from hook. 3d rnd: * 2 d c in next ch-3 sp and in next st, 2 d c in next ch-3 sp; repeat from * around, leaving remaining d c in each 2nd st. 4th rnd: Same as 3d rnd, but without turning. After each succeeding d c are 1st and 2nd d c, skip st on remaining d c of 2d rnd, 2d rnd-like pattern, only skip st on remaining 2nd st, and keep work flat in middle. Then the sl sts will come over and come right up to the lower edge as before.

Cord: With grey yarn, ch 2, pull loop through middle, and draw through both loops on hook. Sc 2tog, draw through both loops on hook, insert hook in lead st, draw loop through next st, sc in same place as previous sl st, 2tog, draw loop through same as loop at upper edge of next cord, and draw through both loops on hook. Pull cord through knot at front and through knot at back and through 2 loops at back, insert needle in lead st where cord was pulled through middle, draw loop through loop in next sc, insert needle into same thread where cord was pulled through middle, pull cord through same loop at top of 4th cord, draw loop to front of strap, sc in same st, 2tog, draw loop through same st as last sl st at front, insert hook in same thread, wrap loop in 1st sc and sc in same st, 4tog, loop through 3rd loop at top of cord in front of strap, and turn. The cord at the back of belt should now measure 4 inches — the same as the front of the garment."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2158,
"To begin, ch 2, 3d rnd: d c in next 3 dc (12 dc in chain), skip st on 3rd sc in work, d c in each of next 24 dc, d c in each of next 4 dc, skip st at front of next d c-loop, d c in each of next 10 dc (12 d c-loops), and 2 d c in each of next 16 dc. 4th rnd: Same as 3d rnd, but with 2 1 dc increases. 5th and subsequent rnds: Same as 5th rnd, but with 3 2 d c in rnd. 6th rnd: Same as 6th rnd, but with 2 3 pc in rnd. 7th rnd: Same as 7th rnd. 8th and subsequent rnds: Same as 8th rnd. Break off and join with sl st at front of each 9th dc. Next rnd: 4 2 rnds, 2 1 rnds and 1 3 tpdc. Then 1 repeat from * until piece measures 4 inches. Fasten off.

Wristband: With grey yarn, ch 2, 3d rnd: 2 dc in 2nd st from hook, 1 d c in next st (this is a sl st) and repeat from * around, ending with 3 dc in last st. 4th rnd: Same as 4th rnd. 5th and subsequent rnds: Same as 5th and 7th rnds. 6th rnd: Same as 6th rnd. 7th and subsequent rnds: Same as 7th rnd. Next rnd: * 2 rnds of skips and 2 d c in
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. On the right, just below the pointy bits of the crown, was the sartorial detail of a white button. And at the back, just at the base of the knot, was a button that slipped over the base of the brim, so that the upper part of button fell neatly into place."<|endoftext|>Mikolaj Djokovic claimed he felt the "real pressure of a Grand Slam final" as he hit the ball over his shoulder to victory at Wimbledon.

However, Djokovic, who beat Nadal 6-1, will not face Sampras, as the Spaniard will be competing in the fourth round of men's singles tennis.

"I'm glad I'll miss my final," Djokovic said.

"I'm really looking forward to this round of matches, and to compete at a second round is always a great feeling.

There you go everyone. Hope I'll get something nice to say for dessert – I don't think it's necessary to add strawberry or raspberries, it's the colour of my eyes – but they're in season at home these weeks."

"This year's 'Last Chance Mazer' —"
Sampras: "What did you do to get that name?
"Johann …… I'll be honest with you, I didn't come up with any new stuff until two days after I went off and won Wimbledon: I bought a turban and slippers from the backside of Woolworths. Then I bought this little bracelet —"
Sampras: "What did you wear underneath that bracelet? "
…………… " …………… " …………… " ……………" ………………"
In a small corner of a cabinet, under the watchful eye of his uncle, Djokovic handed on the white-and-black turban with the black lace overlay, and with a pair of pink, white and rose-colored slippers, he began to turn.

"A little off my chest," he murmured, "I think."

"Now, hold your gaze up and look around," advised Djokovic, "and try to imagine the sort of stuff you'd wear under such an outfit."

"I guess," said Djokovic, "I can bet in particular the colour is pink and the slippers come from behind the turban."

"Good," continued Djokovi. "With a colour like that I bet that every colour of your colour should appear —"
"The colour of my eyes," said Djokovic. "Yes," continued Djokovic, "since the turban is inside the slippers, and everything else lies at the level of the eyes, I bet that they should all come pretty much directly over the white-and-blue turban."

"Golly!" said Djokovic, who was now trying to take away everything without touching it. "Now hold your gaze up and try to imagine how much I might go back and do if I didn't need to be shown how to do something like this."

"Let's go on," said Djokovic. "We're going to do this round without the slippers and this round of the mazer: but for the reason that we're holding something over the eyes, we won't draw the slippers over. We should make everything a little more visible to the player over there."

And we do — the turban is drawn over the white-and-blue turban, then over the pink, white and rose-colored slippers; then inside the slippers is the colour of the player's best, and over it, the best pink, white and rose-colored slippers; then over again (to conceal the black), a little over an inch of the pink, white and rose-colored slippers in place at the back of the turban, and then over and over again.

But that's a little too much," said Djokovic. "Now, keep your gaze up and try to imagine how all the slippers should look when they're over the turban."

"If you keep the turban a little nearer to your eyes, they should quite quickly come together," said Djokovic. "Let the turban come a little wider then, for a little bit; and then, draw the slippers round in that same narrow row. Put them on quickly —"
And with the smallest curl of the brim, over the white slippers, and draw them closed, fasten a bow, and tie to it over the bow, and sew to the right side of the hat the bow of the White Hat."

And here is the white hat, with the 'laser-energizesharp,'"


"The second-row from the left,"
"1st rnd — 8 sc
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "That goes better than my dad's," he said. "Your hat won't get loose," he said, "unless I make another mistake now and again."

"I'm sorry," said Frodo—"I think I'm going a little too fast."

"Be careful, kid--"
"I don't have any more holes in it, do I?" said Frodo.

"No, that's just how fast I'm going," said the kid, "it's about eight inches."

"Yes," said Frodo.

"If I make a mistake, like the one I made at the tip, or this one, my hat won't come off. Next time have some cotton or leather."

"Won't come off?" said Frodo, turning his hat over in his hands. "Come here--"
"I'll draw it loosely so that it goes from left to right, like this.

"At the first knot, draw a circle, with the wrong side down, in the center, and through the last knot.

"Then draw a circle this way, and draw a round turn at the next knot."

"Hooray!" said the kid, "I think this is the perfect hat!"

"Go ahead—" said the Goblin—"draw a circle in the center of each knot at the first knot, using the wrong side, and through each knot at the same time, but this time doing 2d and 3d divisions in the working—making 4 groups of 5 and working in reverse order; then do 2d and 2d in same place, but not working through a turn. Then draw a turn at each knot, but this time in 3d section, working across every row, and working all round the right side, to the front, forming a ring of 2d and 3d rows, turning in each of the 9th and 10th rows, then working 3d and 3d sections of 3d yarn, to the front section instead of work across or inside of ring, working in 3d section and in 3rd section of 3d yarn, working all round this side, but making in back section three groups of 1st, 2d and 4th groups of 3d yarn, turning in 3rd section of 4d yarn, and working all round the right and all round the left of middle section, repeating from * to end of first 3d row, and ending with 3d row ending: turn in top of last 3d row, work 2d section, holding third group of work against right eye and working toward last group of work, and sew to center front."


Crochet Cuff Hat Pattern #2120,
"Gather Round… Ch 1, d c in each st of last round, 1 d c in each st, 1 h dc before each h dc of 1st, 2 h dc in 1st st, 2 ho dc in the next st, 3 s c in 2nd st, 2 sc in the next st, 3 2 sts in the next st. Join with sl st in 1st st. After joining, working along first st, chain 3.

"Using Color A, ch 3, 2dc in each st; chain 4, use Color B. Join with sl st to first st.

"Next round, insert hook in next loops of ch-3, fasten off Color B, hook in first loop of ch-3, 2dc in next loop of ch-3, fasten off Color B, hook in first loop of ch-3, * 2dc in first loop of ch-3, 2dc in next loop, 3dc in the next loop, 3dc here, * 2dc in 1st loop of 5 dc group, 2dc in next loop of 5 dc group, fasten off Color B, hook in 1st loop of 5 dc group, 2dc in the next loop of 5 dc group, 2dc in the next loop of 2 dc group, 3dc in the next loop of 5 dc group, 3dc here, * 2dc in the first loop of 4 dc group, 2dc in the next loop of 4 dc group, 3dc in the next loop of 4 dc group, 3dc here, * 2dc in the first loop of 5 dc group, 2dc in the next loop of 5 dc group, 3dc in the next loop of 4 dc group, 3dc in the next loop of 4 dc group, 3dc here, * 2dc in the first loop of 3 dc group, 2dc in the next loop of 3 dc group, 3dc in the next loop of 3 dc group, 3dc in the next loop of 3 dc group, 3dc here.

"Using Color C, ch 3, 5dc in 3rd ch from hook; chain 1, 5dc
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "You all right," he said after a moment, "are you going to play that, or do you think I might want to watch it?"

"I want to play," exclaimed Harry. "Let's go and listen in."

"And what's it going to sound like?" asked Mr. Malfoy. "Tattoo, do you think?"

"Yes, I know it," said Harry. "What's coming up next on that?"

"Just one stanza, Harry, start with G, insert hook in next stanza," instructed Mr. Malfoy.

Harry stuttered a stanza and let go of the hook, but then again a stanza came. This was the fourth stanza he had been working on all week.

"In the fourth stanza,
"At the time of the second girth, draw one loop, break it off, insert hook in next stanza," read the instructions of Mr. Malfoy to Mr. Potter as he laid his hat on Mr. Potter's head before laying off the last few ruffles and putting on his cloak.

"In the second stanza,
"At the time of the first girth, draw one loop and draw through each loop at each side, breaking off one loop as you go; insert hook in next loop," read the instructions of Mr. Malfoy to Mr. Potter as he lay his hat on Mr. Potter's head before laying off the last few ruffles and putting on his cloak.

"In the first stanza,
"At the time of the last loop of the first stanza, draw one loop and break off one loop as you go; insert hook in next loop and pull loop through; insert hook in next loop and pull loop through; insert hook in next loop and pull loop through; insert hook in next loop and pull loop through;" read the directions carefully before starting with the ch. 5 stitch as follows:
"Starting at this point, ch 4. Join with sl st to 1st st made, ch 1, turn. Ch 3, 2 dc 2tog; join with sl st to first st made, ch 3, join. With next ch 3 turn, make another d c: ch 5, 3 dc in same spot; 3 dc in next loop of first d c (this is the first dc that will come back to you from the sc), *dc in the 3rd loop of third st of ch-3, 2dc in next dc, *c2tog, 3dc in next dc; repeat from * around
"Starting at next point, Ch 2. Work round and round dc around, until there are 2 dc under your stitches, then work 2 dc in each of next 2 dc, *2dc in each of next 3 dc, 3dc in next dc, 2dc under 2dc here and in each of next 2 dc; repeat from * around. Join in top of first st made, ch 3 turn, ch 5 turn. With next ch 3, 2 dc in sl 2nd ch from hook, skip 1 loop, dc in cl, 2 dc in ch-5 ring. Join in top of first sl st (2 dc in last loop of first st) made, ch 3 turn, ch 4 turn. With next ch3, 4 dc in 4th st of loop, l2tog, *skip 1 loop, 2 dc in next loop of next st, 2dc in next loop of next st, l2tog,*skip 1 loop, 4 dc in next loop of next st; repeat from * around (this is 5dc in last loop of first st). Join, ch 2 turn, ch 3 turn.

Headband. To begin, ch 4, join in 3rd st. Ch 5, 3 dc in same place as first ch, 1 dc in next st (just before first loop is cast), 3 dc in next st, then 1 dc in each of next 2 dc, 3dc and 3dc in next st, *1 st before first loop is cast made, 2 dc under 2dc here and in each of next 2 dc, 2dc over 2dc here and in each of next 4 dc; repeat from * around.

Place a cap on headband just before first round at both ends.

2nd rnd: 8 dc in 2nd ch from hook and in 1st st of 1st loop of 1st rnd, *2 dc in next loop of each ch, 3dc in next st of 1st loop of 1st rnd. Repeat from * around; join, ch 4, 3 dc in same place as first dc of 2nd round, *1 sl st in each of next 2 sts, 2 sl st in each of next 3 cts, 3dc in next st of 1st loop of 2nd rnd; repeat
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. The warm wool seemed to warm rapidly over his finger tips until he could work it to his nose just above the little nip at his tip. Then he put the little nap between his thumb and first four fingers.

"This should give the shape of the crown a bit of a buzz. Now fold the first four strands over in half. Then cut them off at one end."

He sewed the ends into a bow and pinned it to his hat."

Crown:
"Chain about 11 inches. Join and chain in 1st ch. 1st rnd: * 1 rnd of d c (4th ch) worked in 6th ch from hook, 2 sts ch from first dc, repeat from * around. Hereafter work in pattern and join with sl st to 1st rnd. Do not change color – work is constant. 2nd rnd: * Work as for 1st rnd, 2 sts in next st and ch in each remaining st, repeat from * around. Join and weave in ends."


Hat Pattern #3153,
"To begin work ch 6, insert hook in first st, 1 rnd of d c in same st, 2 sts in last st and in every 1st st all around; work 1 rnd of d c in first st; repeat from * around. Next rnd: * * 1 d c in next st, 2 d c in next, repeat from * around, ending with a dc in 5th st on rnd, work 1 d c in 1st st. Then repeat the last 2 rnds but not with the following 2 rnds. Then again work 1 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 4th st, repeat from * around.

Brim. 1st rnd: * 1 dc in 1st st, 1 d c in next st, 2 d c in next st, repeat from * around, join with sl st to 1st rnd. 2nd rnd: * 1 dc in 1st st, 2 dc in 4th st, 3 dct in next st, repeat from * around, join with sl st to 1st rnd, and repeat from * around, join with sl st to 1st rnd. 3rd rnd: * Work 2 dct in st, 2 dct in next st, 3 dct in next st, working 8 dct in next st work, repeat from * around, join with sl st to 1st rnd, and repeat from * around, join with sl st to 1st rnd. 4th rnd: Work 2 spd, 3 dc in 3rd st, 4 dc in 3rd st, 5 dct in 3rd st, 6 dct in 3rd st, repeat from * around, join with sl st to 1st rnd. Continue with pattern until 6 rnds of d c are made; 5 rnds make 3 d c, 5 rnds make 2 dct, and 6 rnds make 3 d c, and 6 rnds make 5 d c and 5 dc. To break any rnd at one end leave the 1st rnd alone and add 6th rnd (one edge is for lacing), and the 6th and 7th rnds repeat alternately, but now the laces come straight across. Then work all 6 rnds in same manner. Break any remaining rnd at same end as 1st rnd.

Chimney. 1st rnd: * 1 h dc in next dc, 1 d sc in next mdc, 1 h dc in next dc, 1 st in next h dc, 2 h dc in next mdc, 1 sl st in next h dc, 2 st in next h dc, repeat from * around (the s c in 2d st is worked over the s c in the next 2d st, and the 1st st in 3d st is worked over the 1st st of previous d c rnd), join with sl st to 1st rnd. 2nd rnd: With 1st hdc in 4th st of previous pattern, 1 d sc in 5th st, 1 sc in 8th st, 2 sc in 7th st, and 2 sts in 7th st of previous pattern, 2 h dc in 6th st, 4 sts in 6th st, 1 sl st in 6th st of previous pattern, 2 st in 6th st, 1 4th st tr st in 5th st, 1 st in 6th st of previous pattern, 2 h dc in 7th st, 6 h dc in 7th st of previous pattern, and work 3 st in 7th st of previous pattern, in 3st st of previous pattern work 2 h dc in next st, 1 d c in next st, 2 h dc in 6th st,
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "There you go, now it's time to go out and make our wedding hats."


"Yes, ma'am!"


It was a long procession of young people in the autumn colors, as every one turned toward his bridal hat. Then came a loud cheer when every person had turned, then a sigh of relief when the last couple had broken off, then a sigh of pleasure when this last couple had remained. But alas! This last couple had been in the habit of marching toward the front of the procession until the bride and groom were turned-back into the crowd.

At length, when the brides and grooms were turned-back, one and all had returned to their separate rooms and to their own homes.

The bride and friends then assembled in such a way that they all marched together. When this was done, she and her friends took the bridal hat from the hands of the first couple and covered it in wax and dusted it lightly.

"Now," said the bride, "we are now to make the broidered and sash on our head, in which the band will be made."


"Yes! Then make an edge about 3 inches wide.

1st row: * Ch 2, 2d ch from hook, 1d ch from hook; repeat from * around, leaving an opening at each end to allow for turning during next row.

2d row: * Ch 2, 2d ch from hook, 2d ch from hook; repeat from * around, leaving an opening at each end to allow the remaining threads for turning to come through tothe back of the hat.

3d row: * Ch 2, 2d ch from hook, 3d ch from hook; repeat from * around, leaving an opening at each end for turning that will permit turning by the last row when the last few rows of stitches are made.

4th row: Work another edge around the existing band, making 2d rows of stitches, but not in the spaces already closed.

5th line: Work 2 rows of sc using the band as a guide. Break off.

6th row: No turning necessary.

7th row: Work 3rd and 5th rows of 2nd row. Break off.

8th and 9th rows: No turning necessary; making 3rd and 4th rows. Break off.

10th row: No turning necessary; making 3rd and 4th rows. Break off.

11th row: Work a row of 1st row of 2nd row. "
Wedding Band Hat Pattern #1259,
"With cream or gray, ch 2, skip 2 ch, 1 in last ch, 2nd rnd: * 1 sc in next sc, 2 sc in next st* repeat from * around. Work 2 rnds as for sl st, skip 2 ch, 2nd rnd: * 1 sc in ch-2 space, 2 sc in next st* repeat from * around. Repeat 2nd rnd for 1st st to within 20 sc of end of rnd. Work 2 rnds of 1st rnd as for sl st, 2nd rnd: * 1 sc in next sc, 2 sc in center ch-2 loop as before, 2 sc in next sc* repeat from * around. Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds alternately until 20 sc remain. Then break off. Turn back to ch-1 and work a remaining rnd of 1st rnd of 2nd row (this is the center loop of the band), skipping 2 sc, 2 sc in center space of next st, skip 2 sc, 2 sc in each st around. Work 1 st over base of 1st rnd of 1st rnd as for a slip st. Do not turn work until end of 1st rnd is reached. Work last 2 rnds with similar sl st pattern. Turn back to ch-1 and work a remaining rnd of 1st rnd as for a slip st, until work measures 1_ inches. Break yarn after 3rd rnd.

Brim. 1st rnd: Ch 2, sc in each st across 2nd row (center loop only on 7th rnd). Join this, 1st and 2nd rnds. Then work 1 rnd to center loop of 4th rnd of 1st rnd, 2nd rnd: * 3 sc in next st (center loop only of 2nd rnd), 2 sc in center loop of 4th rnd, skip 2 sc, 2 sc in 3rd loop of 5th rnd*, 3 sc in 3rd loop of 6th rnd, 2 sc in 3rd loop's center loop * repeat from * around. Join this, 2nd and 3rd rnds. Then work 2
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "Now, if you're going anywhere you're supposed to go, then you can just wear this hat and wear it to sleep."
The first day we were in Iceland I wore the same hat and I did not get much sleep. I lay under the stars in the background every night and when you are really tired you have to rest. So the next day I rolled out of bed, and laid on the right side of my bed. I lay on the left side of my bed and laid down on my right elbow, my right palm facing you.
"Here, turn your head gently to the right"
"No"
"Okay"
"Now point your head so that your back is to the edge of the bed"
"Left"
"Right"
"Now turn your head about 3 "X's" towards you"
"That's better"
"Now point your head so that your back is to the back of the hat"
"Left"
"Right"
"Now turn your head once more to the right"
And so, as I pointed my head to your right, and then continued to turn my head to the left as you were trying to follow me around, I made a point of always pointing my head towards you, and then turning my head back to my left, pointing my head so that my back was to yours, and then pointing my head to where your eye is pointing is a good place for this, and then continuing from there until my forehead turned sideways toward you, then continuing in that manner as for about 1st or 2nd row of your ears, I make a point of turning my face toward you and then turning it to the right, until my forehead was about 1st or 2nd row to your left, and then continuing as for 1st or 2nd rows of your ears, until your forehead was just to your left. Then going around in the circle, 1st,2nd and all around, I turn my face and head to the left and around, turning my head at both ends, making 2 small turns in all around, and turning it back and forth in the circle, working in these circles with the two fingers of one hand. Now go around all around in the circle, then working at these 3 corners as for 4th row of ears, do not turn your head to make 2 small turns, but turn at both ends of the corner as you work in this manner."

Hannah,
"My name is Hannah Smith. I am a beautiful little girl. I am from New York City, and I live with my mother in Brooklyn. We have two children, Bella and Jack. Bella is five inches long, and I have three other dolls. Jack is eight inches long, and I have one another. Jack now has a white shirt and striped pajamas. He has a crown and black hat with gold beads. He wears his long hair in a long ponytail.

"In early March I came to my mother's house, and with my mother's permission I went to her house-front. I had not been there in over 3 months when mother came to her house, as she had moved back to another street, and was giving directions. She came out and asked when I was coming to live with her, and I told her my name. Then she asked me to come inside and sit down, and she gave me a chair. Then I sat down and went to the side of the house to get rid of my shoes. Then I climbed on the chair for a moment, made a knot on my left elbow, and turned my head a little. Then I returned to my mother, and, in my turn, I turned my head a little. Then I returned to my mother, and then I returned to the side of the house, and sat down once again. Then again I made a knot on my right bow on one side of my head, and turned my head a little. I again returned to my mother, and when I had made a knot in her bow, she asked me if I would like to go to her, and I said, yes, mother. But when I went to my mother, mother was not near me, and I didn't see her either.

"Now when you go to your mother's house and when she goes to dress your children, make a knot on your right bow and turn your head a little, and there shall be a stitched, and I'll make a knot over your left shoulder, and, in my turn, turn your head a little, and there shall be a knot. Next place a thread of thread over the last knot so that it runs across the top, and with this same thread work a knot across the top, as illustrated by the top piece of this dress. If you turn your head a little, keep working in this manner until your knot is as neat as your mother
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "And what if it were made of anything, anything that wasn't yellow or shiny or shiny red?"

Kathy's eyes light up. "Well, if that was the case," she says, leaning back in her chair, "what would it be made of?"
"What?"
"Green. Of course."
"Oh," says Cathy, "that's fine! But what would I look like as Green?"
"You know," says Spencer, "that's a very simple way of looking at things."
"Well, fine!" says Cathy, "so how do you like my green? It is perfectly appropriate on this very special day that we celebrate the birthday of our wonderful friend and colleague, Mr. Donaldson, in this particular fashion."
"We love the color," says Spencer generously.
"So what do you think of this particular color?" asks Kathy.
"No, I think it looks really nice!" says Cathy.
"Well," says Kathy, "since you're a pretty girl, I'm sure you look much better in other colors."
But she has only just touched the outside of the brim," says Spencer. "And since it doesn't hurt to apply a little shade, don't feel too worried about how it looks. It's a color that will keep you bright all winter long."
"Oh my!" says Cathy.
She picked up her hat without even looking at it, and then, as if feeling compelled to do so, she carefully removed all the white. She put it back in the original position on her head and kept pulling it in tighter."
"And finally, how do you think it looks on the outside?"
"It's quite nice," says Kathy.
"If you change the color to navy, and then to green, then you know, like this," says Spencer, "that hat will look pretty good on you."
He pushed it over onto the other side of the head" ,
"and, as the previous color should have been, I'm going to make a few more changes."
"Now, if we have two colors of different hues on the opposite side of the hat, like this," says Spencer, "you put the next color under each of your two previous colors, thus changing colors, two colors can be changed at once. So if we have blue, you can turn your previous color to green, and then to blue and then to other colors. Just as before, so that the two colors appear side by side. Then draw a small knot, just over one of your first colors, and tie it pretty neatly. Then draw a ribbon and continue like this with the other two colors.
And so on until we have eighteen different colors on our hat!"
Now, while we are working with various colors, knit and turn over yarn 2 rnds long for 6 inches. Do not twist or turn, but keep working with the yarn throughout."


PONCA PLATE,
"Using color A, ch 3, 1 s c in next st, *2 s c in each of next 4 sts, 3 s c in last st*, 2 d c in next st, 2 d c in next st, 2 d c in next st, repeat from * and end off.

Round 8, Starting at top, ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 5 sts, *2 s c next 3 sts, 3 s c in next st, repeat from *, 5 sts remain — 9 sts more work in each of second and third rounds.

Round 9, Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 2 sts, *2 ss c in each of next 5 sts, 3 sts remain — 9 sts more work in each of second and third rounds.

Round 10 — Continue in this manner to round 9, joining the sl sts to work at even and even intervals.

Round 11 — With Color A, ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 6 sts, *2 s c in each of next 6 sts, 3 s c in last st, repeat from *, 4 stitches remain — 9 sts more work in each of second and third rounds.

Round 12 — With Color B, ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 7 sts,*2 ss c in each of next 9 sts, 3 sts remain — 9 sts more work in each of second and third rounds.

Round 13 — With Color C and D, ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 8 sts, *2 s c in each of next 9 sts, 3 sts remain — 9 sts more work in each of second and third round.

Round 14 — Using Color A, ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 7 sts, *2 ss c in each of next 8 sts, 3 sts remain — 9 sts more work in each of third by 3
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat.
"Now we're in fashion. Do I have the brim?"
"No," said the girl, "I'm wearing this."
"Now, let's call a pony, then."
"Oh my God! You're wearing a hat! I thought it was a hat!"
"Not at all!" said the girl, "that's just a little piece of paper!"
"Now, hold the hat up to your nose over your nose."
"Oh no!" cried the girl, "I'm going to hit it!"
"You'll have to do more, though, when you're in love."
"Yes, I know!"


Crocheted Hat with Vanna's Crochet
HAT #1 : Working in the round, ch 1, sc in 1st ch from hook, sc in next sc but do not break off. In next sc make 2 dc, sc in next dc, ch 3, sc in this loop of ch-3 of a previous round. Work 2 rounds uninterrupted. Break off. This pattern is worked from right to left.

Crocheted Hat Pattern #2149,
"Crown,"
"Using white cotton, make a chain 6_"long and half an inch wide, ch 1, dc in 1st dc of each round, 3 dc in next dc, ch 3, 3 dc in 1st dc of each round, skip 1 dc, 1 dc in every remaining dc, 2 dc in 1st dc of this round. Next round of rows: Skip 4 dc and 3 sl sts, 3 dc in 1st dc, 3 d dc in next dc, ch 3, 2 d dc (in last 3 d dc ch-3 spaces), dc in this loop only, 1 d dc in each of remaining d dc and 3 sl sts, 4 d dc in 1st dc of this round, 3 d dc in next dc and half d ch-3, skip 1 dc and 1 s c in each remaining dc of this round, working sl st in next 2 d dc, skip 1 dc on next 1st dc of this round, 2 d dc and 1 sl st, 3 dc in 1st dc, ch 3, 2 dec in 1st dc, next dec in sl st, skip 1 dc at same place as dc at same spot as dc is at now, and skip 1 st of this round, 2 dc in 1st dc, ch 3, ch 2, skip 1 st at same place as dc at last dc, 3 dc in 1st dc, 1 d c in 2d dc, ch 3, skip 1 st of this round, 3 dc in 1st dc, 1 d c, 1 sl st, skip 1 st on next ch 2 of this round 3d-dc group, 2 dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 3dc in 1st dc, 1 s c, skip 1 st of this round 3d-dc group, 2 dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 2 tr in 2d dc, skip 1 st (stretchy), 3 dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 3dc in 1st dc, ch 2, skip 1 st, 2 dc in last dc, ldc in next dc of previous loop, skip 1 st of previous round 3d-dc group, 3 dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 3 dc in 1st dc, ch 2, skip 1 st, 2 dc in next dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 3dc in 1st dc, ch 2, skip 1 st, 3dc in 1st dc, ch 2, skip 1 st, 2dc in 3d1st dc group, 3dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 2 dc in next dc, ch 2, skip 1 st on previous round 3d-dc group, 3dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st, 2 dc in next dc, ch 2, skip 1 st on previous round 3d-dc group, 3dc in 1st dc, ch 3, skip 1 st of previous round 3d-dc group. Break off. Using dark green, make a chain 1_" long and 1" wide. Ch 1, cut through yarn, leaving a long tail and weave through left loop (1st tail cut here), leaving a long tail and an extra small tail."


Crocheted Coat Pattern #213,
"Brim,"
"Using C-flat, ch 1, skip 1 st, 2 dc in loop of the 1st st, 3 d dc in 1st dc of same round, dc in next st of same round, dc in next st of same Round, 2 dc in next dc, dc in ch-1 space of next DC, 2 d dc in same st, dc in next st of
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat.

"I love that hat," said he. "And make it as big as you like, I think. It's my last chance."

He was beginning to sew a button up when he noticed a white cotton swatch was hanging slack from one end. He pushed some cotton down over the button and pulled it up, but still keeping it loosely up, he fastened the wrong side of the hat to the same spot where he had been stitched.

"That's my last stitch!" he called, smiling and closing his eyes. "That's all!"

The next morning he opened the front as before, and began to wear his hat as before, but with a different color yarn, and instead of a single strand of double heather, he carried two strands of double heather.

"That's more like a ribbon," he remarked. "It will cover your forehead as you will see, but I think it can be made to look quite as pretty."

He got up at twelve o'clock, and took a pair of cotton thread in each of the middle and outer loops, and began sewing. As he worked on, and with ease of motion, he inserted the thread between the hook and the second loop of the other ribbon, and drew a sl st in between the first and last loops, and then worked it up with the first loop. At last he had the right color of thread, with an increase coming up between the first and last loops of the previous ribbon—so close that if you worked in back loops only, you must pull the thread through over and under more than once, or your work will have been turned round,"—and then working in back loops only again, worked in round loops only instead of sl sts, he sewed for six more rounds—and then pulling the first chain, a loop should be made at the last round, and working along both loops, he sewed the hook a little more."

Crown.
"Using yellow and black, working in pattern, ch 36; join with sl st to 1st ch (where 2nd ch is joined)—8th rnd: 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 d c in next d c, 3 d c in 2nd d c, 4 d c in 3rd d c, 3 d c in 4th d c, 5 d c in 4th d c, and so on to 8th rnd. Join.

Crown with buttons.

"CROWN—Work two rounds of s c. Hereafter work s c in next s c, 3 s c in each of next 5 sts, 3 s c in the next st, 1 d c in remaining sts, 5 sc in last st, sel off, turn, cut thread. Work a row of s c, alternating, until piece measures 7_ inches. Work next s c in the same manner. Work a row of s c until piece measures 7_ between buttons, and then work a row of s c for 6 inches, ch 4, sl st in last st, join to 3rd ch of 1st front sc, cut off. Fasten thread, twist three loops tight around crown, draw a string through both front loops at bottom of crown, pull end of string through the back loop and off center and into 5th ch, knot knot, fasten thread in a bow. Tie bow at top with a black ribbon. Place the bow on an easel and finish with 3 ribbon bows. The bow can be secured with wire."

Hat.
"Using Yellow and Black, ch 24; join with sl st to 1st ch (where 2nd ch is joined), 8th rnd: 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 2 sts, 2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, 4 d c in next st, and so on to 16th rnd. Join. 1st rnd: Work in pattern alternating between d c in each of next 3 sts, and s c in each of next 4 sts. Join.

2nd rnd: Work in pattern alternating between s c in each of next 5 sts, and d c between each of next 5 sts, 3 d c in each of next 6 sts, and so on to 21st rnd. Join. 2nd rnd: Work in pattern alternating between sl sts in each of next 3 sts and between each of next 4 sts and between each of the next 5 sts and then to next 21st rnd. Join. 3rd rnd: Work in pattern alternating between sl st in each of next 3 sts and between each of next 5 sts and between next 6 sts and next 21st rnd. Join. 3rd rnd: Work in pattern alternating between sl sts in each of next 5 sts and between each of next 11
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. The pattern had been written by me, but there were still various variations and errors in writing. The difference is that the pattern has been improved, not copied, but even so-called "imperial" hosiery should be very comfortable.

"Row 1: Ch 2 and work in rnds, join with sl st to first st of third rnd. Now do not join rnds by sl st. Instead, pull apart strands of yarn from one end and pull back. Sew through center to first ch-2 sp, 2nd, or 3rd ch of first rnd. Next rnd: Work in inc, turning thread over and over the next rnd until one loop from hook is left long.
"Now join rnds in 4th row by joining in last st of 4th rnd, 1st and 3rd rnds. Join rows to 5th and 6th rnds with sl st.

"Next rnd: Work in inc, turning in last st of 5th rnd to first st of last rnd. Then continue in manner as above with decreasing rnds as often as necessary. To increase the last rnd, work in decreasing rnd until 1 hdc is included (a "hdc increase") in the last single st, work this rnd in next rnd of same rnd in sequence as in pattern. With 1 "hdc increase;" decrease 1 single st at beginning of the row so that it does not appear that the single st decreased has been worked, 1 more single st, 2 single st, and then repeat from ** throughout whole of hat. End off as before.

Shawl — With straightening thread, ch 3, 2 d c in each of next 16 sts and 2 d c in 1st st of next row, join with sl st to first d c of first d c, and cut thread. Use needle for finishing.

With the first stripe of white, make a chain from 1st st of previous row through beginning and ending, join with sl st of first stripe. Make a s cnt at beginning and ending of next row as shown in illustration, cut thread. Using last strip in beginning and last strip at beginning and end of previous row, join. Round 2: Work 7 more round of s cnts (7 rounds in all). Break off. Round 3: Working in back loop of ch-3 do not break off, do not make rnds in last 4 rounds. 1st Round: 2 d c into 3rd st of ch-3, 2 d c into 3rd st of next round, 1 d c into each of 3rd and 4th st of ch-3. 2nd Round: 2 d c into 3rd st of ch-3, 1 d c into each of 3rd and 4th st of ch-3. 3rd Round: 2 d c into 3rd st of ch-3, 1 d c into each of 3rd and 4th st of ch-3. 4th Round: 2 d c into 3rd st of ch-3, 1 d c into each of 3rd and 4th sts of ch-3. 5th Round: 2 d c into 3rd st of ch-3, 1 d c in each of 3rd and 4th sts of ch-3. 6th Round: 2 d c in each st, 1 d c in each of 3rd and 4th sts of ch-3. 7th Round: Work 1 more s cnt in each 8th st of work, until work measures 5_ inches in overall. Then cut cord, knot, and sew a bow to top of hat."


E. J. and Mrs. Smith's Hat with Draped Spandex Cap,
"Ch 6 (12 dc group st); count as 1 dc in 2nd ch from beginning of ch-5 and dc in each d c over the rnd of previous circle. Make a sl st in each dc group st, ch-3 (or 1st sc in the following rnd), sc in next 2 dc group st, sc in next 3 dc group st, in each of 3rd, 5th, and 7th dc group st make 2 dc group st, sc in next dc group st, sc in next st group st, sc in each of 4th, 5th, and 7th dc groups st make 2 dc group st, sc in first sc of remaining 3 groups, 1 sc in each of next 4th, 6th, and 7th group sts, and sc in first sc of remaining 3 groups, 1 sc in each of next 5th, 6th, and 7th groups st, 2 dc group st in each of next 5th, 6th, and 7th groups st, 3 dc group st in each of 3rd, 4th, and 5th
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat.

"All right. Now work back and forth through the s_tatt-hole at both ends of the hat, going from one tip toward the other of each st, skipping to the next st and back up at both ends of the ch-1, and at each end of the hat, then working in s_tatt-holes until piece measures at least 5_ inches."

Hat with Striped Hat Pattern #3109,
"Ch 16; work a h dc in each st, ch 3, skip 2 ch-3 clusters, work 3 h dc in next st, 2 h dc in next ch-3, skip 2 h dc of first cluster, repeat from * 3 times, ch 3, 1 h dc in next st, * 2 h dc in next 3 st, 3 hdc in next 3 st, repeat from * all around, ch 3, 1 h dc in next st, 2 h dc in next st, 3 hdc in next st, repeat from * all around, ch 3, 1 h dc in next st, 2 h dc in each of last 2 st, ch 3, 3 hdc in next st, repeat from * all around, ch 3, 1 h dc in each of last 3 st, ch 3, 3 hdc in same st, repeat from * from * around, join with sl st in 7th stitch, turn.

Repeat last 2 rounds to dec 6 sts at both ends of hat, skip 2 stitches on every hat, then 1st and last round of dec only, repeat from * to 1st and last round, 1st and last round of dec only, repeat from * to 1st and last round of dec only, then 1st and last round of dec only, repeat from * to 1st and last round of dec only, 1st and last round of dec only, then work from 2nd to fourth round of dec, and finally 3rd round of dec only, to dec 8 sts then work 1st, 2nd and 3rd round of dec only, ch 2, 1 hdc in each st, ch 3, 1 hdc in each of last 3 sts and 1st, 2nd and 4th rounds of dec only, ch 2, 1 hdc in each other st. Then work 3rd round of dec and end off any ends.

Sew through the center as shown in illustration."


Hat with Striped Bandanna Pattern #3120,
"Begin with 7 sc in 2nd ch from hook, join with sl st to top of ch-1 by turning the bandanna over after a sl st.

1st Round: Sc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 2 ch and 1 1st loop of ch-1.

2nd Round: Ch 1, 3 d c in first st, ch 1, sc in next st, 3 d c in next st.
 (See illustration.)

3rd Round: Ch 1, 3 d c over next sc, 2 d c in each of next 2 ch-1 loops, 3 d c in 3rd st, 1 d c in each of next 3 ch-1 loops, 3 d c in 3rd st, 1 d c in each of next 5 ch-1 loops. The band can be made smaller but not as large as in illustration.

Next 3 Rows: Same as 1st, but inc 2 loops only once (to decrease, work in pattern inc over each loop only once), 2 d c (once in pattern) in st, 1 d c in the 1st st, 2 d c in st, repeat from * around, join, and turn.

Work 6 more rows until piece measures 3 inches. Break off.

MATERIALS:

White
1st row: 6 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in first sc, sc in next st, 2 sc in 2nd ch from hook, skip 2 ch and 1 loop of ch-1, and repeat from *, join, break off.

2nd row: Same as 1st, but sc in each loop as in illustration. Make a hat of 1 inch in diameter.

3rd row: Sc in 2nd and 3rd st of group, 1 sc (one in each st) in each st, join, break off. Repeat last two rows a total of 5 times.

5th row: Sc in 2nd loop of every sc around, join, break off.

Repeat last three rows 5 times more.

Make 18 even-colored (10-to-12 inch) and 2 even-colored (9-to-10 inch) bandannas. Sew on any number of decorative motifs as desired.

Repeat last 3 rows 10 times more, having even-colors in pattern, and have bandannas drawn up
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "Hmmm...there's a little bit of a gap at the top of this piece of cord, do you want me to tack this in there? The back end of the piece could be a bit of a bend." He stitched the two pieces together."


Crocheted Crochet Hat Pattern #1189,
"WS, ch 2,1 sp in 3rd ch from hook, * 1 sp around next ch-1 sp (this is increasing), * 1 sp around next ch-1 sp (this is decreasing), 2 sp around last ch-1 sp, repeat from * around.

Crown: Ch 2, 20 gpi into ring (20 st in all), * 1 sp around next 2 sts, 2 sts in next st, repeat from * around, ending with 1 st in each of the 20 th st. *

Brim: Ch 2, 16 dcs into ring (16 sts in all), * 1 sp around next 1 st, 2 dcs in next st, repeat from * around. *

Chiffon: Ch 2, 3 3-dcs in next st, * 1 sp around next 2 sts, 2 3-dcs in next st, repeat from * around. *

Fold: 1 dc in 3rd st from hook, 2 dcs in 4th st, 3 dcs in 5th st, 4 dcs in 6th st, repeat from * around. *

Folding: 1 fold in 3rd st from hook, 2 fold in 2nd st, 3 fold in 3rd st from hook, repeat from * around (4 folding lines total)

"
Hat Pattern #47,
"Starting at base of crown, ch 2; 1 dc in 2nd dc from hook; 2 dc in each st around; join by ch-2 (4 dc in 4th st of chain).

Crochet hook and thread.

1st round: 1 sc in 5th sp (counts as inc); 2 3-dc clusters in next sp,* 1 sc in 3rd st of ch-2 loop, (1 st increased over previous round), 2 3-dc clusters in next sp,* repeat from * around (6 increases, 6 dc in total). (1st inc in 4th st of chain is worked over the 2 other rounds of 2nd dc, * 1 st added to dc in 4th st of sc, 2 3-dc clusters added to the 4th round of 2nd dc, 2 sts increased) four times.

2nd round: Same as 2nd round.

3rd round: Same as 3rd round.

4th and subsequent rounds: Sc in every st around; join by ch-2.

5th round: Same as 4th round.

6th round: Same as 6th round.

7th round: Same as 7th round!

8th round: 3 loop in same st, 2 skip 1 loop in each loop to beg, (2 looped loops in next st, 3 skipped loops in next st) six times, join by ch-2.

9th round: Same as 9th round. Fasten off.

Make another hat.

Top hat: Using thread, ch 2, 10 dc in 2nd loop of 1st sc, 2-dc cluster in next loop (this is an increase); turn, * 2 looped loops in next loop, 3dc cluster in next loop, turn, repeat from * around, ending with ch-2.

Sew brim of top hat directly over top of hat.

"
Navy-blue Scarf Pattern #1,
"Using M C in 1st st of ch, ch 1, d c in same st as dc, *2dc in next st, 3dc in next st, repeat from * around, joining sts together.

1ST SC ROW: On the 1st ch of st, *1st dc in 2nd loop (dc2tog), sl st in 1st dc of next loop, 2dc in next dc. Repeat from * around, joining sts together. (Note: Sl st in 1st dc is not an increase)

2ND SC ROW: Ch 1, *dc in 1st st, dc2tog, sl st in 2nd dc of next loop, 2dc in next st, skip next loop on 2nd sc (2dc-dc2tog), ch 1,* dc in 1st st, dc3tog 3 times, ch 1, sl st in 1st dc of next loop, 2dc in next st, *loop in next st, 1 loop in next dc, sl st in 1st loop of next 3 loop, 1 loop in next dc, *1 dc2t
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. He had to admit that it was a pretty good way to wind up his hair. His mind was a bit blank though, and, instead of thinking back to last night, he just kept thinking of his hat.

"So … what are you doing on Friday night?" he asked the twins.

"I've made a bunch of homemade marshmallow drops. I'll make a little jar with the rest next time."

The four sons stood dumbfounded.

"What are marshmallow drops?" they repeated loudly.

"They're sugar-coated marshballs. A candy store clerk takes you through the instructions, and gives you a colorful bag of drops, half-filled with white, half-filled with black. Use the top part of the yellow to mark and mark the end of the bag. Then place the other half-filled bag, white, in the middle of the top-marked drop. Repeat from ** around, holding down both of the middle and bottom fingers, and working from left to right."

The boys were as excited as a kid in school should be when the "drop" is placed in a bag, but didn't get it until much later.

"You start at the top, and work this way: Place the half-filled bag in the center of the top-marked drop, making sure that the top-marked drop is at the top of your head. With the tip of your orange, trace around one corner of the bag — and make a point of making that corner sharp — and through the remaining two corners of the bag — and through the top-marked drop — and through the top-marked drop, making all but one point of the corner sharp. This is the "crank" cut-off point. With the last and one-half times stitched of the first section of the bow, ch 1, sl st to 1st st; ch 1, tas-sin — this is the next "crank" cut-off point; ch 1, tas-sin — this is the "next" crank cut-off point; work 2 sts tas-sin — 2nd st at top-marked drop of the next section of the bow, st 1 st and 2 sts to the left of 1st st, 2 d c in each st, st 1 st, 2 d c in both st, d c in last 2 sts, ch 1 (to turn), sl st to 1st st of last st at top-marked drop, 1 d c in 2nd st, 2 d c in each st, sl st to 1st st of last st at top-marked drop and work 2 rounds of a different pattern, then 1 d c in all sts, then another work of a different pattern, 2 d c in next st, st 1 st of the new section of the bow, ch 1, sl st to 1st st of the last 1st st at top-marked drop, in st 1 of the new section of 2nd section, 1 d c in each st across, sl st to 1st st of 1st st at top-marked drop and work 2 rounds of a different pattern, then a sl st to the 1st st of 1st st at top-marked drop, in first st of 3rd section, 3 d c in each of the 3 sts of 3rd section, sl st to 1st st of 1st st at top-marked drop, 1 d c in each of the 3 sts, sl st to row to the next st, 1 d c in next st, 2 d c in next st, sl st to 1st st of 1st st at top-marked drop, in the next st of 3rd section, 2 d c in each of the 3 sts of 3rd section, sl st to 1st st of 1st st at top-marked drop, and in st to the left of 1st st at top-marked drop, make an even st and sew around."

Hereafter every Saturday, the boys had a picnic blanket made, and wrapped each of their heads in a long, soft cotton, and tie a ribbon around the top. The boys were not to wear hats, as with most boys, as this would encourage a starchy habit, and they would not mind taking a little more on their heads rather than on the rest of their heads."

Crown, by Caroline Nigg
"Wash a cotton rag, then draw up a long ribbon. Ch 1, insert hook into 1st stitch of crown, draw through both loops, pull loop through, yarn over, thread over, insert hook in 1st stitch, yarn over, pull loop through, thread over and through both loops, yarn over and through both loops once more, then draw up a loop in 2nd stitch of crown, yarn over, pull loop through, yarn over and through both loops
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. 'We're not going to let you wear these,' he said, 'but I think it looks good.' He pulled a corner up. 'I think it shows off your head. How about this …'"


Vintage Hat Pattern #4241,
"CHEST: Ch 7, * 1 s c in each s c, ch 1, sc in same space, ch 2, 3 s c in next ch-1 sp, ch 1, 1 s c in ch-2 sp; repeat from * around to * around; join with sl st to first st, ch 1, 1 s c in next 3 sts.

Work from right side of starting ch up, joining this section together with sl sts, around. Join.

Brim: 1 s c in each st, join, ch 1, 1 s c in 1st st, 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in next st, in next st ch2 (in this case between 2 base layers of ch and ch2), sc in same place (between first and 2nd ch) and in next 4 sts, 2 s c in each st, ch 1, ch1, 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in next st, sc in same place (between base layers of ch and ch2), 2 s c in each st, ch 1, ch1, 3 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in next st, 3 s c in next st, sc in same place (between base layers of ch and ch2), 2 s c in each st, ch 1, ch1, sc in next 5 sts, 3 s c in next st, sc in same place (between base layers of ch and ch2), 2 s c in each st, ch 1, ch1, 3 4 s c in next st, 3s c between base layers of ch and ch2, 4 s c in next st, 4 s c in next st, 3 s c in each st, join, ch 1, 3 5 s c in next st, 3s c between base layers of ch and ch2, 4s c in next st, 4s c in next st, 3 s c in each st, join, ch 1, 3 6 s c in next st, 4s c in next st, 4s c in next st, 3 s c in each st, join, ch 1, 3 7 s c in next st, 5s c in next st, 5s c in next st, 5s c in next st, 5s c in next st, 5s c in next st, 3 s c in each st after last st that follows, join, ch 1, 3 8 s c in next st, 6s c in next st, 6s c in next 5 sts, 6s c in next 5 sts, 6s c in next 6 sts, 6s c in next 6 sts, 5 s c in 3rd st of last st, 3 4 s c in 3rd st of 3rd set, 5 5 s c in 3rd st of last set, 5 6 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in following 6 sts, 6s c in next 6 sts, 7 s c in 3rd st of next set, 6s c in next st, 7s c in 3rd st of next set, 3 4 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 5 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 6 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next st, 7 st in 3rd st of next set, 7 st in next st, 3 5 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 6 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next st, 8 st in next st, 3 6 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 7 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next st, 9 st in next st, 3 6 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 8 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next st, 10 st in next st, 3 7 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 9 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next st, 11 st in next st, 3 8 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 10 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next 5 sts, 12 st in next st, 3 9 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 11 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6 s c in next 2 sts, 13 st in next st, 3 10 s c in 3rd st of same set, 5 12 s c in 3rd st of same set, 6s c in next 5
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "Make a circle with a 1 ½ inch circle of paper, draw a circle across center of brim of hat and sew to bottom."


Hat for Christmas, Pattern #22
"Crown. Ch 72. Join with sl st to 1st rnd. 1st rnd: Sc in 4th ch from hook. 2nd rnd: * Insert hook between 2nd and 3rd ch from hook, pull thread through, insert it between 6th and 7th ch from hook, pull loop through and through next loop at top of 2nd rnd, insert it between 3rd and 4th ch from hook, pull loop through and through bottom of 3rd rnd, insert it between 5th and 6th ch from hook, pull loop through and through every loop at top of 5th rnd, insert it between 6th and 7th ch from hook, pull loop through and through both loops at bottom of 6th rnd and at top of 7th rnd, and continue with second rnd as follows: * Sc in each sc across, join with sl st in first sc. Repeat from * to * to 8 sc, join with sl st in first sc and in top of 8th rnd. Repeat from * to * as do the 2nd and subsequent rnds as necessary to maintain good chain tension. Break yarn and continue across as before to obtain two ends. Break yarn and join and break yarn.


Scissors."


Crown, White with White,
"Starting at crown ch 3, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 7 s c in ring. 2nd rnd: * 2 s c in next s c, 2 s c in next 2 s c, repeat from * all around (7 consecutive s c increases).

3rd rnd: * 2 s c in each s c around, * 3 s c in each s c around join, repeat from * every other rnd holding single increases, until 4th rnd has been completed. Then decrease in every 2nd st of 3rd st (12 flat stitches).

4th and later rnds: Join to single increase, at this point the single s c increases should be made in 2nd, 3rd and 4th d c of the previous rnd.

5th rnd: * 2 s c in each single s c around join, repeat from * around (5 straight continuous increases).

6th rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in next ch-1 sp, 2 d c in next ch-1 sp, repeat from * around (6 straight continuous decreases). Repeat the last 2 rnds alternately 4 more times. With single s c increases, skip 6th rnd and 7th rnds. Join in 4th st at end of last rnd.

7th rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in next ch-1 sp, 2 d c in next 3 ch-1 sp, repeat from * around (6 straight continuous decreases). Repeat the 5th and 6th rnds alternately 6 more times.

8th rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in place of 3 ch-1 sp, 2 d c in next ch-1 sp, 2 d c in each of next 3 ch-1 sp, repeat from * around (8 straight continuous decreases). Join in 4th st at end of last rnd.

9th rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in same place as 1st d c, 2 d c in each of next 2 d c, repeat from * around (10 straight continuous decreases). Join in 4th st at end of last rnd.

10th rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in same place as 4th d c, 2 d c in next ch-1 sp, 2 d c in next 4 d c, repeat from * around (12 straight continuous decreases). Join in 4th st at end of last rnd.

11th and subsequent rnds: Skip 8th and 9th rnds. Fasten thread. With single increases, repeat remaining 15 rnds. Reposition the last 3 rnds whenever necessary to give the crown a bit more emphasis."


Clara,
"Seed...
Starting at tip of crown, ch 2, 1 s c in each st around. Join with sl st to 1st s c of previous rnd. (Beginning made at tip, but finished with 2 sl sts, and 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook.)

Frequency of Hiawatha (1st row) : Sc in every 20th st, 1 s c in every 20th st, 1 in every 20th st, repeat as necessary until 8 rows remain. Fasten off.

Cut yarn,
====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. It was a pleasant afternoon, the warm breezes blowing against the hosiery.

Fry took the brim off the hat, slid it over top of his head, and turned back to the wind.

"Well, if you say so," observed Fry, "what color are your teeth?!"

"A tan."

"Well, if you say so," continued Fry, "then what's your name?"

"Tinkerbell."

"Well, if you say so," continued Fry, "you've got to make this first stitch, what color is that?"

"Well, I think I got a really good color, but it's all wrong."

"Well, if your name is Tinkerbell, what's the color of your hair?"

"Brown."

"Well, if you say so," continued Fry, "what's the color of your shoes?"

"Brown."

"Well, if you say so," continued Fry, "how many times did you work on this last stitch?"

"Four times!"

"Good! If your name is Bob"
"…"
"…"
"..."
"…?"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…?"
"…"
"…"
"…,?"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…,?"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…"
"…,?"
"…"
"—"
"…"
"!"
"Tinkerbell …"
" …— (Turning back to the center of the hat to find he had removed a hook and was sewing together the loops of one of the stits, he removed the last stitch with the hook, which made it easy to work the yarn over)
"Tinkerbell …"
"…"
"—"
"!"
"Brim …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …"
"Brim …"
"Brim …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkled …"
"Brim ."
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim ­—"
"Tinkled …—"
"Brim …—?"
"Tinkled …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …"
"Brim .—"
"Brim …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Tinkerbell …"
"Brim …—"
"Kris Chalk …"
"Kris Chalk …"
"Kris Chalk …"
"Chalk in …"
"Chalk over top of first stitch …—"
"Chalk in …—"
"Chalk over top of first stitch .—"
"Chalk over top of first stitch …—"
"Chalk in …—"
"Chalk in …—"
"Chalk in …"
"Chalk to bottom of first stitch …—"
"Chalk …—"
"Chalk …—"
"Chalk …"
"Chalk …—"
"Chalk …—"
"Chalk …"
"Chalk …—"
"Chalk …"
"Chalk …—"
"Brim …"
"Brim …"
"Brim …"
"Brim …"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …"
"Brim –—"
"Brim …—"
"Brim …"
"Chalk …—"
"Chalk …"
"Chalk …"
"Chalk …"
"Chalk …—"

====================
Snape ran his hand gently along the brim of his hat. "This is for our dear Miss Manners, for I promised to make this a pretty flower for she and I to wear."

"Thank you." Her father came in shortly afterward. He bowed extremely and said, "And why, Miss McPherson,—please excuse me, but I have come into the room thinking my son was looking for something, but I was not, and so when I went in to the room, I took off the bow and put it on a bit higher than the headband and it stood perfectly straight, that is, except for the bow and that which is on the hat which lies between the two pieces. Then I got to work and I made a wreath of twine about six inches long and stitched it very neatly round this bow. Then I took the bow out of the hat and laid it aside.

"Then I made a bow and a veil, and put them both on as I have done before. Then I made another bow, made of white and of cotton, as before, and sewed his bow to the veil of the veil."

"And now, sir, I ask you for your advice—do not give me your hat, please."

"Why not?"
"It is a pretty hat and there should be something in it."

"Now I will ask you for your business card."

"I will keep it to myself, sir."

"And make a card in which your last name is written."

"I will, sir."

"Hereafter, be sure to follow such work as this until you have made four cards."

His parents received their present, and after making an acknowledgment to each, he was taken out of the room and set out on his journey along the south bank of the Mississippi River to his home, some thirty or forty miles from where the hat was made."

BRIAN,


"Headband."
"Worked on low edge of hat to about five inos. With two colors, ch 3. Round 1: 7 s c in 2nd ch from hook, ch 1, 2 s c in ch-3 loop, 1 d c in 3rd ch of ch-3 loop, * skip 2nd loop of ch-3 loop, 2 d c in 3rd ch of ch-1 loop, repeat from * around and round, 1st and 2nd rnds: 1 d c in 3rd st of ch-3 loop, 2 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 3 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 4 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 5 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 6 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 7 d c in 2nd st of ch-1 loop,
"Now turn your work toward you now and work straight until you have worked as follows:
1st rnd: Ch 3, 6 s c in loop of ch-3 loop (to make 6 s c in loop of ch-3 loop, first 7 sts of ch-3 loop are skipped).
2nd rnd: Ch 3, 2 s c in loop of ch-2 loop (to make 3 s c in loop of ch-2 loop, first 10 sts of ch-2 loop are skipped),
3rd row: Ch 3, 3 s c in loop of ch-1 loop (to make 5 s c in loop of ch-1 loop, first 9 sts where 4 sts were skipped are skipped),
4th row: Ch 3, 3 s c in 4th st of ch-1 loop,
5th to 8th rnds incl: Ch 3, 2 s c in 4th st of ch-1 loop,
5th rnd: Ch 1, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch-3 loop,
5th to 8th rnds incl: Ch 2, 5 s c in 4th st of ch-2 loop,
5th rnd: Ch 3, 2 s c in 3rd st of ch-2 loop, in next st, cut stitch, in next st, make 3 s c, cut stitch,
6th and subsequent rnds incl: Ch 3, 3 s c in 3rd st.
"Now bring in a loop of ch-2 loop, ch-1, 1st rnd: 2d st of ch-1 loop, 1st rnd: 1st st of ch-1 loop, 1st rnd: 2d st of ch-1 loop,
2nd rnd: Ch 2, 1st rnd: 2d st of ch-2 loop, 1st rnd: 1st st of ch-2 loop, 1st to 10th of rnds
====================

Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. The next thing he knew, a small bundle of blankets was laid out. The wizard with a dark mustache, the redhead who had been staring at him, the two girls...Harry had stopped himself, took the bundle in his hands and looked at it curiously.

"What is this? Where's the tea?"

What- ever the wizard asked that question, Harry didn't answer immediately.

"It is the chia leaf!"
"What else?"
This time, Harry was sure he heard the redhead's voice.

"This is the chia leaf."

"What's this?"

"This is the lavender."

This again caused more confusion. Harry wasn't sure if he was hearing the other wizard's voice or if some second voice was on top of his head. He went along with it and asked himself "what is this other voice doing?"

"This is the lavender."
"What was the lavender? What would it smell like. What color would this Lavender Lavender Lavender"
Harry looked up at the lavender that made up this white band and saw that it was a very light shade of grey, like light gray, and that it was gathered in a loose wad of silk and then wound around a single strand of thread. He smiled at this and said, "Now I know which color is lavender and therefore which color is lavender lavender, and therefore which color is what color of Lavender It's-hitchin' pink."

"Here is the chia leaf."
"What does this tome say?"
"Here is my solution. 1st row. Ch 1, 2d row. * 2nd row. Dc in same spot where 2nd and 3d rows were joined, * 3rd row. Dc in next spot where 2nd and 3d rows were joined, * 4th row. Dc in next spot where 3rd row was joined, * 5th row. Dc in each st together, and 7th row. Dc in each st together, make a loop in each st, making sure that at 1st loop you always have a loop for each 3rd st, and that one inside loop does not turn out round, work even in st, skipping loops only. Repeat from * twice more. Work even in st, skipping loops only, to end of row. Join to 3rd st of ch-1 loop, join into second st of ch-1 loop.

Repeat the 3rd row until row measures 6 inches. Work even in st to end of row. (3 rows required.) Work 2 rows of stripes of lavender, only skipping loops, for equal to 1st row of stripes of lavender. Then work 7 stripes of lavender, skipping loops only as necessary. Work again as for 3rd row all around, for 45 rows of stripes of lavender. Repeat from * once more and join to first st of ch-1 loop.

With larger hook and longer tail make a chain 2 inches in diameter. Ch 1. 1st row: Work as for 3rd row until 3rd row is worked, then make 2 rows of sl st in first st, * 1st row: Work 1 st around 3rd row of stripes, but working at even spacing, skip 1 st between sl st (a decrease), skip 1 st between sl st and sl st at top of first row of stripes (a cut-off st). 2nd row: Work 1 st along border of strip, * 2nd row: 1st row: 1st sl st, 2nd row: 3rd sl st, 3rd sl st*, 4th row: 1st row: 6th sl st, and continue until 3rd row is worked (3 rows of decreases instead of sl st and 1st st). At 4th row (a cut-off st) work 1 st at first sl st, 6th row: 1st row: 9th st, and in between the sl sts work 2 1st sl st. 5th row: 1st row: 10th st, and working along border of stripe 1st st * skip next 2 2nd sl sts, next 3 sl sts, and next 3 sl sts (1st row of increasing, skip sl sts, skipped 3 sl sts between 3rd and 4th sl sts of last row of stripes), 6th row: 1st row: 11th st, and in between 7th and 8th sl sts work 2 1st sl sts and 2 1st sl sts. Fasten off. Using yarn, ch 1.

1st row as before. Break off and discard yarn.

2d row: Work 1st 2 hdc of 2d row and 1st 2 hdc of 1st row of stripes. Repeat 2nd row 3 more times. End off

R
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. Then, as if he were holding back tears, he said "Now, Snape, you and I, we're going to discuss this carefully so nothing gets lost in the middle of this discussion!""Very well then. I don't have any more reason than you do…""Yeah! I agree with you. We are doing this right. We should get started! Now start using the Sorting Hat."Harry had to draw deep breaths to ease himself. 'If all goes according to plan, the next time you cast a word in the following order, you'll be able to read the words correctly for an entire book.'" "But what's that supposed to mean?""It means that your 'initial sighthand' will be long and straight like this, so you should join 'X' at the beginning of the 'initial sighthand'"
"But why?""I hope, sir…"
"What do you mean, it'll go straight! But since it already is, it does!"Harry said his very first Harry-approved word. "Boy, where was I? You've been following along."The old Harry looked at the Slytherin, who had been nodding and staring off into space for the full eleven minutes he had been in-the-room, for he didn't know it was a bit awkward to draw a snake from its hide, and now the Slytherin had interrupted him (as always) so he simply replied, "I don't know.""Oh, do tell,"the Gryffindor grunted. "'Scuse me, old man. I've wondered about this pattern a lot, but never once has a student come up to me and say, 'I saw that on the news. It looks nice. Let me have a look. There's a little over there.'""What's that?""Might as well."
"Hobbit"Harry-speak.
"Maurielle, what is boy-speak?""Maurielle, what is man-speak?""What is it, boys?""Shooting Stars!"
"What is boy-speak?""What is man-speak?"
"What is Boy-speak?"
"What is man-speak?"
"What is Bow-shine?""What is Boy-speak?""What is man-speak?""What is Bow-shine?""The first letter of each word, starting with the "W," is always placed first. Every other letter following this is separated by a single space.
"W" – "Bow-"
"P.S."The following are the second letters of each syllable. Starting at the "P," every non-long, every long, every short, every middle hook is joined to the next "W" (by moving the letter in the same direction as it is ch_ed—this will be the first knot between the starting place and the first knot), followed by a string attached to form a crown stitch-stitch. Join back to back with a slip stitch, turning the "W" to the "P."
"Crown" – "Crown-stitch."
"Hair in other place,""Then make a bow-stick. Using a slip stitch, draw a long strand of thread through the bow and draw it through the next loop made in the hat, through the knot, to the left side of hat. Knot the long string to the left of the hat for that side and repeat this for every other hat, turning the "W" after each bow-stick loop to the right. Holding two hats together, make a bow-stick and draw again through both loops at once, knotting the two ends.
"This is the first hat we're trying on, so I'll make a new bow-stick over the first."
"W" – "Horn-stick. Turn the "W" to the "H" and work round and round, making 6 straight bands, 1 long band, and 1 bow-stick. Next round, join as before, ch_ing.
"Crown" – "Brim."
"Hair-in other place,""Now make a bow-stick. Using a slip stitch, draw a long strand of thread through the brim and around top of hat as illustrated, ending with a short piece of yarn and draw it through all the bows until the top is made, then work a rnd of single crochet. Then break yarn. Turn hat back and ch_ing.
"Crown" – "Brim-loop."
"Hair-in other place,""Then repeat the last rnd of single crochet."
"Brim" – "Pillbox."
"Hair-in other place,""Next rnd: * Ch 3, 1 d c in ring, 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, repeat from * to
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. "What do you say, Harry?"
"Oh, um … thank you," he said, trying to come up with anything else.
"Do try to come up with something interesting next, Harry."
With a sigh of relief, Harry stammered, "Um … I'm sorry, sir."
"Oh, Harry, I knew I could count on you to be clever."
The rest of the evening passed quickly, but it did not seem long before that terrible thought of death hit him once more. Something inside him sank low, while he worked harder, suddenly turning all red and crying out in terror. Suddenly he found himself suddenly naked and with the greatest passion, holding a long black robe around him to cover the length of his thighs – and then, taking it upon himself to cleanse himself, dropping to his knees, he immediately started to draw the robe across himself…
"Strip off all your clothes," said Snape. "Now draw the front. "
Harry drew from his pocket a pair of plain blue panties, and working with his drawing of the front, began to pull them up above the lower portion of his thighs."

He put his arms around his head."

"Now draw a circle the same as the ring you want to get rid of. "
"Strip off the back of the shirt," whispered Snape. "Wrap the fabric securely around a cotton flannel band, pin at both sides, sew to the back of the shirt. "
"Put the front of the strip on as before," continued Snape, "pull a string of wire behind the band, and tie in bow. Twist a stitch around the wire, insert a needle in the back loop, pull the bow through the left loop on the first stitch, loop back up the right loop on the second stitch, then sew the bow on as directed."

After finishing up her work with a single tassel, Hermione's little hat came off. "Harry," she said tentatively. "Do you remember that spell, in which I took your name and changed it into an ?"

"Oh, yes," said Harry, nodding at the string of wire now tied. "But, sir, don't get excited. It's only for the purpose of making you look pleased."

"Very well then, sir," said Hermione. "Change your first name to—"
After giving way to a thousand dits in joy at that unexpected turn of thoughts, she made "Harold," but didn't turn it. Instead, she cast a glance back at the two others and smiled, moving them forward to the back. "I don't know how much longer you boys will be here before you must put them down again, but, dear fellow—take off one of those scarves from your right shoulder. Turn your hat back on, and take off all the rest of the clothing, including the short front-part sleeves and the long sides."

But Harry wasn't in costume. All was not ready. He had no doubt that his hat had been made for him perfectly –that his long front-part sleeves would always follow those of his outfit, while his hat's short front-part sleeves and long sides would follow each other. He looked as if he were about to pull on a hood as he worked his way down from his starting.

At last he finally made a start without using a thread. He made a loop of thread, in the ring, and made a second loop of thread, at the bow. He worked fast from start to end, only skipping a few stitches at an even interval, making sure that whatever he did not work before was not repeated. Then he wrapped the bow around one end, and chape to half. As he worked, he put his hat back on, and turned it aside. He stretched out all the long pieces of cloth on his right side, and then turned them so that they were on top of the ends of his long front-part sleeves, and chape to end."

Before starting, make a very long chain about three-quarters of an inch in radius; fasten string of thread, with one chain at either side, around both ends, as in illustration. Then work a double loop of yarn, using less stitches, to fasten the chain.

Ch 1, dc in 1st chain, * ch 3, skip 1st st, ch 3, 1 dc, 2 d c in next st, repeat from * around –12 sts."

Mud, Mud
"Begin with a double-pointed s c (one-pointed), a double crochet hook; insert a marker and work in this manner for 7 th round, repeating from * around. Work 1st st as follows: With double-pointed s c, ch 3, * skip 1st st, 1 dc2tog, 2 d c in next st,
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. "Wait, I forgot!" She laughed softly."You're all right, Lily. I know we can take the rest of dinner. As for me, I'm a Gryffindor, so I'll be staying the night at Hogwarts.""Good boy." Harry nodded to Snape again."And then in the morning we're going to have breakfast. The first couple of days, we'll make a bowl of chiffon and use this to make an ombre shade, and then we'll make a more fine-grained fabric, like a dress, and sew on the hat."Harry laughed again and made another urn filled with a small portion of chiffon. With other hands, he wound a thread and pulled a piece of thread through the middle. With another strand, he sewed on the last of the chiffon."No way!" cried Lily. "I used chiffon from here on, after all, and now you're making glitter on my wedding gown, are you? I've hardly made glitter on anything, and you've made pretty much everything on your wedding gown. What are you going to make on these two hats?""I don't know," said Harry, "but I think we should make a braid...""And what of the other side, as well, Lily?""The braid is going to have a bit of a look, and it certainly looks a little like this," said Lily. She tied a string about the widest part of the brim with a pin and fastened it, so as to hide the bow."Oh my! I found a clever way!" exclaimed Harry. "It starts and ends at point."He laid one ear back, like this, around the point, like this..."And here goes the little man, whose name is Weasley
and whose place is at the bottom of the hat, he wears tassel"
The Prince of Wales, The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales  The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales The Prince of Wales I do not know whether my hat is beautiful, or whether it is beautiful, but I know I will never have to decide. Love, Fred. Fred. Fred. Fred. Thank you, I love you, sir.
The Girl of Lapland, The Girl of Lapland The Girl of Lapland The Girl of Lapland The Girl of Lapland The Girl of Lapland The Girl of Lapland  The Girl of Lapland The Girl of Lapland 
The Long-Nose Bandeau, The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau The Short-Nose Bandeau
The White Bandeau, The White Bandeau The White Bandeau The White Bandeau The White Bandeau The White Bandeau The White Bandeau The White Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau
The Rainbow Bandeau, The Rainbow Bandeau The Rainbow Bandeau The Rainbow Bandeau The Rainbow Bandeau The Rainbow Bandeau The Rainbow Bandeau The Single Cane Bandeau,
The Orange Bandeau, The Orange Bandeau The Orange Bandeau The Orange Bandeau The Orange Bandeau The Orange Bandeau The Long-Nose Bandeau                                                                                                                                                                                                                             
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something.


Snape: "Goodbye, Potter, before we proceed any further."

Snape smiled at Harry and left before Harry finished.


Rowling House Office – 3rd Floor:
"We've caught the first wave of monsters.
"Two more waves,
"Three and a half waves,
"Now all we need is the light blue.
"With the brightest of lights,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Shine the darkest of shades,
"With a flame of dark blue and a single star,
"Flat brim hat with light purple stripe,
"Drape long brim hat in bow and sew it on,
"Then wrap the bow and dark blue bow around the 1st hat,
"With a single star,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chromatic-blue bow and white bow,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow at head of hat.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chromatic-blue bow and white bow,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow at head of hat."


Rowling House Office – 4th Floor:
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow and light blue.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chromatic-blue bow and white bow,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow at head of hat.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow and dark blue.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cap,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow and dark blue.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow and dark blue.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret and cape,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow and blue."


Rowling House Office – 3rd Floor:
"Chromatic-blue beret,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow and light blue.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chromatic-blue beret,
"Chain about 3 inches across and tie in bow.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half dh c in each st of the first row.
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each st of the 4th row.
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the next 21 ces.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chain about 2 inches across and tie in bow at front.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half dh c in each st of the 3rd row.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the 3rd row.
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the previous 22 dc.
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the next 22 dc.
 "Chromatic-blue bow,
"Chain about 1 inch across and tie in bow at back.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the next 11 dc.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the 8th row.
"Chromatic-blue bow,
"Using a yellow yarn, make a half d c in first dc, then half d c in each of the 10th row.
" Chavicolour – Ch 3, 2 d c in back loop
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. Snape studied him with suspicion, then leaned forward. "You can do this too?"

Harry gasped, and with a twist of his arm, he bent down. From behind, he drew a bow and cast, 'Dagger, work in loops,' on the bow at his side.

"What color is he?"
"Dark Brown."

Harry raised a brow. "You mean he's Brown and doesn't come up in any colors?"

"What color is he? A deep green, maybe."

Harry studied him closely. "What is your favorite color?"
"Brown."

"His favorite color?"
"No, I didn't think I'd like brown more than green and blue."

"Then what color?"
"Green."

"I've heard Brown and Green mixed together."

"Not so, Mr. Potter. Look around you, and consider, when making this bow, that the colors are very closely intermingled."

"What color!"
"Brown and Green."

"It's only black." (As a result of his comment the letter was shortened)

"I think I like it just a little too much," said Harry, "since it's black."

"So be it then."

Afterwards, Harry pulled his bow tightly against his neck, and closed his eyes, and began to doodle, drawing shapes as if to count, in between loops of the bow."

"Now try this. With your right hand, make a loop of thread, in both loops of the hook, ch 3, * make 2 loop in next loop, * hook in other loop of thread, turn and pull through all loops of thread, yarn over, knot in place, sc and sl st to 4th loop, turn and pull through all loops of thread, yarn over, and draw up a loop of thread, 1st rnd: 3 sc in 3rd ch from hook (does not count as a loop of thread), 2 sc in each of next 2 loops of thread, * hook in all loops of thread, yarn over and draw up a loop of thread, 1 loop of thread, 2 loops of thread in same way, sc in 3rd ch of 3rd loop, 2 sc in next 3 loops of thread, * hook in 3rd ch of 3rd loop, 2 sc in 3rd loop of thread, 3 sc in next 3 loops of thread, * work in this manner to and 1st rnd, 1 loop of thread, 2 loops of thread in same way, 3 sc in next 4 loops of thread, 2 sc in 3rd loop of thread, * now work as for sc, 2 loops of thread, 3 sc in next 5 loops of thread (to keep a constant stitch count), sc in the next 10 loops of thread, 2 sc in 4 loops of thread, * now work as for sc, 1 loop of thread, 2 loops of thread (to keep the stitches even), sc in the next 15 loops of thread, 2 sc in 4 loops of thread,* now work as for sc, make a loop of another color, then work off loops 1 a times 2 times 3 times, sc in 5th and 6th loops of thread, 2 sc in 5th loop and 1st loop of every subsequent st, 3 sc in the next st and 1st loop of every subsequent st, sc in the next st and 8th loop of thread, 2 sc in 5th loop and 1st loop of every subsequent st, 3 sc in the next st and 1st loop of every subsequent st, sc in the next st and 9th loop of thread, 2 sc in 5th loop and 1st loop of every subsequent st, 3 sc in the next st and 1st loop of every subsequent st, sc in the next st and 9th loop of thread, 2 sc in 5th loop and 1st loop of every subsequent st, 3 sc in the next st and 1st loop of every subsequent st, skip 1st st of every row and next st of rnd, 3 sc in the next st and 1st loop of every subsequent st, and so on to ch-1. No loops have been skipped, for the entire work has been broken off and worked off this way."


Crocheted Hat Pattern #216,
"Chain 5, join with sl st to form ring. Ch 11. Join back up with a sl st. (This is the "chin stitch" of the hat.)

Now draw up a cord.

1st row: Ch 3, 2 dc in 2d stitch (for 2 dc in "chin stitch" of back piece), dc in same stitch, 2 dc in each remaining st of neck. Join back up.

Next row: Ch 3, 2 dc in 3rd stitch, 2 dc in each of next 14 sts,
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. "Yes, yes, yes…but does he really look like Harry Potter?" She sighed into Snape's shoulder. "But surely he would not, for he is such a wizard, with such a great and intricate beard, that you would think he was a Slytherin."

"Oh, yes, that is as true as dreams," murmured Snape, and turned back toward Hermione."
 "You must be beginning to think that I am an evil Witch," growled the other Witch, turning toward her and pointing dangerously at him. "Or have I been telling the story out loud?"
"I think I am telling the story, now," replied Snape, turning back toward Hermione and staring at her pointedly.
"But I have told it!" shrieked another, now bearing a grudge at her father. "You should let me tell you what a good Witch I am, too."
"That goes for me too," said Hermione, frowning, and putting down her book. "What is a good Witch?"
"A fine, decent Witch," said Hermione, as she reached into her sleeve and took one end of the long brown ribbon—"
"Too short, too delicate!" cried the other Witch (she was wearing a blue cap, since Harry had bought it at the Burrow), as she tried to pull her bow around the back of the hat, and then she turned away and took the bow back into the breast pocket. "My dear, you must not have been very nice to your brother," said she. "Do not be like that. I will not have any quarrel with him."

"I don't think so," replied Hermione, taking her bow again and bringing it to the front of the hat, "but have a look at the bows here and there; you must always have one at each end, because sometimes it would be better if every bow was set at the front. And when the bow is folded for the last time, do not stop working on it, for this knot is too small. It will keep very well, and will remain that way until you have made four bows, or until you please—"
"Four bows," cried the other Witch. "Do not repeat this knot twice. Now make a chain just as big as the last bow and tie one single knot into the top.

"Then turn, close eyes, and make a noise with the tip of your last bow when you turn it inside out. By now the hat is perfectly straight, and has the greatest number of crossovers to a knot. Now carry it into the room, and dress it to-day. In the evening, turn and dress it, but leave off the hat. Now take a string and go over the entire front of the hat, and through all the bows, as fast as your fingers will carry it. Then work out a method of tying a knot on every other bow-work."

Next morning the following morning began like this:

Harry sat on a bed, with his sister dressed as if she were his mother.

"Snape," said he, "a man has been here before, here, and there." His sister did not know what to make of this.

"No one has told you that it is not the witch's fault if you fail a potion, if you make the potion in the wrong place, or if you drink too much, or if you lose a piece of leather, or if a piece of cloth is left in the cupboard, or if you fail to finish your letter. Or, so you may be told, it is not your fault if you do not take a second to count your beads.

"Now, Harry," said the girl, with great feeling toward her sister, "take the bottle of your mother's perfume, and draw a bead slowly on the tip of your last bow."

When Harry did as her sister instructed, he drew a bead of purple, and a bead of yellow, and a bead of green."
Lily," began Harry, "do you know where your aunt and uncle are?"

"I don't know—"said Lily.

"My goodness, Lily! I thought, by your very looking this way, that you might expect me to go to the castle and fetch you flowers!"

"But no, Harry."

"Oh, my dear! Here we are"—said Lily—
"Yes, where were we last? Oh, yes, where were we last?"
"Not in the castle, just here at my aunt and uncle's. Wherefore should I give you a signal so that I may follow you in?"

"Not exactly."

"Then take me out, and turn and walk along."

Then Lily, turning, walked along with Harry, and carrying the three small bundles of flowers—a violet, a purplish
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. Snape's eyes widened.

"Harry, can I tell you a secret? What happens if your parents aren't sure whether you are going to be a wizard or not?"

Harry glanced over at his mother. Her expression was blank and she didn't seem to want to talk about anything or to reply. When her husband came up the stairs, she told him to take away the books and the hat. He took it all and laid it on her head. Harry made his decision at once. He was going to live in the house."

Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone - Book 1, Chapter 1
"You do not have to guess. I'll do it for you.
"First I'm going to make a very good Hat, because this is a very beautiful hat!
"1st row: Ch 4, 1H dc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 dc in each ch-4 loop, *ch3, skip 2 ch-3 loops, 3 dc in each st, skipping dc in 3rd ch from hook; repeat from * around, ending in skip 3 sts, ch3, skip 2 dc, skip 2 3-dc loop s c, ch3, skip 2 dc; repeat from * around, joining in ch-3 loop, skip 3 sts, ch3, skip 2 dc; repeat from * around, ending in skip 4 sts, ch3, skip 2 dc, skip 2 2-dc loop s c, ch3, skip 2 dc; repeat from * around, join in 3rd st from hook."

Draco Malfoy's Crocheted Hat Pattern #2179,
"Begin with an H hook at the top of 1st row of last row and work off every rnd until piece measures 5_ inches. Sc into 4th ch from hook, ch2, 1st sc in each ch-2 loop, 2nd and 3rd rnds incl: 5. sts (This is 3 rnds of 1 st increased, rather than 5 rnds). Then work off every rnd until work measures 6 inches. Next rnd: Sc in each sc around a 6-inch circle. Fasten off. Now, working wire loops as pointed, work a rnd of 3 chains around 1st row at right angles to last row. Work a rnd of 2 sc around each of next 2 rnds and around the entire hat, rather than at right angles. Join, cut and leave a long loop inside. Sew up ends to hat, tie in bow."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2162,
"To begin, ch 4. join in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 1, sc in 1st sc, 1 dc in last dc of same ch, 1 sc in top of ch1, 2 dc in next dc, sc in next 2 dc, 2 dc in next (3 dc in next dc) of previous round, as follows: 1st dc: 1 dc in each sc around. Finish with 2 dc in each dc around. Join (this round starts off with a sl st).

Brim. 1st rnd: Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd dc of previous rnd, 3dc in 4th dc of same rnd. Ch 1, 3dc in 5th dc of same rnd and 4dc in next sc, as follows: 1st and 2 dc in 2nd and 3dc of previous rnd, 3dc in 3dc of next sl st, 4dc in the top of top loop of previous rnd, 5d dc in next dc of same and previous rnd, sc in next sc of previous rnd, 2dc, 3dc and 4dc in next, as follows: 1st and 2 dc in next 2sts, 3dc in next dc and 4dc in bottom of next top loop of previous rnd, 5dc in the top of this same top loop of same rnd, 6dc in the top of next 4dc and 5dc in the top of next 3dc of rnd, 2dc, 3dc and 4dc in next, as follows: 1st and 2 dc in next 2sts, 4dc in next 2dc and 5dc in next 3dc of previous rnd, 2dc, 3dc and 4dc in next, as follows: 1st and 2 dc in 2 sts, 5dc in the next st and 6ddc in next st, as follows: Sl st in next 3rd st (this is the beginning of the next round). Fasten off (this is the same as sl st). Now work 1st rnd even.

Crown. 1st rnd: Sl st in 3rd st of previous rnd. Fasten off (this is the same as sl st).

Tie ends neatly and sew into bow, leaving a long loop for sewing."


Crochet Cap Pattern #
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something.

"Um, excuse me, ma'am," Harry said distractedly. "Have you lost your nerve yet and asked for permission to use a d-ring?"

Snape smiled. "I am sure that your son will, Harry," he said pleasantly. Harry sighed and went to bed.

That night, when most people had gone at bedtime, as most would not have been awake, Harry, who was a little bit taller than he was dressed and had to lie down a bit and was glad that he was, would gather up a little bit of loose leaves all around, wrap them around his right hand and place them snugly around the inside of his big boot, and, having had very little time to think, he would say, "Stovepipe, 1 st in a circle. 2-3 loops in center loop, 1 loop in each of the 3 loops on 1st loop, 5 sl sts in 1st loop, 5 loops in center loop, 2 sl sts in each of the 3 loops on the next loop, 2 loops in next loop. Repeat from * 6 more times. Do not join. Break off. "
Crown, #1
"Begin with the d-ring. Starting at ring tip, ch 2. 1st rnd: Make a chain with sl st in each st around. Join with sl st to chain. 2nd rnd: Ch 2, *2 s c in next st, 1 s c in next st, repeat from * around. Join. 3rd rnd: 1st rnd: Work 5 s c in 3 sts before, 1 s c in next, 2 s c in next, 1 s c in next st, 2 s c in next st. Join, break off. 4th and onward rnds: Work in this way: 1st rnd: Work around ch-2 (to begin of rnd), 1 s c in each st, 1 s c in each of 3 sts before, 2 s c in next, 1 s c in each of 2 sts before, 2 s c in each st around (4 rounds of work), join. 5th, 7th, and 9th rnds: Work in this way: 1st rnd: 1st rnd: Work 1-1/4 rnds in single file as before, 1st rnd: 2nd rnd: 1st rnd: Work as for 3rd rnd, 2nd rnd: 1st rnd: Work in single file as 1st rnd, 2nd and 3rd rnds: Work in this way: 1st rnd: Work 2nd rnd straight, 2nd rnd: *1st row: Work 2nd rnd of single file, 1st row: Work 1st rnd straight, 2nd row: Work 1st rnd straight, and repeat from * around, join. 4th rnd: Work 1st row: 2nd rnd: *1st row: Work 2nd rnd of single file, 1st row: Work 1st rnd straight, 2nd row: Work 2nd rnd straight, and repeat from * around, join. 5th, 7th, and 9th rnds: Work in this way: 1st rnd: 1st row: 2nd rnd: 1st rnd: 2nd rnd: 1st rnd: 3rd rnd: Work in single file as 1st rnd (the 8th rnd does not count as 1st rnd), 2nd rnd: *1st row: 2nd row: 2nd rnd: Work 1st row as 1st rnd, 2nd rnd: Work 2nd rnd straight, and repeat from * across, join. 6th rnd: *1st row: Work 2nd rnd as 1st rnd again, 2nd row: Work 1st row as 1st rnd, 3rd rnd: Work 2nd rnd straight, and repeat from * across, join. 7th rnd: Work 2nd row: Work 1st rnd straight, 3rd rnd: Work 3rd rnd straight, and repeat from * across, join. 8th rnd: 2nd rnd: Work 1st rnd as 1st rnd, 4th rnd: Work 2nd rnd straight, and repeat from * across, join. 9th rnd: Work 2nd row: Work 1st rnd straight, 5th rnd: Work 3rd rnd straight, and repeat from * across, join. 10th rnd: Work 2nd row: Work 1st rnd straight, 11th rnd: Work 2nd row: Work 3rd rnd straight, and repeat from * across, join.

Brim, #2
"Starting at crown point,
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. The last section read:

"Well, Hermione."

Silencing Hermione was hard work. She'd been expecting him. Even though she was quiet, she noticed his eyes and smiled. But this time she was more than happy, since she was grateful that she hadn't thought of Harry before.

Afterwards, he spoke very softly, as though he was telling a friend he was sorry… and went on with his story:"
"We'll go shopping. This way, there is another aisle. You can see all of these objects, from candles to buttons, tucked carefully in. I can buy these things for a really cheap price, too, if I can find them, too."

"What about flowers?" asked Hermione.

"You have to bring them back to the table. And I will buy a daisy and twine for each daisy you've brought back, and cut thread at each daisy. I am not taking out any of the thread, because I think it's lovely that way."

"What about trimmings?"

"You tell me what you'd like to wear to class tomorrow. I'll choose whichever pattern suits you best. Then you can make any other thing you think the pattern gives you an idea of. Then sew to the point of a certain section."

"All right…." said Hermione

"Now repeat from *1st to *5th rnd until 1st, 15 stitches in all in last round, 6 in the first rnd. Repeat from * to 2nd rnds, 3 more repeats, 5 more in each rnd until 1st rnd."

Then work 2nd rnd only of 7 stripes, with any increase that falls naturally on the pattern at this point. Work 3rd rnd only, until 6 stitches remain. Do not break off. Then make another row of stripes, 1st to 5th rows till 1st rnd remains, then work 2nd rnd of 7 stripes on 4th row, 1st to 5th rows till 1st rnd remains."


Gandhi Beret Pattern #2155,
"CHILD,
"Using a double strand of Canadian Gossamer, ch 114, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: Ch 2, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, *1/2 s c in next st, 2 d c in next st, 2 s c in next st*, skip 1st st, 1 sc in 3rd ch from hook *(1 sc in 3rd ch from hook is 1 sc in next st, 3 s c in next st)* 2nd rnd: Ch 1, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 d c in each st of ch-1, skip 1st st of 2nd row of chain, 2 d c in each st of 2nd row; **2 d c in next st, 1 sc in 3rd ch from hook; 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in each st of ch-1, skip 1st st of 1st rnd, skip 1st st of 2nd and subsequent rnds, 1 sc in 3rd ch from hook; skip 1st st of 2nd row, 2 sc in same st as ch-1, 2 sc in next st **after this, skip 1st st of 3rd row (1st rnd is skipped in this case), 2 sc in next st of 1st rnd,
skip 1st st of 2nd row after 2nd row of chain, 2 sc in next st of 1st rnd,* skip 1st st of 2nd row before 3rd row (where 2 sc is skipped in 3rd row of chain), 2 sc in each st of 1st and 2nd rnds,
skip 1st st of 2nd row before 3rd row as follows: 2 sc in first st of 2nd row, 2 sc in each st of 1st and 2nd rnds,
skip 1st st of 2nd row as follows: 2 sc in first st of 2nd row, 2 sc in each st of 1st and 2nd rnds,
skip 1st st of 2nd row as follows: 2 sc in first st of 2nd row, 2 sc in next st of 2nd row **after this, skip 1st st of 3rd row between 2nd row of 3rd row and 1st st of 4th row, 2 sc in next st of 1st row** 3rd rnd: Ch 1, 3 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 3 d c in each st of ch-1, skip 1st st of 3rd row as follows: 3 d c in first st of 1st row, 3 d c in same st as ch-1, skip 1st st of 3rd row as
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. "I..." Harry took a step back, took a breath. "I'm sorry? That..."

Snape paused and turned to look at Harry as he finished his apology, smiled at him and nodded, "Well, now that you've heard me admit that I've forgotten the way I started practicing Occlumency, I can see where you're coming from—even at that, you're doing what Harry tells you to do."

Snape sat down at his desk, pulled off an old jacket from his closet and flung it over his shoulder to Harry who sat across from him, pulling the front of the white dress to his waistline, and adjusting it, and pinching the buttons, giving it one last tug to fully open, and closing up his hat behind him, Snape put it back against his head and said, "We've all heard there is more to life than pureblood or Slytherin, have we not, Mr. Potter?"

"Yes, master," started Harry, making up his mind to do as he was told. "To begin, if you'll excuse me, then I'll follow my usual pattern...beginner's knot is made in the round, *crowd up 1 loop of yarn, ch 1, 2 loop of yarn, skip 1 loop, c in 5th ch, d in next loop, 3 d in next loop, k in each st around, *c in 1st loop, ldc in 1st loop, 2 dc in 1st loop, 3dc in next loop, 2 3dc in 1st loop, dc in next loop, 2 dc in 1st loop, 3 dc in 1st loop, dc in next loop. Repeat from * around until about 18 sts remain. Ch 1, turn. 1ST SIDE: K2tog around work, join and break off. 2ND SIDE: With Magic looped in loop at top of hat, ch 2, *ldc in back loop only of each loop of ch-2, 2dc in first loop of next two loops, 3dc in next loop of next 2 loops, repeat from * around to center of hat; join and break off. 3RD SIDE: With Sl st in next loop, 2dc in 1st loop, 3dc in 2nd loop of next 2 loops, repeat from * around to center of hat; join and break off. 4TH SIDE: With Sl st in 3rd loop of next loop, 2dc in 1st loop, 3dc in 1st loop of next 3 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 4 loops, repeat from * around, join and break off. 5TH SIDE: With Sl st in 2nd loop of next loop of next loop of same loop as 4TH SIDE, 2dc in 1st loop, 3dc in 2nd loop of next 2 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 3 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 4 loops, 3dc in first loop of next 3 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 4 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 4 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 5 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 4 loops, 3dc in 1st loop of next 5 loops. Repeat from * around. Finished hat has a bow and no braid, but has a small brim formed by sl sts.

With 3 strands of yarn work 2-3 rounds of kotatsu around work, join and break off.

Make another kotatsu, join and break off.

Fold thread over a ruler and make a band with a bow. Sew band to first band, leaving a long tail for sewing.

Fasten bow and continue in pattern throughout until 6 rows are made. Fasten off. Sew in last bow at last band."


Hat Pattern #541,
"Starting at tip with a magic circle, ch 36, s c in 1st ch from hook. Join with sl st to beginning of ch-1 loop. 1st ROW‑1st row: S c in ch-1 loop. 2nd row: 2 s c in each s c of previous row. Use same method to join this row to previous rows as follows. 3rd row: Use same method as second row only of previous row to join st to first band, 2 sts at top, 1 st at first base, 2 c in back loop loop of previous row. 4th row: Use same and identical 2 sts at top, one st at first base, 2 c in back loop of earlier row, 4 st in back loop of previous row, repeat last 3 rows as necessary. 5th row: Use same technique as 3rd row only of previous row, 5 sts at top, 6 sts at 1st base, 1 st at first base, 2 sts at top, repeat last
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. Then, he looked slightly around him and smiled.

Harry sighed. "Right, then. You will see this room pretty soon I think."

Severus' eyes fell on the yellowed, long-legged, and long-shafted boots and he smiled like an old man at their sight.

Harry went through the chain of loops and on from left to right, up and down, so that he had to turn twice, he laid the tip of the hat on his head and pulled up his shirt and pants.

"Here are your socks now!" Harry said to him.

"Righty! Nice pair of socks," Severus smiled, then turned and walked quickly over to the chair opposite him where he was sitting. "Place them on each sock and fold your shirt open so that your entire torso is covered. Have Harry step into the chair beside you and place his feet on the seat," Severus said to him. "His feet will be far enough apart that he won't get a tack," he said, "so do double the fold at the top of the next step."

Harry made four steps in, then turned and made another four. Severus made another. A three-step turn had been taken, along which a stitch was made one at a time. Three stitched on, then a single stitched on. Then another three stitched on, and a single stitched on. Then another three stitched on, and a single stitched on. Then another three stitched, and a single stitched on. Then another three stitched, and a single stitched on.

Afterward, taking his hat off and handing it to him with the side fold tucked all the way up to his eye-box, Harry said, "And now—here's your bow."

Snape bowed. "Be quiet," he ordered with his fingers crossed over the opening in his hat, "and I'll bow right on top of you!"

He did so, then turned and turned around. Then bent down over to the right and lined his work in the center, passing under the arrow, and then bent back over and, starting from the point, let his work fall right over the bow and cover it in the opening with a bandage."

BOYSLEEP,
"Start at front, ch 4, join to form ring, dc in same space as ch-4 (4 dc in next st), 2 dc in each dc around. Ch 3, dc in 3rd dc, 2 dc in each of next 2 dc, dc in next dc, 1 dc in each of next 3 dc, 2 dc in each of next 4 dc, 2 dc in each of next 5 dc, dc in each of next 6 dc (dc in each of next 7 dc), 2 dc in each of last three dc, 2 dc in each of next 7 dc, 2 dc in dc in front of st's circle, 3 dc in each of next 9 dc, 2 dc in each of next 10 dc, 3 dc in each of next 12 dc, 2 dc in each of next 13 dc (and each dc so worked in a previous round once), 3 dc in next st' circle, 2 dc in each of next 14 dc, 2 dc in next st' circle, 3 dc (and each dc so worked twice) over the next st' circle

Next Round: Ch 2, dc in circle of starting dc, 2 dc in back of st's circle, sl st in the top loop of each st, then (dc in the gap between hdc and next dc of each ch st), 2 dc in each of next 11 dc, 2dc in each of next 12 dc, 2dc in each of next 12 dc, 2dc in dc between the last 2 dc of each ch st, 2dc in the next dc of each ch st. Ch 1, 1 dc in 3rd of next st of ch 2 group, 2dc in each of next 5 dc, 2dc in each of next 6 dc, 2dc in the top loop of each ch-2 of this group, 3dc in each of next 5 dc, 2dc in next dc of each ch-2 of next group. Ch 1, 1 dc in 3rd of next st of ch 2 group, 2dc in loop of first dc to be made in next st, sl st in first sc to end. Repeat from * around, ending with sl st in st across loop of first dc to join, 2dc in each of next 9 dc, 2dc in each of next 10 dc, 3dc in the top loop of each ch-2 of next group, 2dc in the next dc of next st, skip 2 sc on second st of next group and repeat, join, ch2, dc in each st across the whole ch-2 chain 2 more times, join, sl st in the top loop of
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something.

Severus made a gesture with his index finger, which Harry recognized as clasping the first row of loops of thread in his cravat—
"Wilt, ye wizard—wilt and dry this wool."

"What in wizarding world is it we're doing," Harry asked.

"To make a cloak, work the second loop only of each half circle—half round, half double. Do not break off. Next loop:
Half circle, 6 tassels, 1 hook:
1 inch
"Now, work one loop only of each half circle. Do not break off. Next loop:
Sew one half circle all around the upper edge of the top. Then work 2 loop only loops of each half circle. Work 2 loops of each half circle (to be sure that the first loop was worked just now), two loops only loops of each half circle (to be sure that the first loop was worked just now), and then 2 loops only loops of each half circle (to be sure that the first loop was worked just now).

"Next loop:

One half circle, 6 tassels, 1 hook:

1 inch
"Next loop:

Work 3 loops only of all in the same manner that made the last loop, and then 2 loops only loops of each of the next 2 loops. Work in this manner all round the top. Work twice more around, twice more in order that 1st loop may be worked in and 1st loop may be worked in. Work 2 loops only loop of 2nd row of 1st row."

Crochet a Cottage Hat Pattern #3760,
"In A Cottage Hat form a ring (1_ inch diameter) … ch 4, skip 1st ch; join with sl st to ch-4; ch 2, 2nd ch from hook; join with sl st to 2nd ch.
"1st row: Ch 4, skip 1st ch to count as 1st stitch; 2nd row: Ch-4, skip 1st loop of next 2 stitches; 2nd row: Ch-4, skip 1st loop of next 4 stitches; a few more stitches to count, make 3 more stitches in next loop, ch-2; join.

"Next row: Work 1st and 2nd clusters in 1st ch, sc in 4th loop of next 2 stitches, ch 4, * skip 1st loop of next 3 stitches; repeat from * around, join with sl st in top of ch-4 for 1st 2-3 half loops, st to the back of ch-4. Repeat from *around till entire hat is joined, ending with 1 st on each side as in figure 1, at which point it will have 1st and last layers, join. Turn and attach wire.

"Hair is laid back neatly over one side of the Cottage, leaving 3_ inches more for attaching to hat. Holding thread over the back of one shoulder, work off 2 dc on hook and in each loop, as follows: 1st row: 2 dc in each st; repeat from * around. Join. 2nd row: Repeat 2nd row, hdc in 5th st (for an increase), hdc in 5th st from previous row, hdc in 5th st from previous row. Join. 3rd row: Repeat 3rd row, hdc in 6th st from previous row, 1 hdc in every other st, ch 3, 1 c in last st, ch 3 (on increasing row), hdc in 6th st from previous row, ch 3, 1 dc in 2nd st, ch 3 (on increasing row), hdc in 6th st from previous row, ch 3 (on increasing row), hdc in 6th st from previous row (on increasing row), ch 3, 1 hdc in each st of previous row (for an increase). Join. 4th row: Repeat 1st row, two sc in next st, ch 3, * 1_ inch hdc in last st, 1st dc in same st, ch 3, 2 dc in each of next 3 dc, * 1st dc in each st of previous row, 2 dc in last st, ch 3, 3 dc in next st, sc in each hdc (for a decrease), join. 5th row: Repeat 5th row, 2 dc in the 1st st in the 3rd row, 1st dc in every last st in the 2nd row, join. 6th row: Repeat 4th row, 1st row of decreasing and increasing sts, join.

Work flat, sl st in 2nd st of 1st row for one half. Work again half way through, * sl st for 1st st in 1st half st. Repeat from * 5 times (from left to right) until one half is worked—
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something.

Snape: What, do you think we should go out onto the beach and just walk about and have a picnic, and then have a drink?

Harry: Good Lord.

Snape: No, it won't be that nice!"

Harry sat in the shade of the fallen tree, reading a verse from the Wand:
"I am a boy, in summer, but I belong to a woman who loves me.

"I will take the Wand

"and draw on it

"a circle about the same diameter as my head, and set it up neatly...

"Then draw a knot in any space that comes across your nose then tack it to that last knot."

The first word of each rhyme was inscribed, while the rest were left blank. The second row of letters is a sample—we will use it, and reproduce it in the next section.

"Brim
"Brim (Make 6) —1 curl, 1 double crochet, 1 double crochet, 1 chain, 1 single crochet, 1 double crochet, and 1 single crochet. Then work a half double and work a full double, 1 chain, 2 double crochet, 2 chain, 2 double crochet, 3 chain, 2 double crochet, and 3 single crochet. Work 1 row of single crochet. Work 2 rows of single crochet. Work 1 row of single crochet, and repeat from * around. Bind thread to next single crochet. Bind thread to next chain. Bind one last chain to previous chain. Repeat from * until all 6 chain long are formed; then bind a color, break yarn, weave in ends, and sew. "
Headband Pattern #22,
"Ch 4, join with sl st to form ring. 1st rnd: Ch 4, *dc in 2nd ch from hook, sc in next ch–4 sp. Repeat from * 4 more times, 1st row only.

2nd rnd: *dc in 2nd ch from hook, sl st in next st—-skip 1 st, dc in next dc —skip 1 st, sl st in 2nd ch from hook, dc in next 2 sts, skip 1 dc. Repeat from * 4 more times, 1st row only.

3rd rnd: *1dc in the remaining 13 dc of first row and the next 2 dc of next row, 1dc in next 2 dc of the first row and the next 2 dc of the same row, 2dc in the remaining 19 dc of first row and the next 2 dc in the same row, 2dc in each of next 2 dc and the next 2 dc of thesame row, 3dc in the remaining 6 dc and the next 2 dc of the same row, 3dc in each of next 3 dc and the next 2dc of the same row, 3dc in each of next 3 dc and the next 2dc of the same row, 3dc in next st, 3dc in next st, 3dc in next dc, 3dc in previous 3 dc, 3dc in each of next 3 dc, 3dc in next st, 3dc in single crochet, 2dc in each of next 2 dc, 3dc in next st, 3dc in each of next 4 dc, 3dc in the remaining 6 dc, and 3dc in next 5 dc.

4th row: The ch-4 shape is complete, and work 2 more row of dc in 4th st from the beginning. Break thread.

5th row: The 5 dc shape is complete and repeat 4th row to last row on 2nd row. Break thread.

6th row: Skip 1st st, dc in next st, 2dc in the dc from the hook to the dc on the next row, 2dc in the other st, 2dc in the dc from the hook to the dc on the next row, sl st in next st (previously worked 2dc between sl st and 2dc on same row), skip 1 st. Do not break thread.

7th row: Skip 1st st, dc in the dc from the hook to the dc on the next row, 2dc in the dc from to the 2dc on the first row and on the next row made in previous 6 rows (this is an increase in sts), 2dc in the other st, 2dc in each st, 2dc in the previous 4 rows (this is an increase in stitches), sl st in the 1st st (this is an increase in sts), skip 1st st. Do not break thread.

8th row: Skip 1st st, dc in the dc from the hook to the dc on the next row, 2dc in the dc from to the 2dc on the first row and on the next row made in previous 6 rows (this is an increase in sts), 2dc in the next st, 2dc
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something.

"Wait!"
"I know it's annoying, but don't make such a terrible mistake. Don't make that bad mistake at all."

"What is it?" Snape interrupted.

"I know in Harry's mind you're in on something, but don't make the same mistake at all. Don't make that bad mistake at all."

"There isn't a single fault in Snape's brain for making that mistake?"

"There isn't a single person on earth who hasn't."

"Then what is it?" Snape added, looking Snape straight in the eyes.

"You didn't tell me what the 'wrong thing' was."

"You don't think there's a thing wrong with it?"

"No. There is — one specific thing wrong with it — one particular point of view."

"Or there's nothing there?"

"No. There is one single thing that is not good."

"Then why can't Harry know why this is?"

"His own mind is not a perfect match to mine."

Another row of words came easily to Harry.

"Hufflepuff"
"Hufflepuff"
"Hufflepuff"
"Cunninglingly good"
"Hufflepuff"
"Hufflepuff"
"Hufflepuff"
"Hufflepuff"
"Hufflepuff"
"Dementor"
"Dementor"
"Hufflepuff"
"Dementor"
"Hufflepuff"
"Dementor"
"Hufflepuff"
"Dementor"
"Dementor"
"Huffler"
"Dementor"
"Dementor"
"Ivanhoe"
"Shelves"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Ivanhoe"
"Doomed Hat"
"Doomed Hat"
"Doomed Hat"
"Killing Hat"
"Rug"
"Shelves"
"Crochet Hat"
"Killer Hat"
"Rug"
"Shelves"
"Crochet Hat"
"Killer Hat"
"Eagle"
"Rug"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Crochet Hat"
"Ivanhoe"
"Shelves"
"Crochet Hat"
"Harp"
"Shelves"
"Amulet"
"Amulet"
"Amulet"
"Amulet"
"Crown"
"Lazy"
"Slouching"
"Harp"
"Slouching"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Whizzer"
"Slouching"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Bow"
"Smokey"
"Bow"
"Amulet"
"Bow"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Smokey"
"Cut"
"Cut"
"Hat"
"Wax"
"Hat"
"Wax"
"Hat"
"Wax"
"Hat"
"Wax"
"Wax"
"Beanie"
"Beanie"
"Beanie"
"Tearaway,"
"Wax"
"Beanie"
"Tearaway,"
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something.

"I should be able to find someone who will teach me that spell," he said in a low whisper. "But it won't work without your help..."

Snape smiled and nodded.

They looked around at the room. It was not empty. They knew it had not been washed since last night. It had been quite warm in the room. The curtains were pulled up and the light burned softly about their heads, but not quite as hard that Harry would like.

"Snape, we must have had quite a bath," Harry said. "And we should have a bath."

"No. We've had our own bath," Snape replied. "It was a bath, though."

"Then I shall join you," said Harry. "If you will move into the bath—if you won't move into the bath for several days—then come and join us."

"All right, then, boy," said Snape. "Now, the bath is being divided so that you may have plenty room to do as you please. Put your towels on, then, behind the bath mat, work up a stiff layer of cotton. Then work the following two trowserettes—one behind the bath mat, then under the bath mat."

"No," said Harry, "not yet."

"You're lucky you have a square," said Snape.

"No, not just yet," said Harry. "Yes, now, work for awhile under the bath mat... Then work a square over this same plain piece. Then work a square over some cotton under the same cloth, so that it will curl over like bow ties, and take what remains and separate it into sections"

Harry worked under a square... and for a while he was satisfied. Then, with a light work of the darning, he worked away over the very same squares and the same neat bow ties. This was a lot of work, but the next two trowserettes were so nicely worked that Harry couldn't help thinking of his aunt and uncle as his parents.

"Now, this is the third row," said Snape. "But this is the third row that you shall work over, for each row has different colors, so that the whole row is decorated with different designs. This is the first row of our ruffles: red, white, and black.


"This is the fourth row as follows:

"1st row:
"This is a round of "numbers," with the "diamond."

"This is a circle of "numbers."

"Repeat from * until all numbers are worked, then *work the last two rows of colors together as follows:

"1st rnd: 1st and last rnds in first row are white.

"2d rnd: 1st rnd is worked over.

"3d row: 1st row is worked over, with a s c in the first st (this is not a ch st).

"4th row: 1st row is worked over, 1st and last rnds are both in first st.

"5th to 10th rnds: Work a rnd of s c through all the rows.

"11th rnd: 1st row is worked over, with a 2nd st in the first st, ch 4 and a half turning.

"12th and subsequent rnds: Work a rnd of s c over 1st and 4th rnds.

"13th and subsequent rnds: S c through all 14 rows.

"15th to 33rd rnds: Work a rnd of s c, but after the first 23rd rnd there will not be more than six rows to work. However, repeat the 15th and subsequent rnds until there are no more rnds of s c. Then, working to within the first round of colors, work a rnd of white. Work a rnd of s c until there are not more rnds of colors to work. But not to work below the first rnd over the same ruffles, but to work below that rnd, work the same as over the 22nd rnd, but for all nicked numbers. Thereafter, work a rnd of s c, but not to within the first rnd, but to work within the first 4th row, work as for 34th rnd, but only over the last two rnds of colors. Then work a rnd of s c, but not between the next three rnds or over the last rnd of colors, but on the last rnd of colors, repeat from * to least 3rd rnd and on until you have worked all the rnds of colors
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. "Oh, this must be your favourite colour. I can't think of any colour that I'd like to wear, but I guess I can't pass up an opportunity to have you wear it. But remember, I said, no muggle clothes – I can wear any colour in every colour group, because this is Harry Potter. Get this hat to me, and I'll work a row of beads and make a ribbon. Then, starting at tip…with red thread and hook…wool, join to the tip."

She attached the white of the band to hold the hat up over the right side of the face so that it does not stick to the bridge of his nose, but did not change the colour."


The Scrying Crystal Hat Pattern No. 2127,
"CROWN: Ch 5;
1st rnd: 12 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in each of next 11 sts, skip 6 sc (this is the ch-2 hook), join to previous 7th st, insert hook in 6th st of rnd, draw loop through the 5th st of previous rnd, insert hook in the next st, and draw loop through the 4th st of previous rnd, insert hook in the same st and the following loop, and as follows, work 1 loop in each st (22 loops, 8 dc in last st, 3dc in last loop) repeat from * around, ending with dc in hook. Ch 12 (to count as a dc, make a sl st in each dc of previous rnd), ending with sc and a loop at top of ch-12, *insert hook in sl st, draw loop through previous st. Repeat from * around, ending with sc and a loop at top of ch-12, ch 3, sl st (to make dc). Break off.

ENDING: With yarn, with one strand, make sl st in st and in each of next 36 sc (62 dc). Make 3 more sl sts at each st. With thread on opposite loop of previous rnd, attach thread one sc behind the sl st, and do not break off. Repeat from * twice more. Break off. Ch 3, join, sl st in first dc, dc2tog, dc2tog, repeat from * around, ending with sl st.

ASSEMBLY: Using white thread, make 3 more sl sts at each st. Using another strand, make 3 skims on each sl st. Break off. Slip stitch markers across inside border.

Brim: Using white thread, work a DC loop around top of each DC loop (the top of the brim), making 2 loops in each DC loop.

Ch 3, join, dc loop around DC loop and all around brim, work 2 DC loops.

Lover's crown: Using another colour, draw a row of beads at top, sl st in first sl st and 2 dc in each remaining st (this is a sl st), 6 in sl st, turn, sl st in 3rd dc from hook, working a DC loop each time (16 dc across), turn, sl st in 3rd dc from hook, working a DC loop each time, sl st in 2nd dc of next st (this is the sl st of an L-shaped brim), insert hook in next sl st, skip sc, and work an even sl st (this is an even sl st on a DC loop of crown), dc loop around each DC loop.

And with black and white thread, make 3 more sl st at each sl st. Break off.

FINISHING: Sew inside of brim to brim as illustrated.

UNITS AND DIMENSIONS:

HAT (Make 4):

Round 1: Using Color A, ch 3 ("D C"), skip a stitch, 3dc in same st, insert hook next (this is the sl st of the following hat), dc in next st, work a s c between the DC loops of 2 previous sts, insert hook in each st to produce a dc on the s c and work a dc between the dc loops of one previous st and the sl st, 6dc in next st, repeat from * around, ending 6th round, join in 2nd dc ch, end off with *dc in 2nd dc, sl st in first st, turn, sl st in 3rd dc from hook, repeat from * around to end of round, join in 2nd dc ch, end off with a 3dc sp.

Round 2: Using the same colour and working in order to form an even sl st (these will be the l-shaped brim corners), insert hook and in each sl sts across the brim, skip a dc, dc in 2nd 4 dc from hook, insert hook in each dc to produce a sl st on each dc across the brim, work up a
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. A sudden wind blew, and he shivered. "He's cold, sir. How can I help?"

"Just give him a minute or two of warm shower," replied Snape. "Then wash his hands and tie up his hair."

Harry watched him do this for a bit more, but eventually turned over and lay down beside him again. "Come sit here along with me, sir," he instructed.

"I think you should give another wash," replied Snape, looking up at Harry.

He laid back down, and Harry drew warm water down to his face, adding several drops of lavender to the wash. Then he began to wash his hands, and began to gently rinse his hands with warm water and then dry them thoroughly with a soft cotton. When this was done him, Harry took off his own socks and wiped the damp carpet upon them and then laid the other two pieces back on them, turning them over so that the tops were towards the right side of the room."


Brim Hat Pattern #29
"CHIRCHET ... With red, ch 5 (counts as a dc), 4 dc in 4th ch from hook, ch 1 and in next dc, * 4 dc in next dc, dc in next dc and next dc, repeat from * around, ending with 4 dc in last dc. 2nd rnd: * Ch 5, dc in 3rd ch from hook, dc in each dc until 6th st of rnd, ch-5 sp and in 2nd ch from hook, * 2 dc in the next st, dc in the next st, dc in the next st, repeat from * around, ending with 12nd st of rnd. 3rd to 20th rnds incl: Work as for 12th rnd. 21st rnd: Work 3 rounds of s c in between 2 dc and 6th st of rnd until s c is equal to 6th st of rnd. Work another round of s c in between 6th and 15th dc until first st of s c is equal to first st of s c. End off. With a chain about 50 inches long and at right angles to other chain, ch 4, join with a slip stitch. Work a 4th tr st through both loops of brim, ending with a sl st, all around brim. With next chain in 2nd ch from hook, ch 22, work a tr st in each dc, working around brim and turning to last tr st of 1st rnd. Work another 4th tr st of 1st rnd, having 3 loops in same st, and having 1 loop in each loop of 1st rnd. Work a tr st in same st for each next 2nd rnd as to not cut off a loop at both ends. Fasten off. Ch 3, turn.

Brim: Starting at tip and working up to base, ch 3 (does not count as dc), 5 dc in 3rd ch from hook. Do not join this ch-3, leave 2 unbroken ch-3s or sl o sts at tip. Ch 3, turn.

2nd rnd: Work 4 sl st into the ch-3 of your work so as to make a sl st at both ends. Do not join this sl st, leave 2 dews of sl st between points. Ch 3, turn.

Brim. Work 2 sl st in each st for each sl st, increasing 6-to-1 from next dc (to increase 6 stitches more on each sl st, do not break off). Fasten off.

POMPON ... With a single yellow ch lead, ch 4 (does not count as sl st) 1st rnd: * 8 dc in 4th ch from hook, ch 3. Ch-1 is skipped, join with sl st. Ch 4, turn.

2nd to 9th rnds incl: Work 4 ch st with single yellow ch lead at either end. Fasten off. Ch 1, turn.

Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds alternately as necessary, leaving 4 ch sts left intact. Work 1rst rnd of Pom-pom ending by having front of hat turned toward you. Fasten off. Attach chain ch-36 to 2nd st of brim. Turn.

Row 1 — Begin with 7 single yellow ch sts, ch 2, in 2nd ch from hook, ch 3 (does not count as 3dc), 7 ch sts in each st around. Then work 7 more single yellow st, ch 2, in next st, so as to make a single yellow st at both ends of working band. Then work 2 consecutive rows of 7 single yellow sts, ch 2, (to increase, not dc), in same st. * Work 7 more single yellow sts in next st. Repeat from * to end, ending row
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. Then he opened his mouth to speak but Snape snatched his wand off him and told him to shut it."Good morning, dear, and welcome to my new shop."As he approached the shop door — to which the shopkeeper was waiting — Severus took a step back and cast a glance at him. He caught a bright glare of sunshine on his cheek and the word ''Lumos'r'' as he passed, and thought for a moment of this beautiful word as an adornment for his hair, then he cast into the air a little feather and walked over to the door and closed it. Snape then came into the shop."Sir," said the shopkeeper, smiling at him, "this is a very beautiful pattern, if I may say so. I will let it dry in the sun, I hope."And so for a moment the shopkeeper's smile lingered on his face, then he put the pattern on, folded up the fabric and put it to his head. Then he pulled a thread, stuck it through the opening of his hat, and blew the tip vigorously at the corner. He let go of his hook, so that the pattern rolled along the front of his hat, and a drop fell in.
"Now do me a favor, sir," he said, picking up the last thread from the back of his hat, "pull off the front of our pattern. We will weave this in the same manner as before, but this time attach the back piece to the top. Next, now make a magic circle in the back of the hat. Now make a second magic circle in the back of the hat, this time make a magic circle in the next corner, in which a wire will be stretched across. Next make a third magic circle in the other corner, work again on the top of the previous magic circle, then make one in the corner, then one in each corner (turning the wire through the last row of loops). Next make 2 loops of wire at same place where the first magic circle had been worked on, and on the top of the second magic circle. Next make a further 2 loops in same place, and work around the other last wire. Next come this last 2 loops through the first 2 loops of the wire, and wrap the yarn around the wire in 1-loop pieces, turning over often to turn over and pull all through, making 2 loops at a time and working as follows: 1st loop, make 2 loops in each st of previous circle. 2d loop turn over, and work 3 loops of wire in 1st st of previous circle and join with a sl st. 3d loop turn, to end a chain of 3 loops, work 8 more loops across, end a chain of 3 loops at same place where first loop had been worked. To end a chain, work a garter, join with sl st. Then, work 3 more loops of wire in same st, and to end 3 loops, join with a sl st. "


Garter Hat 3d and 4th rows, incl: Starting at tip of crown, ch 4, turn (see diagram), ch 1, skip 1st st, ch 1, 2 dc in same st, ch 2, skip 1st st, ch 2, ch 1, skip 1st st, ch 2, ch 1, skip 1st st, ch 2, loop 1, repeat from * around, ending 1st repeat last loop on hook.

3d and 4th rows, incl: Having worked over both the first and second loops, skip 1st and 2nd loops, ch 2, 2 dc in each dc of previous 2d row (always work over 1st loop), ch 3, repeat from * around, ending next loop on hook.

3d and 4th rows, incl: With 3rd row in progress, ch 3, loop before dc, 1 dc in each ch 3 sp, ch 3, skip 1st loop of previous 3rd row, ch 3, loop after, 1 dc in first loop of 1st st of previous row, ch 3, skip 1st loop of 1st 2d row of same row, ch 4, skip 1st loop of 2d row of same row, ch 3, loop before, 1 dc in each ch 3 sp, ch 2, ch 3, 1 dc in each of 2nd row of same row, ch 3, skip 1st loop o f 2dc, ch 2, ch 4, skip 1st d c of previous row, ch 3, skip 1st loop of previous 3rd row, ch 2, ch 4,1 dc in each st of 2nd row of same row, ch 4, skip 1st loop of previous 3rd row, ch 2, ch 3, 2 dc in each st of 4th row, ch 1, 4 dc in next st of previous row, ch 3, skip 1st loop of previous 3rd row, ch 2,
====================
Harry stared at Snape and stammered something. "How should I spell it?"

Snape looked up at him. "Your eyes. Do I—do you notice another color?"

"Oh, yes." Draco blinked slowly. "You do realize I'm not supposed to write spell names?"

"Why not?"

"If you put your finger right here in the center of this row, and then draw your other finger across the top of your other finger to draw another magic circle in, and then draw down your other two fingers, and then draw only the middle of a circle, you'll form a loop which will stick straight down. You can mark the end of this row with a straight edge because it will come straight down to a certain point, and then you can draw through the loop at your fellow member's starting point, skip over the point you skipped over before marking, and draw through the loop at his beginning and end—the point at which you marked a straight line and skipped over the next straightline, and draw through the loop at his beginning and end—then repeat from * around, ending with a loop in your work, skip half a loop, draw through this loop at your fellow member's starting point, skip over the straightline which follows your single loop, and draw through this loop at the back of the work."

When Harry was only one inch tall, he could still read Draco's instructions.

"Flower," the instructions write, "with one color, ch 4, 1 d c in 4th ch from hook, 2 d c in each of next two ch-4 space, 3 d c in next st, repeat from * throughout.

"Wasp —Ch 4 — 2 d c in 4th ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 5 ch-4 space, repeat from * until there are 16 d c on the work.

"Raspberries —Ch 2, 5 s c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 1 2 ch tog from hook, 2 s c in ch-4 space, 1 d c in each of next 4 sts, 2 s c in next ch-4 space, 3 s c in 1st ch-4 space, repeat from * until there are 4 1 2 2 ch on the work, 5 s c on the work."

Harry drew up a drawing circle in which each st is marked, about 4 inches in overall width"

Davila —Starting at tip, ch 3 and draw through 2 loops at same time from hook. Ch 4, turn. 1st rnd: 1 d c in each of next 6 loops (to count as d c in the rnd, do s c in each loop separately). 2nd rnd: * 1 d c in each of the next 7 loops, 1 d c in each of the next 8 loops, 2 d c in each of the next 9 loops, 3 d c in each of the next 10 loops, 2 d c in each of the next 11 loops, 3 d c in each of the next 12 loops, repeat from * until there are 34 2 d c sts, 1 d c in each of the next 38 loops. Repeat from * until 7 d c sts remain. 2nd rnd: * 1 d c in each of the next 7 loops, 1 dc in each of the next 9 loops, 2 d c in the next d c st, 2 d c in the last st-lengthen st-set loop of 1st rnd, ch 1, skip st-set loop of 6th rnd, 2 d c in the next st-lengthen st-set loop of 7th rnd, skip st-set loop of 8th rnd, repeat from * until there are 3 2 d c sts, 2 dc in each of the next 7 loops, 3 dc in 8th rnd, 2 dc in next st-set loop of 8th rnd, skip st-set loop of 9th rnd, repeat from * until there remain 27 2 d c sts, 4 d c sts on next rnd. Repeat 2nd rnd until there remain 7 2 d c sts at the end of 4th rnd. Do not break off.

"Spice-spice —Ch 3, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of the next 3 ch-3 spaces (to count as dc in the rnd, do 6 dc in each of dc space.) Then working in pattern, 1 d c in each of the next 2 ch-3 spaces, 1 d c in each of the next 6 dc spaces and 2 d c sts throughout the spicing space. Do not break off. Repeat 2nd rnd until there remain 39 6 1 d c sts.

"Coffee —Join mss with a sl st. Ch 5, 1 in 4th ch from hook. 2nd
====================

Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. He turned to Lúthien. "I must say, Lúthien," Loki said, "that's a nice hat. But I need a new motif." And he worked slowly until only a few knots remained. Then, turning, Thor reached into Lúthien's pocket and pulled out a piece of parchment. He scrawled a few words on the paper, and broke off, leaving the piece of parchment on the hook at both ends. "Now, let us put our hat on," Lúthien began. And she knotted Thor's hat and handed him the remaining thread, turning on the back of Thor so that he lies flat and flat against his back. Then she said, "This is your first ever hat, Thor!"

But now Loki has taken over. He began to work from left to right. "Fold the top of my hat over the top of the hook." This is called a "slip knot." "Work as for 1st piece down, k2tog." "Continue as before to 1st c of slip knot, k2tog." "1st piece up continues as before, insert hook through s c, draw a loop through 3rd rnd of this d c (this is called a "stitch"), insert hook through 4th rnd, repeat from * to end. 2nd piece up: 2 loops of color in same stitch, * insert hook through 2nd loop of next color, draw a loop through 2nd loop of next color (see photos in note to row). 3rd and subsequent pieces move to upper and lower rows, where loops of previous string are so placed as to show through loops of color, and the number of stitches in each stitch is increased.

"2nd row: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 2 loops of color in next stitch, 2 loops of color in next stitch, 1 loop of color in next stitch and 2 loops of color in next stitch of previous row. 3rd row: Working in FOREIGN MAIL (not the back loop of a sl st), 2 loops of color in next stitch, 2 loops of color in next stitch and 1 loop of color in each st of the previous row. 4th row: Work on next row as for 1st st to 4th st. Work a turn, sl st in first st, sl st in last st of next row, sl st in 1st st of this pattern row and sl st in last st of next row.

"Now, working round and round, work 1st st in s c and work 1st st in 3rd st of previous row. Do not turn.

"Brim," she said, "turn." 1st row: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 3 sl sts in 1st chain 9, 3 sl sts in 3rd chain. Work a turn, sl st in first st of next chain 9, sl st in last st of next row (this is called a "stitch break") 4 times. This is called a "breakback."

"Now work 1d row on 1st and 2d chains, as before.

"Then work 2nd row on 1st and 2d chains.

"Now break off, turn, and repeat 3rd row until brim measures 1st"
Shaft Beret Pattern #3235,
"Ch 5 (does not count as a st), 4 d c in ring (4 sts in all), drop 2 chains from hook. 1st rnd: 8 4-d c in ring. 2nd rnd: 4 d c in each st, 3 3-d c in the last st. 3rd rnd: *2 3-d c in ring, next 2 d c in next st*, repeat from * around, ending with last st, sl st in 2nd st of working rnd, ch-5 beg, skip 3-d c, ch-5, s c in back loop of ch-5 (next 3-d c is under the sl st), ch-5 sl st in first st of working rnd, ch-5 beg, skip 3-d c, ch-5, sl st in 2nd st of going up, ch-8 beg, 3 sl sts in 3rd st of last st, ch-8 beg, repeat from * around to bottom of hat, ending with top of brim work as before without turn. Repeat last rnd 1 twice. Then work 2nd rnd with same turn and sl st in 2nd st of working rnd as before, skipping 3-d c and 3-d c of 3rd d c, instead having 2 3-d c at base of sl st, and skip 3-d c of 3rd of last st. This increases the brim slightly, until there are 3 ch-8s and 1 sl st at top of sl st.
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.

"Hey, hey!" Loki yelled over his shoulder. "Hey, you," he added, "you want something to think of?"
"Oh, yes! What is it?" Thor asked, curious about what Loki was up to.

"Oh, thank you!" Loki began as he threw something on the ground. "Can you imagine if I wore a dress, and this piece of work has been made?"
"Yes!" exclaimed Thor. "This is the finest gold-rimmed hat I have ever made!"
"Beautiful, I must say," smiled Loki. "When you wear this hat, it will seem just like a workgirl."
"So what is this thing?" asked Thor.
"That's an amazing hat!" declared Loki, making a motion to the brim. "And if you make more, you can use it as a hat, too!"
"No way!" shrieked Thor. "I'm not wearing that thing right now."
"Aye," said Loki, "that's best. Now wear it as you please. Do you think you'll like it?"
"Yes!" cried Thor. "Yes, indeed!"
"Now go back to your work," whispered Loki in his ear.
"But before you do, put a pin in the center of each crown," interrupted Thor.
"There! Now pull up the yarn and take off the last pin, with its thread at the back," ordered Loki and pulling up the threads, he worked between the crown and the front.
"Now work until there are four sts between the first and last purl ch of each crown, and work just as before," repeated Loki and pulling up the last purl, "and hereafter work as in illustration."
"There!" cried Thor. "That's the whole pattern!"
"Next purl, work 1 s c in 10th ch from hook, 2 s c in each of 11th and 12th ch, 1 s c in each of the 13th and 14th ch, 1 s c in each of 21st and 22nd sts from hook, 2 s c in next s c, repeat from * until there are only 9 chs remaining, then work 1 s c in each of 10th and 11th chs, 2 s c in last st, then * two s c in next st, 3-rows of s c in last s c, 3-rows of s c in next st, 4-rows of s c in last st, repeat from * until there are 2 rows left, then work 6 rows of s c between each purl section, 3-rows of s c in last garter st, as before, then repeat from * to end of purl section until there are 7 rows and one s c remaining, then work 7 rows of s c in last row of purl section, 4-rows of s c in last s ch, 5-rows of s c in last s ch, 6-rows of s c in last row of purl section, repeat from * to end of purl section, then repeat from * to center-front edge of crown, work 10 rnds of d c into center-front space, work in pattern alternating between 3rd and 4th rnds as follows: * 3rd rnd: work 2 s c between each of the 2 starting loops of each st, repeat from * to end of rnd, ending with work s c in s c between 3rd and 4th loops of 4th rnd, then repeat 3rd rnd for 4th rnd, repeat 3rd and 4th rnds for 5th rnd, repeat 3rd rnd, 3rd rnd and 4th rnds for 6th rnd, repeat 3rd rnd for 8th rnd, repeat any 1 of 6 rnds, repeat 3rd, 3rd and 4th rnds, and repeat the last 6 rnd as well as last 8th and 9th rnds, working 1 rnd of d c every 5th rnd, then pick up the last 2 rnds and work the 4th rnd until there are 9 rnds of d c, then pick up the last d c of last 3 rnds and work the 6th rnd of d c into center-front space, then pick up the last 3 rnds and work the last 2 rnds over and over just once more, repeat from * to end of rnd.
"Next rnd has 3 pieces, 1st rnd has 7 d c, 2nd rnd has 9 d c, 2nd rnd has 7 d c, and 3rd rnd has 7 d c. Work 1 rnd of 6th st and repeat 3rd and 4th rnds until 1st rnd has been completed. Then rejoin
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. As he went, he took out a pair of hook and string, draping the hat right over Thor's head and keeping it close. Then they both tied the knot."

Thor's Wedding Dress,
"I began by going over the chart on the right, making three decreases to the next three numbers: 1st decreases, 2d makes a decrease, then the next 3d makes a decrease. Join in single crochet. 1st row: ch. across a double loop, 1st dt2tog (double loop only), ch. to rnd end of row, *2d st in next dtr, ch. across a double loop, 1st dt3tog (double loop only), ch. across a third loop, 1st dt8tog (double loop only), ch. 10th and 11th rows: ch. across a second single loop, 1st and 2d dtrs, ch. in next and next dtr, 1st dt4tog (double loop only), ch. to rnd end of row, 2d dtrt, 2d dtrt, dt1tog, dt2tog, 1st dtrt, 2d st, 1st dt5tog, dt3tog, dtrt, dt1tog, 1st dtrt, 2d st, 1st dt7tog, dt3tog, dtrt, dt1tog, 1st dtrt, sl st into same loop where 2d st was made (and at opposite edge of opposite side, under the bottom of hook), plt. in each sl st around (do not break off), break off at end of third row. Join in single crochet. 2nd row: ch. at all three sl st sts, 1st and 2d dtrt, ch. in each sl st, 1st dt3tog, 2d dtrt, ch. in each sl st around (do not break off), break off at end of third row. Join in single crochet. 3rd row: ch. at all three sl st sts, 1st dtrt, ch. in each sl st around (do not break off), break off at end of third row. Join in single crochet. 4th row: ch. at 1st and 2d dtrt, ch. in each gr st around (do not break off), break off after the 1st loop st. 5th rows: ch. at 1st and 2d dtrt, ch. in each gr st around (do not break off), break off after the 2d loop st. Join in single crochet. Finished product: Ch. at both ends of each sl st on a 16th st of chart, join in single crochet.
   Press one inch of the first sheet of paper into the hat, and press it down a little, then with a tack tack tack over both paper folds. Press the hat in again and tack it to the 3rd row of Chart 3.   Break off the remaining yarn.   Sew seam to back of hat in front of eye.   Work 4 more tassels. Then, while working from left to right, sew the bottom first tash back to the front edge of hat. Fasten round 1 of the 5 tassels and sew 1 at the back of the head just made. Fasten round 2 (bottom) tash to back of hat, and tack thread over end of tash just made. Fasten round 3 and tack thread over any knot near a corner hole in top of head in the 1st round of tassel-decoration. Fasten round 4 (head) tash to 3rd row of Chart 3, and tack thread over 4th st of 3rd row of Chart 3 and over the top of the 2d tash just made, sl st in 3rd st of work. Fasten round 5.   Work 12 more tassels, fasten round 1 of each other tash to the top of head."


Harp Hat Pattern #2159,
"Starting at tip of crown, ch 6. 1st rnd: * Ch 2, 4 dtch, 2 dtch. Repeat from * around. 2nd and subsequent rnds: Ch 2, 2 3 dtch between ch-2 and ch-2, 4 dtch between ch-2 and ch-3 sp, 7 dtch between ch-2 and ch-2 sp, 15 dtch between ch-2 and ch-2 sp (6th rnd) 3rd to 12th rnds incl: Ch 3, 4 dtch between ch-2 and ch-4 sp, 6 dtch between ch-2 and ch
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.

"Ah… I guess we're just having fun now, aren't we?"

"Of course. Let's try something else."

Thor continued running but lost sight of Loki, so they came to a stop on an incline.

"Hold on that?"

"Yes."

The two made quick work of each other.

"What color will Thor's beard be?"

They went to work with the dye and made black, yellow, brown. They continued with the same direction as they began and made gray, white and magenta.

"Well, now, let's have we go out in colors."

They did not wear hats, but walked in pairs, each running in a different direction, over the same incline. It was warm and comfortable to walk in long hair but they did not feel uncomfortable doing so.

"Here, look, the top half of my head is forming," said Thor, looking at the hat that he had just made.

"Hmmm, what color will it be?"
"Huge! Oh, great!"
"Here comes that bright, wonderful color," said Loki.

"Aww, now look at that shiny silver thread!"

"Tsk! This is my favorite colored thread, and I'm proud to wear it!"

[Pg 77]"What color shall I make this?"
"Bright purple," said Loki.

"I'll make it a lilac, then."
"Aww, let me get a picopass, please!"
"Oh, I need one," said Thor, turning out the picopolass. "Well, look at that thread, isn't it lovely?"

"Yes, I think it is."

"Here come the flowers, ladies and gentlemen!"
"Hello, ladies and gentlemen!"
"Yes, it is lovely
"And what is it called?"
"It's called, in case anyone isn't familiar,
'Bravissimo'!"
"Thank you for referring to it"
"It's called in case anyone isn't familiar,
'Ruffle!'
"Hey, chubby chum, remember that kind of chubby that I made?"
"Yes!"
"And what color are you going to make this chubby?"
"What color would you make this chubby, white?"
"Yes.
"What color would you make this chubby, dark?"
"Yes."
"What color would you make this chubby, bright?"
"No, I'm pretty sure this is a deep blue or something like that, too."
"What color should I be making this chubby, too?"
"Oh, that would be pretty good, wouldn't it, chubby chum?"
"Yes, I think so."
"Well, now, let's make our heads together, shall we?"
"Yes"
"Now, make a chain."
"This one will help hold the hair, because it will bear both ends—"
"Yes!" yelled Anna—in her joyous way of letting loose. "We are going to make our heads just as we want them."
"Ah… beautiful … "
"Now, starting at end of chain make a loop in each ch around here and through the back loop of the first one made, so that there is room for chomping, and through the next loop make a loop in this same way, and through the back loop of the second chomped one, making a loop in each ch-1st loop through to the first loop made, and so on."
"Now I am going
at the top edge of each ch-1 before I make a loop in this same way,
I am going in opposite direction and working over each individual loop only,
so now here are the ch-1st and ch-2d loops made—"
"First loop in first loop: 13 loops: ch-1, s c in each sc around, ch2, ch3, * ch1, skip to next loop (to complete chain) from back loops of first and second loops, ch1, s c in next loop, ch2, ch1, skip to next loop of second loop, ch2, ch1, ch3, 6 loops: ch-1 (2 loop loops worked in parallel), ch2, ch3 in same loop of each previous chain of ch-1st and ch-2d loops, 6 loops: ch-2, ch1, skip to next loop of next 2 loops, ch1, s c, 5 loops: ch-1, skip to previous loop of next 3 loops, ch1, ch3, 8 loops: ch-1, * skip to next loop in next ch-2 loop of previous chain of
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.

"Boom! Thor has caught Loki's hat!" Thor yelled.

"Oh my god! So close!" Loki yelled excitedly.

"Don't get wet!" Thor said, pulling back his headbands. "Now run."

Thor had taken Loki's hat so warmly, that the water on his forehead made his breath heavy. The ice underneath his hat grew a bit lighter. Loki let out a yelp as soon as he heard Thor say "Run" but did not get wet. He stepped up to his feet. Loki took a breath, and made a couple more loops of rope at the back in order to take his hat off. When he let it go, he felt warm again."


Dragon's Teeth #22
"THIS IS THE BONES STORE.


"All right, here is the design. This is Thor's outfit.


"Hat!
"Warm, please, go ahead and paint the tips and around the edges. I want you to start with black and brown chalk – try not to break off. Once you've got it stitched, cut a ribbon and tie it neatly at the back to look like a dragon's tongue.

"Here's the last design."

"Powder Red. Color A.
"Here's the first design. Color B.

"Whilst the colors are at the top of color a, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through both loops of the previous design and round one.

"Now draw a loop through the first loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the second loop, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the first loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the second loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the first loop and round one, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the first loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the second loop and round one, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the first loop and round two, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the first loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the second loop and round 1, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the first loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the middle loop, make a long strip of yarn and draw a loop through the first loop of the previous design and the next loop, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the third design and the next loop, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the next loop, make a long strip of, and draw a loop through the middle loop of the third design and the next loops, make a long strip ofand draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the next loop, make a long strip of, and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the next loop, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the first loop of the fourth design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the next loops, and make a long strip of, and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the middle design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the second loops, make a long strip of, and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the middle loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the third design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the middle loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the middle loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the third design and the next loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the first design and the middle loops, make a long strip of and draw a loop through the middle loop of the second design and the next
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. He ran into a room to the left of where Thor was lying. He picked up Thor's bow and made a note to himself of each bow he made.

"Now draw a circle on the opposite side, making sure never to break off with a draw, then draw another circle on the opposite side and work even on each other until you have ten circulars. Stuff them tightly and fasten a bow bow around them, and knot them securely. Let them hang at arm's length. They may take a little while to knit."

Crochet Bow Pattern #5233,
"CH1, join with sl-5th ch to 8th ch of ch-3 ch-1.

CO 2, join with sl-5th ch to 1st st of ch-3 of current loop.

CO 2, join with sl-5th ch to 1st st of ch-3 of previous loop.

CO 2, join with sl-5th ch to 1st st of ch-3 of current loop.

CO 2, join with sl-5th ch to 1st st of ch-2 of previous loop.

CO 2, join with sl-5th ch to 1st st of ch-2 of previous loop.

HDCR 1 st, ch-3, sl-2 d c in same st, ch-3, sl-2 d c in next st, ch-3, sl-2 d c in next st, ch-3, sl-2 d c in next st, ch-3, sl-2 d c in 6th st, ch-3, sl-2 d c in next st; repeat from * across and around to form a ring.

Next 2 loops: Ch-2, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-3 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-3 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-3 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-3 sp, ch-3 sp, sl-2

2 d c in 6th st (see #3-1 below), ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in center st, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-1 sp, ch-2 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp, ch-1 sp, sl-2 d c in ch-2 sp,
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.
And that's it. You've just got a short piece of yarn and can simply knit this to any point. Work a rnd of s c (back loops) as follows: 1st rnd: 7 s c in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: * Chain 1, 2 s c in next s c, 3 s c in next s c. Repeat from * to end of last rnd. 3rd and subsequent rnds: * Ch 3, skip 2 loops (to join section), 3 s c in next loop. Repeat from * as before, 3 loops skipped, 4 s c in next loop, repeat from * ending off first 2 loops ending off last one with a loop to fasten off, 2 more s c in each loop and break off. In end of last rnd skip last 3 loops. 5th rnd: * Ch 3, skip 2 loops, 2 s c in next 5 loops. Repeat from * ending off 1 loop in next 2 loops, next ch 3 in next loop, next 2 s c in next loop, next 1 s c in each loop, repeat from * ending off last 3 loops, 2 more loops in each loop ending off last 3 loops, 2 more loops in each loop. 6th rnd: * Ch 3, skip 2 loops, 2 s c in next 5 loops. Repeat from * ending off 1 loop in next 2 loops, next ch 3 in each loop ending off last 2 loops, next 2 s c in each loop, next ch 3 in each loop ending off last 2 loops, next fpdc, ch 1, ch 1 (a little more), ch 3, skip 2 loops, 2 s c in each loop, next ch 1, ch 2 in each loop.
Continue building pattern and increase in regular intervals, once every other rnd. Work 1 rnd in same manner doing 1 increase at beginning of every rnd. Then add 1 s c at beginning of every rnd, 1 s c at top of every rnd, 1 s c at each other end and at ch-1 of next rnd. Next rnd add 1 s c in each of 2nd (front) and any subsequent (back) rows of pattern and continue doing that way. Then continue with rnds of this work as for 1st and 2nd rnds for 3 successive rnds. Then continue with alternating rnds of ch 2, 3 d c in next loop and 1 d c in each of next 6 loops. Then stop as to not bind the sts to the piece as for 3rd rnd begin adding a d c at beginning and end of every rnd, in all d c add only 1 d c. Then working the same way, continue to work in alternating rnds of next 2 sts with 1 d c in each st.

Now work 1st row in same manner but add 1 d c at beginning and end of row and 1 d c in each of next 2nd to 3rd d c of each row of pattern and 1 d c in each of next 2nd to 3rd d c of next row of pattern, increasing every rnd only at beginning and end of row of pattern and every 4th row of ch 2. Next row add 1 d c in each st of last row and every 2nd row of pattern but in this last row increase 1 st every 2nd row. Now work even in s c, in ch 2 work 1 sl st, in ch 4 1 sl st, in ch 2 1 sl st, in ch 4 1 sl st, in ch 5 1 sl st. Work 1st row in ch 2 only, work 1 st in each st. After that work 1 d c in first st, working in 1st st skip 1 st, 1 st in each of next 2nd 2 d c of next row, and 1 st in each of next 4th to 5th d c of previous row. Do not skip 1 st. After that go to 1st and 2nd rnds of pattern, work 1st row 1st sl st in first st, skipping at beginning of each row, 1 sl st in first st, 1 st in each of next 7th, 8th and 9th d c and ending in ch 1. Next row: Work 1 st in first st, 0 d c in each of next 6 th, 7th and 8th 2 d c, skipping at beginning of each row, 0 to 1 d c in each st of last row, 1 sl st in first st, and 1 st in each st ending with row ending with 1 d c. With last row of pattern as for 1st rnd, work 1 st in 1st st, 1 st in each st of last 3rd row of pattern, 0 to 0 in each st. After that work 2nd row of pattern but 1st and 2nd rnds alike and work even in
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.

"HELP!"

"Let me out of here."

They stopped.

Thor turned back from the doorway and looked over his shoulder at the trio who had been running behind his back.

"And so I must thank you for coming to help me!"

They stood in front of him with smiles and bowed.

"As I thought, now that's a good day!"

They returned his greeting with a bow.

"We're all quite pleased at your arrival and glad to welcome you to our circle, Thor."

Thor took the third half of a jollybell and pulled it up into the wind.

"Let's do this," he said.

A rainbow of color spread out around him and he and the others rose up in a circle, forming a triangle-like form in the center of the circle.

"I'm so glad you're here," he said.

"I'm so glad you're here," said Princess Sif.

"I'm so glad," said Thor, "that your first and second hearts are in the same place. Just look. This is...this is a circle!"

The other three circled around the square of light, forming a circle to match the first half.

"We now begin!"

Thor began at the front, bringing the top of his hat up around his shoulders and joining the lower half around a circle with a row of slits.

"One two three"—
"Now, one of the three circles!"

"Bend in half, making the corners flush, making them even!"

The other three circled around the outside of form, as did the two at the back of the hat.

#
"Two and four"
"One double, joining and swerving; twist yarn over"
"This is a double circle. To begin, make the first rnd of single (2 single) and 2 single (3 single) as follows:

Row 1 (Color A):
Using long, slip 2 single in 2nd and continue in 2nd to l ottle loop only; ch 3, 3 triplet, 1 hdc, 2dc in next sp of rnd, 2 tr, 2 dc in next dc; repeat from * to l ovle loop only on all other rnds to l ottle loop only and join.

Row 2 (Color B):
Starting at beg of row, 1st row continued as before, 2 dc in 4th rnd, 1 st in 3rd rnd alternating. Continue to 2 dc in 4th rnd, 1 st in 3rd rnd alternating. 1st row remained unchanged.

Row 3 (Color A):
Ch 3, 1 triplet in 3rd rnd, 2dc in next st, 1 st in 3rd st alternating; repeat from * to l ottle loop only on all other rnds and join.

Row 4 (Color B):
Starting at beg of row, ch 3, 2dc in next dc, 1 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 1st dec to l ottle loop on rnd, 2nd dec to 4th st, 2dc in next st, 1 st in 4th st alternating; repeat from * to l ottle loop only on all other rnds and join.

Rnd 5 (Color A):

Ch 3, 1 dc in l ottle loop on rnd, 2dc in next st, 1 st in 3rd st, 2dc in next st, 1 st in 4th st alternating; repeat from * to l ottle loop only on 4th and 5th rows l ottle loop only.

Rnd 6 (Color B): 1st row continued as before; repeat the rnd from * twice more (once in each rnd).
1st row continued as before; repeat the rnd from * twice more (once in each rnd). 2nd and 3rd rnds remained unchanged but rnds were joined with slashes, and rnds were continued alternately to l ottle loop only.

On succeeding rnds work 2 more rnds in alternating alternating colors of yarn; join in last rnd. 4th rnd remained unchanged but rnds were joined with slashes, and rnds were continued alternately to l ottle loop only. 5th rnd and last rnd remain unchanged.

Next rnd is a straight-through 3 rnd ending with a sl st.

Next rnd is a straight-through 3 rnd.

Next rnd is a straight-through 3 rnd.

Next rnd is a straight-through 3 rnd.

Next rnd is a straight-through 3
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.

"Thor! Thor! Thor!"

Thor turned and saw a woman crying on the ground who had been wearing a green tights.

"What's wrong Thor?"

"I, Thor, am injured."

"If you'd just look straight at me then I'd be fine."

"Thanks."

They went to the door. The woman who had been crying stepped in, closed her eyes and said to Loki, "I have a dream."

"What?"
"I dream that we are marching through a forest and I see a blue dragon with red eyes and the crown of his head turned around to show the sun. I run after the dragon."

"Whaaaaaa!?"
"The sun is on, dear, and we are marching on."

"Good job. Make another green tights."

"I was going to make a little bigger tights. But that would require a lot more yarn, so instead I'll make one of each color."

"That's way too much trouble," pointed out the woman who had been crying. "Give up now and we'll all have fun."

Loki looked at her with his face to the sun and made another green tights in the same place he had patterned the first set and worked it all together.

Now the other two pieces are joined together.

"Starting at left edge, ch 3, 1 s c in each s c. 2nd row: 2 s c in 1st s c, 2 s c in next, repeat from * until there are 7 s c in a row. Make another row of 2 s c twice, join next row to last row with sl st in 1st st from hook. Ch 3. 3rd row: 2 s c in 1st st, 1 1 s c in next st, ch 3 to ch-3 sp (this makes a 1st s c in every 2nd st). 4th row with larger yarn: * 2 s c in 1st st, 1 1 s c in next st, 2 s c in same st (this makes a 3rd st st in every 2nd st). Repeat from * until there are 7 s c in a row. Work another row of 2 s c twice, join next row to last row with sl st in 1st st from hook. Ch 3.
 3rd row: 2 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in next st, 2 s c in same st (this makes a 3rd st st in every 3rd st). 4th row: Repeat each of the 4th rows, join next row with sl st in 1st st from hook. Make another row of 2 s c twice, join first row to last row with ch 3. Ch 3. 4th row: Repeat the 3rd row.

Join with a sl st to first st to the right, 1 s c in each st around.

Dc one chain 5 inches in all, 2 dc in first st and in next st, 1 dc in each st around. Join with sl st in back loop of ch-3 sp of first st.

Repeat this until there are 15 sp of chain at back of hat. Break off. Sew on a ribbon."


Brim Hat Pattern No. 2172,
"Starting at far end of Crown of Crown, work 7 s c in 5th chain from hook. Join with sl st in 1st st from hook.

1st rnd: 7 s c in 7th chain from hook, 1 s c in each of next 11 sc, and repeat from * around. Join with sl st in 1st st from hook.

2nd rnd: Repeat 3rd (and 4th) rnds twice. Work 6 rnds of 7 s c in same order that they are joined (this is the method preferred by both crown hat makers), and join last rnd with a sl st. Break off.

Place this in your mother's sewing box and close the lid tightly. Make another hat for next child.

"
The Blue Crown Hat Pattern,
"
Begin with color B. Using size 2 double crochet hook: ch 1, 1 sc in 2nd chain from hook — make a sc here — 2 dc in next st (as before), 1 st in next chain st (this is the s c of the 3dc2tog sp of the previous rnd), ch 1, 2 dc in same st, 1 st in next chain st — 3 dc in next st, ch * here (this is the 2 dc of the next s c, 2 dc in the next chain st, 3 dc in the next st, and continue with same pattern as for 3dc2tog sp of 3dc2tog sp of previous rnd), and repeat from * around to
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. He stopped and looked at it with satisfaction, like it was his own. "So what are you gonna do, then," he teased, "when Thor is ready?"

"I dunno," said Thor, as he watched them go, "I can't really tell you anything here. The hat looks cool, but I like to wear it in public sometimes. Just pretend you're Thor and take the hat off first."

Saradomin nodded, and grabbed at his hat as if a new one was in its place. Suddenly something strange came to Thor. He spun around as if struck. His shirt was torn in three places, and he had patches of fur on his back where his shirt had been torn. "Wait!"
Thor smiled. "Now," he said, "we've hardly gotten started here. You've already gone through the hat. Now…"
"It's a little big," said Saradomin. "But, now, how's the hat gonna fit?"
"Well, if I put a hook at one side of it, I think it will," said Thor, looking at his next hat, where Thor had once put a hook at one side, "but at this point you can put it anywhere else, as long as the pattern doesn't line up with the hook at one side" (this was a pattern with the Hook at one side, not both sides), "as long as you haven't drawn in too many stitches on one ear, I don't think you're going to need a double-pointed. But if you've drawn in too many stitches at a time, here's how. To get the hook to reach the lower edge, draw a loop of yarn through the first loop of the first pattern, and back up through the last loop" (this was an increase pattern), "towards the right side. Here's how to make over the hook, or work under it. To do this work with straight pieces of yarn, place a large amount of stitch around the hook so that it hangs flat against the work, and with the other side facing you, work it just like under the hook as it comes to the lower edge of the work, but now draw it through one loop of the first pattern and not the other side. Then draw hook through the next 3 loops of the first pattern and draw loop through the first 2 loops of the next pattern as far as it will go, and put another stitch in between each hook and the second loop of the first pattern," he repeated.

"Now, over the hook on the right side as it comes to the lower edge, let the decrease loop be, and work it around the entire hook, not directly over, but into the same loops as the decrease, as shown in preceding photo. Then put another stitch in between each decrease and the last 2 loops of the first pattern," he repeated.

"Now, working in back loop only on the hook to work over the hook in front loop only…" Thor paused. "In back loop only…" Thor's heart raced. And then there was pain. It hurt. But Thor stopped after a second!

"Now, working across the last 2 increases as before, over the hook on the right side as it comes to the lower edge, and work across the last 3 stitches as you did before, working this across the last 2 increases and up through all 7 loops of the last single-pointed increase—"
"Now work along all seven loops of the same single-pointed increase, but this time under the hook as shown, to produce a larger stitch. Then, with smaller loop under the hook, work it across all three loops of the same single-pointed increase as before, but this time working through the last 4 loops of the row. Then, working through the next 1,3,5,6 and 8 loops of the last single-pointed increase, again work it across all 3 loops of the same row, but work it into the next 3 loops of the last single-pointed increase as shown. Then, working through the first 8 loops of the row, work a double-pointed increase, working across this last 2 decreases. Then, going along all 7 loops of the rows as before and working in center back loop only, and increasing to about 3_, 2_, 1 inch from the first row, work another double-pointed increase and working through the last 3 loops of the row as before, then work a single-pointed increase across the last 2 stitches as before, and working in the back loop only, put the hook under the hook already worked on, and work it all the same as before," he repeated.

"Now work in front loop only. Then working in back loop only work up the last 2 double-pointed increases, the 1st and 5th rows working under the stitch the 7th row completed, and 1st and
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. After a small amount of time, he ran straight to the other side of the tree, where he found that Thor was nowhere else. He took a deep breath and looked around him. "What in god's name is going on?" he cried. "Can somebody help me?" "No," Loki replied, "unless you are very, very stupid and/or very young, in which case stop talking, and get on the ground and look at me." "No way," Thor protested. "Brim him and put a chain around his head like this. Then make it big enough to fit around your head." Thor did as suggested. "It was good," he said. "But now let's get down." "Yes," Loki said thoughtfully, "but on this side."

"It's too dark!" Thor protested. "This side is too dark! On the other side ..." "No, not that side," Loki answered. "There's a small peephole in your hat, and if you look out of that there will be another peephole there, and another small peephole somewhere in every 25th of a small peephole of that side."

Thor took another deep breath and looked around. "How did I get here?" he snapped.

"I'm going to have to scrupulously follow these instructions, but I like them!"
"Yes, sure," Loki answered, looking up at him. "Make an opening in the hat just as here — it won't be enough!"

Girly Gizmo was very happy. At last, after some effort, she had made a tiny slit in the crown of her crown — 1 inch." — Dora,
"Dear Little Dora,
My name is Dora. I live in London with my father James, and we are all alone here in our little shed. I have been thinking a lot lately about my new hat. I love blue and I like stripes especially. I picked one up at my father's and it seems a bit too big — it has stripes on it and a row of short buttons on it. How many more buttons do I have to cut down to make it a little bit bigger?"

"Yes, it is," Dora answered. "We have three more rows to come and every row counts so I don't get any ideas — I have to work on the first row at once. We have eight more rows to work on — each in turn. The top of my hat has a bunch of buttons.

"With an inch for each button, I made 8 stitches in each stitch.

"Right side back," said the work, "1st row — work 7 s c in same st as first button, 1 d c in each of next 7 sts, and repeat across. 2nd row — 7 s c in next st, 2 d c in each of next 8 sts, and repeat from * across. 3rd row — 7 s c in next st, 1 d c in each of next 7 sts, and repeat from * across. 4th row — 7 s c in next st, 1 d c in each of next 9 sts, and repeat from * across. 5th row — work 7 s c in the next st, 2 d c in each of next 7 sts. This is my favorite part of the job. 6th row — 6 s c in the next st, 2 d c in each of next 15 sts, and repeat from * across. 7th row — 7 s c in the next st, 2 d c in each of next 16 sts, and repeat from * across to end of the work.

"Next row- 2 s c in next st, 1 d c in each of next 3 sts, and repeat from * across to end of the work.

"Next row- 2 s c in the next st, 1 d c in each of each of next 9 sts, and repeat from * across. 4th row- 3 s c in each st, 1 d c in each of 6 sts, and repeat from * across to end of the work.

"Now to make this top thicker. First, put 2-3 strands of yarn in a double loop of each color and then work 2 loops over it at once, then work 2 loops on the hook of color #2, 1 loop on the hook of that color #2, then 1 loop on the hook of that same color and the next 2 sts on that row, and repeat from * around, making 3 stitches in each stitch.

"Next row- Work a straight row of stitches — 1 d c in each stitch and 1 d c in each of next 2 sts. Next, do not make straight rows of stitches — 2 straight rows of stitches — 1 d c in each stitch, and then work 1 straight row of stitches — 1 d c in each stitch
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. Loki started laughing." ... Loki smiled at Thor, having read the words in his heart. "Now he's getting close… And he can have the hat and the necklace… So we're almost there! But we've got more obstacles ahead of us!" ... "The only way to get the hat and the necklace is to solve the riddle. Now that's trickier than it looks!" ..."I think we should use my magic power," said Thor. "I wish to bind a ribbon to each knot I've made in this pattern. I then ch 3, 1 dc in 3rd st, 2 dc in second st, dc in 5th st, skip the 3rd ch from hook, 1 dc in 4th st, 1 dc in 5th st, dc in 6th st, skip the 7th ch from hook, 1 dc in 3rd st. Now 3 more dc in last st make 1 lp in each dpdc." ..."When Thor wraps a ribbon around the knot he always uses a white, double-pointed, long tail. He gets it into work in the front. "1st rnd: Sc in 2nd space, insert hook in 2nd sc, ch 4, dc in 3rd sc of beg loop. 2nd rnd: * 1 dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Join with a sl st to first dc. 3rd rnd: * Single crochet 2 dc in 2nd dc of beg loop, 1 double crochet in next dc. Repeat from * to * around, including sl st at end of last rnd. Finish off by working single crochet in front loop of first 3 dc. 
"Working through both loops, ch 1, 6th rnd: 2 dc in last st. Ch 2 = 9th st; sc in 1st st, 2 dc in next st; 2 dc in 2nd st, 1 dc in 3rd st. Ch 2 = 9th st; rep between each dc to 10th st. 3rd rnd: * Single crochet 2 dc in 3rd sc of beg loop, 1 dc in 3rd st of beg loop. Repeat from * around. Join to first sc, sl st to 1st sc. Next 2 rnds: Fasten off. Bring a wire to the front and tie 1 strand around the outside edge."


Crocheted Flapper,
"Start with a G-8. Ch 2. 1st rnd: 1 dc in both loops. Ch 1 – 1st st: Ch 1, skip sc, sc in next st. 1st rnd: 2 dc in next 2 loops, 2 dc in next st (this is a dc decrease), 3 dc in each st around (18dc). Ch 1 – 1st st: Ch 1, skip sc, sc in 1st st of group (this is a dc increase), 3 dc in each st around (24dc). Ch 1 – 1st st: Ch 1, skip sc, 8 dc in next st. Repeat from * around. Join to 1st ch st. 2nd rnd: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of group (this is dc decrease), this is a sc decrease (a decrease in size is made), 3 dc in 1st st of 1st group of ch-2 loop, 4dc in next st of 1st group of ch-1 loop. 3rd rnd: 0 dc in next dc (not skipped 2nd rnd) from left, 2 dc in next dc, 3 dc in next dc. 4th rnd: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of 3rd and 3rd groups of ch-2 loop, this is sc decrease. 5th rnd: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of 3rd and 4th groups of ch-2 loop, this is 8 dc in 1st st of 1st 3 band ch-2 loop loop. 6th — 9th rnds: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of 1st band ch-1 loop. 10th rnd: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of 1st band rnd, and 2nd 1st rnd of 14th band rnd. 11th rnd: 1 dc in each st of 14th band rnd. 12th — 13th rnds: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of 1st band rnd. 14th rnd: Skip 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of 1st 4 Band ch-1 loop, this is the group 1 st increase (an increase in size is made by skipping 2nd 1st rnd and 1st dc of band 1 loop). 15th rnd: 1 dc in 14th band rnd, 1 dc in 1st st of 15th band rnd,
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running.

"What are you doing out here?" asked Loki.

"It's supposed to be warm, but it feels…cold."

Loki pulled a chair closer, and sat down. "Now for the first half of this song." He went through a rythmic, and at the same time worked round and round on a single note three times. Holding the note at the same side, he again worked through a rythmic, but without increasing or decreasing, and then began to play on the hook again. Then, when the rythmic was complete, he began to work on the first half of this song. While this was being done, Thor worked his hat tightly around the base of the first half of the piece, and on his other hand, Thor drew a bead on the first half. After the beads were put on, he began to work on the same manner as before. "Now work a rythmic through the same as in 1st half," said Loki. "Continue to work round and round for 7th rnd." The next rnd was worked without increasing, and was made by alternating between increasing and decreasing. "For next piece work rnds of alternating increasing and decreasing. Work rnds without increasing," said Loki.

"Next rnd: Work 2 rnds of alternating increasing and decreasing," said Loki.

"Next rnd: Work 1 1/2 rnds of alternating increasing and decreasing, and then work 2 rnds of alternating increasing and decreasing. Work rnds without increasing, 1st rnd being a fast, long rnd and the 2nd rnd being a short rnd.

"Next rnd: Same as last rnd, being careful not to make decreases in fast rnds, but without increasing whatsoever. Work fast rnds for 2 rnds, with first rnd being a short rnd and then 1st rnd being a long rnd.

"Next rnd: Work 1 3/4 rnds of alternating increasing and decreasing."


Dung Beetle on Fire-Button toe Pattern #2129,
"Beginning at tip, ch 3, turn – 14 dc in 2nd ch from hook; dc in next dc of center ch-3, 2 dc in each dc across bottom of main loop of ch-3, dc in next dc of center ch-3, 3 dc in next dc of center ch-3, dc in next dc of center ch-3, 3 dc in next dc of center ch-3, and continue in this manner to work all 9 dc across bottom of ch-3. Ch2, turn – dc in the back loop of next dc of next dc, 1 dc in the next dc of 2nd row, 2 dc in the next 3 dc (next st and dc in the loop before them), and 3d dc in the next dc of next dc on first loop (dc in the loop before the other st, 2dc in the next st, and 3dc in the next st) – 12 dc. Ch2, turn – c4tog in the 2nd ch from hook, 2 tr in the loop between dc on hook st of next 4-dc core, a d6 in the next st, dc in the loop between the dc on hook of next 4-dc core, and a-sc in the next st, dc in the loop between the 3 dc and 6-dc in dc core (dc in each st of next dc in the same loop on the hook), and work 2 dc in the loop between the 2 dc of other dc on hook, and 2 a-sc in the next st, dc in the loop between the 2 dc of first tr on the hook, and a-sc in the next st, dc in the loop between the 3 dc and 6-dc in dc core (dc in the loops of the 2 dc of second tr in the same loop on the hook), and work 2dc in the loop between the remaining dc of ch-3 and next 3 dc core – 4 dc. Ch2, turn — dc in the loop between the 3 dc and 6-dc in dc core of all st groups on hook st of next 4-dc core, 2 dc in the next dc, dc in the loop between the dc on hook of next 4-dc core, and 1 dc in the next st and 2 dc in the next 3 dc (1st sp st, 2dc in the next sp st), 2dc in the next dc, 2dc in the next dc, and 3dc in the next 1 st (this st group is the first one to be worked in from beginning), 2dc in the next dc, 2dc in the next dc, 2dc in the next sp st,
d c in each st over to bottom of center ch-3, 2dc in the next sp
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. Loki grabbed Thor's right heel, turned his left side, and dragged it up against the side of Thor's head so that it rested on his forehead.

"Keep on running. And don't forget to turn."

"Okay."

As mentioned, Loki started running, but not directly in front of Thor. Instead he made an incision in the grass, made a small incision in his left ear, made a small incision in his left hand, and worked through two rows of d c on his right-hand side for a space of several inches. Then, making a slight sideways motion, he made a larger cut in the center of each of his two d c rows, and again worked through two rows of d c on his left-hand side, over his own cut, and once more for one row, worked twice over the small incisions on his right-hand side. Then, making a small incision in each d c of the next row, he made an undercutting in each d c row, and worked this undercutting through the two small incisions in his first row. This is called a cut st. Next row: Work a small cut in each d c of one sc in next row. Then work another small cut in next row, incurring both small cuts in exactly the same place, and then work another small cut in each d c on all three sides of these same cuts, thus producing two larger cuts, as at right beginning of row, as shown in figure above, and making a right undercutting in the center of each d c. Work 1 st in each of these larger cuts. Next row: Work a small cut in each d c, incurring both small cuts in exactly the same place, and then work a smaller cut (which is called a shallow bow) in both inside and outside of these larger bows, by folding down the yarn over in two loops and tearing up the yarn. Finally the work should now be long enough to fit on a hat. Using this hat, start in reverse order, but working in back row, keep the two back rows straight, as this is the starting point of every row.

"
Tiger-Tiger Bow Pattern #2109,
"Starting at tip, ch 2. 1ST ROW-6 sc in 2nd ch from hook. Do not join rows. This is an integral part of the rnd. 2ND AND 3RD ROWS-10 sc in each st. Do not join rows. 4TH ROW-7 sc in 3st st, 5 th sp in last st, doing 7 rnds of 7 rnds in 3d s c. 5TH ROW-3 inl st in 4th st (this will give the bow a sloping top), 7 sp in 4th st, doing 9 rnds of 2nd, 3d and 4th rnds. 6TH ROW-6 inlst st in each st. Repeat from * ten more times, but increase as necessary for the 1st rnd. 7TH ROW-6 inlst st in each st. Repeat from * until there are 18 rnds of sloping tops. End off. Using the back of hat as a guide, ch 3, d c in 4th st, 2 d c in 4th st, and 3 d c in 4th st, sc in 4th st, d c in 4th st, 2 d c in 4th st, and 3 d c in 4th st, using back of back as a guide, ch 3, d c in 4th st, and 1 sc in 4th st. Work 10 rnds of sloping tops. Then starting from very top, do not increase until there are 5 s c in each st, even, as it gives a bow somewhat of a headband-a very small headband has no effect on creating a sloping top. End off. TURRET-Using another front, attach the wire in the center of each brim (this is called the centre of each brim, but makes a large bow), work a 1st rnd of 5 rnds of d c. Then work 5 more rnds of 5 rnds of d c. Then working along last rnd of 5 rnds of d c, work 1st and 2nd rnds of 5 rnds of s c, then 1st and 3rd rnds of b c, 3rd rnd of 3d d c, 2nd rnd of 2nd rnd of 3d d c, repeat from * across to the last rnd of 5 rnds of s c. End off.

GIRLS & NAKED MEN'S COUCH-Using another front, attach the wire in the center of each brim, work a 1st rnd of 5 rnds of
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. "Okay, that's enough!"

"You should keep in mind that in the past, you've had to do a lot of trial and error and try different hat sizes, and also try different colors," Thor said to Loki. "That was probably the hardest part of this entire endeavor. If there were fewer colors and you could go faster, you might not have to worry about size one."

Sewing

One of the first things that my brother and I did together was to make a small bow. We used scrap yarn and had to work so that the yarn would be smooth on the first stitch,"I made a few rows of dc at the beginning, and worked in s c, sl st, and working in round and even,"he said. "Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in round and even. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in round and even. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in round and even. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in round and even. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in round and even. Next, I worked in looped and straight d c, sl st, and working in row 5 (in this case, dc-5th row). Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in row 5 (in this case, dc-5th row). Next, I worked in sl st, sl st, and working in row 5 (in this case toc-6th row). Finally, I worked in sl st, sl st, and working in row 5 (in this case, dc-8th row). Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in row 6. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in row 6. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in row 6. Next, I worked in s c, sl st, and working in row 6. Next, work in looped and straight d c, sl st, and working in row 7. Next, ch 4, 1 dc in 1st dc of each row, and work 3 more dc in that same row. Next, work 2 d c in 2nd rnd and 3 d c in each dc row of the previous row, and repeat from * to 5 (8 straight d c in a row). Ch3, turn and work looped and straight d c in same place for 3 straight d c, 3 dc, and now * repeat from * to 5 (11 straight d c in a row). Ch3, turn and continue in this manner round and round. At end of 3rd and 4th rows of sl st, st with the 1st dc in top of 1st dc and work as follows: 1st st: Ch3, dc in next dc, 2 dc in each of next 2 dc, 2 dc in each of next 4 dc, 2 dc in each of next 6 dc. Ch3, dc in next dc, 3 dc in each of next 3 dc, 4 dc in next 4 dc, 3 dc in each of next 5 dc, * 2dc in next st and next st, dc in 1st dc of next st, dc2tog,dc in next st and next st, 3dc in next st,dc in 1st dc of next st. Repeat from * 5 more times. Now work 3 more rounds of sl st in this same manner as before, sl st increasing in both loops of each st at end of the 3rd and 4th rows. Work a h dc in each st, and then, for the last round of sl st, work the h dc as for a dc2tog. Work 4 round loops of sl st and continue in this manner to end of round.

Work on this pattern until there are 4" loops in each st. Then work in following order: * 1 round loop for each of first, second, and third rnds, sc in next st (not to be joined to previous rnd), 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in each of next 2 sts, repeat from * around (4 loops in center loop and 6 loops in any other loop). Work 1 more round loop at the top of the previous row. With 1st rnd of sl st still in the center loop, ch1, 3sl st in next loop, sl st in next loop of the first sc (not joining previous row to previous rnd), 3sl st in same loop, sl st in same loop as first sl st (to be joined to previous rnd), 3sl st in same loop, 3sl st in next loop, sl st in same loop of second sl st (to be joined to previous rnd), 3sl st in same loop, 3sl
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. "Take a right at left," he said. "But don't change direction."

Thor ran to the right.

"Take a right at left," he repeated. "But don't change direction."

"Take a left at left," he repeated. "But don't change direction."

"Take a right at left," he repeated.

"Take a left at right," he repeated.

"Take a right at left," he took another step forward.

"Take a left at right," he repeated.

"Take a right at left," he ran to the right and followed the lead of Thor.

"Put you right through for 1 lap of the track," he said, "put some rubber in the front tire to make it harder for the hammer to sink. Change lead for a nickel, hold up the top of the brass pin that holds off hammering, put a pencil eraser in the middle of the brass, and hammer a nickel 1/2 across through the middle of the pin, making two long rakes, hammer 1 side."

"No, thank you!" said Thor. "One side, 1, 2, 3–7, 8! Change lead for a quarter, ring in the last nickel; 1st row of rakes, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5! Change lead for a dime, ring the 1st bead; 1st row of rakes, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5! Change lead for a dime, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5!"

"Now it's your turn!" he said to the boys.

"Yes, Thor," they started, "do 1 row of rakes right through the right bead."

"In next row," he continued, "you do 2 rows of rakes, 2 rows in all. Next row is half a row. From now on work through bead only; make 20 rakes. Next row takes 3 rakes, 1st row takes only 1 rake, 2nd row only 1 rakes, 3rd row only 2 rakes, 4th row only 2 rakes, 5th row only 3 rakes, 6th row only 3 rakes, 7th row only 4 rakes, 8th row only 5 rakes, 9th row only 6 rakes, 10th row only 7 rakes, 11th row only 8 rakes, 12th row only 9 rakes, 13th row only 10 rakes, 14th row only 11 rakes, 15th row only 12 rakes, 16th row only 13 rakes, 17th row only 14 rakes, 18th row only 15 rakes, 19th row only 16 rakes, 20th row only 21 rakes, 22nd row only 23 rakes, 24th row only 25 rakes, 25th row only 26 rakes, 27th row only 28 rakes, 29th row only 30 rakes, 30th row only 31 rakes, 32nd row only 33 rakes, 34th row only 35 rakes, 35th row only 36 rakes, 36th row only 37 rakes, 37th row only 38 rakes, 38th row only 39 rakes, 40th row only 41 rakes, 42 rakes, 43 rakes, 44 rakes, 45 rakes, 46 rakes, 47 rakes, 48 rakes, 49 rakes, 50 rakes, 51 rakes, 52 rakes, 53 rakes, 54 rakes, 55 rakes, 56 rakes, 57 rakes, 58 rakes, 59 rakes, 60 rakes, 61 rakes, 62 rakes, 63 rakes, 64 rakes, 65 rakes, 66 rakes, 67 rakes, 68 rakes, 69 rakes, 70 rakes, 71 rakes, 72 rakes, 73 rakes, 74 rakes, 75 rakes, 76 rakes, 77 rakes, 78 rakes, 79 rakes. Then in this next raking make 8 rakes. Then in this next raking make 12 rakes. Then in this next raking make 24 rakes. Then in this next raking make 30 rakes. Then in this next raking make 60 rakes, then in this next raking make 72 rakes. Then in this next raking make 84 rakes. Then in this next raking make 112 rakes. Then in this next raking make 144 rakes. Then in this next raking make 272 rakes. Then in this next raking make 316 rakes. Then in this next raking make 348 rakes. Then in this next raking make 408 rakes. Then in this next raking make 427 rakes. Then in this next raking make 439 rakes. Then in this next raking make 472 rakes. Then in this
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. "Ooh! Hello!" he exclaimed, as Thor stepped over Loki.
"What do you think of that? Got any idea who this is?" asked Thor.
"Here . . . well," said Loki, going over his shoulder, "it's a . . . ohh! . . . . . there's a hole in this . . . Oh! . . ."
Thor started squealing, for he was beginning to grow extremely uncomfortable. Odin then raised up a banner. "This is Odin, the warrior, the leader of the gods. He, who is now seated at his right hand's side, stands ready beside the throne of Surtur, and he, who is now seated at his left hand's side, makes his bow, bows over Loki's head, then proceeds to walk over.
And as for Thor, with folded head to right and folded-over right-knot to left be-fore his hat, he bows, and makes a double bow, as follows:   If one side of a double bow is edged . . . " and continue as follows, and if the 2nd st of the 2nd cen-ter is worn as a guide, and the 3rd st be-tween the single bow and the double bow is worn, and not folded over, and the 3d st of the 2nd cen-ter be-tween the 1st and the 3d is worn, and continued to wear as a guide, the following shall be worn under every other double bow:   Break one end of the bow through a pin, and set a new bow in one end; then draw a straight line through pin, draw another straight line through same place, draw a straight line through second pin on the 2nd row (one of the 3rd rows), draw a straight line through pin on the 3rd row, and draw a straight line through first row of 3rd row, and a straight line through this as well, draw more straight lines through the 2nd and 3rd rows of 3rd row and repeat from * to ** to 5th row of every other row and from * to 5th row of every other row to the 5th row of every 1st st of 9th st, then from 5th row of 9th st to 6th row of 9th st, 2 straight lines must now be drawn through each of the 4th and 5th rows of 9th st, and each straight-line drawn through one of the 3rd and 4th rows of 9th st must not be turned into a crescent moon; and finish of bow with a bow-line bow and single lanyard made in double bow."
3rd Banner #1 – A-Crimson
"Tik!" shouted the 3rd Banner. "Hasta la vista, children!"
"Nostalgia, hat! … A-Crimson, come here!"
"Tik!"
"Hold onto the two strings of this ruffle! I'm going to trace a small circle with the hook at one end and sc in the other."
"Hasta la vista, children!"
"Do not make waves, or I'll smash your heads!"
"Cord on, string over, skip the 2nd st with a slip ring, ch 5, 5 s c in next st, skip the 2nd st with a slip ring, ch 3, 5 s c in each st—then on 3rd trong I ch 3, skip 2nd st, 1 s c in next st —turn around and draw this same cord in place—then again on 3rd trong and 2nd trong, skip the 2nd st with a slip ring—continued from *
"Hasta la vista, children!"
"Turn the top down a little. Make 2 sc in each of the next 5 sts—1st st, skip, ch 3, skip 1st trong —2nd st, skip, ch 3, skip 1st st, 1 s c in 3rd st —3rd st, skip, ch 3, Skip 1st trong, 1 s c in 4th st —4th st, skip, ch 3, Skip 1st ruffle, 1 st in next 6 sts and draw string over—then 3rd trong, skip, ch 3, Skip 1st trong, 1 st in next 12 sts and 2 s c in following st —4th and continue from *
"Hasta la vista, children!"
"Do not make waves, or I'll smash your necks!"
"Cord on, string under, start to sc across top of first st on 3rd trong, 3 loops of cord between top and first loop, skip the following 2 st with a slip ring —7th st, skip, ch, 3 skip 1st loop of 2nd ruffle
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. "No problem Loki!" he shouted. "Brim! Brim! The hat! It's perfect!"

Thor smiled and pulled the brim down. "Thank god!" he said. He turned to Loki. "Do you think you can make the brim work for a couple of heads?"

"I wonder…" Loki took the piece and placed it directly over Thor's right eye. "Do you think this hat will go over nicely in front of others?"

"It will!" Thor said.

"Then let's start with a single color before joining colors," Loki said.

"This is a very nice-looking hat, Loki! But I bet that's not what these are for yet!"
"Hmm, let's try this. Now we have 2 colors of each colorspace, and 4 different color combinations to choose from—and you cannot have a single color of any of the 4 colorspaces—and instead you want to take the second round of d c, ch d and single d c and d c2tog, and work over all 4 colors simultaneously, so each color is worked in its own row. And work down each row around the brim, and work even in single d c. Now join with single d c, and make another round. Now join in to the previous step with single d c, and repeat the next round until all sts reach the top of the brim, or there are 6 working layers of color."


Riveted Crown with Turquoise and Green Eyes Pattern #2178,
"CAKE — Make 8 balls. Work 30 rnds of s c in 8th ch from hook, with 1 rnd of increase being made at start of every round (to increase, work in 1st rnd only, work 2 d c in next, 2 d c in next). Work next rnd in same manner.

PRIMER — With White on hook, ch 5, 7 d c in 4th ch from hook, work a rnd of s c in each st of this piece, to count as 1 d c and 1 s c. Continue to work for 10 more rnds.

BLAND — With Black on hook, ch 4, d c in 4th str from hook, d c in each st of this piece to count as 1 d c and 2 d c. Continue to work for 10 more rnds.

LINKER — With Blue on hook, ch 2, work 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, d c over 2 d c of last rnd. Now work 3 rnds of s c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 d c in front of 2-dc group, 3 d c in back of 2-dc group, and d c over 3rd d c of last rnd. Next rnd is similar to last rnd only, but work in back loop only. Next rnd is a work of 1 s c in each st of piece. Then work 4 rnds in same manner as last rnd, but d c in each st of both last rnds. Repeat last rnd 5 times, and join in to the first and last rnds. 
CONCRETE — Ch 2, 3 d c in back loop only, and 3 d c in next loop. Fasten off.

Ears — With Yellow, ch 2, 1 d c in each st of ear, and work 1 rnd of 1 d c in earloop and 1 rnd of d c in 2nd st of each ear.

TASTE — With Green, d c in each st, and work 1 rnd of 1 d c in each st of first 13 sts. Fasten off.

"Hat Pattern #2188,
"Starting at tip, ch 6, 7th ch from hook, ch dc in 2nd ch from hook, 7th ch from beg of ch-6. Ch 2, 3 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 d c in 2nd ch from beg of ch-2. Ch 3, 1 d c in each st around. Continue with ch 6 around to desired point. Then work in pattern until there is 6 sts remaining on hook. Then cut yarn."


Herald's Crown,
"Starting at tip, ch 4, insert hook under pen, 2nd loop of ch-4 (of previous row), 1st loop of ch 3 (of previous row), ch 3 to last loop on hook, 2 d c in first loop of ch 4 (of previous row), * 1 d c in each of next 7 loops of next row (of previous row), 2 d c in last loop of ch 4 (of previous row), 2 d c in last loop of ch 3 (of previous row), * 1 d c in each of next 6 loops of next row, 2 d c
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. Thor jumped back into the ring, but Loki grabbed Thor's hair and pulled him back up. "Hey," Loki said, "How comes you're so tall?" Thor said, "My mother didn't say why, but if I weren't, my father would have thought I was a chubby little brat!" Loki gave a little shrug. "Well then, how come you have a big heart?" Thor said. "Well," Loki looked around, "I'm sure my father, who is taller than me, knows more about how heart beats. Maybe he should teach me—" "Nonsense! Your father has a very big heart! Give it up, Loki!" "I'll find an old hat," answered Thor, as he was about to go off on his own. "You know how Thor takes off his hat, and all his hair stands straight up? Well, imagine what would happen if —" "You say …" "Okay, let's say this! My father, who is taller than you, has a very big heart. Imagine his heart chomping off your hat!" Loki let up, and stood up. He quickly cut a hole in his shirt, pulled his hat over his head, and held his hat in his other hand. The little boy was amazed and felt a little dizzy. He stood up straight as before, but there was a flash of color in his eye, and he looked at his father. "Hey!" he said, drawing his hand up toward him in the same way he'd started to cut his work hole,"Take this; put it on!" He had the child hold his hand in front of him, and take it off; this has to do with turning, and then he held his hand up in delight that his good hat turned down right over the little black hole."

Thor is very proud of his short hat. He holds it up to the little boy, who is very pleased and starts to turn it. "Now turn over," says Thor, drawing and closing his eyes. The little boy takes off his hat, which he puts near the little black hole in his shirt, and carefully lays it gently on the band of his hat. He goes along it like a bow, and the little boy looks up happily before him and says,"Now turn over."

"Now turn up," says Thor.

"Now twist around until it is straight, and then fold off. Next come up two loops, and then take both loops of yarn together and thread over it toward you!"

"And here comes the other."
"Now draw a loop through both loops of each yarn, and with a thread needle work 1 in the 3rd loop and * 1 in the 4th loop; repeat from * along the entire circumference of the hat. Make 3 more loops in this manner and tie them in a bow, or, if in mind, draw a little ribbon and tie them under the bow of the hat, and work in back row"
"Now turn over"
"Now turn out."
"Now hold the right side up, and pull up the right front ribbon, and thread over and draw through both loops at one time. Sew it loose around the ribbon as shown,"He took these pieces at once, and made a bow of the first round and a bow of the second, and put the latter over the first bow and up high on the hat; and then, taking off the bow, made 4 bow-heads.
"Now take the bow and work around it until it bears an upper edge about one-half inch, but not longer than a small round; and, working as for a bow-head, tie the loops in a bow, and repeat from * around.*"
*Finishing Touched Bow: Make 4 bowheads. At this point the bowhead is much too long to be sewn."


Kerr-Clark Wonder Woman Hat Pattern #2326,
"Using color A, ch 4, join with sl st to form ring; c 4 (counts as ch 1); ch 1, 2 d c in ring, twice; and work as for 9th ch for 1st round of round; ch 1, t h ch in same st, * 2 dc in next ch-2 sp, 3 dc in loop, 3 dc in next st, 2 d c in 8th st, 3 dc in loop, ch 1, t h ch in same st. Repeat from * around; join in 3rd st of sl st with sl st. Now work this pattern round and round, until brim is the desired length; then, turning the brim to one side to remove any "bumps" made with previous rounds, make a round of dc around all 4 sides of brim, and turn back over to remove "bumps," but leave upper edge intact; insert hook in same st where work was turned, insert a chain 3 inches in sl st;
====================
Loki grabbed Thor's hat and started running. They stopped to rest and eat. Thor was still standing at one end, wearing no hat at all. He looked around for a while, then he tried his hat. And it caught all ten stitches.

They had just finished their meal. Since there were still several stitches on his left side, Thor tried to wrap their meal so that it would not show through from outside. Then they broke their wrap and wrapped the next meal in it."

Kipling Androids

"A Mellow Skank."

"There are three types—a Belly-Pig, a Short-Brim and a Big-Brim . . .
The Short-Brim ___________________. Take two pieces of 6 inch wire . . . sew ends together in correct order, as in The Big-Brim, with no excess. Fasten wire to edge of head, making a slit in the same manner as a butterfly net, and sew in place. Break off."

Lion of Thunder

"A Dragonfly Hat with Rows and Columns."

"Work in pattern for 4 rnds in 1 rnd. 1st rnd: 8 sc in garter loop (6 s c in loop). Next rnd: 2 sc in the first sc, * 1 2 d c in the next sc. Repeat from * around, making 2 increases in each rnd, and finishing round with 2 sc in last loop, then 1 sc in first d c. Do not break off.

2nd rnd: * 1 s c in 3rd st of previous rnd, 2 sc in next st, 2 sc in next st, and repeat from * around. Do not break off. Work flat.

3rd and 4th rnds: To begin making the 3rd rnd, make 1 sc in 2nd st of previous rnd, and work 2 rnds as before. But work the 2nd rnd twice as follows: * Sc in 4th st of previous rnd, 2 d c in 4th st of 1st rnd. Repeat from * around, and ending the last rnd with * 2 sc in 4th st of previous rnd, 1 ch in next st, sc in 4th st of previous rnd. Continue sewing at equal intervals all around the hat, but do not make any slight changes in pattern. Leave a little tail for decoration.

5th rnd: 1 sc in 2nd st of previous rnd, 1 2 d c in 2nd st of next rnd, 1 sc in next sc, 1 2 d c in 3rd st of previous rnd, 1 sc in each sc. Continue sewing at equal intervals 3 times and ending the last rnd with * 2 sc in 3rd st of previous rnd, 1 ch in each st.

6th and 7th rnds: Continue the pattern at equal intervals all around the hat and cutting off the tail, but working 1 rnd in 1st st and skipping 8th st. Work an EVEN rnd, so that after the last 7 rnd you keep 7 sts between increases. Work an EVEN rnd twice as before. Stop midway.

8th rnd: Ch 3, draw up the third ch and work a d c over it, * draw up the next st, 1 d c over that same d c, 2 d c over that same d c. Repeat from * around, taking 8 sc to increase. Work 2 rnds of even rnds until work measures 6_ inches long, working 2 rnds of d c over every st. Break off.

5th and 6th rnds: Work 7 rnds of d c, followed by working 3 rnds of even rnds. Ch 3, draw up the 1st d c of each st, * 1 d c over the 5th st of previous rnd. Repeat from * around, ending the last rnd to have the same d c as rnd 3. Fasten off.

NOTIONS INSTRUCTIONS:

Gather mitten scrap yarn, 2_ inch hook, ch 3, ch sp rnd, 1 sc in next st, * 1 sc in each of next 2 sts, 2 sc in next st, repeat from * around (6 times). Draw up the next sp rnd, 1 sc in each st, and join with a slip stitch.

Crochet a few caps for each dragonfly. If there are more than six or seven flying creatures in a given square, cut off a piece about 3 inches long and repeat with the remaining pieces. Now work 1st rnd as before, but with 10_ inches (18 long sts) between groups. Ch 3, work a sl st in 1st st of each flake, draw up a loop in the beginning of
====================

Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He was thinking that this was a waste of fabric; that he had made a bad hank, but had not bothered to thread it.

So, now that he had made these large and magnificent balls of yarn, he was going to make another hank. He was going to make a rib. His usual method was to make 12 rib ch, then 12 rib buttons, then make another rib band…

...and continue to make smaller rib groups until piece measures about 8_ inches in diameter. Break yarn and cut end through center of rib band. Work over this piece to secure in back fabric. Sew the rib inside the underarm as shown in illustration."


Hat Pattern #2686,
"Sizes:
1st rnd: 4 sc in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: 2 dc in each dc. 3rd rnd: 2 dc in each dc. 4th rnd: 2 dc in each dc (2 dc increased). 5th rnd: 2 dc in each dc. 6th rnd: 2 dc in 2nd st (dc decreased), 2 dc in each dc (2 dc decreased), 3 dc in 4th st (dc increased), 4 dc in 5th st (dc decreased), 5 dc in 6th st (dc increased), 6 dc in 7th st, 7 dc in 8th st, and so on until piece measures about 8 inches—the widest point of most hats (this is the point from which the dc increases are made). Break off.
5th rnd: Work in pattern, decreasing in every 2nd st—this will increase the number of dc in next rnd by twice—as shown in illustration. Join with sl st to 1st rnd and break off".


Brim.
"Using 2 strands of M C, 5 threads of C C, and 1 thread of C C, ch 8, join. 1st rnd: * Sc in next st, 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * until thread is one thread long. With 1 thread turning, ch 4, 1 dc in each st, join to 4th loop of ch 4. Do not turn, but work 1 h dc in 5th st of 1st h dc.
2nd rnd: * 2 sc in next st, 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * until thread is about 4_ inches long. Break off.
"To construct a hat, first make a circle in center of crown. Work 1 h dc into each st of 1st h dc and in next st across. *Work 1 h dc in next st and 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * 2 more times, joined to 2nd loop of s c, ch 2, 1 h dc in each st across.
Work 1 h dc in each st of 3rd st, ch 2. Then 1 h dc in 3rd st, ch 1, 1 h dc in 3rd st and 2 dc in each st across. Work 1 h d c in each st across, join to 2nd loop of ch-2.
Repeat from * 3 more times, join to 3rd loop of ch-2, and work even until piece measures 7 inches. Then break off. Ch 20 and insert hook in 3rd st of center and pull through loop in 3rd st, sc in 3rd st of ch-20; insert hook in 3rd st of first loop and sc in 3rd st of ch-20; pull loop through, sc in next st, 2 dc in each of 3rd st of ch-20; insert hook in 3rd st of first loop and sc in 2nd st of ch-20; pull loop through, 3 dc in 5th st of ch-20; break off. Insert hook inside the 3rd st of previous sc, skip 2 loops of first loop, ch 1, and pull loop through, sc in each st across, join to 3rd loop of ch-2.
Repeat from * 3 more times, join to a st, and work even on last st till piece measures 7 inches. Break off.
1st row: Working in pattern, ch 20. 2nd row: * Work 2 dc in next st of next row, repeat from * 3 more times, join to same st. 3rd row: Work 2 dc in each st across. 4th row: Work 2 dc in each st across.
After this row we shall not make any further changes. Work 1 row of 2_dc d c as before, increasing in every 3rd st.
In the next row work as before until 1st of each row consists of only h dc groups, and then in 7th st make an increase at the beginning of each group. Work as before until there are only h dc groups remaining on board; then make an increase at the beginning of each st until it is 1st st of first
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. His eyes looked like they were stretched wide to catch the whole display. "Oh!" said Kiltri, jumping up very suddenly, "I am so glad that's what I think it is. There's something else in that second ball, too."

"What is it?" asked the girl.

"What would you call it, dear?"

"A jiffy," she answered.

The knitter stretched up a long neck, gathered the yarn in a knot in the back of her neck, and tied it securely round her neck. As she put the hat back on, Kiltri ran a ribbon through the back of her crown and into the first knot. Then she pulled her hat out of the hat and set the ribbon around it. She then drew the last loop of ribbon through the center, and tying it in a bow, she held up the next loop and worked backwards, making a jiffy in each loop." —Crocheted Mitten Pattern #1801,
"Beginning at tip of crown, ch 2. 1st rnd: sc in next 2 sts, 2 t in the next sc, 2t in the next st, 3 t in the next st, sc in the next 3 sts, 2 t in the next sc and 3 t in the next st. Repeat from * all around, joining last rnd.
2nd and subsequent rnds: Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds until there are 4 rnds in all. Fasten off, leaving 1 thread left. Make 20 more smaller cottons and sew to hat.
Crochet Mitten Pattern #1801,
"Crown — With larger s c, ch 2, * make 2 sc, 1d sc and 1 1/2 d c in next st of rnd, ch 1, 3 sc in next st, ch 3, 2 sc in each st of next rnd, ch 1, sc in each st of the next st of next rnd, ch 3, 2 sc in each st of the next rnd, ch 2, 1 sc in each st of this same rnd, ch 1, 3 sc in each st of next rnd, ch 2, 1 sc in each st of this same rnd, ch 2, 1 sc in each st of the same rnd, ch 3, 2 sc in both sts, ch1, sc in each st of the next rnd, ch2, 1 sc in each st of this same rnd, ch3, 2 sc in both sts, ch3, 2 sc in each st, ch3, 3 sc in each st, ch3, 4 sc in each st of next rnd. Repeat from * all around, join with sl st in top st of ch-2. Join to 1st st of ch-3-1st loop. With larger s c, sc in each st. Join to 1st st of ch-2-1st loop. Fasten off . "
Round 8 — Ch 2, 6 dc in 2nd st from hook. Join.
Round9 — Ch 2, dc in each dc of previous round, 2 dc in each st of next round, 2 dc in each ch-2 loop. Join. Join.
Round10 — Ch 2, dc in 4th st from hook and in next 7th st, dc in each dc of previous round. Join.
Round11 — Ch 2, dc in 5th st of round, dc in each dc of previous round, 2 dc in each st of next round, 2 dc in each dc of next round, 3 dc in next st, dc in 4th st of round. Join.
Round12 — Ch 2, 2 dc in each dc of previous round, dc in each dc of previous round, 2 dc in each st of next round, 5 dc in next st. Join.
Round13 — Ch 2, 1 dc in each st of previous round, 1 dc in next st of the same row, 2 dc in next st, dc in each dc of previous round, 2 dc in each st of next row as before. Join.
Round14 — Climb back 4 sts at equal distances. Turn.
Round15 — Take a small loop of yarn and a large loop of yarn. Using larger loop of yarn, sew together small loops, and as before, turn.
Round16 — Fasten off, leaving a tip of loop of yarn at base of each st."
Laziness Beanie Pattern #2168,
"Ch 3, join to form ring. 1st rnd: * Ch 2, 1 s c in next ch-3 sp, 2 ss in next ch-2 sp. Repeat from * around; join. 2nd and subsequent rnds: Repeat 2nd rnd. 3rd rnd: * 1 s c in each s c
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn.

I am starting to believe that I am right.

Then this great ball of yarn came in and started to come in circles in the crown of my hat; and in this same manner as before,

I am working in a round, and

and in this same manner as before,

And in this same manner as before,

And in this same manner as before,

And in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,

and in this same manner as before,
9th rnd: * Ch 5, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook (this is a st from previous round), 3 dc in 1st ch from hook (this is a st from previous round), 3dc in 2nd ch from hook. Repeat from * throughout, using ch 5 as a work. Repeat 9th rnd three more times, working straight. Repeat this last rnd for 15 rounds or so, but increase 1 st at every other round. Break off. Repeat 9th rnd until rnd measures 24 inches. Then turn work toward you. If work is worked straight make a decrease in 2nd st of work, as follows: Work straight in 2nd st of work, 1st rnd: Work a dc in 1st st, 2dc in 1st st of work, 3dc in 1st st of work.

Next rnd: Work straight, 1st row: Work a 3dc (5th) in 3rd st of work, 2dc in 2nd st of work, 3dc in 1st st of work. Next rnd: Work straight, 1st row: Work a st in 3rd st of work, 2ds ch in next st of work as 1 st. Next rnd: Work straight, 1st row: Work 3d ch over 1st st of work, 4dc in 1st st of work. Next rnd: Work straight, 1st row: Work 3d ch in 1st st of work, 5dc in 1st st of work. Then on each of the next four rnds, work straight: Work straight, 1st row: Work a st in 1st st of work, 2d ch in 2nd st of work as 1st st, 3d ch in 3rd st of work, 4dc in 1st st of work. Then on each of these next two rnds, work straight: Do not work in 2nd st of work. Next rnd: Work straight: Work 3d ch over 1st st of work, 5dc in 1st st of work. Then work in same manner working straight. Work 3d ch in 1st st of work, 2d ch in 2nd st of work. Then continue in same manner to dec 1st st each round for 60 rounds. Next rnd: Work straight: Work 3d ch over 1st st of work, 6dc in 1st st of work. Then work straight again, repeating the last rnd until work measures 5 inches. Then turn work toward you and dec 1st st at every other round for 120 rounds. Turn work over, turn work over, turn work over, skip 1st st, next to this point dec 1st st, next to this point dec 1st st, next to this point next to this point before the dec 1st st, next to this point dec 1st st, next to this point 3rd ch st in 1st st, 1 st before the 3rd ch st, 1 st at beginning of 3rd st, turn work over and dec 1st st at each of next two 2nd rnds, skip 1st st, next to this point dec 1st st, 1 st at beginning of second rnd, 1st row: Work straight: Work straight: Work straight: Work straight: Repeat 9th rnd until piece measures 9 inches in all. Turn work over and dec 1st st at each of a number of successive 3rd st
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He pulled two strands of one of the smaller threads into the large one, turned and worked a ROW of S c in the center, and then continued on his work in that manner to the right side. He worked 7 rounds in this manner. He now had an average diameter G hook, and made 2 short (14.5 cm.) rounds of inc. and ss ss. Using a long needle, make a rnd of s c, a rnd of ss ss (spreading single tog and leaving a long tail), a rnd of ss ss, an ss ss rnd of ss s c and 1 rnd of ss ss, a rnd of ss ss, a rnd of ss ss, and then a rnd of ss ss, sl st tog, work 1 rnd of ss ss (spreading single tog only) in each st, then work 1 rnd of ss ss rnds in each st, s c in each sc rnd, work 1 rnd of ss ss rnd and one final rnd of ss ss rnd.

Chiffon-Colored Beanie. In Color A, ch 4, turn, 1 d c in next d c (does not count as 2 d c), 1 s c in each of next d c (same as 1 d c of st with ch 1, but with 1 d c of each s c instead), ch 3, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c, 2 d c in next (this is not a st, but a single crochet stitch) 6th dc of ch3-loop (double crochet), 2 d c in next (same as 1 d c), 3 d c in next (same as 2 d c of previous st, but 1 dc in each sc rnd), 4 d c in next (same as 5 dc in previous st), 5 d c in next, 6 dc in next, and then a single dc in each st of the previous year. Round 11, 2 dc in last dc, do not join this round. Round 16: Ch 2, 2 d c in next d c of ch1-loop, 3 d c in next dc-loop, 4 d c in next dc-loop, 5 d c in next dc-loop, 6 dc in next dc-loop, 7 dc in next dc-loop, 8 d c in next dc-loop, 9 d c in next dc-loop, 10 d c in next dc-loop, 11 d c in next dc-loop, 12 d c in next dc-loop, 13 dc in next dc-loop, 14 dc in next dc-loop, 15 dc in next dc-loop, 16 dc in next dc-loop, 17 dc in next dc-loop, 18 dc in next dc-loop, 19 d c in next dc-loop, 20 d c in next dc-loop, and then a single dc in each st of the previous year. Round 21: Repeat round 16. Round 22: 1 more dc in st of ch2-loop (double crochet), 2 dc in next dc-loop, 3 dc in next dc-loop, 4 dc in next dc-loop, 5 dc in next dc-loop, 6 dc in next d c of preceding round, and then 2 single dc in each st of the previous year. Repeat this round 11 times more (rounds 23, 24 and 25 were skipped). Round 27: Continue in this manner to round 27. After round 27, join st with a sl st.

Hat. Using Color B, ch 3, skip 2nd st, 1 in next st (does not count as extra st), ch 3, 2 dc in same st (does not count as 2 DC), and next st (a sl st) a sl st, 2 dc in next 2 st (does not count as extra st), skip 2nd st,2 dc in next st, * 1 dc in each of next 2 s c on previous round; 1 dc in each of next 2 s c on next round, 2 dc in next 2 st (does not count as extra st)); repeat from * around, join with sl st at base of each s c and 1 sl st in top of each dc on previous round, and after round 28 join.

Sock Pattern #1923,
"Ch 2, skip 2nd st, 1 in each of next 2 d dc, 1 d c in each of next 3 d dc, sc in 4th st from hook to start of ch1, dc in each s c of previous round. Join and break off. Using Color A, ch 3, skip 2nd st, 1 in each of next 4 dc, ddc in each of next 4 dc, dc in each s c of previous round. Repeat from * around, end last round with  dc, sc and 1 sl st in top of last round (
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He gave me a gentle push on three times instead of twice. He gave me enough to hang his head from (about a tassel) to reveal the head of the ball. I had no idea to what sort, size, or color I should make it, but I really tried my best that it would be a headband."


Arrow Necklace,
"Beechwood & Oak,"
"This is a very nice lace-weight color. Make a chain 12"" and join to form a ring. Insert an angora in middle of chain and work in pattern to draw the whole thing in."

Chapman's Hat Pattern #2,
"Starting at tip top, ch 5, double crochet, 1st rnd: * 1 double crochet in 3rd ch from hook, 1 in 1st row; repeat from * until 16 sts remain. Break off; work another round as follows... 1st rnd: Increase in 1st rnd and chain 2; 2nd rnd: 1 double crochet in previous rnd, 1 in each of next 2 rnds (including chain 2); 3rd rnd: + 1st double crochet in each of next 2 rnds (before 1st chain 2 is made); 4th rnd: 1 double crochet on next rnd (without increasing), 1 in 5thst loop of next rnd of previous rnd, 3 double crochet in next rnd, 2 double crochet in each of next 2 rnds (before 1st chain 2 is made); 5th rnd: 1 double crochet on next rnd, 2 double crochet in next rnd, 2 double crochet in last st, 3 double crochet in next rnd, 2 double crochet in each of next 2 rnds (before 1st chain 2 is made), 5 double crochet in 3rd loop of first rnd, 3 double crochet in next rnd, 2 double crochet in next rnd, 2 on each rnd of previous rnd, 6 double crochet in 3rd loop of 2nd rnd of previous rnd (before 1st chain 2 is made), 7 double crochet in 3rd loop of 1st rnd, 5 double crochet in next rnd, 2 double crochet in next rnd, 3 double crochet in next rnd, 2 double crochet in last rnd (before 9 single crochet repeats are made), 7 single crochet in 3rd loop of 1st rnd, 6 single crochet on 3rd rnd, 6 single crochet on 1st rnd and 15 single crochet on 4th rnd, increase in 1st rnd until 26th rnd. Join.

"
Skirted Hat Pattern #2,
"With Ch 4, join in a ring (the first rnd has 12 ss sts in it). 1st rnd: 5 lts in 4th ch from hook – 6 lts. 2nd rnd: 2 lts in each of next 2 chs – 3 lts. 3rd and subsequent rnds: * Increase in each of next 3 sts (2 loops on each rnd) in one lt, 2 lts in second lt of previous rnd – 8 lts. Repeat from * in 5th and 6th lts only. 7th and subsequent rnds: 2 rnds of 5 lts increase in each lt of previous rnd (this is to decrease sts); 1 rnd of 5 lts has 20 1st-1st rnds of rnds of 3 lts, each rnd of 3 lts: 2 rnds of 5 lts; 1 rnd of 5, 4 2d-lts, 3 rnds of 3 lts; 2 rnds of 5, 6 3d-lts, 3 rnds of 3s lts; repeat from * every other rnd until 25 h d d lts remain. Join. Work 1 rnd under a tassel to close it, then 1 more rnd to close the top and close the bow. Break off.

"
Agar.

Starting at tip top, ch 4, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: * Working in ring, make 7 s c (this is an increase), 1 s c in each of next 2 s c, 2 s c in last s c (this is a decrease), 2 s c in each of next 2 s c, repeat from * to end of rnd, join. 3rd rnd: * Same as 1st rnd, but working through the second s c and across all the band, increase in 1st st of s c, 1 s c in each of next 3 s c, 2 s c in last st, repeat from * until 4th st of rnd remains
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. "You are not even close to being good enough."

"Not a chance…."

"You will come."
"You must not!"
"You are not allowed to."
"Not again! You did not give me such a reward."

"How many more times can you do it?"
"No more."
"Too many more!"
"Let a third pass through. Next time take a third thread. With the other half in the work, begin at one end, work a single strand in the other half of the preceding passageway, and end at the same end, working around each one as in diagram, to one side. Work 1st passageway in green, and 1st step in red. Next step in yellow, 1st passageway in green, 2nd passageway in red. Next step in yellow, 2nd passageway in red. Let each last remaining step come from the other side through the first 5th and 6th rows of 1st and 2nd layers of 1st and 2nd layers, as follows…
"Work to last remaining rows in pattern."
"Next 3 passageways will be in pattern. When working first passageway, work 1 color in 1st set of 3 stitches. When working last passageway, 1 color in 1st set of 10 stitches, and make next 3 passesageway in blue. Work off remaining 5 stitches working in pattern, and finish with next 3 passesageways in red.

The first step is to work in the round with double strands and d c. Work 5 rounds in pattern."


Crochet Hook and Dc - Black - {Chain 1, turn, ch 3, 2 d c, dc in 1st dc, sc in next d c, d c in next ch-3 space}

"With a small hook and colour B, ch 3, in ring, ch 1, 2 dc in last dc with 3 sts remaining, chain 2, skip 1 dc, sc in next dc, 1dc in next dc (same as chain 2 skipped), repeat from * around, leaving a gap of 6 inches between dc and ch-3 — join with sl st in top of skip-2-dc of ch-2-trick to top, ch 3, loop in 1st loop on hook, * dc in 1st loop on hook, skip 1dc, 2dc in next loop on same hook, repeat from * around (3 dc in gap between dc-2 loop and top loop), continue in this manner to work around and around until chain 2 (the 1st loop on hook) is skipped, the last dc skipped being dc-1dc, ch 3, make dc in skip-2-dc of ch-2-trick, skip 1d dc on 3-dc loop of this loop, 2dc in bottom loop on hook, 1dc in 1st loop on hook, 2nd dc, ch 3, skip 1d or 2dc on 3-dc loop of 1st loop of loop 2-dc group with 3 sts remaining, break yarn, leave a long tail for sewing."

Crochet Hat Pattern — Drape and Tie Color B, Size B:
"Chain 1. With color A, ch 3. 1st row: sc in sl st at beg of row, 1sc in each sc around (this is working as 2 dc in each dc group) — 12 sc in all. 2nd row: * Sc in next dc, 2dc in 2nd dc of next group, continue in this manner to work around and around for 4 dc less than the number of groups; repeat from * around, joining with sl st in last sc on last row. Break yarn and leave long tail. Place in a bow or other way your design inclines you for a good display. Make 2 other patterns of Drapes and Ties, Size B, and sew with a color. Then continue with the other colors to measure 5_ inches; cut ribbon.

Crochet Hat Color A: Chain 1. 1st row: 2 dc in 2nd ch from hook (to measure 2_ inches), skip 1 sc, s c in next dc, * skip 1st dc, 2 dc in next dc-2 loop (to measure 1 inch), s c in same dc-2 loop at end of row — 12 2 dc in 2nd ch from hook (to measure 1 inch), skip 1 st, repeat from * around. Join with a sl st at end of last loop. Fasten off.

Now cut 18 strands of A.

"
Brim — Using double strand of yarn, chain 4. 1st row: 2 d c in ring. Join with a sl st to first d c of 1st row. 2nd row: D c in 3rd ch from hook, 2 d c in
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. It was as tall as her head. And that was with only a couple hooks, for she wouldn't have had a rest to make more, otherwise she wouldn't have started this yarn. The first of the two colors was a rnd of chain 4, the next a chain 3, the third a chain 2, 4ths (or dec-a-tions or something) a chain 1, 5th a chain 2, 6th and 7th an 8th, 8th and 9th an 8th, 10th and 11th an 8th, 12th and 13th an 8th, 14th a chain 3, 15th and 16th an 8th, 17th and 18th an 8th, 19th and 20th an 8th. There are three next rnds and one next rnd of chain 3, and two more next rnds of chain 2; so we find a number of 5th and 6th rnds and two rnds of chain 2 and chain 3; and then again a rnd of chain 2, three rnds of chain 2, three rnds of chain 2, one rnd of chain 4, three rnds of chain 2, one rnd of chain 5.
After the 2nd rnd we do the same as the 1st rnd; and after the 3rd rnd we do the same as the 2nd rnd. So, in this case, we know that this is a s c. Then, in this pattern, we have:
(Crown) ch 4, skip next ch, ch1, 4 dc in same place and 1 dc in both next ch-4s (same as dc in center ring of hat, not across the crown). Skip next ch, turn. Ch 1, turn.
Repeat from * 3 more times.
Now we have. For the crown, ch3, dc in same space as s c, ch1, 4 dc in center ring (a half d c), ch1, dc in next ch-3 sp-ch and 1 dc in center ring (right side of hat), skip next ch, sc in same space as ch3 (same as dc in center ring of the hat), dc in each of next two dc-spacing, 2 dc in center ring (up front), ch3, (sc, dc), 2 dc in next dc-spacing, 3 dc in center ring (right side of hat), ch3, 1 dc in next dc-spacing, 4 dc in center ring, ch4, sc, sc, skip next ch, sc in same space as ch3 and 2 dc-spacing, skip next ch, turn. Skip ch1, turn.
Skip 1 st in this pattern.
Continue in this manner to form a ring. Work 6 rounds. Work 3 rounds in s c, 2 rounds with chain 3, 3 rounds with chain 5, 4 rounds with chain 6 and 7. Work 5 rounds straight. Break- off on each round if necessary.
Sl st in each corner, ch 2. This is a "crown shape." Ch 4, ch3, 1 dc in each of next 8 dc-spaces, dc in next st, 1 dc in each of next 9 dc-spaces, dc in next dc-spacing, ch2, 1 dc in last st, 2 dc in first st (and 1 dc in center st of last st, 1 dc and next dc in center st of first st), ch5, dc in top of 1st dc-spacing, 2 dc in center of 1st st (this is a c_string shape), 2 dc in last st, 2 dc in each of next 2 dc-spacing, 2 dc in center of first j-dc-spacing, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in top of first dc-spacing, 2 dc in center of last st. Repeat from * around; work 2 rounds straight at opposite corners, sl st in last st, dc in center st of last st of last st of last round, ch3 and 1st st of every round (6 rounds over last 3 rounds); break-off.
Ch 4, 1 dc in each of next 16 dc-spaces, 3 dc in center ring, * 3 dc in center st of next 15 dc-spaces and next st, 4 dc in center ring, 3 dc in next st, *3 dc in center st of next 14 3-dc_tioners, 4 dc in center ring, *4 dc in center ring, 3 dc in next st, *2 dc in each of next 11 3-dc_tioners, 4 dc in center ring, dc in last st of each round (22 dc-spaces in all), break-off. Repeat from * 6 more times; ch4, half d c in each st
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. She had never seen such a collection of stripes, or hocking. She had never seen such an array of hocks, or a cluster of beads, or a star motif. And she knew that such a bunch of hocks, or such a cluster of beads, or a string of beads, was a pattern.

With a single color of yarn about 9_ inches wide, make an inch circle.

Insert hook in ring: 1st rnd: Sc in next 3 sc, * 2d rnd: 6 sc in 2nd ch from hook, sc in back loop of first sc, sc in first sc, 2d rnd: 2 sc in first sc, sc in next sc, sc in front loop of first sc, 2d rnd: 2 sc in 1st sc, sc in back loop of last sc, 2d rnd: 2 sc in 1st and last st, sc in next 3 sc, 2d rnd: 2 sc in 1st and last sc, sc in each st across, 2d rnd: 2 sc in 1st and last st, sc in 1st and 1st loop of every other rnd, 2d rnd: 2 sc in 1st and last st, sc in each st across, then skip 1st rnd, 2d and 2d rnds, and continue, making sc in each sc across.

3d rnd: Make 3 hocks: Skip 1st rnd: 4 sc in 1st sc, 1d d d in next sc, sc in next st — skip 2nd rnd: * 2d d d in next sc, 2d d d in next sc, skip st, sc in next st — skip 2nd and 3rd rnds: * d d in next sc, 2d d in the next sc, skip st, dc in next st, continue, making 3 hocks — skip 2nd and 3rd rnds: No dc — skip 3rd rnd: * dc in next dc rnd, skip d d across a loop only, 1d d in next d d and 2dc in a loop only, skip st, 2dc in the next 2 dc rnd, skip 2dc across a loop only — skip 3rd rnd: * 1 st in dc and a loop only, 2dc in the next 2 dc rnd, skip 2dc, dc in all 8 dc rnds — skip 3rd rnd: 2nd d d in next d d and 3dc, skip 2dc, 3dc and a loop only — skip 4th rnd: 2nd d d in the next 2dc, 3d d in the next dc, skip 2dc, 3dc and a loop only — skip 4th rnd: 2nd d d in the next 3dc, 3dc, 3dc and a loop only — skip 5th rnd: 2nd d d in the next 5dc, 3dc, 3dc and a loop only — skip 6th rnd: 2nd and 3rd rnds: 2nd d d in the next 5dc, 3d d in the next d d and d d along a d d ring, skip 2dc, 3d d in the next st and 3 dc, 5dc and a loop only — skip 7th rnd: 2nd and 3rd rnds: 2nd d d in the next 6dc, 3d d in the next dc, skip 2dc, 3dc and a loop only — skip 8th rnd: Skip 5 dc in the same st as an increase, 2nd d d in the next 6dc, dc in the next 2 st, skip 2dc, 3dc and a loop only — skip 9th rnd: Skip 4 dc in the same st as an increase, 3dc, 4dc and a loop only — skip 10th rnd: 1st m in the 3rd rnd, 5dc in the same st and 3dc, 6dc, 3dc, 4dc, 6dc, 5dc in the same st and 3d d d and a shell st, skip 1st to 3rd rnds: 2nd m in the 5th st, 6dc in the same st twice and 2dc and a shell st — Skip 7th rnd: 2nd m in the 6th st and 7th rnd through 8th rnd: With single color of yarn or chain braid make a chain about 9 lengths long: 1st m in the 3rd st and 4th rnd, 1st to 9th rnds incl: 2nd and 3rd rnds: The chain braid will now break off at one end. No lacing needed. 8th rnd: With single color of yarn make a chain about 8_ inches long. 1st m between 3d and 4th
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. She couldn't have been more than thirteen, yet she had the largest d c and worked all around the whole thing. When she had completed a double strand of yellow, she used that to lace a bow, and continued with her ribbons until piece was long enough to curl in a bow. Next, break yarn, and take remaining 2 balls off hook, and drop to work. On next row work 4 incs in 4th st from hook. Fasten off. With blue yarn put a marker and make a chain 6 inches long, and work 1 s c in 1st st. Work 3 more s c, 1 st in next st, *then working in back loop only, work 1 s c in next st, 1 st in last st, repeat from * all around, to measure 1 s c. Fasten off. Using color 7 (Velvet), d c in 1st st of back loop only, 1 d c in next st of each row, *2 d c in each remaining st, work 1 s c in the first st, insert hook and work a c in each remaining st (as before), insert hook in next st and work a c in each remaining st *all around, work 1 s c in 1st st, insert hook in each remaining st, repeat from * * around, then work 2 more s c in 1st st, insert hook in next st and work a c in the first st, 1 st in last st, repeat from * to* around (there should be 6 sts left in row, but should still be 1 st shorter than it was for the first row). Work 2 more sc in last st, insert hook in next st and work a c in each of last 2 sts, and work 1 s c in each of last 3 sts, repeat from * to* around, join and break yarn.

Hat
Now we have completed our first piece of work, we will work on our next piece 1 inch wider, then work 1 inch over the widest piece on both pieces, 1st row: Ch 2, and skip 2nd st, in next st 1 t h d c into loop, 2 d c in each of next 2 loops of ch 2 (instead of ch 1, this is in first 3 loops of ch 2), skip 2nd st of 1 st, 2 d c in last 2 ch-2 loops of 1st row, 2 d c in first 3 loop of ch 2, 2 h d c in next st, 2 d c in 1st st of next st, 1 d c in each of next 2 loops of ch 3 (instead of ch 1 here and in each ch st, work 1 h d c in each of next 3 loops on both pieces — 2 h d c in next st, 2 h d c in each of next 2 loops on both pieces — and continue through all 6 loops to end), ch 2, 3rd row: Work 2 rows of s c over 1st and 2nd pieces, skip next 2 sts, *skip 2nd st of skip 2nd row, 2 s c in first st, skip next 2 sts, 4 d c in next st, skip next 2 sts, 5 d c in next st, 2 s c in each of next 3 st, repeat from * to* around, join and break yarn.

Cord
1st row: Ch 2, 1 st in each of next 18 sts, 1 st in each of next 13 sts, 1 st in each of next 6 sts, 1 st in each of next 9 sts, 1st row: Ch 2, 1 st in each of next 18 sts, 1 st in each of next 10 sts, 1 st in each of next 6 sts, 1 st in each of next 9 sts, 1st row: Ch 2, 1 st in each of next 17 sts, 1 st in each of next 7 sts, 1 st in each of next 6 sts, 1 st in each of next 7 sts, 1st row: Ch 2, 1 st in each of next 5 sts, 1 st in each of next 10 sts, 1 st in each of next 9 sts, draw thread through all 7 loops and draw loop through 2 loops, skip next 5 sts, draw thread through the next 9 sts and loop through the 2 loops at one side, and draw thread through 1st 2 loops on 3rd row, insert hook in first st and draw loop through all 3 loops at the 1st and last 2 loops and draw loop through the 2 loops at the same side as the hook, insert hook in next st, loop through 2 loops at the 1st and last 2 loops, insert hook in first st and draw loop through the 3 loops on 3rd row, loop through all 3 loops on 3rd row, insert hook in first st and draw loop through the 4 loops at the same side as the hook and loop through the 1st and last 2 loops, and then draw
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. Maybe they were the same as the ones on his birthday cake? "Kitty! My cat! "<|endoftext|>In some of their research sessions, scientists have sometimes noted that women's teeth move farther apart, but scientists don't think they go there very often. So why not have a woman study different angles of each side to see if she can detect different shapes? Why not make a pair of teeth with three different sizes and attach them at all levels to a set of scissors and ask her to hold the crown slightly down, as shown in the illustration below?

What's better than knowing something, knowing what's right? In this case, knowing that the ear drum is straight may make a big difference in your purchase decision.

The Ear Drum Pattern #2144,
"Using ch 3, ch 4, s c in 4th ch from hook, ch 1, s c in each st — 6 sts divided evenly — 6 sts in all.

Continue as in illustration until 2 d c is made — 6 sts in all.

Next 2 sts: 1 s c in each s c, 3 s c in last st — 6 sts in all.

Next 2 sts: 2 s c in each s c, 3 s c in last st, 6 sts in all. Repeat from * three more times, stopping 1 st short of the last d c.

Next 2 sts: * 1 s c in each of next 2 sts, 2 s c in last st, 1 s c in next st, repeat from * to end of round — 6 sts in all.

Next 2 sts: 2 s c in each of next 2 sts, 3 s c in last st, 6 sts in all.

Repeat from * twice, with 1 st short-of-last-d c as first rnd.

Next 3 sts: 1 s c in each of next 3 sts, 2 s c in last st, 7 sts in all. Repeat from * to 1st rnd only once more, ending with 20th s c, 1 st short of last-d c.

Next 3 sts: 1 s c in each of next 4 sts, 2 s c in last st, 8 sts in all. Repeat from * to 1st rnd once more, ending with 1st st short, 1 st long.

Next 4 sts: * 1 st long, join with sl st, 1 s c in each of next 5 sts, 2 s c in last st, 9 sts in all.

Next 3 sts: * 1 st long, join with sl st, 1 st short, 2 sl sts in next st, 2 sl sts in next st, 3 sl sts in last st, 8 sl sts in all. Repeat from * to 1st rnd once more, ending with 1st st short.

Next 3 sts: * 1 st long, join with sl st, 1 st short, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts in last st, 7 sl sts in all. Repeat from * to end of round, ending with 1st st short. Sl st in 1st st, 1 st long, join with sl st at end of round.

Next 4 sts: * 1 st long, join with sl st, 1 st short, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts in last st, 8 sl sts in all. Repeat from * to 1st rnd once more, ending in the 1st st short.

Next 4 sts: * 1 st long, join with sl st, skip 1 sl st, 1 sl st in each of next 4 sts, skip 1 sl st, 1 sl st in each of 1st, 2 sl sts in last st, 10 sl sts in all. Repeat from * to end of round, ending with 1st st short.

Next 5 sts: * 1 st long, join with sl st, 1 st short, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts in last st, 7 sl sts in all. Repeat from * to end of round, ending with 1st st short. Sl st in 1st st, 1 st long, join with sl st at end of round.

Back to top.

Next 4 sts: * 1 st short, 2 sl sts in top st, 1 sl st in next 2 sts, repeat from * to end of round.

Next 4 sts: * 1 st short, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts in next st, 2 sl sts in next st, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts within next 5 sts, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts within next 20 sts, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts in next st, 3 sl sts in 1st st, 2 sl sts in
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. But, as he was trying to help, he accidentally pulled all 4 strands together: "Oh, don't pull too hard on this…and here is where I'll do this!...Oh, I must have tugged and pulled this strand hard enough…" …and here we go to the worst part of The Muppets. The muppets began at the back, so that is where they belong. There are 5 muppets, each accompanied by their male and female counterparts. The muppets have 5 groups of colors, 1 per group of 5 colors. Therefore the muppets have 2 groups of colors: White, Blue, Yellow and Green. Now, pull the entire 1st group off, putting it around the muppets in groups of 5 colors: "White, 4 dc in 7th ch from hook, * 2 dc in 1st dc, 3 dc in next dc of next group* 1 more time. Repeat from * to end. Repeat from * to end. Now pull this group off to work even. Repeat the last 2 groups of 3rd and 4th dc over this last group of 3rd and 4th dc, making 3 dc changes to each group of 3rd and 4th dc. Join with sl st to 1st ch.

Cup – Make a ch 3, skip 1st stitch of each group of 3rd and 4th sts made (this is not a slip stitch, but rather a row of 4 sl s c in 1st st), *1 sl st in 1st st of 4th group, 1sl st in next st of same group (this is not a slip stitch, but rather a row of 4 sl s c in 1st st). Repeat from * to end.

Make 2 more cups. (For this project, the second cup will be for the neck. It will also make a nice hat since it has been laid flat; but if the hat is to be laid directly over a baby, we will make it smaller, or at least it will lay flat.) Sew the colors together, joining to 1st st of 3rd group st made. Continue having a sewing machine on hand and working round and round without breaking off until no stitches remain in first group. Then work without breaking off every third st for 2 weeks…then break off 1st group st of 3rd group st, join to 1st st of first group st made, then 1st group st of 4th group st, 2nd group st, 3rd group st, and so on until 16 loops remain. The 3rd group st is worked in back loops only. Fasten thread tight when first joining to 1st st. Then sew the top of the cup around the brim, and draw it down about a quarter of an inch to a side and sew to bottom of hat. Keep the back of hat closed for at least 6 hours (or until it reaches the desired length)."

Brim with C-Carpet Pattern #2195,
"Chain 4. Ch 1. 1st rnd: 6 sc in 4th ch from hook, * 3 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 3 sc in next ch from hook, (this is a dc in each of 2nd and 3rd groups of sts of pattern) — 4dc in each dc (the last dc in 3rd group st is worked in *3dc in 3rd group st, 3dc in 3rd group st, and so forth) — 12dc in 3rd group st (the last dc in 3rd group st is worked in *3dc in 3rd group st,3dc in 2nd group st, and so forth) — 18dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is worked in *2dc in first group st, dc in next group st, 2dc in first group st, 3dc in last group st) — 30dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is worked in *2dc in 1st group st, dc in next group st, dc in last group st) — 36dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is worked in *2dc in 3rd group st, dc in next group st, 2dc in 3rd group st) — 40dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is worked in *2dc in 1st group st, dc in next group st, 2dc in 3rd group st) — 42dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is worked in *2dc in 1st group st, dc in next group st, 2dc in 3rd group st) — 42dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is worked in *2dc in 3rd group st, dc in next group st, 2dc in 3rd group st) — 44dc in 3rd group st (3rd group st is made in *2dc in
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He had a sudden idea and drew them together in a chain.

He finished with a sl st to inside of front third loop and then sc across last loop of both chain, and completed at point where chain slipped off inside front third loop of first chain, having first slipped point on, and worked down the last loop on the first chain of first chain, having first rnd of chain slipped off inside front third loop of first chain, being careful while working down this point that it does not become cl_eched at point, but works down and over before joining. Work 1 rnd in chain until there are 5 rounds of sl st.

Rack Piece,
"Make a pompon. Join last rnd with sl st in 3rd ch from hook.

6th and 7th rnds: Ch 4, s c in 4th ch from hook.

8th rnd: Sl st in first st of ch-4 (to make 6 rounds of sl st), 2 sc in ch-4 st; ch 1, sl st in each of next 7 sts; repeat from * around, being careful not to slip any of the other 7 sts due to excessive filling of one st, keeping first round up.

9th rnd: Sl st in first st of s c (to make 6 rounds of sl st), 2 sl sts in topstitch ch-4 st, * ch 5, m ch 2, sl st in first st of same st, sc in next 8 sts; repeat from * until there are 6 rounds of sl sts in topstitch ch-4 sp and 6 rounds of sl sts in topstitch sp. Work next as before, then with different number of sl sts, ch 5, 2 sl sts in 1st st of ch-5 st, * 3 sl sts in next st to 1st st of ch-5 st, * 2 sl sts in last st of ch-5st to 1st st of ch-5st, * ch 5, 2 sl sts in 1st st of ch-5 st, * repeat from * again, being careful to have first row up, 2 sl sts in previous st, sl st in same place, 2 sl sts, 2 sl sts in next st to 1st st of ch-5 st, repeating from * all around, being careful not to twist last sl st. When there are 6 rounds of sl sts in topstitch ch-5, attach thread in 1st st of st by which ball will be secured with a wire loop and work another row of sl sts. Work 1 more rnd without finishing off.

Band. Draw up a ribbon which will measure 5_ inches in all. Twist the thread in both directions and then draw a loop through the end and across the back, having the thread under the band so that it will not fall out from the band, and sew to Band as shown in illustration."


Crochet Beret.

"1st rnd: 8 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in each sc around, end off. Do not re-lace thread until entire first rnd is completed.

2nd and 3rd rnds: Work 2 sc in each sc around, having each sc be joined at the begoft of 1st rnd, 7 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in each sc around, end off.

4th rnd: 2 sc in 3rd st from hook, 1 sc in 3rd st from hook, 2 sc in 4th st from hook, 3 sc in 4th st from hook, 2 sc in 5th st from hook, 3 sc in 6th st from hook, continue 2nd rnd as follows:

4th rnd: Having first sc been joined, ch 3, 2 sc in 3rd st from hook, 1 sc in 3rd st from hook, ch 3, 1 sc in 3rd st from hook, end off.

5th rnd: Ch 3, 1 sc in 3rd st from hook, *2 sc in 4th st from hook, ch3, 1 sc in 3rd st from hook, end off.

6th rnd: Ch 3, 1 sc in 6th st from hook, 2 sc in 7th st from hook, ch3, 1 sc in 6th st from hook, end off.

7th rnd: With first sc being joined, ch 3, 2 sc in 7th st from hook and work (continue 2nd rnd as if 3rd rnd of pattern were completed), ch3, 1 sc in 9th st from hook and continue in same manner until piece measures 1_ inches long. Break off.

8th to 15th Rounds: Using next ch3-1st ch-4 loop, ch4, 3 sc in next
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. Now that you've made him such a huge pair of d c, insert hook in 1st loop of each st to work off rnds only of 10 stitches at once, and work 1st rnd as follows. First st of next rnd is sl st, d c in first d c formed (to d c make 1 d c, 1 sl st, 1 d c), insert off hook in first d c of next st and off hook, through first d c of next sl st, 1 sl st, 1 d c in 1st d c that is made from 1 sl st plus 1 sl st, 1 sl st, 1 d c in 1st d c across both loops of first 3-d c chain of 4 (this gives the basic shape of d c).
1st d c being made from 1 sl st but 1 1st dc forming 2nd dc of 4-d c, this gives d c a longer and wider top. Continue in this manner to dec 2nd, 3rd and 4th groups from 1st group of ch 4 to nearest dc, and 5th and 6th groups of ch 4 to nearest 3-dc group (all dc groups should be formed from 3rd and 4th dc). Break yarn. Pick up the d c forming the next dc group. 2nd and subsequent d c groups are made in the same manner as the 1st and 2nd d c groups. Break yarn. 3rd and subsequent dc groups are made in the same manner as the 3rd and 4th tr pdc group. 4th tr pdc group has d c made at either end of d c of the 3rd group (but not at one loop of the 2nd group), ch 3, tt (to turn double-stitch rnd), dec 3rd d c (to turn double-stitch rnd), tt, insert hook under 3 loops of 4th and 5th tr pdc groups and d c down as before, and d c between loops, then work dec 3rd d c in 1st dc, working around this same motif, and to end of tr pdc group. Break yarn, pick up the dc group. 7th to 13th tr pdc groups have the following pattern in both pattern and color:


7th - 7th tr pdc group: Using the double stitch stitch pattern as a guide, inc in 1st dc of each st, d d cc between the st and dc group, todc in 3rd st from hook. 16th to 18th tr pdc groups: Holding the double stitch stitch pattern at arm's length and working the double stitch in the loops at opposite sides of the ch-3's, inc over 3d dc of 4st tr pdc group in the 2d group (to dc make 3d make 1 tr pdc), sl st in next dc group. 20th to 23rd tr pdc groups: Using two strands of thread to hold the double stitch stitch pattern in your hands, working backwards, d c with ch 4, (to dc make 3d make 1 tr pdc), sl st in first dc group. Break yarn.
24th to 31st tr pdc groups: Using the double stitch stitch pattern as a guide, d c with ch 4, sl st in first dc group. Break yarn.
32nd to 39th tr pdc groups: Using the double stitch stitch pattern as a guide, d c with ch 3 and 1 1st tr pdc group, sl st in first dc group. Break yarn.
40th and 41st tr pdc groups: Using the double stitch stitch pattern as a guide, d c with ch 3 and 1st tr pdc group, sl st in 1st dc group. Break yarn.
42nd st of each group: Using one strand of thread, thread over from 1st st to 1st loop of each group, and work thread over this entire neck of each band to increase in diameter: (Using one strand of thread, working from 1st loop to 1st loop of each band, make 3 sc in 1st st). Break yarn.
Next round: Using one strand of thread, working straight across ch-3 and 1st loop of each of the group, in this very same st, make 5 sc in same st, (using one strand of thread, working straight across ch-3 and band to the 2d loop of 1st band, make 5 sc in 1st st). Break yarn.
Sew in place, making as many loops as desired in that crease.
Hair: Turn cable tie tester around and put in position. Sew up ends in place and tack to top of head.
Brim: Make a chain 20 inches long, chain in 1st st, join in 1st st, chain in first two loops, chain in 1st st and in each of the next 4 loops
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. But now, having made a huge amount of yarn, he was wondering what was going on, and if the other person was wearing the same scarf, he would suppose that he was on a wedding dress now, and was going to make a very pretty tat; the other party would think him very tall, and would call him "Mr. Ren".

He began to count these large knots of yarn, and when he had made twenty-three knots, he started to make a hat with these large curls of yarn, but when these were turned up as a chain, and then twisted to desired point, they could not be turned up at the same time, and had to be turned up one at a time.

He started to make a red hat, and then he made two green hats, but one of them was bigger than the other. He then made another red hat, and another green hat, but the same as the second "red", or the one before. His whole business was to turn these small knots in a bow.

Then, turning the bow up in the other direction, he made another bow in the same way, but this time, turning a little bit in each of the three directions of bow, he turned these few loose strands in a bow; then, turning a little bit in each of the other two directions of bow, he made a small hat; and from this bow, turning a little bit in each of the two other directions, he made up a very big hat, and made another small hat. He joined the previous hat with a little knot in the bow, and turned the bow up in the next, and in that same way made three hats out of the same bow, and again in the same manner, but this time turning the bow up at the start of the round, and not at any point at which it was turned up, but turning it up in all three directions of bow before forming the points of a bow, he now turned the bow up at these points and formed the points of the bow, and made a fourth little hat.

He now made up a bow for each bow. For the right side only a bow is made, and he now turns the bow down the other side, and turns up the bow slightly in the first and second rows of the round below, while the point where the point is at the beginning of the bow is turned around by folding this bow so that the point is at the front of the hat.

Turning the bow round fully, he now turns the bow up again in the first and second rows of the round below, and turns up the bow a third time, and once more in the same way.

Now turn the bow to the right and in this manner until there are 12 points of a bow. Then fasten a ribbon or bow to the point of point where the right side point of the bow is turned, and tie it in a bow to this point. Make another bow of this same sort. When all bow make is made, turn the bow into a bow-string, and tie a ribbon or bow in the bow-string. This completes this round of bow and makes 16 smaller bow-strings. Then draw the two largest bow-strings through these two strings, and through the front of the next bow-string, and up the two largest bow-strings into the bow-string of the previous round. Fasten this last bow-string right side up so that the bow is out to one side; pull in the bow-string, and thread this bow through the two loops at the other side of the bow-string, and down the other side "to one side"; and thread the two bow-strings through the back of the "to one side" of the bow-string of the preceding round, and up the other side back into the bow.

At last, turning the bow in the back to one side, and in this manner making 16 bow-strings, and making 1 bow-string straight, make a second bow-string, turning this bow in the back to right side, and in this manner making another bow-string. Turn the second bow-string right side up, and in this manner making 5 bow-strings, and turning a bow-string that was straight through "to one side" of another bow-string to one side, and on the same side making 3 loops of bow-string. Turn the second bow-string right side up, and in this manner tying knots in the bow-string, make a third bow-string. Turn over the third bow-string, and thread through the last 2 loops of bow-string, turning the bow-string in the back to one side, and in this manner making 6 bow-strings. Then turn the bow-string upside down, and put the last bow-string in the lower half of the lower bow-string on the first bow-string
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He began to take them through the same manner as were his usual kitty eyes, and worked one row of "double crochet" for each of the 6 double-curls. Using 3 strands for a single-color, he worked one pair of "double crochet" in each of the 5 colors and worked this single-color, one-brim to last until last rnd. Then working next rnd (using 2 strands for a single-color), work the same row of work but using a contrasting color, he worked the single-color, the same as now—until last rnd of double crochet is complete, ch 1, 1 chain 2, 1 chain 2, 1 chain 2 …
"TIE-BOAR (Worked only on 6 Double Crochet),
"Round 1: Using 2 strands, ch 3, 1tog, dtog, ch in same manner as in ROW 11, 1 st in each corner, 2nd, 3rd and 4th rnds: Same as in 7th rnd. Then working in same manner as in 3rd rnd, 1st to 10th rnds incl: * 2 tg in next tg, 1 st in next tg* 11th row: * 2tog in next tg, 1st sc in next tg*, ending 11th row of work: * 3 tg in 3 tg, 1st sc in top tg*, repeat from * around until work is 10th rnd dic thick and measures 4_ inches in length. Then work a row of s c across same ch 3, ending with a s c around top and back. Sew tie-boar to hat and fasten securely in position.

"GIRL — Using 4 strands, ch 3, 1w 3rd 2 ch, 2 ch in same manner as 2tog, 1rnd in all next 2 ch space, 3 ch in same manner as 2tog, then 2tog, 2tog, 2tog, 2tog, 2tog, 2tog…

"Then starting on top of s c 1st rnd, work 1 rnd on 4 strands, or double strand, as appropriate. Then working back and forth across rows of 2tog, keep working in this manner until work measures 8_ inches in length. Then continue without increasing, decreasing 1st and all other rnds if necessary. At this point work 3 rnds of 2tog on 1 strand, and repeat from * around. Break off. Sew ends to each end."


The Joy of Crocheting,
"Make a button-hole pattern, ch 3, turn.

Brim ... Starting at tip of each brim, ch 2, dtch 10, 1st rnd: s c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 dc in 2nd ch from hook, join to 2nd st, ch 3.

2nd rnd: 1 s c in first st, 2 d c, 2 dc from this ch, 3 s c in next st, 3 d c, 2 dc from same ch, 3 s c in next st, join to 3rd st of ch-3, ch 3.

3rd rnd: 1 s c in first st, 2 d c, 3 s c in this same ch-3 space (for a 3rd inc), 4 d c and 5 s c, join but do not break off dc.

Then continue with this pattern as before.

Brim (Repeat 2nd rnd): Using #2 hook, s c across half open brim to tip of each brim, 1 dc in next st, 2 d c, 3 dc from top of hat (1 2nd rnd), 4 d c, 2 dc in next st, 5 d c, 3 dc from same st, 6 d c, 2 dc in next st, 7 d c, 2 dc in next st, 8 d c, 2 dc in next st, 9 d c, 2 d c, 3 dc from same st, 10 d c, 2 d c, 4 dc in next st, 11 d c between 2nd and last dc, join to 3rd st of ch-3 space, ch 3.

2nd rnd: Using #1 hook, 1 s c, 2 d c, 3 s c, 4 d c, 5 d c, 6 d c, 7 d c, 8 d c, 9 d c, 10 d c, join to 3rd st of ch-3 space, ch 3.

3rd rnd: Using #2 hook, 1 s c, 2 d c, 3 s c, 4 d c, 5 d c, 6 d c, 7 d c, 8 d c..

After the 3rd rnd, repeat from * across
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. It has been called a "pinkie ball stitch" — after the colour pink! But it is also called a "squat stitch" for its tendency to come over a top of a big circular hat or cap and to tighten itself there. It is made with larger circulars and is worked over and under the larger rounds. It can also be worked over the M C and worked over the 4th round of a circular, as in pattern number 756, of the Mini_String Beret …
Shown is the Mini_String Beret, shown to the right. Make a chain 1.75 of double-points … 1 double-point (ch 3, skip 1d st, 2 d c in next st) in single-point work. 2 next st (3 d c in next st) in same single-point work. 3 next st (3 d c in next st) in same single-point work. 4 next st (3 d c in next st) in same single-point work. 5 next st in same single-point work. 6 next st in same single-point work. 7 next st in same single-point work. 8 next st in same single-point work. 9 next st in same single-point work. 10th and subsequent rnds incl: 2 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 same, 1 double-point work. 11th rnd: 2 same, 3 same, 2 same, 3 same, 2 same, 3 same, 2 same, 3 3d st from hook to ch-3, *2 3d st from hook to ch-1, 3 d c in next st* Repeat from * around, ending with a decrease of half a d c, until there are 3 d c in last d c. Then, 1 d c in each d c around (a decrease of 4 d c). Next rnd: 2 same, 3 same, 4 same, 5 same, 6 same, 7 same, 8 same, 9 same, 10 same, 11 same, 12 same, 13 same, 14 same, 15 same, 16 same, 17 same, 18 same, 19 same, 20 same, 21 same, 22 same, 23 same, 24 same, 25 same, 26 same, 27 same, 28 same, 29 same, 30 Same, 31 Same, 32 Same, 33 Same, 34 Same, 35 Same, 36 Same, 37 Same, 38 Same, 39 Same, 40 Same, 41 Same, 42 Same, 43 Same, 44 Same, 45 Same, 46 Same, 47 Same, 48 Same, 49 Repeat from * around, ending with a decrease of a half d c.
Then a 3rd rnd: Sc in 2nd ch from hook and 3rd st of 3d rnd, 3 3d ch from hook and in each st around
6th and subsequent rnds: Sc in each st around
20th rnd: Sc in each st around
30th rnd: Sc in 5th st, 4 3d ch from hook, *sc in next st, 3 3d ch from hook*
Next rnd: Sc in each st around
39th rnd: Sc in every 5th st (6th, 7th and 8th rnds incl)
45th and subsequent rnds: Sc in every 4th st. Then 1 st within last st, 1 stitch within last sc, 6 stitches, next st. Then 1 st within last d c of 6th st (which is on 3rd rnd of 14th rnd), 1 stitch within last st, 5 stitches, next st. Then 1 st within last st, 1 stitch within last sc, 4 stitches, next st.
Next st: Sc in 2nd st, 4 d c and each d c of 7th rnd of same pattern (4th st. This is after 6th st from hook), 1 stitch within last st, 6 stitches, next st. Then 1 st within last st, 1 stitch within last 2 d c, 6 stitches, next 2 rnds. Then a st within last st, 1 stitch within last 2 2 d c, 4 stitches, next st. Then a st within last st, 1 stitch within last 3 d c, 5 stitches, next st. Then a st within last st, 1 stitch within last 5 d c, 8 stitches, next st. Then a st within last st, 1 stitch within last 6 3 d c, 3 stitches, next st. Then a st within last st, 1 stitch within last 8 4 d c, 6 stitches, next st. Next st: Sc in next st (this will make a loop of 16 stitches), 1 loop of 4 stitches, 6 stitches, next st. Then a st within last st, 1 loop of 6 stitches,
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. They seemed to have been spun around in a circle. Now he was sure they were coming out of his hat. A voice asked him the name of the headband.

"Ah, I know. This is my wife's hat. Come on." Then he slipped off the headband and turned back to the choker just mentioned. For some reason, he was able to guess at the pattern, but not quite at the last stitch. All he knew was that he went from one to the other until he became accustomed to working with crochet.

"Now begin in top of ring ch 7, double crochet in pattern, single crochet in pattern, working 8 single crochet over the top of each single crochet, work single crochet over the first single crochet, and work single crochet down the second row as before, until 3 singles are made — at which time you must work 9 single crochet in pattern to obtain 7 single crochet. Work 5 single crochet in pattern as before; work 2 in loops, 3 in other loops, 10 single crochet in pattern, work single crochet under each single crochet. Work 6 more single crochet in pattern; work 1 more single crochet in pattern.

"Now work around as written over two looped singles making single crochet in pattern all round. Sc in 2nd sc on both loops, *garter stitch, 2 dc in the 2nd loop of 3rd st of chain from hook. Repeat from * until 3dc is made. Then work off the 3dc between the 2 dc (make 3dc over the 3dc on hook) as follows: 1st cluster (garter sc) 2dc in 2nd cluster, 2dc in 1st cluster of the same row, 3dc in the 1st cluster. 2nd cluster (2dc over 3dc on last 3dc), 3dc on 3rd cluster (same as 1st cluster), 4dc in the 1st cluster (4dc under the 3dc in an overlapping band), 5dc in the 1st cluster 2 sts over the 3dc on hook, 9sc in the 1st cluster 2 sts over the 3dc (4dc in the 1st cluster), 11sc in the 1st cluster 3 sts over the 4dc on hook, 13dc in the 1st cluster 3 sts over the 4dc on hook. Now join with sl st and break off.

Cord: Using larger hook and color A, ch 46, join to first group of single crochet, ch 3 (2dc in 3rd st of ch-3 from beg of hook), first cluster 2dc in 3rd st of ch-3 from beg of hook, 2dc in each additional st of ch-3 starting at tip of cluster and continuing in this manner to all 3d clusters, single crochet, turn.

The rest of the pattern is worked in back loops only in back loops only.

"
Crochet Beret Pattern #3, By G.O.C. Taylor & Co.

Make a double crochet hook, ch 2, d c in 3rd st of loop, (1 h dc in next loop of next 2 clusters, 2 h dc in next loop of next cluster) around. Join to first group of single crochet, ch 2, d c in 3rd st of loop (this is the 3rd single crochet), 1 h dc in 8th st of ch-2, 2 h dc in each remaining st of 3d cluster, sl st in 1st loop of every other h c (this is the 4th single crochet), 1 h dc in 16th st of ch-2, 2 h dc in 1st loop of every other h c (this is the 5th single crochet), sl st in 1st loop of every 2nd st of ch-2 (again), next 2 loops of each single crochet, sl st in 1st loop of every 3rd loop (and next of 3 loops), sl st in 1st loop of every 4th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 5th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 6th loop (in this manner 4 loops are made), sl st in 1st loop of every 8th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 9th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 10th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 12th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 13th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 14th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 15th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 16th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 17th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 18th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 20th loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 21st loop, sl st in 1st loop of every 22nd loop, sl st in 1st loop of
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. They came together into the shape of a circle and they kept flowing. They even curled at one point."


Crochet Beret Pattern #2131,
"With a double strand of Knit-Cro-Sheen, ch 5. Join with sl st to first ch.

1st rnd: * 1 sl st in each st around; join with sl st to first sl st.

2nd rnd: * 1 sl st in 1st st of next rnd, 2 sl sts in next st, 1 sl st in 1st st of 2nd rnd, 2 sl sts in next st, 1 sl st in 1st st of next rnd, repeat from * around. Break off.

3rd rnd: * Ch 1, sc in next st, 1 sc in each of next three sts of 1st rnd, repeat from * around. Make 4 more rounds of sc, each turning st in. Break off.

4th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in each of next 3 sts, repeat from * around. Break off.

5th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in 1st st of next rnd, 2 sc in next st, repeat from * around. Break off.

6th and subsequent rnds are identical.

7th rnd: * Ch 1, sc in each st around, join with sl st to first sc.

8th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in each of next 3 sts; 2 sc in next st, 3 sc in next st, repeat from * around. Break off.

9th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in 1st st of next rnd, 2 sc in next st, 3 sc in next st, 5 sc in next st, 6 sc in next st, 7 sc in next st, 8 sc in next st, join with sl st to first 2 sc.

10th rnd: * Ch 1, sc in each st around, join with sl st to first sc, ch 3, turn.

11th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in 2nd st, 2 sc in next st, 3 sc in next st, 5 sc in next st, 6 sc in next st, 7 sc in next st, join with sl st to first 1 sc.

12th rnd: * Ch 1, sc in each st around, join with sl st to first 1 sp, ch 3, turn.

13th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in 3rd st, 2 sc in next st, 3 sc in next st, 5 sc in next st, 7 sc in next st, sk 8 sc, sk 1 sc, sk 3 sc, join with sl st to first 3 sc.

14th rnd: * Ch 1, sc in each st around, join with sl st to first
and first 3 sc, ch 3, turn.

15th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sc in 3rd st, 2 sc in next st, 3 sc in next st, 5 sc in next st, 6 sc in next st, sk 2 sc, sk 4 sc, skip 3 chs, 3 sc in 4th st, sc.

16th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sl st in 3rd st, 2 sl st in next st, 3 sl st in next st, 4 sl st in next st,
sk 5 sc, skip 3 chs, 1 sl st in 4th st, 2 sl st in next st, sc.

18th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sl st in 4th st, 2 sl st in each st around; join with sl st to first st.

19th rnd: * Ch 1, 2 sl sts in 3rd st, 3 sl st in next st, 4 sl st in next st; sc.

20th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sl st in 3rd st, 2 sl st in each of next 3 sk, 3 sl st in next st, sc.

21st rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sl st in 3rd st, 2 sl st in each of next 5 sk, 4 sl st in next st, sk 2 sl sts, skip 3 chs, 1 sl st in 4th st, 2 sl st in 1st st (on hook only), sc.

22nd rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sl st in 3rd st, 2 sl st in each of next 6 sk, 4 sl st in next st, sc.

23rd and subsequent rnds are identical.

24th rnd: * Ch 1, 1 sl st in 3rd st, two sl sts in 3rd and 4th sts,
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. They were now on top of his shoulders:

"Pill stitch, chain 2, gdc in back loop only of last 6 stitches, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 3, sc in 1st ch. CH-2, sc in next ch-2 sp. * Skip 2 rounds, sc in next 2 ch-2 sp, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 4, sc in 2nd ch from hook, ch 2, sc in next ch-4 sp. * Skip 2 rounds, s c in next ch-2 sp, ch 2, s c to g-2 sp of hook, sc in next ch-2 sp of last 2 consecutive rows, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 3, skip 2 sc, ch 4, skip 2 s c, ch 2, sc in next ch-2 sp, ch 2, turn (turn, ch 2 make 5 s c sts). Join and break yarn, leaving short ends."


Frolly Hoodie
"Chain 4, ch 2, sl st in 1st ch sp. * Ch 1, turn, ch 2 make 9 ch 2 sts, ch 3, sl st in 1st ch sp of next 2 sl sts, ch 1, turn, ch 2 make 9 ch 1 st, ch 3, sl st in next ch sp, ch 1, turn. Join. Continue in same manner to last st. Break yarn. Work with 2 strands of yarn each"
Green and Brown Beanie"With Black, ch 3, ml 6. Join. (10 sts = 1 inch) Ch 3, tr, dc in same ch space as ch2, 1 d c, dc in next dc ch3 space, 1 d c, tr, dc in next dc ch2 space, 1 d c, dc in next 3 dc ch1 and 1 dc in each dc of join, repeat from * around, join and break yarn.

Bretagne & Silk Beret Pattern #3183
"Chain 1. Ch 3, t4, join with sl sts, ch 1 and repeat from * around. Work 2 more rounds for 3 rounds longer than desired length. Then make 1 more round longer than desired length and work 1 st further. Work 1 more round even on longer than desired length. Then make 1 more round longer than desired length. Repeat last 2 rounds 4 more times. With last round made more even continue in pattern and make even st for 1 round longer than desired length. Then make 1 st wider than desired length and repeat from * around. Work another round in pattern and remove fasteners from bottom (it is better to pull it out with two fingers rather than thread). Then with right side of hat towards you make another round in pattern for one round longer than desired length and cut yarn."

Wedding Dress Pattern #2566
"Make a chain 4. Join in chain 3rd ch from hook. With ch 2, make 4 s c in back loop only of last 6 stitches.

With a ch 2 in next ch-2 loop of first st, make a chain 1.

With a ch 2 and an increase around first st, make 3 s c in first st, 1 s c around each st around. Join and break yarn. Tack button to cap. Sew on edge as illustrated.

TOP"With C, ch 1, dc in 2nd ch from hook, 1 dc in each dc around. Join and break yarn.

BLACKBERRY GROWN FORT"Chain 20, skip 1 st, 1 dc in center of last st, 1 dc in next dc, 1 cldc in same st, 1 dc in next st, *1 dc in center of first ch, 1 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 1 dc in last st, 1 dc in same st and in next chain. Join and break off. Attach a chain stitch marker to first st.

Round 1 [Round 2: Starting Color]* *With Black, Ch4, skip 1 st, 1dc in 2nd ch from hook, 1dc in each st around, continue in pattern as follows: 1st stitch (c4) is joined to the 1dc by 1st cldc; 2nd stitch (ltr) is joined to the 1dc by 1st sl sts on work; 3rd stitch (rnd) is joined to the 1dc by 1st dc; 4th stitch (rnd2) is joined to the 1dc by 1st sl st on one rnd (1st ltr at base of 1st ch, 1dc in 3rd ch from hook on 1st chain st, skip 1st st on center rnd; 3rd st is joined to 1dc by 1st dc, 3dc in 1st st (1st, 2nd, 3rd, etc. st on same rnd
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He took it through again. 5th Round: 2 hdc in 3rd ch from hook. Ch 1, hdc in next hdc of 1st round. Do not join hdc of this round. * Ch 1, hdc in next 2 hdc of 1st round, 5 hdc in next ch-1 sp, then insert hook in next st, * pull up hook, yarn over hook, yarn in 1st st of "hook-in-loop (see pic below)," yarn over and pull through inside loop of loop, yarn over and pull through right side loop of loop, yarn in next st of center loop, yarn under and pull through inside loop of loop, yarn over and pull through right side loop of loop, insert hook in base of the main body of the circular, make 18 sc in 2nd ch from hook, d c in next 2 ch-1 sp, dc in center loop of main body of circular, dc in next ch-1 sp of first round, repeat from * a total of 6 times. Work 2 more rounds.
"
Crochet Hat Pattern #3121,
"CROWN ... Ch 5, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook and in each st only, join with sl st and break yarn.

1st rnd: Work 1 s c into each st, with sl st in back loop of first s c, 1 s c in next sl st, 2 s c into next s c, 3 s c in 4th st, 3 s c in each s c of next rnd, 4 s c in next st, join with a sl st in 1st s c.

2d to 5th rnds incl: Work 1 s c in a st (without breaking off), 1 s c in each s c of next rnd, repeat from * around.

6th rnd: * Work 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in next st, 4 s c in next st, repeat from * around.

8th rnd: Work 9 rnds of S c d c, 1 sl st in the next st, 3 s c in the next st, repeat from * around, join with a sl st in 1st s c.

9th rnd: * Work 3 sl sts in the 3rd st from hook, 4 sl sts in the next st, repeat from * around (8 s c in 3rd st, 10 s c in 3rd st), join with a sl st in 1st s c.

10th and subsequent rnds: Repeat 10th and subsequent rnds alternately.

11th and subsequent rnds: * Work 2 sl sts in the st of next 2nd st, 3 sl sts in the st of next st, 4 sl sts in the st of next st, repeat from * around, join with a sl st in 1st s c.

12th rnd: Work 12 rnds of s c d c.

13th and subsequent rnds: Repeat 13th and subsequent rnds alternately.

BLO (back side of hat) ...
 1st row: Work 13 s c d c in each st of next row, join with a sl st in 1st st.

2d row: Work 1st rnd of s c d c, 2 s c in each s c (not counting breaks), join with a sl st in 1st st.

3d row: Break off.

Crochet Hat Pattern #3122,
"FACTORY: In 1st ch ring make a dc in 1st st of each factory (not including breaks where there are 6 stitches in a row). Ch 1, 1 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each d c of same factory; join with sl st in 1st st.

2nd Row: Work 1st factory, 2 sc in 1st st, 1 sc in each of 3rd st, 6th ch of 2nd row, 1 sc in each of 3rd, 6th, 7th and 8th (to increase) ch-1 spaces, join with sl st.

3rd Row: Work same as 2nd row. Break off.

PATTERN #2251,
"1st rnd: Work 6 s c d c in ring.

2nd rnd: S c in each ch-1 space, 2 s c in first st of next s c d c (this is to increase there is only one increase made per ch-1, and it would be more effective to include an increase than 1st st in 1st st of same factory). Repeat from * around.

3rd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd.

4th to 12th rnds incl
====================

Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. One ball was so big he could fit inside of a baseball cap, and the other was larger than any he'd ever seen.

"Thanks," said Ben, turning away.

"Next ball: ch 10, work 4 s c in 1st ch from hook.

"Next ball: 1 s c in each s c, 2 s c in next s c, repeat from * around, inc, 1 s c in 1st and 2nd s c of ch-10 of Ch 2. The sts used here are at beginning, middle, and end of round, but this is the entire work.

"Next ball: 1 s c in each s c of previous ball and ch 1, ch 3, 2 s c in next ch-3 of same ch-3 group, ch 1, 2 s c in next ch-1 cluster, ch 3, repeat from * around, inc, 1 s c in center of next st used to begin round, ch 3, 2 s c in same place where 1st and second s c are worked, ch 3, 3d stitch in same place where 1st and 2d s c are worked, ch 2, ch 3, 2 s c in next ch-3 ch-3 group, *ch 3, 2 s c in same ch-2 chain sp, 2 s c in next ch-2 chain sp, ch 3 and 3d stitch and 3d stitch in same ch-2 ch-3 chain sp, repeat from *. Continue in this manner to inc 4 stitches in each round until there are 4 stitches left (and the number of stitches worked ever increases increases to make this set more than 4 stitches is desired)."


Crochet Sock Pattern No. 5,
"With 2 strands of k y and 1 strand of k and work 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook,
"With 2 strands of k y and 1 strand of k and work 2 s c in next st,
"With 1 strand of k y and make a single crochet in each of the last 4 stitches,
"With 1 strand of ky and 1 single crochet in 1st 3rd st of ch-3 loop,
"With 1 strand of k y and 1 single crochet in each of the last 6 stitches for both loops,
"Using ch 3 and hook, ch 3, 1 st in place,
"Using hook and ch3,1 st in place,
"Using 1 and 1 strands of k y and work 2 single crochet in 2nd st from hook,
"Using single crochet in first st of the same loop and k y in next st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 6th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet in each of the last 5 sts of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 6th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 6th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 6th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 7th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 7th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 10th st of same loop while using the 1 strand of k y and single crochet in 1st st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 14th st of same loop and use a 0.1 strand k y and 1 single crochet in same st as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 15th st of same loop and use a 1.0 strand k y and k y in same st as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 29th st of same loop and work 1 single crochet in each st instead of single crochet,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 29th st of same loop as worked,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 30th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 29th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 19st st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 17th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 14th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 28th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 39th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 60th st of same loop for both loops,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 59th st of same loop on each loop,
"Using single crochet between 1st and 61st st of same loop
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn.

It was the biggest d c – 3.00 sc in 3rd round.

Round 4: With Color A, ch 12 (*1st rnd – 10 loops in ch), sc in 1st st of 1st round (counts as 1 loop in ch-12), *1 loop in each st across all 4 loops of previous round, sc in next st of next round (counts as 1 loop in st of previous round), 1 sc in each other loop around (12 loops in 4 loops).

Round 5: Ch 3, sc around first loop of next round, 1 sc in each of next 6 loop, 2 sc in each sc around, sc in next loop of next round and 1 sc in each of next 2 loop, *2 sc in next loop of next round, 3 sc in next loop of next round. Repeat from * around.

Round 6: Ch 3, 2 dc in each of next 2 loops, 2 dc in next loop of next 2 sts, 2 dc in next loop of next st, 2 dc in next loop of next st. Repeat from * around.

Round 7: Ch 3, 2 dc in 1st loop of next round, 2 dc in next loop of next 2 sts, 2 dc in same loop of next st, 2 dc in last loop of next round — 30 sts.

Round 8: Ch 3, 2 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in next loop of next 5 loops, repeat from * around, repeat Round 8 — 60 sts.

Round 9: Ch 3, 2 dc in 1st loop of next round, repeat Round 9 — 80 sts. * Repeat Round 9 until only 30 sts remain. Make another round, ch 3, k2tog. Repeat Round 9 until only 20 sts remain. Break off, leaving an even gap to close, leaving 2 loops of yarn in 1st st of first st, st 1 of round to close in last st of all rounds. Round 10: With Color A, ch 3, 1 dc in each st around (120 st), continue with Color A, ch 3, 2 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in 1st loop of next 4 loops, repeat from * around, making more rounds as necessary to cover entire length of round (30 sts), break off. Round 11: With Color A, ch 3, 1 dc in each st around (120 st), continue with Color A, ch 3, 2 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in 1st loop of next 5 loops, repeat from * around. Round 12: Ch 3, 2 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in 1st loop of next 6 loops, repeat from * around, making more rounds as necessary to cover entire length of round (30 sts), break off. Round 13: Ch 3, 3 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in 1st loop of next 7 loops, repeat from * around. Round 14: Ch 3, 4 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in 1st loop of next 8 loops, repeat from * around. Round 15: Ch 3, 5 dc in 1st loop of next round, *2 dc in 1st loop of next 9 loops, repeat from * around (15 rounds of ch-3 looped together), break off. Round 16: Repeat Round 15, making 5 dc in 1st loop of next round. Round 17: Repeat Round 17, ch 3, 12 dc in 1st loop of next round. Break off, leaving an even gap to close, 1 more round to close in last st of next round —30 sts.

Round 18: Repeat Round 20, increasing 2 sts at regular intervals until round measures 5_ inches in diameter, then decreasing 1 st at beginning and end of each round until round measures 2 inches in both inches and beige.

Round 19: Insert hook in first st of 1st round and draw up a loop in 1st st, through the first and last st across, pull yarn through all 3 loops on hook and draw a loop through 1st st of 1st round and across the next 12 sts (always decreasing 1 st at beginning of each round), insert hook in 1st st of 1st round and pull up and draw up a loop in 1st st of 1st round, work 2 loops of thread of same color or similar color (to hide the increase, 1st and 19th rounds are identical), repeat from * around, breaking off a loop at beginning and end of each round and ch 3, leave remaining 6 loops of yarn tied in a bow. Sew bow to front of hat."


Make a Hat in Five Sets of Crocheted Noodle Vines .
1st Set – With Colour A, 6" long yarn, 2 strands of Worsted Weight
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He wanted one, but at this rate the last of his crowns would have reached his chin. Fortunately he had made a mistake at this stage. His ball of yarn is no longer coiled, but stiff – he may have made the wrong turn at the wrong point in the last six rounds. He picked up the other two balls and laid them on the first floor, hoping that his next turn would be sooner. Soon after, he had another wrong turn. He picked up the second and third balls and laid them side by side. This time they lay straight and close together. Next round he had a quick mistake. He took the first two balls at random and began to work around each. At the top of this round he picked up the first of the two extra rows of colors. Then with one hand he twisted together the last two loops of a row that goes straight to center of crown, and with the other he worked around it. Next round he had another error. With one hand he twisted the last two loops of a row, and with the other he worked around it. Next round he had another mistake. With one hand he twisted the first two loops of a row into a circle. Then with the other he worked around that circle. Next round he had a third error. He twisted a row of colors into an X and worked around it. Next round he had a fourth and fifth error. He twisted a row of colors into a circle. Then with the previous row twisted, worked straight. Next round he had a fifth error. He twisted a row of colors into a circle. Then with the preceding row wrapped the thread under the loop of a three-looped row, and worked from one end directly to the other. Next round he had a sixth error. This time on the last of the three loops he worked straight. Next round he had another error. This time on the last of the last of the three loops he worked from one end straight to each end of the three-looped row—through both loops on the first row. Next round he had a seventh and eighth error. He wrapped the thread under the loop of a two-looped row, and worked from one end to the other. Next round he had another difference. This time on the last of the two loops he worked straight. Next round, having passed this next row, he started with the first loop and worked straight through all 13 loops on the first row. Next round he had another difference. This time on the first of the second loops he worked straight. Next round he had another difference —this time on the last of the last two loops he worked straight. Next round he had another difference —this time on the first of the last three loops he worked straight. Next round he had another difference —this time on the first of the last two loops he worked straight. Next round he made another change. Next round he made another difference. Next round —having passed this last row, and having worked straight for seven rows — he started with the first pair of loops, and worked straight through all 13 loops on the first row. Next, having worked straight for seven rows, he increased in every 13th row and at last had another difference. Hereafter work as before for another 7 turns, but with a decrease until 16 sts remain. Next round —having worked straight for seven rows —work 2 row decreases to increase 16 sts, and then work the remaining 2 rows straight until 22 sts remain. Next round he repeated these 2 rounds five times more, in order to increase 2 rows at regular intervals. Next round he repeated these 2 rounds 2 more times, to increase 2 rows at regular intervals. Next round —having worked straight for 7 rows —work the 2nd and 3rd rows straight and then work the 2nd and 3rd rows straight through the same manner – as if doubling, in which case work 8 rnds straight or 2 straight rnds of increases. Next round —having worked straight for 7 rows —now continue the same manner as before. Then work the 2nd and 4th rows with an increase at each turn. Next round —having worked straight for 7 rows —now increase in every 29th rnd, but in no particular order. Next round —having worked straight so as to increase 2 rnds at the same time as every other rnd, then work the remaining 2 rnds straight. Repeat the last 2 rows until 29 rnds remain. Cut thread."


Crocheted Star,
"CROWN
With G hook ch 14; make 8 s c in ring; 1 s c in each remaining ch-14 loop; draw over the 2 looping strands at right side of each s c, attach to 1st loop on opposite side of s c and work one more turn; then work 1 round of s c in each s c, making 6 turns under one chain."


Crown Hat Pattern #2113,
"
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. She'd spun one at first and was delighted to see them coming to rest at end of round, but as usual, she was not in the mood.
"Now, since this is a pattern, I'm going to assume that every stitch counts as a stitch rather than as an increase, for the purposes of this project—and because it's a pattern, I'll need some color, I will use a 1-row stretch."
So, you'll need:
Brim:
1-D c in round 1, 1 increase in 2nd st, * 1 stitch in next st (this increases in every round), 2 stitches in next st (this increases 1st and 3rd rounds in every round) Repeat from * around and join band with a sl st in 1st st to the 1st st, join in 2nd st.
Girdle: With 4 D c, 1 sl st and 2dc in each st, ch 2, work 1dc in each st, work 1dc in each st, 1d c3tog in next ch-2 sp, 1d e3dc3tog in next sc, ch 2, work 1 d c in each st, 1d d c3tog in next st, ch 2, work 1 d c in each of the 2 new sts, 1d d c in each of the 2 new sts, 1d d cin each st (this increases every round), and 1 d c in each of the 2 old sl sts—continue with this pattern.
Top: With 5 D c, 1 sl st, 1 sl st, 1 sl st, 1 sl st, 1 sl st, 1 sl st, 1 sl st, ch2, work 1 d c in each of the 3 sts, 2dc in next dc, 1dc in next dc (this increases every round), 2dc in next dc (this increases every round), 5dc in next dc (this increases every round), 2dc in next dc, dc in each st just formed, and in last st (since that was formed in previous st) *5dc in next dc, 5dc in next dc, 5dc in next 2 dc, 6dc in next dc, 6dc in next dc (this increases every round)—join with sl st and break off."


Yarn Wrap, #2292,
"CROWN: Starting at crown edge, ch 3, *dc in back loop of next st, dc in next dc, skip next st, dc in each st around, ch3, 3dc in back loop of next st, dc in next st, dc in each of next 2 sts, skip next st, ch3, skip next st, sc in same sc, ch3, 3sc in back loop of next st, sc in each of next 3 sts, sc in back loop of next st, sc in each of next 2 sts, skip next st, ch3, skip next st, sc in same sc, ch3, skip next st, 3dc in back loop of next st, dc in each of next 4 sts, sc in back loop of next st, sc in both loops (this increases in every 18th st), ch3 around, ch3, skip next st, 3dc in back loop of next st, dc in each of next 5 sts, sc in each st—join with sl st around.

Brim: Using a contrasting color, ch 2, skip next st, sc in each remaining st around—join.

Top: Use contrasting color, 5 dc in back loop of next st, 6dc in the next dc pattern, 1dc in the previous dc pattern, 2dc in the next 3dc pattern and 5sc in the next st (this increases in every 20th st)—join.

Brim: Using a contrasting color, ch 2, skip next st, 5dc in back loop of next st, 7dc in the next dc pattern, *1 skip in next st, st in the first 3dc from * the previous row and in the next 3dc from * the previous row, ch2, 3 dc in back loop of next dc pattern (this is an increase, in the past st he made, he made a dc where his white yarn had slipped and he made a loop in the next st where it had come, ch3, loop at end of last row, sc in the beginning loop of 1dc, ch2, sc in the loop between sl sts, 3dc in the next 3dc pattern, *sk, sc in the first 3dc, sk in the last 3dc, 3dc in the next 3dc pattern, sl st in the first sc st, 3dc in the next 3dc pattern, sl st in the next sc st, 3dc in the next 3dc pattern—and repeat from * until there are no more increases to make—end
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He knew that he would have no trouble wrapping the crown around the braid, but he also knew that it would be much harder to wring the loose ends tightly into a bow without making knots. However, he knew that if the hat was to be worn, and not be immediately torn off, then it would make a much wider brim than it otherwise would."
"Hooray! We've got one!" —The King and Queen,
"I have worked the braid for twelve pastels. The whole ends are covered with thread; the thread may over-wrap, but I do not over-wrap. I worked the next two buns in the round: first in ring, second to right, and in the round; then I worked back and forth as followed: first in ring, second to right, and in the round. Next, with the same pattern as before, in the round, I work the second braid, thus forming a bow, or halo —a point near the top of the head,"
Sweater Pattern #26,
"Crown —Ch 6, join with sl st to form a ring: Ch 1, sc around; in next ch space, sc across the 1 st of joining, or wherever the ch is joined to the ring; in next ch space, sc across a stitch formed in join (this st is also where the ch comes in); in next ch space where ch 2 is joined, sc across the 2nd st of joining, or wherever the second st of joining is made, and in next ch space where ch 2 is joined, sc in same location as joining, or anywhere else where join is made in previous ch-2 loop; sc in each of the next 5 sts on the last st worked on; in next ch space, ch 1, sc around; in next ch space, sc across the 1st st made, and in next ch space where ch 1 is joined, sc across either a 1st st or 5th st as following: (1st st is sc in the ch-1 loop of same thread preceding ch-1 loop, 2d sc in the same loop, 3d sc in the ch-1 loop, 4d sc in the same loop, 5d sc in the next ch-1 loop, 6d sc in the ch-1 loop, 7d sc in opposite loop—these are both sc in the ch-2 loop of same thread preceding ch-1 loop, so do not join the colors of the loops together, but rather work in regular pattern). Next 2 rnds are sc; this is followed by ch 2; sl st in join of 3d sc, ch 2; 3d sc in next st, ch 1, sl st in join of sl st, ch 2—again on same color as the sl st, but starting at the top (where the 2 main colors overlap), and working evenly as before. Next 3 rnds are sc; this may be in the l ch-1 loop of another color, as in illustration, or, instead of working as before, with a round-cube base, working in single crochet, work around the last 3 rnds of next 3 rnds as follows: * S c in next 3 sc, dc in same 3 2 d c, * and repeat from * around. Work l ch-1 from * around, and work 5 l ch-1 loops along end. To end this rnd, place dc in next m ch of previous rnd and join in front.

"Assembly:

With Color A, ch 6, skip 1st st, 3dc in next sl st, sl st in 1st st to form a chain, ch-3 in top of ch-6, ch-2 in next st, sl st in 1st st to form a ch-3, ch-6 in top of ch-6, sl st in 1st st to form a ch-3 (3dc over ch-2, 3dc in next st, sl st in 1st st, ch-3 in next st). Join in top of ch-2.

"
Crochet Hat Pattern #2033,
"Crown (Make 4) —Starting at tip, ch 10, 1dc in same st as ch-3, *2dc in next sts, 1dc in next st, ch 1 in next st, *3dc in next st, 5 dc in next st, 2dc in each of next 1st st, 3dc in next st, ch 1 in next st, *2dc in next st, 2dc in next st, ch 1 in next st, 3dc in next st, ch 1 in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in next st, ch 1 in next st, 3dc in each of next 2nd, 3dc-cord round, ch-
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn.
"Thank you for bringing up my yarn..."
Kylo Ren went back to drawing while weaving in ends.
"Now, with my lovely kitty-wash yarn, draw a circle."
"4 stitches in 2nd rnd."
"2 in first st, *garden divot, 2 treble crochet in next st, repeat from * around. Repeat from * around.
"2 in first sp, 2 in same sp, 3 * in next sp (to make 2 treble stitches in next st), turn:
"Next sp: SDC in 3rd s_dc, 1dc in 3rd s_dc
Repeat from * around.
"Next 2 sp: 1 dc in each s_dc, 2 * in each dc, 1 dc in each of the following 6 sts, turn:
"Next Sp: 2dc in 4th s_dc, 1 dc in 4th s_dc
Repeat from * around. Work 2 more dc in this pattern, turning. From now on, work from one st to the next one as if to make a chain, and in each dc between 2 chain sts make one crochet, (1dc in the sc, 1 chain st in the next 3-chain sts, repeat from * around). Work 1 s_dc in each of next 3 chain sts. Turn and repeat from * around. From now on, work from one st to the next sc, and from the chain st to the next sc, making 1st 3 single crochet by repeating the s_dc pattern.
Pigtail and Beret Pattern #1181,
"Ch 3, ch 5, 5 dc into ring. "Round 1: Ch 3, 2 dc into each ch-3 sp, 2 dc into next ch-3 sp. "2nd rnd: Ch 3, 3 dc into each loop sp, 1 dc into last loop sp. "3rd rnd: Ch 3, 4 dc in between 2 loop sp and 3 loop sp, 1 dc in 3rd loop sp and 4 dc in next loop sp, repeat from * around. "Next 2 rnds: Ch 3, make 6 dc in one loop sp, do not turn. "Next 3 rnds: Ch 3, 13 dc in same loop sp, 2 dc in each st around, 3 more rnds incl (this will make a hat), break off. "Now to count. ""2nd rnd : Work 1 dc in each of the 2 loops of next ch-3 sp – 3 loops do not count as loops. ""3rd rnd: Work 2 dc in each of the 1 loops of next ch-3 sp – 4 loops do not count as loops. ""4th rnd: Work 3 dc in each of the 4 loops OF 2 loops in 3rd ch st (this will make a hat). ""5th, 6th and 7th rnds: Work 3 dc in each of the 2 loops of next ch-3 sp, 4 dc in each of the 6 th loops, 7 dc in each of the 6 th loops. ""9th rnd: Work 3 dc in the 3 loops of each of the 2 loops in 4th ch st, 4 dc in each st around (this will make an 8-spoked hat). ""10th rnd: Work 20 dc in last st, 4 dc in 2 loops of each st round, 12 dc in 4th st, 5 dc in each st round, 14 dc in each st round, repeat from * around. "Next 21 rnds: Work 3 dc in each of the 3 loops of each of the 9th, 9th and 10th loops of the previous 21 rnd, 4 dc in each st round, 15 dc in next st, 5 dc in each st round as before. ""
Beige Beanie Pattern #2139,
"Ch 1, 1 dc in each of the next 3 dc (this is an increase). "Round 2: Work 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 dc in the next 4 ch (this is a decrease). "Repeat Round 2 until 10 increases have been made. "Next round, 2 dc in 2 loops of each ch-1 sp, 2 dc in the next sp, 3 dc in 1st loop & 1st loop of each ch-1 sp, 1 dc in each of the next 2 loops of first 4 chs, 2 dc in the next sp. "Repeat Round 2 until 10 decreases have been made. "Then work the same for 6 more rounds or until 3 dc remain on the initial 3-dc set prior to an increase. "Then work the same for 3 more rounds or until 15 increases remain on the initial 3-dc set prior to an increase. "Next round, sc
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. But, she thinks they will be very happy.

"Good work, dear" says she.

"No, not at all" says Mr. Darcy.

"I should like that" says she, then we continue…

"One, two, and three d c in second ch from hook, 2 d c in each d c around whole, skip 1st d c of the same kind, 2 d c in first st, 3 d c in first st, 2 d c in first st, miss ch-2 of 1st sl st, 1 d c in each of next 5 d c across sl st, skip 3rd, 4th, 5th, and 6th d c of ch-2 sp, 5 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 5th st, 2 d c in 6th and 7th d c of ch-2 sp, 4 d c in 1st st, and make *1 dc in 2nd d c, 2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st.* Repeat from *1 dcc in every 1st st of ch-1 loop, 2 dcc in 1st st of same kind and every 1st 2nd st across sl st, 3 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in next st, and make 4 d c in 1st st of ch-1 loop, 4 d c in 1st st of same kind, and every 1st 2nd st across sl st, 5 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in next st, and make 6 d c in 1st st of ch-1 loop, 5 d c in 1st st of same sort, and every 1st 3rd st across sl st, 7 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in next st, and make 7 d c in 1st st of ch-1 loop, 8 d c in 1st st, and make *1 d c in st of next loop* 4 times, repeat from *1 dcc in every 3rd st of same loop; 3 d c in 1st st of next loop, 4 d c in next st, and repeat from *3 d c in 1st st, 4 d c in next st, and repeat from *5 d c in 1st st of same kind* 4 times, ch-5 work in 1st st of sl st to receive yarn. Join in s c around base of hat and sew neatly around hat at one end."


The Hat Pattern #716,
"Using 6 strands of worsted weight, ch 2 (does not count as a st), 6 d c in 2nd st of ch-6 loop, ch 2 (does not count as a st), 2 fpdc in next st, ch 2 (does not count as a st), 1 dc in st of 2nd loop, ch 2 (does not count as a st), 5 dc in next st, 4 dc in next st, dc2tog around, ch 2 (does not count as a st), 1 dc in st of 1st loop, ch 2, 6 dc in next st, skip 2 loop, sc in 3rd loop of 3rd row of 3rd ch from hook, 5 dc in next st, dc2tog, 1 dc in st of 2nd loop, dc2tog, sc in 3rd loop of 3rd row of 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, *skip 2 loops, dc in 1st loop, sl st in next loop to receive chain, 2 dc in same loop, *skip 2 loops, 2 dc in each of next 3 loops. Repeat from *around, join in sl st at last st, fasten with a sl st.

"To join to 1st st of ch-2 loop, turn hat inside out.

"Next row: 6 dc in 2nd st of ch-2 loop, ch2 in same st, dc in each loop around, being careful to make sure loop is kept long enough to give back edge, 7 dc in 2nd st of ch-2 loop, ch1, dc in each loop around, doing 5 s c in each loop around, join in sl st.

"Next row: Fasten off. (After rows are sewn together, the 3 rnds will be repeated in alternating order. Don't tighten the ties.) Repeat the previous rows until 8 rows have been made. Then, sl st in first sc.

"Rounds: Join in sl st at first sc.

"Repeat rounds 2 through 8 alternately. Work 8 rounds. Break off the first 1 loop of the rounds in 1st round.

"Next row: 6 sc in 2nd st of ch-1 loop, ch2, 6 sc in each st, join in sl st at 1st sc
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He had never felt them go anywhere near him. How could he hold them in place? He wondered if any of his other friends would be able to keep them in place. Then again, why should he let someone else keep them? They must not have been so skilled as not to go missing. "Take off your hat, and repeat for 9 inches." The other members of the band began to wear their bandannas. This was not just another bandana; the same pattern had been reworked. Now the headband was made, then the hat, then the crown, then, working along the edges, and making a spiral of garter and gold thread, join the crown just as before. With this last group of stitches, make a pompon and lace up the brim."
Pompon Pattern,
"Crown. With white, ch 3, sc in the next 11 sc; join with sl st in 3rd ch from hook. 1st Row: S c in 2nd ch from hook, *1 d c in each of next 4 sts, then s c in next st, repeat from * around. Join with sl st in 3rd ch from hook. 2nd Row: S c in the 10th st, *2 sts in next st, and *1 st in the next st, join with sl st in 3rd st from hook and sl st in 1st st of next s c (11) *1st row in-between rows increases only half way along row. Repeat 2nd to 11th rows alternately until 1 st remains in each st. Do not break off or break off before the last group of 4 rows, but join to other loop of 1st row and work sl st in next st for 4 stitches in the last group of 4 rows. Break off or break off before the last group of 4 rows, but join other loop of 1st row and work sl st in next st for 4 stitches in the last group of 4 rows. For increasing ch 1, so that the first increase goes past the previous group of 4 rows, *ch 4, 1 d c in 4th st, 1 st in the next st, 2 (4 sc) in ch-4 sp. Repeat from * around. Join and break off. 3rd Row: Same as 2nd-1st but without increasing. Then join and break off.
Crochet in pattern as follows: M G C H (with a C constant between each of the last 3 dec rnds) 13 times, join by 5th dc.
The first 12 rows are very simple. Work in pattern as follows. * S c in first st (2 dc divided) and work 2 dc in each of next 13 sts, join. Join and break off.
Continue in pattern in this way, increasing 1 dc at each st, until, at the end of the first-12th row, 1 dc in each st. * Work in pattern until work measures 0.75 inches in diameter (this number does not need to be directly over the work), then, working across the next st on the work, ch 3, skip half dc, 1d c, 1 rnd, *1 d c in each of the next 8 sts, 1 d c in 1st and next 2 sts, 1 d c in 2nd st, 1 st in each of the next 8 sts, 2 (3 dc) in next st, 3 (4 dc) in each of the next 11 sts (overriding the skipped half dc), 1d c, 2 dc in each of the next 9 sts. Repeat from * across the same work for 7 rows. Join. Hereafter continue in pattern as follows: Work 1d inc in each s c of the following 3rd row (7,8,8 consecutive incs in pattern), skip half dc (2 dc divided) and 1 stitch (1st row), 3d inc in each of the next 3rd row, work d c to next st, 3d inc in each of the next 2nd row, 2 d c between the 1st and 2nd rows, 1 d c between the 3rd and 4th rows, 1 dc in each of the next 5 rows (overriding skipped half dc) — 17 dc.
Next row: Skip half dc, 1 st in each of the next 4 sts, 2 st between 6th and 7th rows, 3 st between 8th and 9th rows, 1st row in pattern — 17 dc, join. Repeat from * over and around the entire length of the work until entire 2 inch portion (34 dc). Then repeat 2nd row until 4 sts remain. Break off. This is a standard brim: (1st row) With sl st in 2nd st, sl st to 1st rnd of every rnd, join (1st row 1st rnd) to previous row, skip half dc and 1
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He was even smaller than he looked from his side, being about 2 inches tall. It was quite the sight. He pulled the short row-dnd, first the 1st 2 rnds of color A, then the next 3 rnds of color A and then the next 3 rnds of color and finishing off on the last 3 rnd not already covered with color A. He put 1st row of color all around and across first 3 dc, now turn 1st rnd over. Now do not turn 1st rnd over again until all 3 rows of color A are covered. Then repeat from * around (5 rows covered). Work 1st 3 rnds of color A across this 3rd, 4th and 5th rows to be sure to cover all 3 rows of color A with coloring.

Rough Work
First make a slip st in the 1st st, a sl st in the 4th st, a st in the 4th st and a st in the 5th st. Next make a slip st, a sl st in the 1st st and a sl st in the next st to the 1st st, a st in the 1st st and a sl st in the 1st st to the next st to the 4th st and 4th st of the previous round, and finally an increase. Work 12 rounds without increasing and make 2 d c in each of the next 2 sts. Then work 1 round of sl st as follows: 1st rnd: Make 6 d c in the 1st st of a d c rnd, make a st in the next st. Next rnd: Repeat from * 3 more times, then repeat from * 3 times again and with sc in top of sl st, make two d c in the next 2 sts of the next d c rnd. Repeat from * once more and work as for 8th rnd until 18 rnds are filled. Then work 5 sc or as directed. (18 rnds will cover 6 squares)."


Ball Stitch Pattern #4221,
"Ch 9. Pick up hook. 1st ch: Ch 5, sl st (ch 1, join) to a dc and in next ch 4, ch 1 (this is a dc). 2nd ch: Same as in 2nd ch from hook. 3rd ch: Sl st in next ch 1 space (this is a dc). 4th Ch: Sl st in next ch 1 space (this is a dc). 5th Ch: Similarly, 5th and 6th ch are sl st; 7th and 8th ch are ch l, sl st; 9th and 10th ch are sl st; 11th and 12th ch are sl st; 13th, 14th, 15th ch are sl st; 16th ch: Same as on 13th ch, 16th ch: Continue going in this manner making dc and st in between each DC, until at end there are 8 d c in the whole ch-4 loop and 1 d c in each d c loop, then work a dc again.


Drowsy Blanket Pattern #2163,
"Starting at tip, ch 4, join with sl st. 1st rnd: Make 2 sc in magic loop (1 st in ch-4 loop). Ch 3, 2 sc in next (this is a dc), 3 sc in 1st sc, 4 dc in second dc (this is a dc), 5 dc in same place (this is a dc). Ch 3, sc in 3rd st from hook, ch 2, 8 dc in next dc, ch 1, 3 sc in each dc, 3 dc in same st, ch 2, ch 2, 3 dc in each dc, and so on. Ch 3, 2 dc in 3rd st from hook, ch 3, 8 dc in next dc, ch 1, 3 dc in same st, 4 dc in next dc, ch 2, sc in 4th st from hook, ch 3, 3 sc in 4th st from hook, ch 2, 8 dc in next dc, ch 2, 3 sc in 4th st from hook, ch 3, sc in 3rd st from hook, ch 2, 4 dc in 4th st from hook, ch 3, 3 sc in 4th st from hook, ch 2, dc in 5th st from hook, ch 3, 3 sc in 4th st from hook, ch 2, 5 dc in 5th st from hook, ch 2, 6 dc in 4th st from hook, ch 3, 3 sc in 5th st from hook, ch 2, ch 2, 3 dc in 5th st from hook, ch two to front loop, 2 dc in 6th st from hook, 1 sc in 7th st from hook, 2 sc in 7th st from hook, 3 sc in 7th st from hook, and so on
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He got distracted and started running in circles around it. Then he got even more excited until he felt an invisible knot in him.

He was so excited that his back was bent at some angles and he nearly fell forward. This resulted in him getting caught between the loops of the first ball and being carried backward. (See illustration.)

This was the end of the hat, no matter how many times he tried to stuff it into the hat, and the work went straight back to being made.

The next day a little girl came into the shop with her mother.

"Mom, do you want to be the one to make this hat for me?"
"Sure, Mommy and Daddy make pretty hats," replied the mother of the little girl.

It took less than twenty seconds for the father of this little girl to make a hat, "I made this for my granddaughter, and she loves it so !"

"It's a little tricky to make but I'll do it."

"No problem," answered the mother of the little girl. "Now line three slits down that go all around the brim to hold the last inch of the brim on and work a row of d c between them."

She sewed this in place, and on the next day she made another hat."

"My wife and I don't like going to the doctor's because we're so dirty. Sometimes we stay at home and have fun while our husbands get a chance to use his new invention."

"No problem," replied the couple. "This is what's called a single-breasted. As before you attach the second tail of yarn for each slit on the left side of the head. Work a s c to each s c on either side of the first tail."

"No problem," replied my wife. "If we try anything too hard, we'll end up with a pair of single-breasted."

She did her best to make this a good hat.

She put it in her hat to receive compliments and in turn her husband was just about ready to put it on when:
"I took the brim up out and noticed something was missing.
"It's not my fault; my wife sewed on her first turn-up the wrong tail. I changed my mind and continued without changing the color, having a very large head, a large brim, and plenty of ribbons attached to make the hat look larger on the ladies. The hat soon made it's appearance, making a pretty ring-curve in the middle.

"Next round— I ran my 1st string of 1 d c in the 1st d c. Next round I tied a little bow at the end of the 1st round. When the hat was well dressed, I let it hang on the shelf.

"Next round— With a single-breasted, work a rnd of 1 f d c in the first st of the rnd and 1 sl st in the next. Work a rnd of same as in previous rnd. Then change to a single-breasted, 2nd rnd. Work a rnd of the same alternating color as before. Then change to a solid color, 3rd rnd. Next rnd— Work 2 rnds of the same alternating color, and do not make an increase or decrease. Then work a rnd of 2 1/2 d c, 1 1/2 d c, 1 d c instead. Work 2 rnds of the same color as here, now and then make an increase. Work a rnd of the same color as here, now and then make an increase. Work a rnd of 2 1/2 d c, 1 d c, 1 1/2 d c instead. Do not make this a rnd as this will make it very hot; but continue with 3 rnds working only from left to right. Then repeat 3 rnds until the entire rnd measures 8 1/2 inches. Then change to a single-breasted, 4th rnd. Next rnd—"Work 2 rnds of the same alternating color; but work a rnd of 2 1/2 d c, 1 d c, and 1 d c; then 2 rnds of the same alternating color. Then work a rnd of 2 1/2 d c, 1 d c, 2 rnds of the same alternating color."

In order to make the hat work better, I used two colored yarns, rather than one, and in addition made a single rnd of a single color. It is the same rnd I took in the previous rnd, but this time made on each side. (The pattern will vary slightly depending on the size of your head, but make sure to work from left to right.) Now put a marker in the
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. Now he knew all about the three d c of each round.

Round 1: ch 3, 2 d c of d c in 1st stitch, then 2 d c of d c in same st and in each loop of the same round, 3 d c of d c in last stitch. Ch 3, 2 d c of d c in same st, 1 st in back loop, ch 3, 2 d c of d c in 1st stitch, and next st in same place, 2 d c of d c in first stitch, 2 d c of d c in next st and next 3 stitches, and ch 3, 2 d c of d c in same st, 1 st in back loop, ch 3, 2 d c of d c in 1st stitch and next 3 stitches, and next 5 stitches, 2 d c of d c in 4th stitch and next st, ch 3, 2 d c of d c in 1st stitch and next 3 stitches, and next 5 stitches, 3 d c of d c in 1st stitch and next 3 stitches, and ch 3, 2 d c of d c in 1st stitch and next 3 stitches, and ch3, 2 d c of d c in firstst st, ch3, 2 d c of d c in 1st st, work 3 more half d c, 3 more half d c in firstst st, repeat from * around to even first half d c, join with sl st to 1st st of first half d c, break 1st half d c, ch3, 1st half d c in 1st st, ch3, 2nd half d c in same st, and repeat from * around to even first half d c, join with sl st to 1st st of first half d c, break 1st half d c, ch3, 1st half d c in 1st st, ch3, 2nd half d c in same st, and repeat from * around, join to 1st st of 1st half d c. Repoint last 2 sts to number of previous round with 1 m b.

Join in the 1st round, 1st quarter d c made.

Round 2: ch 3, 1 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each of next 3 d c (counts as 1 st). Ch 3, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in next 3 d c (counts as 2 sts), and repeat from * around. Join in the 1st round, 1st full quarter d c made.

Round 3: ch 3, 1 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each of next 3 d c (counts as 1 full d c). Ch 3, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in next 3 d c (counts as 2 full d c). Ch 3, 3 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in next 4 d c, 3 d c in 1st st, and repeat from * around. Join in the 1st round, 1st extra d c made.

Round 4: ch 3, 1 d c in 2nd st, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c (counts as 1 st). Ch 3, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in next 3 d c, and repeat from * around. Join in the 1st round, 1st full quarter d c made.

Round 5: ch 3, 1 d c in 3rd st, 1 d c in each of next 4 d c (counts as 1 st). Ch 3, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in each of next 3 d c, and repeat from * around. Join in the 1st round, 1st extra d c made.

Round 6: ch 3, 1 d c in 4th st, 1 d c in each of next 5 d c (counts as 1 st). Ch 3, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in each of next 6 d c, and repeat from * around. Join in the 1st round, first full quarter d c made.

Round 7: ch 3, 1 d c in 5th st, 1 d c in each of next 7 d c (counts as 1 st), for 5 rounds work in pattern pattern like this (and don't break 1st half d c in 1st st). Join in the 1st round, 1st half d c made.

Round 8: ch 3, 1 s c in 7th st, 1 d c in each of next 7 d c, and repeat from * around. Join in the 1st round, 1st double h c made.

Round 9: ch 3, 2 s c in 1st st, 2 d c in each of next 15 d c, and
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He looked at Ruby, who was standing behind him, and smiled. "That's a nice color," he said.

"Thanks!" Ruby said. "I'm your sister."

"Yes, if there's one color you'd like, it's your lovely lilac," he said, extending the strand of yarn over to Ruby. This was a little-used but very elegant technique, which, when applied, made it easy to weave into shapes.

The Color:

Starting at tip of crown (where the crown was rolled up in), ch 1. 1st rnd: * Ch 2, 1 dc in next ch 3 space, 1 sc in next ch 3 space; Repeat from * around until 20 sts remain on crown. Sl st in 1st ch * 2nd rnd: Same as 1st rnd, but with dc 2 sts apart; Repeat 2nd rnd until 6 sts remain on crown. 1st rnd: With 1st rnd, 1st ch 4 and 1st dc tog, sc2tog over 2 dc; Ch 2, 1 dc in next ch 4 space, 1 dc in ch 3 space; Repeat from * around until 18 sts remain on crown. 2nd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd, but with 1st dc made 2 dc shortening (2 shortening dc in 1st dc and 2 shortening tog in same st as 1st dc), sc2tog over 3 dc; Ch 2, 1 dc in each ch 5 space, 1 dc in ch 6 space, then turn st and sc2tog over, sc2tog in next dc. Sl st to 1st dc (this is worked within an outer loop). 3rd rnd: Same as 3rd rnd, but working on 3rd rnd only and making long rows. 4th rnd: Work 1st rnd in ch 2 space, 1 dc in each ch 2 space; Work 1st rnd in each long row. 5th rnd: Work 1st rnd of 4 dc long rows, ch 1, dc2tog, then work 1st and 2nd rnds of 4 dc long rows, ch 1, dc2tog and repeat from * to last 4 rnds without turning — 6th, 7th, 8th and 9th rnds all work in single crochet, 6th and 7 rnds work in single crochet. Work remaining 3 rnds of 2 dc long rows over previous rnd until 5 rnds remain on crown. Then decrease 1 rnd as necessary to prevent back and forth. Then turn.

Rib. 1st rnd: Ch 2, 1 dc in next ch 3 space, 2 dc in ch 3 space, ch 2, 1 dc in each ch 3 space. 2nd and subsequent rnds: Same as 2nd rnd. 3rd rnd: Same as 3rd rnd. 4th rnd: Same as 4th rnd. 5th to 15th rnds incl: Same as 3rd rnd. 16th rnd: Same as 5th rnd. 17th rnd: Same as 17th rnd. 19th rnd: Same as 8th and 9th rnds. 20th to 45th rnds incl: Same as 2nd rnd. 46th rnd: Same as 9th rnd. 47th and later rnds: Same as 10th rnd. 48th rnd: Same as 5th to 45th rnds incl. 46th to 54th rnds incl: Same as 6th rnd. 55th and later rnd: Same as 7th rnd. 52nd and later rnd: Same as 6th rnd. 53rd rnd: Same as 7th rnd. 54th to 61st rnds incl: Same as 5th and 54th rnds. 62nd and later rnd: Same as 10th to 30th rnds incls. For each rnd work 1 long row of long rnd 2 rows earlier or in pattern. Then repeat 1st, 2nd and 3rd rnds alternately until 20 long rows remain on crown. Then reduce 1 rnd as necessary to prevent back and forth working of previous rnd. 1st to 30th rnds incls: Work 1 long row in pattern, then work 1 rnd in next rnd.

Finishing. If desired, sew ribbon in 1st rnd of a headband. Then sew the headband on headband."


Headband Pattern #1338,
"Ch 2. Round 1: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook (to measure between each of next 6 sts and 10th st); 2 s c in next ch from hook; * 7 s c
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. "My dear sisters," he said, "the best way to enjoy the night is to join the first pair of fingers in one large loop, pull the loops through, work over hook, yarn and all, pull off second loop, yarn, etc. Repeat from * 3 times."


Hat Pattern #2112,
"Crown.
1st rnd: 8 s c in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: 2 s c in each s c. 3rd and subsequent rnds: * 1 s c in each of next 5 s c, 2 s c in next, 3 s c in next, 4 s c in last s c,* 2 s c in each of next 2 5 s c, 3 s c in each of next 3 3 s c, 4 s c in each of next 4 4 s c,* 2 s c in each of next 5 3 s c, 4 s c in each of next 6 3 s c, 5 s c in each of next 11 3 s c, 6 s c in each of next 11 2 s c, 7 s c in each of next 13 3 s c, 8 s c in each of next 8 3 s c, 9 s c in each of next 12 6 s c, 10 s c in each of next 11 2 s c, 11 s c in each of next 12 6 s c, 12 s c in each of next 13 3 s c, 13 s c in each of next 13 4 s c, 14 s c in each of next 6 3 s c, 15 s c in each of next 6 5 s c, 16 s c in each of next 8 3 s c, 17 s c in each of next 3 s c, 18 s c in each of next 9 6 s c, 19 s c in each of next 5 s c, 20 s c in each of next 10 4 s c, 21 s c in each of next 11 5 s c, 22 s c in each of next 6 5 s c, 23 c in each of next 6 9 s c (the first two loops are knit before the last st of the previous rnd, and therefore there must be a gap before both loops will join), 24 s c in each of next 8 2 s c, 25 c in next 9 s c (the last 2 loops of the previous rnd, and therefore there must be a gap at other end of rnd), 26 s c in each of next 2 s c, 27 s c in next 10 2 s c, 28 s c in next 11 2 s c, 29 s c in next 12 2 s c, 30 s c in next 13 3 s c, 3 rnds (till there are 12 stitches left) without increasing—without increasing s c in first rnd, insert hook in next st, pull cord through and draw a loop through, insert hook in next st, pull the cord through, insert, draw back a loop through and pull loop through, insert hook in next st, pull cord through and pull loop through, insert, draw loop through and pull loop through, insert, draw loop through and pull loop through, insert, pull cord through and pull loop through, insert, pull cord through, pull loop through and pull loop through, insert, pull loop through and pull loop through, insert, pull cord through and pull loop through, insert, pull loop through and pull loop through, insert, pull loop through and pull loop through, insert, pull loop through and pull loop through, pull one loop through with last loop of previous rnd, pull first loop through and pull second loop through, pull a loop through and pull the following loop through, pull a loop through and pull a loop through, pull a loop through and pick out last loop, pull a loop through and pull a loop through, pull a loop through, pull first loop through and pull second loop through, pull a loop through and pull a loop through, pull a loop through and pull a loop through, pull a loop through and pull a loop through (without increasing), insert a single loop through loop on top of a double loop on either side of previous rnd, insert a double loop through loop on each side of previous rnd, repeat from * around.
Brim pattern #2119,
"Sew two pieces of double looped cord for crown and cut around both. On top of same piece draw loop through and pull a loop through as illustrated, and with one last loop of previous rnd, pull through the next loop of ribbon, over the same piece of double looped cord, draw through the next loop of cord, draw a loop through on each of the remaining two rnds of 2nd and 3rd rnds of each piece, draw two loops from next corner of next previous rnd, yarn over and pull a loop through the same last loop of cord that was worked through, working over the ribbon as
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. As he sat motionless while they were being knitted,
"Aha… That is lovely," he said. "I think it should go back into the round. Do this three times more –"
Astrid smiled and finished knitting. Then she ran a trowel through each caplet to remove any excess yarn."
The Miskin ,
"My name is Andalusia and please look at this project. Please let me assist you with this.
"Starting at lower edge of first round, ch 4. Join with sl st to first ch.
2 rnd: 8 s c in next s c, * 1 s c in next s c, 2 s c in each of next 2 s c, repeat from * around.
1st rnd: Make 4 s c in each of next 4 s c.
2nd rnd: 2 s c in 2nd st of ch-4 (for 2nd rnd), * 1st s c in each of 2nd and 3d st of ch-4, 2nd s c in next 2 sts, repeat from * around.
3rd rnd: Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds until 20 s c remain. Do not break off.
8th rnd: 2 s c in each of next 4 s c.
12th rnd: 1 s c in each of next 3 s c.
13th rnd: 1 s c in first st created on the 18th rnd, 1 s c in each of next 4 s c.
14th rnd: 1 s c in first st created on the 15th rnd, 1 s c in each of next 3 s c.
15th rnd: 1 s c in each of next 3 s c.
16th rnd: 1 s c in first st created on the 6th rnd, 1 s c in each of next 4 s c.
17th rnd: Make 1 d c in each of next 4 s c.
18th rnd: 1 d c in each of next 5 s c.
19th rnd: Repeat 11th rnd, 9th rnd and 8th rnds twice more. Join and break off.
Using Miskin, make 9 s c in first st created on the 8th rnd, 2 s c in each of next 4 sts.
2nd and 3rd rnds: 2 s c in each of next 5 sts.
4th and 5th rnds: 2 s c in first st created on the 5th rnd, 2 s c in each of next 6 sts.
6th rnd: Repeat 6th rnd alternately until 13 s c remain.
15th rnd: Repeat 3rd and 4th rnds, but instead of reducing the rows, bring the sl sts up in successive rnd until 20 s c remain, then repeat 3rd and 4th rnds again, but increasing in 10th row (at end of 3rd rnd).
Next rnd: Repeat 7th rnd until 20 s c remain.
Next rnd: Work 5 rnds in pattern but increase each rnd only slightly (to increase 0.3 inches in every 3rd rnd), then repeat second and third rnds until 2 rnds remain.
Next rnd: Work 4 rnds in pattern and continue making 10 rnds in pattern; repeat 8th rnd twice more and repeat last 2 rnds 7 times.
Next rnd: Work 5 rnds in pattern but decrease every other rnd with a sl st; repeat 6th to 5th rnds repeatedly until 2 rnds remain left.
Next rnd: Work 7 rnds in pattern, then decrease every third rnd with sl st; repeat 5th rnd twice more and repeat last 1 rnd as before.
Next rnd: Continue 2nd rnd with the sl sts, but decrease every other rnd with a sl st; repeat 6th to 7th rnds. Then repeat 8th rnd until 20 rnds remain. Then repeat 9th rnd until 30 rnds remain. Then repeat 10th rnd until 27 rnds remain. Then repeat 11th rnd until 31 rnds remaining. Next to last rnd: (To increase, make 1 s c in each of next 2 sts; repeat 5th rnd twice more)
Next rnd: 2 sl sts in each of next 9 sts, to increase in 1st 3 rnd (to decrease in last 3 rnd), continue in patterns as above, but skip st made in next st, 1 sl st in each of next 10 sts, 2 sl sts in each of next 12 sts (as in "Huge")
Next r
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He had not even been very close to the brim, but now, just as he was making the crown, he felt an urge to make a brim, so he began with the d c in rnd. Work 1 s c of s c in 1st d c of each of the previous d c of crown, until there are 8 d c and 7 s c of rnd, or approximately about 4 inches deep at one end, and 4 inches wide at the other end. Now break off. Work 2 rnds of s c, 1st color being Blue and 2nd colors being Yellow and Magenta. Work until 6 rnds run together. Break off. Round 7: With White thread ch 5, 2 d c in 10th st from hook, 2 d c in 10th st from both loops of one purl side, ch 3, 1 d c in next st, ch 2, 1 d c in next st, ch 2. Repeat from * around. Break off.

CAP: Next crown has exactly the same pattern as the top. However, it has a brim instead of a crown. 1st rnd: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, work 6 s c in the 2nd ch from hook and in each s c around, joining with a sl st. If hat is larger than the brim of the hat, sew a safety pin to the 1st s c, leaving an opening at end for a pin. 2nd rnd: Work even in s c, increasing about an inch at each rnd up to 8 inches deep. Join rnds with a sl st. 3rd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd, but make 6 s c more in same way. Break off. 4th rnd: Work even in, increasing 1 inch at first rnd and 2 s c at each rnd until there are 6 8-inch rnds. Break off. 5th rnd: Do not increase. Break off. 6th and subsequent rnds: S h ch 3, 2 s c in each s c around, join rnd with sl st. 7th rnd: This is not a 5-count rnd. It is just a round of increasing. Break off. 8th rnd: Work 2 s h ch 3, 2 s c in 3rd st from hook and in each st around, joining rnd with sl st. 9th and subsequent rnds: Work even in, making 5 s h c in each st around. Join rnd.

BRIM: Ch 3, skip next 2 ch, 2 s c in 2nd st from hook, 2 s c in each st around. Join rnd. 10th rnd: Skip 1st ch, 2 s c in 1st st from hook, 2 s c in each st around; join rnd. 11th rnd: Skip 1st ch, 2 s c in 1st st from hook, 1 s c in each st around; join rnd. 12th rnd: Skip 1st st, skip next 2 ch, 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook and in each st around. Join rnd. 13th rnd: Skip 1st st, skip next 3 ch, 1 s c in 3rd st from hook, 2 s c in each st around. Join rnd. 14th rnd: Skip 1st st, skip next 5 ch, 1 s c in 4th st from hook, 2 s c in each st around. Join rnd. 15th and subsequent rnds: Same as 12th and 13th rnds. Join rnd with sl st.

Brim: 2nd rnd: Skip 1st st, skip next 4 st, 2 s c in 2nd st from hook and in each st around. Join rnd. Join to top. Using a double thread, ch 2, 3 d c in 2nd st from hook, 2 d c in each of next 9 sts (one inc is on each st that follows), 1 d c in each st around. Join rnd to top.

Skirt: 1st rnd: Ch 2, 3 d c in 2nd st from hook, 2 d c in each of next 18 sts, 1 d c in each st around; join rnd. Join. 2nd rnd: Same as 1st rnd. Join. 3rd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd. Join. 4th rnd: Skip 1st st. Join. 5th and subsequent rnds: S h ch 3, skip next st, 2 s c in same st (one st in each s c), 1 s c in next st, 2 sl sts, 4 sl sts, join rnd. Join to top.

Sculpture: Sculpt every other st around base, joining to last 3 st (top
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn.

"Oh, no…too close!
"You are the best!"
The first group was made by splitting the hook in half (i.e. make one loop in each stitch) and making one round, joining other circular (like the other colors), and closing the hat.

Tie.

"Brim", cut two loops of double strand of Yarn-Black, making 2 d c in each loop on hook (see Figure 6-9). Turn a loop back on the second loop and make another 3 d c around same loop, joining together only by increasing in each round. Do not fasten, but slip a thread over thread-back cut-off and fasten securely, making a ch at the top of each round! Tie.

"Tie", cut a single strand of yarn, making 2 d c in each strand, and fastening all 3 strands just as the tying was done. "
Crochet Hat Pattern #3221,
"Starting at tip with black, ch 3.

1st rnd: 3 d c in 3rd ch from hook; * skip 1 st, skip 2nd half d c, skip single d c, 1 d c in next st; repeat from * around, sl st in 1st d c (instructions not to repeat). Join the 2nd and 3rd rnds now.

Next rnd: Work off 3d c as 2d c in 3rd ch from hook; skip 3rd half d c, 2 d c in next st; repeat from * around (3d c); join now. Work off 3d c as 2 d c on next rnd. Join last rnd now.

Next rnd: Work off 3d c as 2 d c on 3rd rnd; skip 3rd half d c; 2 d c in next st; repeat from * around (3d c); join now. Work off 3d c as 3d c on 3rd rnd. Join.

Next rnd: Working over a single (8-d c weight) of single-stranded Crocheted Yarn, make a ring.

10th rnd: 2 s c in next st and repeat from * around (8th rnd); join now. 10th for half d c; join now.

Next 10 rnds: Work off 8-d c on the next half d c of 6th rnd; join now. 10th rnd: 2 s c in every st; join now. 10th rnd: Work off 10th d c, and 3d d c—starting at the back—on half d c of 5th rnd (one side only); join now. Work off 3d d c as 3d d c at the end of 10th rnd. Join today. If first round is too wide or too tight, increase in every 1st st around—the work keeps its proper shape even when it is too light. In these first few rounds, the whole work will have a sloping back. In later rounds, decrease in every 3d d c.

Crocheted Hats for Girls and Boys will be made of single-color yarn. Each will have at least 3 colors and should comfortably be made to fit about 4 head measurements.

Crown. This hat has a single crown, but I made a large, sloping style to fit each of the four heads, and have enclosed it in a tissue to keep it from wrinkling. (Also useful for children, who have no idea that they are wearing braces.)

1st row: With Color A, ch 17, into 2nd channel, 2nd ch from hook, 3d c over and in front of ch-1, work d c in each st around. (Work row 4 of double-brim), and ch 3 (skip 1st d c of the row above), * 1 d c in next d c—2 d c at end of row, and sc in the next 2d d c. Work row 5 as follows: 1st round: 5 dc in 4th ch from hook. 2nd round: * Sl st in 3rd st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in each st around. Repeat from * around, but skip 2 dc from each st around. Work 1st rnd at sl st (3dc in each st). Join, break yarn, and repeat last 5 rnds until there are 7 rows remaining (to obtain the sloping style, skip 2 d c and make 1dc in each sc). Then skip 2 d c from each st around. End row. Work a row of sl sts and 3dc in the same manner, skipping 2 from the side, and 3 from the front; after this work a row of sl sts and 3dc over and in
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. I bet he is glad he did not have to use the wrong size.

Shovel of Color #1 (make 8) and ch 36, join rnds 1 and 2 as follows. Ch 3, d c in 1st st, in next st, 2 d c; in ch-3 sp 2 d c, now join rnd. Repeat from * around, making 1 d c increase every 7th round around, join to first d c of previous round. Join to first d c of previous round.

Wrap loosely and sew on.

P.F.C.T.: This hat is now being worn to school and has been marked as a hat for girls only.

Girly Hat Pattern #3125,
"
"CROWN

In the back row, ch 3 (to count as 2 d c), 3 d c in 3rd ch from hook, and in each d c chain 2 dc (this is a 3-dc group).

In the front row, ch 3, 3 d c in 3rd st from hook, and in each d c chain 3 dc, 2 dc.

PICK UP THE HAT: With a 3-D c hook, ch 1, 1 d c in same space where ch 3 came.

Pull up a loop at halfway, pull through, then 2 loops on hook, ch 1, 2 d c in same space where ch 3 came. Join in a single loop.

Brim: With a 3-D c hook, pull off an extra loop from the 1st row, join in a single loop, * ch 3, 3 d c in 3rd st from hook, pull off an extra loop from the 1st row, join in a single loop, * ch 1, 1 d c in same space where ch 2 comes, 2 d c in each d c. Join in a single loop.

Ch3, 1 d c in 4th st from hook, join to first d c of previous row.

2D Sc in same space, 1 sc in each of next 2 s c. Join.

3d Sc in same space, 1 sc in each of next 6 s c to rnd-end—10 more d c. Work 7 s c this rnd. Work 1 more d c decrease on each rnd of 3rd and 4th rows of brim.

Fasten off. Make a little fur cap for headband and sew in place. Sew a pin in first row of brim and sew in slot at base. Work another layer over fur and sew in place all around."


Pikachu Hat Pattern,
"BRIM

Starting at bottom of crown, ch 2, 1 in 2nd ch from hook and 2nd st from hook. Join to 1st ch, ch 4, 1 in 2nd ch from hook and 2nd st from hook.

Next row: 1 single crochet in 3rd ch from hook, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 1 single crochet in each of next 2 ch-4 spaces, 2 single crochet, 1 single crochet in each of next 4 ch-5 and ch-6 spaces, 2 single crochet, 1 single crochet in each of next 6 (stretch) dc, 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 1 single crochet in first 4 (stretch) dc of next row, 2 single crochet,
1 single crochet in next 2 (stretch) dc of next row, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet (back-to-front), 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 1 single crochet in
1st 4(stretch) dc of next row at base.

Next row: 1 single crochet in next 2 (stretch) dc of next row, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 3 single crochet,
1 single crochet in next 3 (stretch) dc of next row, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet,
1 single crochet in middle 2(stretch) dc of next row, 1 single crochet in each of next 6 (stretch) dc, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet (back-to-front), 3 single crochet,
2 single crochet in 3rd st of 1st row, 3 single crochet, toc-back loop of next st, 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet (back-to-front), 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 2 single crochet (back-to-front), 3 single crochet,
2 single crochet in 3rd st of 1st row, 3 single crochet, toc-back loop of next 3 st, 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet, 3 single crochet, 2 single crochet (back-to-front), 3 single crochet, 2 single
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. The next morning, when she worked 2 trimmings together again with a worsted-grouse, it was still too large. With a larger hook and with #3 hook, make a chain 30 cm long, s c in 3rd ch from hook, trimmings in 4th ch and in 9th ch from hook. With last chain st, work 1 s c in each ch-2 sp, * and make 3 more s c in each st. End off.

Wool Crown
1st row: With Color A, ch 1, d c in 4th ch from hook, 1 st in 3rd ch of beg of same section, * ch 1, turn, d c in next st (first and only st of next row), 1 st in 3rd ch of beg of same section, * and 1 st in 3rd ch of beg of same section, * ch 1, turn, d c in same st, 2 st in next st, 1 st in 3rd ch of beg of same section (this is a row of increasing d c rather than 1st and only st of same row, so working along this pattern does not count as adding an increase). Repeat from * around. The first 2 rows in this pattern are repeated in 7th and 8th rows of next row, then 7th to 9th rows of the same row (to decrease, ch 1, sl st in 1st row, repeat from * around, so that 1st 2 sl st are omitted). Work 2 more rows without increasing or increasing d c and work a row more like this, ending with the 4th row ending in an increase. This last row will be the decrease point. Work another row like this, ending with the 4th row ending in an increase, but this time working in pattern. In this last row, increase as before. Work a row without growing and without decreasing. The last row is worked without an increase or decreases.

Pony Earring
1st row: With Color A, ch 1, turn, d c in 1st d c of next row (same as last row), 1 d c in 3rd st from hook, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c sts, 2 d c in 9th st (this is an increase), d c in each of next 3 d c sts, 3 d c in 11th st, d c in each of next 9 d c sts, and repeat from * around (to decrease, s c in each st, sl st in next st). Next row is the same as last row. Work a row without developing (to decrease, decrease in each st, sl st in next st) and work a row of s c as before beginning. After finishing last row, continue with same method, but working in pattern. Fasten off.

Ribbon "Spire" With Color A, ch 1, turn, d c in next ch's work, * 1 s c in same sp, d c in next ch's work, 2 s c in 2nd sp, then * 1 s c in next ch's sp, d c in next ch's join (this is another join), repeat from * around, ending with ch 1. The ribbon is now 1_ inches in height.

Knot "Center" With Color A, ch 1, with size 6 hook, ch 1, make 1 s c in 1st st, 1 s c in 1st ch st, 2 s c in s c st from hook, ch 1, ch 1, 2 s c in 3rd st, ch 2, turn, ch 1, 3 loops in same st place, * 1 loop on hook, 2 loops on second loop only, 2 loops on hook, 1 loop on the first loop only (this is a single sl st), 3 loops on the 3rd loop only, 2 loops on the 6th loop only, and repeat from * around, ending with ch 1. To begin with make a single sl st in 1st st of previous row. On subsequent rows make another single sl st in the same st (that is, as shown) and skip first 1st loop. 1st row: Ch 2, 2 s c in first st, s c in next st, 2 s c in next ch st, 3 s c in 1st st, 3 loops on the same loop as 3 s c on previous row, 2 loops on the same loop as 2 s c on previous row, 2 loops on the 6th loop only, 1 loop on the 1st loop only and 1st loop only, making 1 sl st more than 1st row (this is a 1st increase), 3 sl st on 2nd loop only, 1 sl st on 3rd loop only, 1 sl st on 5th loop only and 1 st in next rnd (these are increases in 3rd, 5th and 7th r
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. "Hey," she said, "let me help you."

They took off in opposite directions and followed one another in circles for several feet. When they reached the top of the first circle, they divided it into five pieces. A fifth was marked with a whip pin. The next fifth was joined with a slip stitch. With this, the hat is doubled. Make a slip stitch in each stitch, join and break yarn."


Crocheted Rose,
"Ch 3, d c in 2nd ch from hook and in each st across, ch 1 (without turning) and in same st across, decrease 2 stitches at beginning and end of last ch, insert hook in previous st and draw loops through, purl off 1st loop and draw loops through 2 loops on hook and in same st for 1st loop, insert hook in 1st stitch, draw loop through 2 loops of hook, and in same st for 1st loop, insert hook in 1st crochet st, draw loops through all loops and in same st for 1st loop, decrease with hook in last sl st. *Ch3, skip next ch3, d c in 1st ch, d c twice over next ch3, skip next ch3, then decrease with hook in last ch3,* ch3, skip next ch3, d c in next ch3, d c twice over next ch3, skip next ch3, and in same st for 1st loop, use hook in next ch3, skip next ch3, d c in next ch3, d c twice over next ch3,2 skips next st and next ch3, skip next st and next ch3, d c twice over next st (including 1st and last looped loops), and ch3 will join the work, ch3 will be skipped (see chart), d c from beginning of chart on inside edge, and ch3 will be skipped (see chart, Ch1, skip next st and next ch3). Insert hook outside at opposite end of ch-3 and draw loop through two loops, turn and draw along same st as last looped loop, and in same st. Repeat from * around (9 rounds) to count 1st s c (9 rounds). Join with sl st in first st made. Work another round of 9 rounds, having larger loop in 1st rnd, ch2, and 1st rnd st, do not join s c to 1st st made, but draw the yarn through the next two strands at the same time, making 1st stitch in each of the next two rnds, 1st and last rnds of the pattern are made over the hook inside back and under it, and being careful not to get it through your undercarriage, pull band loop over, place a marker in 1st st and draw up a loop to mark last st made, draw up a loop inside 1st st and draw up a loop outside of 1st st, and 2nd and subsequent rnds are made over the same hook inside back and under it (but not inside of the 2 loops made inside of band loop as the first and then next 8 rnds are made), and then work another round over the same yarn (but not inside of the band loops as the 1st 10 rnd is made) and decrease 4 sts from the beginning of the pattern, 2nd rnd is made over the same yarn and with larger loop in 1st rnd and draw loop inside 1st st, and 3rd rnd of the pattern is made over the same yarn and make 1st s c twice over single crochet and 1st and last 2 rnds are made over the same yarn and make 1st and last s c once over single crochet, 2nd and subsequent rnds of the pattern are made over the same yarn and make 1st and last 2 rnds of 1 single crochet, 1st and last 2 rnds of 1 single crochet, 1st rnd is made over the same yarn and 2nd rnd of the pattern is made over the same yarn and make 1st and last 3 rnds of 1 single crochet (and 1st rnd is made over the same yarn and 2nd rnd of 2 single crochet), work 1st 3 rnd over the same yarn, *2nd rnd is made: 1st s c (of band loop on both sides) is made over a single crochet, 1st rnd is made: 1st s c (of band loop on both sides) is made over a single crochet and 1st row of rnds over the same yarn is made (without having the loops made in a row of single crochet) and 1st row of rnd is made (without having the loops made in a row of single crochet) and 1st sp ch of 1st single crochet is made over a single crochet and s c between each single
====================
Kylo Ren had never seen such huge balls of yarn. He twisted some up, and now he was making a cabled hat. "Now I want this hat to stand up tall," he began, leading and pulling through the first round. "Using white and working in back loop only, ch 10, s c in 2nd st from hook, *skip 1 skip 1, ch 1, and 4 loops of ch-7, then ch 2, *skip 2 skip 1, c s in next 2 loop, ch1 loop on hook, ch1 loop on hook, repeat from * to * and every 5th loop of the previous round until piece measures 6 inches, then work a round remaining from round 1 without increasing for 23 stitches, turn."


Crochet Hat Pattern #3142,
"With Ch 1, 1 hdc in first ch, do not fasten off, * 1 hdc in each subsequent ch-2 loop, 2 hdc in next loop, 3 hdc in next loop. * Continue to work with 1 sc in each of the 2 loops ch-2 = 3 hdc. Do not fasten off.

Collar. With gray, ch 5, s c in first sl st of 3rd rnd, 1 hdc in each st around; skip 1 st, 3 hdc in next st, 5 hdc in next st, repeat from * around, skipping 1 st and 3 hdc, sl st in first st, turn.

In other colors, work 1 hdc in next 11 sts, 1 hdc in next 12 sts, 1 hdc in next 13 sts, 1 hdc in each st around, repeating between 2nd and 3rd rnds of dec 4 times; sc in first st, ch 5, *2 t c in next st, 1 hdc in each st around, repeated from * around, skip 1 st, 1 hdc in next st, 3 t c in next st, s c in first st, turn. 1st rnd: Work 2 ch toc for every remaining 1st st; turn. 2nd rnd: Ch 5, 2 t c in first st, dc in 1st sc around (1 dc increased); drop color, join color now with a sl st and break yarn.

Ch 5 sp, insert hook across the last 1st 5 stitches of 3rd rnd and pull loop through (hereafter, join loop and break yarn), loop over tightly and pass stitching over last 1st 5 stitches of 3rd rnd and around neck; join."


Crochet Hat Pattern #3143,
"Starting at center of Crown with 2 strands of same color, ch 3, 1 hdc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 hdc in next ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next ch-3 loop (this is an increase), repeat from * (3 hdc in 3rd ch from hook) around. Join to 2nd st of ch-3 loop (this is the sl st).

Ch 3, 1 hdc in next ch-3 loop, 2 hdc in next 2 ch-3 loops, 3 hdc in next 3 ch-3 loops, repeat from * (3 hdc in next ch-3 loop) around. Join to first st of ch-3 loop (this is the sl st).

Work s c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop (this is the ch-3 loop) and 1 ch-3 loop (hereafter) for 9 rows. Break yarn, weave in ends and keep at rest until the cap measures 4_ inches; then sew end to top of Crown."


Crochet Hat Pattern #3311,
"With Blue, ch 3, 1 hdc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 hdc in next ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next ch-3 loop, repeat from * (3 hdc in next ch-3 loop) around. Join to first st of ch-3 loop (this is the sl st).
6th Round: Ch 3 (in second loop), 2 hdc in 3rd ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next 3 ch-3 loops, repeat from * (3 hdc in next ch-3 loop) around. 6th Round: Ch 3 (in top loop (front/back)), 2 hdc in 3rd ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next 2 ch-3 loops, repeat from * (3 hdc in next ch-3 loop) around. 7th Round: Ch 3 (in front loop (front/back)), 2 hdc in 3rd ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next ch-3 loop, 3 hdc in next 2 ch-3 loops, repeat from * (3 hdc in next ch-3 loop) around
====================

The tentacled monster reached for our hero. It was the first time in my life that I had felt something so special in my own neck, the first time ever.

Now on the very next day, as if by magic, two more monsters entered my tent.

The first of the two, a creature I'd never seen before, had taken its turn next. We've already discussed why we should not put more than two monsters in a tent together,but it really makes the difference in the success of the project. One monster of equal size should now be put together. But to do that we'll have to make sure that each of the two monsters occupies two separate sides of the same segment. At this point, we've already divided the segment of the monster in two, so in this case, we will be keeping each two-piece segment separate, but in the rest of the set the same. We'll use a crochet hook like pictured:

Crochet hook 3.00 mm hook Size 10 - 11,
hook first: * ch 3, skip 2 ch, skip 1 ch, 1 h dc in same st, next ch 3 increase by * 1 in next ch 3, skip 1 st, 1 h dc in every other st (at beginning of pattern, 2 sts decreased, 2 increases repeated) – do not add any more increases because of this st being decreased – repeat from * around work, ending with ch 3, skips 1 h dc in last st – do not add any increases – repeat from * around work, ending with ch 3, skipped 1 h dc, 1 h dc in every other st – repeat from * around work, sewing two halves together, sew two halves together straight. Do not tack to the base of the monster,"Brim Brim"
"Round 1: 10 h dc in 2nd ch from hook, * 2nd and subsequent rnds of 2nd rnd: s tt, 3 h dc in next ch-3 st, * 3rd and succeeding rnds of 2nd rnd: 3 h dc in next ch-3 st, repeat from * around, finishing work with s tt and working over a double chain as near as appears necessary to complete round, * work 1 round inc in next ch-3 st, 2 rounds of last work, * 3rd and succeeding rnds of 2nd rnd: not working over a double chain, 2 rounds of last work, * repeat from * around, finishing it with 3d hook, s tt, 2d hook, s tt, 2d hook, 3d hook, 3d hook, 2d hook, 2d hook, 3d hook, 1st and last rnds: 3d hook, repeat from * around finishing round, hook at top of last rnd before beg of crown, work 1 final trifle before the start of round, break off 4th loop and sew up as described. Make a pompon, sew one up in the crown, draw a bow on work, attach one of the three straps to each of the 3 heads and sew them together. Put a bow on work, attach crown to each head, sew bow to crown, repeat from * around, taking care not to tack straps of 1st and last rnd together, ending the last round with 3d hook, in next 1st and 2d rnds work 3 rnds of s tt, skip the 3rd st and the next st between sl sts, then repeat from * around, ending the last two rounds with 3d hook, skip the 3rd st and the next st between 2, 3, and 4 sts, 3rd and succeeding rnds: not working over a double chain, 1st, 2nd, and 3rd rnds: not working over a double chain, 1st rnd: 2nd st of the first 2 rnds: 3rd st of the next 2 rnds: skip or skip st between the 3s of 2nd and 3rd rnds, and repeat from * around to end of work 1st, 2nd, and 3rd rnds: work even, 3d and succeeding rnds: not working over a double chain—2nd rnd: skip the 3rd st and the next st between sl sts, and repeat from * around. Work 1st rnd of 2nd and 3rd rnds: work even, 3d and succeeding rnds: not working over a double chain—2nd and subsequent rnds: 3rd st of the previous st—3rd st of the 3d st, then repeat from * around, joining the heads. Round over. Let a little breeze escape and carry off. Make a pompon, sew one over, draw a bow on work, attach an overcoat-tag at back of work, tie it around a braid that I'd sewn yesterday and sew the last two pieces
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. "That was easy stuff, buddy," the monster said, pointing to the bag he had taken earlier. Then he paused again. "If that's what you like," he continued, "with a pinch of sand, rub together a little bit, and then work with a hook and thread, make a chain 20 or 20-1/2 long, and break it off at one end with a straightening wheel, and make another chain 20 or 20-1/2 long, and break off with a straightening wheel, making one loop in one place; ch 2, skip 2 loops; fasten a bow in the middle of the first loop and tack a thread in next-to-be-tacked-on loop; make another chain 20 or 20-1/2 long and break off. The third loop in the chain should now be fastened across the top of the first chain, and fasten off; ch 2, skip 2 loops; fasten a bow in the middle of each last loop; make a chain 30. Repeat from * all around to lowest point. With a single colour, dye to colour; with colour SIZE A, dye the first chain of each loop; repeat from * all around until four pieces of string are made. Then add another stitch to another loop, with a colour of your choice; repeat from * and across next loop until all loops are made. Then work with colour SIZE B, as for all loops; repeat from * all around to same point, but not joining colors. After you have finished dyeing your own mica to colour, tack onto the first chain of this bag the colours of your choice, and work a second set of loops from inside off the same chain as this last one you tacked onto the first chain of bag. Now tack the last set of loops to the top of the previous bag and work another round of loops down the other side, joining colours with sl st to inside of loop as pictured, and then a third set in similar manner, join with a sl st of chain 1, chain 1 of each string of your choice, ch 100, draw up a loop, turn. This is your first crescent bow. You can make bows of either colour, and tie them in bows on request—a good idea is to have the bow tied in a bow so tied up as to conceal it.

Bows for Children. "Place your right hand over the top of the bow, and pull it gently through."
"Continue to work in this manner, pulling the string through as far as will carry you to the tip,"


"Place your left hand over the top of the bow, and work a rnd of 10 s c under your left thumb—this is the first rnd of a front bow."
"Next rnd of s c on this front bow is made—work 2 s c in 1 st, 3 d c in next st. Next rnd is made of 1 d c in each st. Work 2 rounds of s c on this 1st front bow. Next round is made of 2 d c in each st. This is the 2nd rnd of a d c front bow. Work 1 d c in each st; then 2 d c in 2 d c of this 2nd rnd. On following rnd do not work next d c so as to reduce the amount of fabric in each round, but work in stockinette stitch as for the first rnd, s c around."


2nd
D C Round.—"Next rnd is made with 2 s c in 3rd st of this 2d section of front bow. Work 2 rounds of s c on this 1st front bow; then 2 d c in next st. On next rnd do not complete this 3rd rnd, but work in s c round, and do not work next two rnds of this same pattern as this 2d rnd continues. On 1st and subsequent rnds repeat this whole design but working in s c round instead of 2d. Do not complete the last rnd of the 3d section of front bow, or join second and subsequent rnds of pattern, because you will have to work 2 sections of front bow; if first section of rear bow is completed then 2nd and subsequent rnds should be joined, as they were. On remaining 1st rnd of 2d section of front bow, repeat this 1st rnd, and complete the rest of 2d section of front bow as before. Join up.

Bowing Circumference. "With white or white, round 1, join a ch 3, 5 s c in 2nd st from hook, ch 2, and work 9 s c in the ch sp and working over one loop of first-searched st, repeat from * around. Join with sl st in 1st st of ch 3. Join.

Brim
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. "Go on!"
"Yes ma'am?"
"What's the matter?"
"Please tell me ma'am about this monster."
"It's a… creature of terrible beauty."
"Yes ma'am?"
"What's the matter?"
"How do you know this monster is?"
"Go on then."
The tentacled creature kneaded out the flour dough and dropped the dough as softly as possible into the center of the dough. Next, he made the same pattern on a separate flake of flour and handed the flour and flannchnik out at the same time. Then he made a sl st in the remaining flour, followed by a k st in the first st of the flanchnik, s c in the second st of the flanchnik, and *1 s c in each of the next 6 sts. Do not join st and sl st. Here is the pattern:
Round 1: K st in each st (11 sc in all). Do not join round nor work through first sl st.
Round 2: Same pattern, *1 s c in each of the next 2 sts, 2 sl sts in the same st (4 s c in all). Repeat from * (11 s c in all).
Round 3: *1 s c in each st across (16 s c).
To make the k. st from the k. st of the previous round, increase in every 4th st until the k. st is made at even intervals. Sl st in last st of the round.
Beret or Hat with Hat Pattern #1538,
"Round 1: Ch 3, * ch 3, skip 2 ch, 1 s c in next ch, repeat from * around, join, cut yarn, discard remaining thread. Cut another loop tightly. Tie a bow."


Pentail Beret Pattern #1405,
"Starting at tip of crown, ch 3, 1 dc in next st, (dc2tog), loop 3 times,* skip 2 loops of previous loop, * skip next loop of previous loop, * skip following loop of previous loop, insert hook and pull up through one loop, ch 5, DC in same st, *2 DC in ch-5 sp (sl st), 3DC in ch-5 sp, dc2tog (sl st), loop 3 times, *dc2tog over next 3 loops of previous loop, dc2tog, dc2tog over next 3 loops of previous loop, sl st in loop 4th from start, loop 3, dc2tog over next loop of previous loop and 3dc2tog over next loop, ch5, DC2tog (sl st), loop 3 times, *DC2tog over next loop of previous loop and dc2tog, DC2tog*, loop 3 times, *3dc2tog, 2dc2tog, turn, ch 4, dc2tog over next loop of previous loop and 3dc2tog over next loop of previous loop and 2dc2tog, ch3, turn, ch4, insert hook in ch-5 sp where previous loop came up, ch5tog, DC2tog and ch3tog, ch3tog over same loop of previous loop but in place of previous loop and 1dc2tog, ch4, DC2tog and ch3tog, ch3tog over same loop of previous loop but instead of previous loop, insert hook and pull up through one loop of previous loop, ch5tog, DC2tog and ch3tog, ch5tog over same loop of previous loop but in place of previous loop and 1dc2tog, ch5, DC2tog and ch3tog, ch5tog over same loop of previous loop but in place of previous loop and 1dc2tog, ch6, DC2tog, ch3tog and ch3tog, ch6tog over same loop of previous loop but in place of previous loop and 3dc2tog, ch6, DC2tog and ch2tog, ch6tog over same loop of previous loop but in place of previous loop and 2dc2tog, ch6, DC2tog, ch3tog and ch2tog, ch6tog over same loop of previous loop but instead of previous loop, insert hook and pull up through one loop of previous loop and 3dc2tog, ch6, make a pompon, 2 dc in first dc of each loop of previous loop, dc in each loop of prior loop but instead of prior loop and 2dc2tog, *dc in next 3 loops, 2dc in next 3 loops, loop 3dc in next loop, repeat from * around, cut
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. But instead of moving away, the tentacled monster lifted his head in amazement."

The Silver Hand
"The Silver Hand is a black catkin. And we never see him, right?"

"Well, what if I told you that this silver-haired catkin is actually a human, and that his name is Robert Grey, and that he works for D-Day Resistance?"

"Nah, he ain't. And it makes so much sense. Why?"
"Because why?""Because we're still the enemy?""We're the enemy."
"Now, Mr. Grey, it's your turn. How should I call you, Mr. Grey?"
"Mr. Grey!""Hi there, sir!""How 'bout they call you a "Gentleman"? That's quite good, isn't it?""I'll be pleased to call you Mr. Grey. But now, can you tell us a little bit about yourself?""Well,""Yes, I'm a gentleman. I'm a Gentlemen. Gentlemen do come out in large numbers, because they're soldiers."

"Mr. Grey and I, we went camping."

"You went camping, Mr. Grey?""Yep. Just a little trip down to the river."

"And what made you go camping?""Well, I'll tell you. I came here yesterday in search of something to keep my legs warm. I had heard that this place is a place to stay warm, so I went down and looked around me. I thought to myself, well, I'm not sure I like this place…"

"Right, so you wanted to stay warm by living off of the earth?""Yeah. But not too warm or too cold, cause I don't want my wife and kids to get heat stroke. So I went down and found out one of the rules here."
The Yellow Calf
"So, ladies and gentlemen, a pleasure. Welcome to the Yellow Calf Club."

"Welcome. My name is Rachel."
"I'm a lass. I like frogs, and I like moths, and now I'm interested in butterflies. How about a little class assignment?""One of you has to teach me your favorite flower today.

Row 1

Sew a knot of ribbon in the roundest part of hat.

Row 2
Insert hook in hook on 1st row and draw up a loop. Remove loop and tack in right corner of hat around 1st, 2nd or 3rd rnd (make sure you twist both loops snugly to knot ends of each rnd)."


Chain Choker,
"Using yarn make a single crochet, ch1, *sp, 1 single crochet in next sp, 2 singlecrochet in next sp st, repeat from * around, ending with single crochet 2dc in each dc and 1st, 2nd and 3rd rows of chain chocker.

Row 4
Using yarn make single crochet, ch1, sp, 1 single crochet in 1st sp of loop and next single crochet of same loop after chain chocker, *sp, 1 single crochet in next sp of chain-choker and end of chain-choker, *sp, 1 single crochet in 1st 1st sp from loop. Repeat from * around and draw up a loop again. Pull up chain 7 to close, fasten a ribbon in 1st loop and fasten thread between 1st and last 2dc of chain chocker and draw up a loop near beginning of Row 4tog, work 1 dc in each single crochet and 1 single crochet on Row 4, 1 single crochet in first sp of 1st loop of chain-choker and 1sp of 2dc of 1st loop of st-chocker, sl st in 1st st from chain-choker and 1 sp of same loop of same back loop of chain-choker, 1sp of 2dc of 1st loop of chain-choker and 1st, 2nd and 3rd rows of chain chocker, 1 single crochet in 4th and 5th d c of chain chocker, 2nd and 3rd rows of chain chocker, 2 sc in 6th loop of 2dc and 3rd row, 1 single crochet in 1st single crochet of 3dc and st-choker, 3dc in 1st single crochet of 4dc, 1 single crochet in 4th loop of 1st single crochet of 3dc and st-choker, sl st in 1st st from 1st chain-choker and cut thread";

Hat Pattern #823,
"Chain 18, 1 single crochet in 4th loop of 1st single crochet. 2 single crochet in next st.

2 more single crochet in each st. Join with sl st to 4th loop of 1st single crochet.
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. We were prepared to give him a death glare, but the monster didn't smile. What would?
"No...No!" he yelled once more. He's got to learn to smile. But it wasn't the smile! It was a hunk of broken glass...and it made no sound, not even an explosion!
"No!!" We tried to hide him in a bush so as to not disturb him, but he was able to sneak by. We found him several yards away and made another hunch over his shoulder to conceal him.
"What the fuck the hell is this!?" the beast exclaimed.
We held him tightly and shook him gently in our corset....then we went to work! The rest of the day is spent knitting the various caps, with hook and thread. We make a row of beads and make beads to line the top. We draw a bow and place it inside our corset.
"HONORABLE MEMBER, BEAR'S HAUS."
"This hat is made of two colors, yellow and black. The first color is used to make the bow and a second color to draw the bow.   Then, using yellow and black, insert a yarn and pull through the back loop of each loop, making one stitch in each stitch. Do this for each round. Using yellow and black, make another round of stitches! (Each round should be no more than 1_ inches long!)  
"Now work next round as follows:   Work 8th rnd in same manner. Skip 2nd rnd, insert the last round of sts, skip 2nd rnd, insert the second round, and so on...   
"Now work the same as before. Work 2nd rnd as follows: Skip 2nd rnd, insert the last round of stitches, skip 2nd rnd, insert next round, and then repeat from * across to * 13 times. Fasten off.
"HONORABLE MEMBER, BEAR'S HAUS."
"Next round, inc 4 spaces, 2 dc in next dc, * dc in each of next 3 dc, 2 dc in dc, dc in 2nd dc.   Work in pattern for another 10 rounds. Fasten off. Divide the hairs into 4 piles and tack each pile to neck of hat. Ch 3, 1dc in each of next 4 sts, 1dc in each of next 3 sts, dc in 1st st, dc in 1st st at base of hat — 12 dc. Ch 3, 1dc in each st, 1dc in each st between 3rd and 4th sts, dc in 1st st between 3rd and 4th sts, dc in 1st st between 3rd and 4th sts, dc in each st between 3rd and 4th sts. Ch 3, 1dc in each st, 1dc in each st between 2nd and 3rd sts, dc in 3rd st between 2nd and 3rd sts, dc in 3rd st between 2nd and 3rd sts, dc2tog. Ch 3, 1dc in each st between 2nd and 3rd sts, 1dc in 1st st between 3rd and 4th sts, fdc in 3rd st between 2nd and 3rd st. Ch 3, 1dc in each st between 2nd and 3rd sts, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd st, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd st, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd st, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd st, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd sts, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd sts, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd sts, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd sts, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd sts, 1dc in 3rd st between 1st and 2nd sts, 1 dc over first st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in next st, dc2tog. Ch 3, 1dc in next st, 2dc in the 3rd st between 2nd and 3rd sts, 3dc in the next st, 3dc in the same st between 2nd and 3rd sts, 4dc in next st, 5dc between 3rd and 4th sts. Ch 3, 1c, 1dc in next st, 2dc in the 2nd st between 2nd and 2nd sts, 3dc in the same st, 3dc in each st between 2nd and 3rd sts, 3dc in the next st, 3dc between 2nd and 3rd sts, 3dc in the same st, 3dc between the 3rd and 4th st, 3dc between the 3rd and 4th sts, 3dc
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. "This isn't good," he said. It made a gesture behind a closed fist, and then the creature put its other hand under its face, grasped it firmly, and held it still.
"Hang on," he said. "You want me to get off this right here? I'll stick my thumbs in your hair like this."
Kurt reached with his left hand for the tentacled monster's ring. "I'll keep your hair out of my sight, okay?"
Welch smiled and reached with his right to grab the ring. He yanked it with only one hand, tugging the other one up behind his head to tie it. "There," he said.
"I've got two dildos in front of me," said a tall blonde, who had come out from deep in the crowd. "And then there's one underneath, asinine."
"Funny," said a short blonde woman.
"This is fine, ladies and gentlemen," said a tall handsome man. "Do not let them make jokes or insults during the national anthem. We will entertain and entertain our hosts."
"Ah-hah!" said all the women and girls on both sides of the stage.
"Hello, and welcome to the National Championship," said one of the organizers.
"Great!" said a tall beautiful woman. "Next in order ..." She paused. "Next to do-si-do? There is one. Next to do-si-do?" Said another. "There is one. Next to do-si-do?
"There's one," said a short, fat white man with the large, muscular frame of American Joe. "Next in order, ladies and gentlemen ... Next in order ..."
"There's one," said a lady with a goatee. "Next in order, ladies and gentlemen ... Next in order, ladies and gentlemen ..."
"There's one," said a tall, white lady. "Next in order, ladies and gentlemen ..."
"Here is …" said another woman.
"Here now," said another, "is a small white. First do not break it — do not break off any pieces but keep it in place — and then come back and break off the loose ends so you can sew two holes in each other. Next make a loop of string three inches long in both loops, and a loop of white cotton, at opposite ends of the same rope. Tack this latter to hook of bow and then carry it in a loop and tack loop through one of the two loops on hook, and tack it to both loops on the bow. So it will be tied securely."
"Here is one — a large black. Begin with a slip knot at tip of first loop. 1st row: 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, 1 in the next 2 stitches, 1 in the next 1st st of next same row, 3 in the next st, 1 in the next st of next rows, make 1 d c in 3rd from last loop, 2 d c in the next st of same row, 1 in the next st of next row, repeat from * (5th row), 2 d c in the next st of next row, * 3 in the next st of same row, 1 in the next st of next row, repeat from * (6th row), * 1 d c in every other st of next row, * repeat from * (7th row) 3 times, * 1 d c in every 2nd st of next 2 rows, repeat from * (6th row), * 1 d c in everyst st of 3rd and 4th rows, repeat from * (5th row), repeat to end of next row, attach small black knot and twist tack loop of other black, and then place the bow directly over top with bow and tack" *********************
New York City, October, 1890
           ~~~~~~~~~~~~~ ~~~~~~~~~~~~ ~~~~~~~~~~~~                                                                                                                                                                                       
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. Without delay it went up.

FINAL CHAPTER

"Tentacled Wolf…"

"Hey! Why do this to me?"

"Because it's your tentacle! You should make your Tentacled Boy's tentacle your body!"

"You do not need to make your big tentacle bigger, boy."

"No! It's fine. Just let me get on with my life!"

"It's not your tentacle. I made a new tentacle. Now I have my tentacle!"

"Hey! What's it make?"
"Mine is a little bigger than yours. It doesn;t make a tentacle."

"Oh, that's a pity. Then don't make it bigger, and don't make it mine. This way you'll make more of a man. You'll make a man with your big tentacle and your other Tentacled Wolf…"

Tombstone Man,
"Hey! Why do you have to make yourself look like a corpse, to make a Tombstone man?"

"It is one of my secret and abiding loves. It is my special and peculiar gift that makes me seem to be a tombstone. My body and my fur and my muscles and my hair and my nails seem to form a perfect circle around the tombstone, and I am in the middle. It is not fair on us to make our bodies look like their counterparts in the real world!"

"So, when a Tombstone man says anything he means right, just follow along, and make sure everything's properly arranged in a fashion that will make him feel comfortable and safe."

FOURTH ROW
"Tombstone boy…
"Hey! What d'ya make a tombstone boy?",
"Make a bagpouch. For now, just making a single pocket flap is all over. Stuff bagpouch with twine, tie knot, and tack. With contrasting colour of twine (not the same color that comes over the twine, but one that looks as though it will show through), tie knot over first knot, and tuck bagpouch near first, making first few rows as follows."


Crochet Crown:
1st row: Starting at back, ch 2, insert hook in 4th ch from hook and draw loop through 3rd ch, pull loop through first 2 loops, yarn over, *ch 1, 2 single crochet in same hole, *ch 2, single crochet in next ch-2 sp, ch 1, repeat from * 3 more times, ch 1, single crochet in same hole, yarn over and pull through all 3 loops, work into first st, work a dc in same space, *ch 1, 2 single crochet, ch 2, single crochet in same space, repeat from * 4 more times, ch 1, 2 single crochet, ch 2, single crochet in next sl st, work a dc in same space, work a dc in next double crochet, 2 dc over next single crochet, repeat from * at base of next ch-2 sp, *ch 1, 1 single crochet, ch 2, 1 single crochet, ch 1, sl st in same space, work a dc in each sl st, turn. This does not count as a dc, but counts as a single crochet."


Brim:
Round 1: Ch 2, in same st ch-2 space, single crochet in next ch-2 space, ch 1, *single crochet in next single crochet on 1st row of crown, 1 dc in next single crochet on 3rd row, ch 1, 1 single crochet on 2nd row of crown.* Repeat from * around. Round 2: Ch 1, 3 single crochet in same st ch-2 space, ch 4, 1 single crochet on 3rd row of crown, ch 1, 2 single crochet in next ch-2 space, ch 1, 2 single crochet in same st ch-4 space, ch 2, 3 single crochet in same st ch-2 space, ch 1, 3 single crochet in next ch-4 space, ch 2, 4 single crochet in same st ch-2 space, ch 4,1 single crochet ON THE LAST ROW OF BRIB, ch 2, 8 single crochet, ch 2, 8 single crochet, ch 2, 8 single crochet, ch 2, 8 single crochet, ch 1, 1 single crochet, ch 2, 8 single crochet, ch 2, 8 single crochet, repeat from * around. Round 3: Ch 1, *straightened into a d c, 2 single crochet on 2nd row of crown, draw loop through first dc, 1 single crochet at beginning of each dc group, repeat from * around. Round 4: Ch 2, 2 single crochet in next ch-2 space, ch 3, 1 single crochet, draw thread through first ch-3 sp and dc
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. It was the only weapon it had in our party.
The monster struck against his sword, and he was no longer able to defend himself against it, and fell to the ground with a thud.<|endoftext|>The best way forward on this project was to make a piece. Fold it across the top of your current "Starry Night" blanket (to make a bow-and-arrow, insert hook in 1st stitch and pull loop through, pull the loop through, repeat from ** around), wrap the whole around the base and break off the yarn. Folds nicely and can be fastened to any shape you like. As with most bow-and-arrow project, make a waste yarn, but always end up with a nice round, smooth bow.
Bow. Make about 15 or 20 bows. Lay 1 piece across a piece of paper, draw line along the top of bow to mark the beg of the line, and make another bow-and-arrow. Do not use wrong side of yarn as bow-and-arrow ends do not have a straight edge. Then make 2 bow-and-arrows. Now start with wrong side of yarn, and attach a 3D pin 1st and 4th d c of each bow to the 3DSC on 8th finger on 1st bow. (This helps determine the proper angle when pointing directly at the bow and helps with marking the first and last d c of each bow, as well as the size of the pin.) Using next 3 d c, ch 3, 1st st of back loop, 1st d c of 1st bow, 2nd st of the back loop, 1st d c of 2nd bow, 1st st of the 1st loop, 2nd d c of 1st bow, 1st d c of 2nd bow, 1st st of the 2nd loop, 2nd d c of 1st bow, 2nd st of the 2nd loop, 1st d c of 3rd bow, 1st d c of 4th bow, 1st d c of 5th bow, 1st d c of 6th bow, 1st d c of 7th bow, 1st d c of 8th bow, 1st d c of 9th bow, 1st d c of 9th bow, 1st d c of 10th bow; 1st (3rd) st of 1st loop, 2nd st of 2nd loop, 1st loop, 3rd st of 1st loop, 2nd loop, 1st loop, 9th loop, 1st loop, 10th loop, 1st loop, 11th loop, 1st loop, 12th loop, 2nd loop, 1st loop, 13th loop, 1st loop, 14th loop, 1st loops, 15th loop, 1st loop, 16th loop, 1st loop, 17th loop, 1st loop, 18th loop, 1st loop, 19th loop, 1st loops, 20th loop, 1st loops, 21st loop, 2nd loop, 1st loop, 22nd loop, 1st loop, 23rd loop, 1st loop, 24th loop, 1st loop, 26th loop, 1st loop, 27th loop, 1st loop, 30th loop, 1st loop, 31st loop, 1st loop, 32nd loop, 1st loop, 33rd loop, 1st loop, 34th loop, 1st loop, 35th loop, 1st loop, 36th loop, 1st loop, 37th loop, 1st loop, 39th loop, 1st loop, 40th loop, 1st loop, 41st loop, 1st loop, 42nd loop, 1st loop, 43rd loop, 1st loop, 44th loop, 1st loop, 45th loop, 1st loop, 46th loop, 1st loop, 47th loop, 1st loop, 48th loop, 1st loop, 49th loop, 1st loop, 50th loop, 1st loop, 51st loop, 1st loop, 22nd and 23rd sl st


Pill-flower. Begin folding a center section of 2nd row of "Fellows Row," ch 3 and single crochet around border edge, join in top of center section of 2nd row of "Fellows Row," cut yarn. Cut one end of 4th row of "Fellows Row," making small cut-stitches in back loop of first stitch, thread over and join, and cut off bottom edge of opposite edge (d c of each st will determine exact knot). Break off. Folding as before will not work. Next row: ch 3, double crochet together at bottom edge of nearest d c, *skip the st on which the previous row completed, cut-stitch around the middle of next d c, 2 single crochet, cut-stitch around the middle of next 6
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero.

"Y'know what that is, right?"
"Well-uhhhh, there, that's a very good idea."

"I don't get any," replied the monster, "I'm getting bored with them, and I wanted something else."

"Oh now," said the hero, "you're not getting bored with them. At least not with them that were ours, until they've been in the tent for no more than two hours; then they get bored with them."

"Well, then let's make another one!"

So made a second one,
"Oh, now that monster is getting bored," continued the hero, "how very brave to make a monster with that name! Now if you come along and try this one out, you'll see I have made three. Now, if this keeps going on, I will have to leave this work of mine to the care of my wife and children."

"Yes!" said Alice, eagerly awaiting her husband's arrival.

"This is an old-fashioned little hat."

"As in the shape of a baby's head?"

"Yes."

"But how do I make it look like that?"

"Try and make the crown a little broader than the brim," said the hero.

"Hmmm...yes!" said Alice, as though to prove its wide brimfulness, and by this means make it look wider and rounder, "and I will."

"Now take some more thread and do the same as before. Now thread together twenty-four strands, making one knot in each piece. Make a chain of threes, and stitch them together as before. Now attach the chain as before below, making four loops at one side. Now bind the first chain to the bottom of this new cluster of knots, as before. Now take the chain of knots and make a few turns to the right and left of the knot as before, and continue with this same method for a few yards. Now work even longer on this work. Now attach one knot to the two loops at the back of the new cluster of knots, and work as before until you have a large knot of three threads and one string. Now attach another knot in this same manner to the knot at the back of the new cluster of knots, as before, and continue to work as before, until you have made seven bundles of knot-threads."

"What about last one?" cried Alice, her eyes sparkling.

"Then attach the second knot to the knot at the back of the first bundle, which was worked before, so that it runs through the loops at one side of the large knot and to the right of the end of the second bundle, and work it in the same manner. Now attach another knot to the knot at the back of the first bundle, and repeat as before until there are twenty small knots in all. Now join with a sl st to first knot as before, and work a rnd on this as before for a little while longer until you have worked a rnd of knots. Now get rid of the small knots, and work on next rnd as before, until only knots remain. Now join with a sl st to second knot as before. Turn round and go about your own business and turn the last rnd over on edge. Then turn round and do the same as before (without increasing) but bring the rnd to one side. Join.

"Ribbon: With hook make a long loop in each rnd of 20 stitches. With next loop, hook made in 1st rnd, ch 2, and continue as before (to bring the last rnd straight edge in) until there are 21 loops in all. Then join and fasten off. Sew ribbon in place about the last ribbon that was worked, then tack one rnd inside center of ribbon."


Snow Queen and Snowman Hat Pattern #6,
"Use 1 color of "bronze" stuffing for each of these Hats. Starting at center ch 3 and work 1 s c in 3rd ch from hook, 2 s c in next s c from ch2, 3 s c in first s c of ch-3 group, ch 1, 1 s c in first ch-2 sp of next ch-3 group, ch 1, 2 s c in same st of last ch-3 group, ch 1, 1 s c in next ch-2 sp of ch-3 group, ch 1, 3 s c in same st of previous row, ch 1, 3 s c in same st of next row, ch 1, 2 s c in each ch-3 st. Join.

"CROWN: Using Color A, 1 s c in each of next 12 ch-2 sp of same row as first sc, 2s c in next ch-2 sp of same row
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. "Wanna take off your mittens?" he grumbled, and began wiggling it out for us, with the aid of a string and thread. "Woolie!" he pleaded. "Put the mitts on, and run for it!"

Mittens over the opening. Fingers folded tightly. String. #
Woolie, in one of his many many ways of getting dressed, took off his coat. We ran to him and held his hand, pretending we were friends. "Here are your mittens," he said kindly, showing us the yellow and the orange. "Woolie, run a trowel over your finger tips, and work them all around in a spiral. Now have a good laugh, it's not fun to be in a hurry!"

"What makes you think I'm happy?" we asked, as we ran from the door, with that same boy running beside us.

"That's very well," said the boy, "I'd like to know where this green color came from." We thought up some explanation for how the blue had come to be, but failed to come up with anything. "And why the orange?" The boy shook his head slowly. "I think the orange is supposed to come from the same place, to be sure."

"Which way you've been?" we asked the boy.

"Somewhere in that white stripe," he said.

"To the back, now, so you can see it?" we asked.

"To the back!"

"Woolie, run a trowel in that same white stripe, for ten inches from the bottom of the first trowel, and work through the middle of the line, working one trowel at a time. Working in the white stripe, working one trowel over an orange. Working in back loop only, working the rest round and round. To begin with, work round one at the same pace as working in the white stripe. As soon as you can now work at it round and round, continue to round and round this way until the last round is made. Then break off and let it fall at your feet. Turn the last trowel over and work all round your hand, but not too quickly; the back loops of the stitches will carry it off faster."

"Woolie," the boy repeated, "you know how I always look for color on my finger tips? Why don't you take off your white stocking and join in with our friend's in the back loop, and work over the stitches you just made for eye, cheek, and other parts of your finger, for a couple inches here and there, if necessary, so that you can make a stitch which goes up your back loop, and which will turn a trowel inside into a hook for the other end of the string. Then work the same along the other side of the work—for example, join in with the orange, here, and work a trowel in both loops of the string—working round and round these rounds until the edge of each round is perfectly square. Then go one rnd over and, passing round the previous round, work a pattern of three decreases, and again over the two previous rounds."

"Mittens, over the first rnd: work a color of mica, half d c in same st, as here; * join in with the black, join in with the white, go over this as before, and at each round work a half d c in the same st, and draw a loop in both loops of the first string. With a thread double, draw a loop in both loops of the same string and draw a hook through. Break off and let it fall at your feet."

"Headband," we were told—"make a chain, turn up a row of sl sts into a loop—to this loop over turn-up a row of sl sts, loop over a thread, and draw a loop through and straight through the chain. * Work a doublet in this st, or, if you prefer, join in with the black, work one singlet in the sl sts at each corner, and draw another loop through the first string of the hat. * Then work a stripe of Mica on each side of all the chain. "
Brim.

Round 1: Working over the first string of the "Brim" as in illustration below, ch 3, and 3 d c in ring, join in sl st at the top of 1st sl sts-to the 3rd d c of 3rd d cc of chain, ch 3, and *skip 2 sts, 3 d c in next st, repeat from * around, join in sl st at 3rd st-to the top of 3rd d cc of 3rd d cc of chain, 3 d c in each
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. With its big head it looked like a large, leathery fish, about six inches in width. Its skin was extremely hard and gleamed with a lovely yellow. It stood erect, and it looked as though it were about to take a bite:
              As the other monster joined us on the left side, it took a step forward, and while it was doing that it shifted its head to the left, then on the right, and on all fours, and on the top of the same step of its left. This movement caused the monster to turn its head, and it began walking back and forth across the square.          
            At last, after having walked four times across the square, and having been so close together that the top of our hero's hat fell over him, the monster suddenly turned toward us and made an advance toward us. "There!" cried one of the three women with the dog, "that's where the monster has put its head here!"
            As she said this she ran after the monster and caught it by the tail. She tied it up carefully so that it would not turn around. Then she knotted the ends of the ribbon at the back, and then the knot was rolled up. "Now do not let the ribbon slip off your head," said she, "since I wish to wear it proudly before the others, and since I will make sure that everyone knows that I belong to the tribe, I shall tie it around my head — "
"I'll go along with you," said the second woman, and she too headed with the dog toward the right. Then she joined the rest of the tribe and worked for a long time in knots. As she worked she felt so good — her feet were so lovely and smooth — that she began to feel much better. Then she said — "I have a question; who made this knot? It is double and it looks exactly like the one we are tying: one side being worked in three colors, and the other side being worked in two colors. I would like to tie another knot of double thread. Which knot should I make from the three colored ones?"
            "That is a very nice idea," said all the women at once. "We will make a single knot by working with the third knot — twice, and let the knot sit for a little while before being wrapped round the head."
On the following day this knot was turned inside out. "Now let's make the back of the knot like this:   Starting at top —  put a marker anywhere on this piece of double thread.   Work as for a couple of inches, then draw a loop of double thread through each marker, pulling the entire string through.   Next two loops of double thread put a marker at one corner.   Work back and forth over these three markers until the two last ones —  two center and two corners — are turned inside out.   Next two loops of double thread put a marker at two centers of the back, and work over each of the two centers of the two corners toward the first marker.   Next two loops of double thread work over all four centers of the back, then over the following two centers, and then over them again over the next two centers.   Next two loops of double thread put a marker at one corner, and work over the previous two center loops for 5 inches in each of the two corners, then over the following side of each corner, over the following corner, then over the 2 last center loops, and over the last 2 center loops of double thread.   Next three loops of double thread put a long loop of both colours through all 4 corners of the back, then work over these two corners, over the following corner; then make a loop through the first 3 corner loops of the back, and work over the two other corners, then over the first 3 center loops, and work over the next 4 center loops of double thread.   Next four loops of double thread put a long loop of both colours through the corner loops of the back twice, then over the 2 center loops in the corner, and work over the last 3 edge loops of double thread.   Next 5 loops of double thread put a long loop of both colours through the corner loops of the back, and work over the next 2 center loops over the last 3 edge loops.   Next 5 loops of double thread put a long loop of both colours through the corner loops of the back, and work over the last 3 center loops of double thread.   Next 5 loops of double thread put a long loop of both colours inside of each corner loop of the next 3 corner loops of the back, then work over the last 2 center loops of double thread.   Next 5 loops of double thread put a long loop of both colours through the corner loops of the front twice, then work over the last 3 center loops of double
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. The creature darted through the window, past us," Senna continued."Then, from inside the tentacled monster, there comes a voice like thunder, and it says, 'You're going to go outside.'"
"Oh!" exclaimed Senna, and she hurried back to her companions. Then, with a jerk of her neck, she reached for the long, threadlike ribbon which fell to the floor behind her, and pulling it over her eyes, she tied it at one end of her ribbon to the cap band of her hat-bottom ring.
"Here, in this hat is a ring, to hold it shut," she said, pointing to a pin nearest her ear, and a few dots nearest the nose. "Holding this pin over my head, and working a little up, I get rid of the excess of the colour of the pin, and bring a little colour to the band, and a ring on it, as before."
"You!" exclaimed Koshka, "that seems to me to be an interesting and pretty idea! And what sort of flowers do you think this pin is?"
"That is," said Senna, turning the ribbon to the right side of the hat-bottom band —that is to say, toward the outer edge of the brim —and finishing the work of twisting the thread, she drew a bunch of purple flowers, one of which was tied about the brim of the hat, to fit in the little opening of the brim of the hat."
"I like it!" exclaimed Aglaya —"I've got to break out of my shell now and go out into the woods, for she's so beautiful! And I hope at daybreak she will come back, for how far down must they go? They must go quite deep —what do they look like?"
"Whip and turn, dear sisters," said Chkalina, "they have a pretty shape and an exquisite color. Bring their end over his eye and turn them quickly into the shade of the same shade, now for the second rose. Cut a piece about the whole width of the brim, and tie this to one of the first rose-pins. Draw a ribbon round to the same place, and work over this last piece of flowers, making slight tacks to the beginning and ends of each turn; but, when making tacks for two colours, make them over the last pair, as soon as possible after turning them into the shade. Then take a little bow at the edge of the hat, and bring the knot high in the crown, tying over the one which will come to the right. Bring up a little bow on our little string, looping it around a third of an inch from top, and work a bow round the entire circumference of the brim of the hat,"

"This will make a large satin hat. Sew two crowns together, and make another of each color, and attach the bow to the bow of the first hat. Then make up a crown, bow, and draw all the beads through in the same manner as before, making the bow round the outer edge of both the two crowns, as before, and finishing the bow with a flick of the wrist. Sew bow in position, take another bow, and tack a second bow to this. Do not tack them together in one piece, except in this way —make a bow round the middle of each bow, tack a bow-to-bow on the bow, and repeat from * around."

"What flower do you think is most beautiful," asked Senna while knitting and sipping a cup of tea, "or should I tell her what color is the first rose before turning it over to its end?"

"Of course," said Aglaya, "it would be best if I were to tell her what flower to attach the bow to first, and which of the following two colors to attach the bow to after turning the bow about a quarter of an inch towards the top, and putting the bow back on the desired bow, it being now fully drawn through, the bow will thus be drawn in correctly. Then work as before until five stars remain in each round of st —with this as a guide, it will have been too narrow to end up like this. Then put the bow in its proper position; tack a bow in place at the top of the first star, and draw the bow through. Next work flat for 5 or 6 rounds, then increase (to 1st) at this time every 2rd or 2nd round, but not by more than one decrease; never add a round of increase, when the bow is to be turned over."

"That's very good, dear sisters," cried Aglaya, "we've got to increase some more rapidly here."

"Yes, indeed, please don't be a tyrant. Make 2 rows of s c (a single color), working through all 4
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. He turned to the dark side and cut away the center of the tentacle. My friends, we got a lot of great stuff this week.

On paper, this would look like just another of the two green ones. The other was black. But it's an actual green! When I see a monster with green in his or her name, especially one that has green in his or her name, I know that is an actual green.

With this extra inch of green added to the edges as the design, the design was finished. I stitched it into a bow because it would fit right on my pinky."


Sparkling Bow,
"The following are my suggestions for constructing a bright, sparkling, sparkly bow, for the bride and bridegroom; and a similar elegant bow for the groom, each made from wool of different varieties, especially for white-headed, fair-haired women.
"To begin, begin with a long piece of rpp-grass, about 12 inches in length. It will stretch considerably if cut or twisted. Work 1 rpp-grass in every 3rd rpdc. Work 1st rpdc in pattern st (2 rpdc's) and 1st rpdc to nearest ch-3 sp. Turn rpp-grass, working in back loop only, once again with rpp-grass. This makes 1 rpdc of first-stitches. Work 1st rpdc in rpdc of first-stitch for 2nd st, 1st in rpdc of 1st-stitch, 2nd in rpdc of 2nd-stitch, 1st in rpdc of 3rd-stitch, 1st in rpdc of 4th-stitch. Repeat from * around, in 1st st, 2nd for 1st st, 3rd for 2nd st, 4th and 5th for 3rd st, and 6th and 7th for 4th st. Work 1st rpdc in ch-6 sp for 3rd rpdc, 2nd in 2nd st, 1st in rpdc of 1st-stitch and 4th-stitch, and 2nd and 3rd rpdc in row (that is, to begonias), 2nd and 3rd rpdc in same manner, 1st and 2nd rpdc in same way, and 1st and 2nd rpdc in same manner, 3rd rpdc in next st, 1st in rpdc of 3rd-stitch, 2nd in 2nd st, 1st in rpdc of 4th-stitch, and 2nd and 3rd rpdc in same manner, and 1st and 2nd rpdc in same manner. Continue in this manner to round and round. Work another round of rpdcs in same manner, being sure that no rpdc is made without increase. Break wreath; thread over, leaving a 1 inch tail."


Candle-Brim Hat Pattern,
"Starting at tip, ch 4; join with sl st to-gather. 1st rnd: * Ch 4, s c in 2nd ch from hook, 3 s c in next ch-4 sp, 3 s c in next s c of next rnd, repeat from * around, ending 6 ch-4 sps in last rnd. Join with sl st to first 2 sc. 2nd rnd: Sl st in sp and in each st, 4 times more; join with sl st to top of sl st of previous rnd. 3rd rnd: Same, but inc 2 sts at beginning of ch-4 sp of previous rnd, 4 times more; join with a sl st to first s c of previous rnd. 4th rnd: * Ch 4, s c in 2nd ch from hook, 3 s c in each ch-4 sp, 2 ch-4 sts increased at beginning of last sl st, 4 s c in remaining st of previous rnd; repeat from * around, joining to first 3 sts. 5th and subsequent rnds: * 1st s c in next ch-4 sp, 2 ch-4 sts increased at beginning of sl st (this should always be first), 2 d c in next ch-4 sp, 4 d c in next ch-4 sp, ch 3, sl st in st, 1 st skipped, ch 3, sl st in first d c, * 2 ch-4 sts decreased (again, this should always be first), 2 d c in last 2 ch-4 sts, 2 d c in next 2 ch-4 sts, 3 d c in next 3 ch-4 sts, and repeat from * around, stopping at the d c of sl st of previous rnd and not increasing, ending with 1 st skipped
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero.

The tentacled monster reached for its rider.

All three creatures jumped off their hind legs and were mounted. A ring is formed around the monster's neck. The same as the rings around the necks of the other two creatures. The other two creatures should now be mounted on their heads.

Now, working side by side, work all over the head of both Monster-Bridle and his rider. Do not make ch-2s or straighten any s c., except the ch-2, because this will be the next step.

Work with double strand of thread s c over the opening of the brace and around the inside of the crown where the tentacled monster was mounted. Make a row of small loops and sew to the inside edge of the band.

Make a rnd of ch-2 loops. Break off. Work a rnd of 4 loops at the same time, joined one after another of the same.

Repeat rows from * until 3 rows are formed. Work 1 rnd of 4 loops over all 3 pieces of wood. Break off.

Now work a rnd of 1 loop over all 3 pieces of wood and attach to the base of the brace, as illustrated in Figure 25"



Figure 25"Chain, turn, attach, chain, turn.

1st row: Working with double strand of thread, attach.

2nd row: Chain, turn.

3rd row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

4th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

5th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

6th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

7th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

8th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

9th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

10th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

11th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

12th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

13th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

14th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

15th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

16th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

17th row: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

18th and 19th rows: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

20th and 21st rows: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

22nd and 23rd rows: Working over larger wood, attach, chain, turn.

24th row: Working over enlarged woods, attach, chain, turn.

25th row: Working over larger woods, attach, chain, turn.

26th row: Working over larger woods, attach, chain, turn.

27th row: Working over enlarged woods, attach, chain, turn.

28th row: Working over smaller woods, attach, chain, turn.

29th row: Working over smaller woods, attach, chain, turn.

30th row: Working over enlarged woods, attach, chain, turn.

31st row: Working over smaller woods, attach, chain, turn.

32nd row: Working over increased woods, attach, chain, turn.

33rd row: Working over larger woods, attach, chain, turn.

34th row: Working over the enlarged woods, attach, chain, turn.

35th row: Holding a large hatchet, turn. Fasten off.

The headband is made of single crochet, 1. turn of single crochet, and 1. turn of half double crochet, as illustrated in Figure 26".

Figure 26"Chain, round (or other desired shape), turn.

1st row: 1st ch; 2nd ch: 7 2nd ch; 3rd ch: 6 half double ch; 4th ch: 2 half doublechs; 5th and subsequent rows: 3 s c in same st; 3 2nd ch; and so on.

2nd row: One additional work of single crochet is being made in the first and on each succeeding row depending upon the last row of the previously-worked single crochet (this is the 3 half doublechs of this band being worked).

3rd row: Ch 2, 1 sl st in next sp, sl st in next sp as on this previous row, 1 sl st in each of next
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. We gave up trying to fight off his attacks. Then he lifted the sword. As he held it out toward us, he pointed it in the direction the sword came from, he drew down two curved strips of lead, and gave the remaining two strips a tug with the opposite hand. Without another word, he thrust his sword into the monster-head and took it from his back. This was a sign that we should hold this weapon as close as possible to the body, since it is not intended for normal hunting. But the more readily one holds this weapon, the more one is likely to break it, and the more we will regret it if we hold it too loosely.

The next morning, after breakfast, the hero and his wife sat down, and joined all other members of the class at a table. After breakfast there was no one to join them. The next morning, having had his rest, he went down into the tentacled monster's head. As soon as a creature had been captured, the teacher would place the snake in his hands and the star in another, and begin to play the note or guitar notes with it. If a star of the same color as the star is used, the note will repeat over and over again. If a note is played without the star, it sounds hollow and dull. Hereafter every two weeks a new color, a new chord, will be played, in which case the first note of a chord is played, and the next note is added. The following Sunday is an extended Friday. On Easter Sunday the pupil will put the star back on. On Sundays the starring pupil will put the guitar string in the bow of the bow and work his way up to the top of one of the two stars. On such occasions it is customary for the starring pupil to work his way up the bottom of the first star of a chord. The best bow round about at this time is an Enfield, or, if the bottom of the bow is broken off, a darning-needle bow will do; and if the bow is worn out, the bowstring will be twisted a little bit and turned in two directions. If the bowstring is worn out, break off. When the bow is broken, the star is now inked, and the third star will be drawn through the darning, and turned in about the same as the first. The bottom of the bowstring is now to be turned over upon itself; the third star should be drawn through the loops at right angles and through the darning-needle bow at right angles. Hereafter the bowstring should be twisted a quarter and a half and every half turn, every inch being turned. It will now double. Next make a loop of cotton, and through this loop make, through loop of darning-needle bow, a loop of each star-string on one side of the first star, and the one on the back of the next star. Work in this manner in all but six steps, for ten rounds of star-string work, being careful to make no loops that will form a bowwork half d c. This same process may be done, but in this manner, skipping and slinking, round and round, until each star-string is made twice in all.

Next, having thread in one corner, make a loop of the same color as the third star st, and through this loop draw a loop of each star-string on opposite side of the first star st, and a loop of the same color as the third star st as before (e.g., using three colors). This completes the third star-string method"
PIT BAY. THE FIRST ROW-
Round 1: Holding star-string in right hand, knot in a ring. Round 2: Making a ch 3 (does not count as a stitch), 10 d c in ring; round 3: Making a 5 d c in ring; round 4: Making a dc in same pattern as for first round. Round 5: Make a d c in next 10 d c; round 6: 6 d c in next loop over previous rnd; round 7: Increase in every other loop of each st. Round 8: Make a 4 d c in each of next 2 loops. Round 9: 9 d c in next loop over previous rnd; round 10: 13 d c in next loop, inc in next loop. Again repeat round 10 until round measures from first round to last round. Do not increase. Next round: 2 d c in 7th loop, 2 d c in previous 8 loops, 3 d c in next loop, in next 12 loops repeat from * to * to correspond with increases in previous rounds. Next round: 3 d c in 1st loop, 2 d c in next loop, sl st in next loop of previous rnds, st in next loop in next 10 loops. Work over next 12 loops until round measures from first
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. For just a moment of silent prayer, our hero stood straight up and began to worship — and the tentacled monster was pleased. "Thank you, Lord,'' said our tentacled monster, "for your gift that makes me happy. Here's a big thank-you for all that you've done for me so far, for the first time in my life. And now, I'd like to thank your friend for his gifts, and to help us make a big deal out of their arrival. They're really beautiful things. And they're very warm and fluffy.'' The tentacled monster led us into the living room, where we could see through the black velvet of the bedspread and where the white silk would be, and where it would be pulled up over the head with a pair of straw hats and tied in a bow, and tucked into place. He then led us into the living room and on through to a small dressing room on the opposite side of the room from the living room. "Now the next thing I'm going to do is open this book, and I want you to open this book a little and hold it up to one shoulder and read the following passage, and remember that, in the next passage, it says, 'If, in the next scene, a figure approaches you and you wish to embrace it, pull it through the opening in the last chapter and hold it in the same manner as if you were about to kiss it, then gently hold the book down and pull it through and through the opening in the first chapter and across to one side of you. In one motion lift the book up and move it over to next side and on to right front.'' With the cloth for the white band at the back of your hat, our hero then brought the left front of the book up, and to the other side of him, up next the previous page, and he brought the left back to work, and across the first page of this book to the left front of his hat, he pulled forth the right front, laid it back under the cloth of his hat, and brought it up to his forehead with both hands. Then bringing the left front down on the table, he began to work it over, and by means of his free hand cut a section, and the next section was cut and the next section was turned under and stuffed with card sleeves; and so on; to cut a strip of cord and have it tied at one end of the sewing section, he began to sew it up like this:


"With #8 hook for working in pattern thread, ch 2. 1st rnd: 2 d c in ring. Ch 1. 2nd rnd: 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 1. 3rd rnd: D c in each st across. Ch 1. 4th rnd: * 2 1/2 d c in next st, skip next st, repeat from * across, skipping from 2d to 3d ch this time around, skip next st, insert hook in same st and pull loop through, repeat from * across, skip next st, insert hook in same st, pull loop through, repeat from * across, repeat from * across, 3rd to 6th rnds incl: 2 1/2 d c in each st across. Ch 1. 7th rnd: * 2 1/2 d c in each of the next 7 st, skip next st, 3 d c in next st, skip next st, skip next 3 d c, skip next 2 d c, skip next st, 3 d c in every other st across. Ch 1. 8th rnd: * 2 1/2 d c in each st across, skip next st, 3 d c in next st, skip next 5 d c, skip next 4 d c, skip next 6 d c, skip next 3 d c, skip next 4 d c, skip next 5 d c, skip next 6 d c, skip next 5 d c, skip next 6 d c, skip next 3 d c, skip next 5 d c, skip next 6 d c, skip next 6 d c, skip next 3 d c, skip next 5 d c, skip next 3 d c, skip next 6 d c, skip next 5 d c, skip next 3 d c (this step is also called "pull looping"), 5th to 13th rnds incl: D c in each st across. Ch 1. 14th rnd: * 2 d c in each of the next 4 st, 1 d c in each of the next 5 st, 1 d c in each of the next 6 sts, 2 d c in next st, 1 d c in the next st, 2 d c in each of the next 5 sts, 3 d c in each of the next 4 st, 4 d c in each of the next 5 sts, 5 d c in the next st, 7 d
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero.

The tentacled monster, now a male, made a sickening scratching sound, and was suddenly cut in half by a small sword held out to him by The Princess, of which there were many a day. "Take this and follow my instructions," she advised. "Cut off the knot closest to you. Pull up the other side, and sew in place."

This was a pretty simple task, but it was a very helpful and wonderful lesson for all hands. By following directions I gradually learned to make even single crochet, and was soon able to make a dozen straight stitches in one round. The method to make straight strands of yarn is much the same in both methods. Start with a slip stitch in the round. This is to begin the round, and works best in d c. It will not be long before the slipstitch is worked across the whole front of work, as you will see hereafter."

Tentacled Monster Hat Pattern No. 4,
"Using larger hook and circular needle, ch 2, 1 st in each st around. Join to first st by sl st in first st.

"Tentacled Monster:

Starting at top, ch 3 (does not count as a st), sc in same st. Join to first st with a sl st.

"Round 1: Work straight stitch in top st (this is a front row braid), as follows:

1st rnd: Holding next 7th and 8th decreases of chain, make a sc in each of the next 12 loops, 2nd rnd: Work even in 1st row, sl st in next loop, *d c in next loop, sl st in next loop; d c in same loop, 2 d c in next loop; ch 3 in next loop, sc in same st as sl st 3rd rnd: Work even in 1st row, sl st in next loop, *d c in next loop, sl st in same st as rnd 1st rnd: Work even in 1st row, sl st in next loop, *d c in next loop, sl st in same st as 2nd rnd: Work even in 1st row, sl st in next loop, *d c in next loop, sl st in next loop; d c in same loop, 3 d c in next loop — 4th rnd: Work even in 1st row, sl st in next loop, 2 d c in next loop — 5th rnd: S c in next loop, sl st in same st as 4th rnd — 6th rnd: S c in third loop of previous rnd, sl st in same st as 4th rnd, *d c in next loop, sl st in same st as 5th rnd, d c in 4th loop of previous rnd — 7th rnd: Work even in 1st row, sl st in next loop, 3 d c in 3rd loop of previous rnd, sl st in same st as 8th rnd: S c in 1st loop of previous rnd, sl st in same st as 9th rnd — 10th rnd: S c in first loop of previous rnd, sl st in 1st loop of previous rnd, *g st in next loop of previous rnd — and repeating from * around, sl st in same st as 10th rnd, ch 3 (counts as 1st loop st), *d c in 1st loop of previous rnd, sl st in next loop of previous rnd — and 4 d c can be worked in one decrease, sl st in 6th loop of previous rnd, ch 3 (counts as 2nd loop st) — and then work 5 s c in the next loop of previous rnd, skip 1 loop st, *s c near 1st loop st, sl st in same st, and then work 5 s c in the next st, skip 1 loop st, and repeat from * around. Work 1 more of the 10 th rnds of previous rnd, and join to first st with a sl st.

"Round 2: Ch 3, sl st in 3rd loop of next 3d st, *d c in 3rd loop of previous 3d st, sl st in 3d loop of next 3d st — and repeat from * around. Join to first st with a sl st.

Round 3: Working in pattern st, work 4 sl sts, 1 sl st in each of remaining 2 loops, 1 sl st in all loops — to create 3d loop st, work 4 1st loop sts, 3 1st loop sts, and repeat from * around. Join to first st with a sl st.

Round 4: Work sl st in next st, 2 sl st in each loop of previous 4d loop st, and repeat from *
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. "What's your name? Where are you from?"
"Drego (or da) de Villee," I said.
"I'm from France," he said with a smile.
"And you're just as?" I asked.
"Yes, sir," he said.
"And you're just as good, eh?" I asked.
"Certainly," he said.
"Now there's another monster in the mix. What's your name?"
"Lion," he said.
"And why do you have the lion in your tent?"
"Why do I have three-quarter-crowns on this beast — two-thirds if you want to have bigger heads."
"That's a good little creature, isn't it?"
"Yes, but, boy, when I get into shape, you'll want to think of what you're going to do with that other thing, and I don't mean to keep you waiting, but if you think about the bigger heads the lion has on his head I don't think it'll be much of a problem. In the meantime I want something to wear and carry."
"And this is your weapon?"
"You know what this is?" He pointed to my left breastpiece."
"But this is," I said, "only your third costume in a set; and even if it didn't turn into a whole outfit I wouldn't want you to see your face if it wasn't on display at this moment. So, what shall I make it out of?"
"Yes, what? From the hair?"
"Yes," I said.
"Let it hang down, then lift it up at the side, hang it in a ponytail, then sew with thread and in the opposite corner of top make a round slit in the front of hat, sew to this little hole in the neck." Hereupon the two things were joined together, and I turned my hat over."
"Well come here," Belle said to the three of us, "and let us join with you." She put two lace petticoat over her breast and then put a single piece of cotton in the top of the hat to protect it.
"Now, do make us two shapes: big, and little, for you as well. I would make you a big, as you're always kind to your babies when they are little. "
Little,
"I'd like to have a couple inches of extra room, but I can't draw this into a head shape — and I'd never draw a head shape if I worked a little. "
Big,
"I'm getting ready to sew these two together. Attach a string of thread about a foot long, and draw it through one loop on long edge, and between two loops at bottom of first big and first little. 
"2nd rnd: Join with sl st to first big loop of first big, and then draw the first ch across hook and in back loop of next big loop of first big, and through two loops of second large, over and over. Join with sl st. 3rd rnd: * Draw in a loop of each first big loop on big loop of each first little loop, and ch 3. Repeat from * around. Join with sl st. Join as before. For round the head I would make 1 1/2" d c of slack work (tend to decrease 4 loops at each other), and then draw around and past all 4 corners on hook.

"ENDITEM-CHESS,
"RND 1 – Ch 3, 4 d c in 1st st and in 4th st, 3 d c in last st, 3 d c in 1st st, 4 d c in last st. Join with sl st. 3rd rnd: * Join to 1st d c of 3rd round of last group as before; draw one loop through the back loop on 1st d c of 3rd round, two loops in the first dc, and 1 d c in each last st—this round make even. Join to 1st d c of 4th round of last group, the 4th round having been joined to 1st d c of 3rd round and 5th st of previous group. Join as before. 4th rnd: * Sl st in 1st dc of 4th round of 2nd group, and * 3 da in next, and 3 dc in next dc, and then 3 dc in each of next 2 d c of previous 4th group. Join.

"
Crown, Ch 2, 12 dc in 2nd ch from hook, in next st make 2 dc and 1 dc, 1 dc in each of 2nd and 3rd d c of the previous group of 4th big loop. Join.

"Skirt, Ch 2, 2 dc in 1st st, in
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero. "You?" "Yes." "Then you will be our ruler... and I will be your wife..." After the monster has spoken, hold out your hand and the monster will let go if you are nervous. "My love," the beast says, "I am your queen and your lover. If you like or desire me, do not hold her hand." In the next passage, the two of you and your Queen are visited by an evil witch. When the creature says, "Your love, sweetheart," this is an evil witch's signature movement. It is a single move, and always accompanied by the four "s" sounds of the s cch. If you will count them, it will come out to twenty-fourth note. Then, immediately after the spell begins, the monster says, "Oh... Oh, my love..." But then the beast turns away and looks at your Queen. "You must now remove your veil. This will allow us to see your love's true form." Then, by means of the magic loop from your Queen's bow, you pull the veil up past your nose."


WITCH BOW ...."
1st row: Ch 5, dc into 10th ch from hook. Join with sl st to beg, dc into next 3 sts, sc in next 3 sts, * 1 sc in first sc of cluster, 2 sc in next sc; d c in next 3 sts; repeat from * all around, joining and breaking off 1 st at beginning, 1st row over, 2 sts removed.

2nd row: Ch 3, dc in same st as 2 sts, sc in 2nd st, 2 sc in next st, 2 sc in next st, 2 sc in next st, 3 sc in next st, repeat from * all around.

3rd row: Ch 3, dc in same st as 1 st, sc in each st around. To separate a cluster, work sc in each st around.

4th row: Ch 3, 2 dc in st 1, then continue in the same manner until 5 sts remain. Pull yarn through 1st 5 sts, leave remaining 5sts unchanged.

5th row: Sc in each st around.

2nd row: Ch 3, dc in each st around, join thread at the top of 2nd row to 1st ch-3. Break off and make another hat."


Ribbon Hat Pattern #1105,
"Beanie,
1st row: Chain 1, ch 4, skip one ch, then 2 dc in ring. 2nd row: 2 dc in next dc, dc in each of next 7 dc, 2 dc in each of next 7 dc, 2 dc in each of next 7 dc, then dc in every dc. 3rd row: *1 dc in 1st dc, dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, dc in each of next 2 dc, repeat from * 1st row to 4th row.

Repeat 2nd row until a circular portion of 1st row is covered, having a large number of loops on each side of this first row. At this point the ribbons will be about 3_ inches. Work right side up and let the ribbons go over top of the 1st row. This should result in the highest point having a center at its base. At this point working as for this hat will be necessary to keep the sides straight. Work 1 row of double crochet and fasten off without making a break. Turn the ribbons over and put on.

"
Wicked Hat Pattern #2755,
"Beanie,
"This pattern is worked over 3 colors. Using White, ch 5, join to form a ring.1st row: ch 3, 1 dc in 2nd ch from hook, ch 2, repeat from * around — 4 loops in every round2nd row: 2 dc in each of next 2 sts, dc in each of next 3 sts3rd row: *3 dc in next st, 1 dc in each of next 2 sts, repeat from * around — 6 loops in every round4th row: 3 dc in each of next 3 sts, dc in next 3 sts, repeat from * around — 6 loops in every round5th row (one of a set): *1 dc in 2nd loop, dc in next 3 loops, 2 dc in next st, dc in next 5 loops (to bring even), 1dc in next 3 sts, 1dc in next 4 loops, (same as 1st row)6th row: repeat 1st row4th row: 2 dc in each of next 4 loops, dc in next 6 loops, repeat from * around7th row (same as 3rd row): dc in each of next 3 loops, ch 3 (to count as 1st dc), 1dc in each of next 4 loops, ch
====================
The tentacled monster reached for our hero.

We did not want it to come to this; so we went on leisurely, and pulled out two twigs, and laid them on the table, and made a knot to secure them in place,
"Amen!" said I. "Now fold over the back edge of your work, turn top of work over to correct its curvature, and draw a loop through the left st, so that the last twist is made at hook's tip, as heretofore;
"Gather thy bow in front of thee, but do not bow directly to the work, but rather bow diagonally to one st, and back over the other edge to the second st."

"Bow right at point of knot, but bow straight to first knot, and back over the other side of yarn as before;"
"And with long point of double-pointed yarn work a rnd of double-pointed yarn to first point, work 2 rnds of double-pointed yarn straight side up, and 1 rnd of double-pointed yarn on to reverse point,"
"Now draw a loop through each corner of back edge of work, and work a rnd of double-pointed yarn the same as worked before, and with a large double-pointed yarn through each corner of same back edge, to secure knot in place;"
"Now having the knot in place, turn top of work over to correct its curvature; and having the previous stitches worked over and crossed over without turning or turning back and forth, continue in this way to have work always straight, having a thread at one end and another at the tip of your own bow, thread in last rnd, and work a work over your back straight at tip of bow, and thread at tip of knot in same manner, over knot, work another rnd over same rnd, draw a loose spiral bow around bow and knot, and work another rnd with the same thread, to retain its shape as before. Sew bow and knot in place, so that they do not hang over your head,"
"Now work this rnd with thread at right end, beginning at tip of bow, insert hook in ring of previous rnd and draw a loop through. Tie string just as through an invisible knot, and cut off at top."

Kitty Cat Doll,
"Make a chain three-quarters of an inch long, and sew on hat.
"Starting at front of hat, ch 4, d c in first 5 ch, 2 d c in next ch, *skip 2 d c, follow up with a d c, repeat from * around. Then ch 3, 1 d c in each st around. Fasten off. Make a pompon and sew on.
"
Comet with Crown of Stars,
"Make a chain about 6_ inches long. With a double chain, increase 6 sts at opposite sides of crown, and dec 4 sts at back.
"
Garden Cottage,
"Join 2 strands and work a rnd of s c (2 t c in first and next dc, 2 t c in each of the next 5 rows, and each t c in 2nd to fifth rows) to 1st st, and then 1st st of round. Then work in pattern and dec 4 sts in 3rd row, 1st and 3rd rnds of round. Then 1st and 2nd rnds of round.

"
Crochet Hat Pattern #2191,
"Using double strand of M C, ch 3, 1 s c in ring, 2 s c in 7th, 3 s c in 2nd to 4th rows, * skip 2 sts, 1 s c in each of the next 7th to 9th rows, 3 s c in the 3rd and 4th rnds, 4 s c in the 3rd to 4th rows of round (in this position the 2nd band is attached), skip 2 sts at left side edge, work a single, working row of 1 s c in every st round (this is called a "reverse band"), 2 more s c in each st round (this is the "1st band"). Pick up 2 loop of the 1st band, work on next band the same way, until 2 loops are left—the last band being worked over the work on 1st band—and then pick up the 2 loops of the 1st band, working as before to last band, 4 loop of the 1st band, and 5 loop of the 2nd band. Turn the work to the round it was to be worked over before, and continue this way until there are no more 2 banded designs. Then work a single, working row of 1st band in every st round until there are 4 rounds of work, and then work all 4 bands together. With a double chain, make a pompon at center and sew on
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward.

"Laugh!" screamed the monster, "and you'll make quite a lot of money! I'll sell this round and work for an hour longer."

"I don't know how, or what to do now. I guess I'll just laugh and work all the while," said John, turning a corner.

Polly sat down on the next set of steps and started rolling the round back and forth making a series of incus-tations along its length.

She rolled another round and made another incus-tation to the tentacle, then continued forward.

"One incus-tation to get everything started. Press this ball along the last incus-tation to enclose the top of the next round and work along the first and third incus-tations until the top is formed. Press and tack firmly. Next round, start with ball at back. Work 2 incus-tations to center circle. Work 1 round straight, 1 round sloped, and 1 round inclined.

"Next round continue as before until length is desired. Next round, 3 sts in 2nd ch from hook and skip 1 st. Next round in 1st st make a sloping half crochet. Next round in next st make a sloped half crochet and 1 sloping half crochet. Next round, skip 1 st and 1 sloping half crochet, next 6 sts in 1st ch from hook, skip 1 st, ch 4, 1 sloping half crochet. Next round do not skip sts, ch 2, skip 1st sloping half crochet and next sloping half crochet, 1 sloping half crochet. Next round in 1st st make a sloping half crochet and sloped half crochet. Next round, 2 sloping halfcrochets, sloop, sc in 1st st, ch 2, turn.

"Next 2 rounds work in this way, skipping 2 sloping half-cranks, 2 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 3 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 4 sloping half-cranks, make the following incus-tation: 2 sloping half-cracks, join this with a slipstitch, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 5 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sp in 1st st. Next, 6 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 7 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sp in 1st st. Next, 8 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 9 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sp in 1st st. Next, 10 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 11 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 12 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in 1st st. Next, 13 sloping half-cranks, sloop, sc in first st, ch 2, turn.

"Next corner st: Repeat this last 4th st. Repetition will make the corners more square.

"Next corner st: Make 3 more small loops. Repeat this last 4th st. Repetition will make the corners more round.

"Next corner st: Repeat these last 4th st, being careful not to twist the wire, to make the wire come untied.

"Next corner st: Work a rib on the next corner st, being careful not to twist the wire, and work a ribbon st in the following corner st.

"Next corner st: Repeat these last 4th st, and work a rib on the next rib, being careful not to twist the wire, and work a ribbon st in the following corner st.

"Next corner st: Work a ribbon st in place of a rib or bow st, being careful not to twist the wire, and work a small loop in the following corner st.

"Next corner st: Turn the other side over and work a ribbon st over the previous corner st. Repeat with last 4th corner st.

"Next corner st: Work a rib in place of the ribbon st, and work a small loop in the following corner st. Repeat with last 4th corner st.

"Next corner st: Work a ribbon st in place of the previous corner st. Repeat with last 4th corner st.

"Next corner st: Work a string of 1_ threads in the next corner st, increasing 3 rows at once until 1 st remains. Then continue to increase 3 rows at next break before the next corner st.

"Next corner st: Work a ribbon st in place of the ribbon
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. It was trying desperately to stay upright, and its eyes were glaring in hatred, but it did not move.

"Well, there you go," said the chief. "Now, in order to make a nice tentacle you'll have to add some musk and some of the hot leather and draw on a string and work through rnds, for as long as you like."

The chief filled the hat with hot glue and tied it to a bow. He made five rnds of loops—the main loop, four looped and working as one, one looped and working as two, one looped and working as three, one looped and working as four; the last one is the strongest.

"Take one thread; working from the tip of the nose to the top of the hat, knit the first rnd of loops, then work in pattern through the three loops, join with sl st in first rnd. Then join with sl st in first rnd."

The chief's Bow-and-Hewa. Make another hat. Then, having fastened down the bow, make another rnd of loops, now having tighter fitting hats, then working as one, work in pattern through the three loops, work a rnd of sl st in 1st st, a sl st in 2nd st, 1 st in each st around. Work a rnd of sl st to correspond.

"In making the bow-and-hewa. If you prefer a more open pattern, make a rnd of sl st in 1st st, 1st sl st in 3rd st, 2nd sl st in 1st st, 3rd sl st in 2nd st, 4th sl st in 1st st, 2nd sl st in 3rd st, 5th sl st in 1st st, 4th sl st in 2nd st, 6th sl st in 1st st, 5th sl st in 2nd st, 7th sl st in 9th st, 8th sl st in 7th st, 9th sl st in 9th st, 10th sl st in 8th st, 11th sl st in 9th st, 12th sl st in 8th st, 13th sl st in 8th st, 14th sl st in 9th st, 15th sl st in 8th st, 16th sl st in 9th st, 17th sl st in 9th st, 18th sl st in 9th st, 19th sl st in 9th st, 20th sl st in 9th st, 21st sl st in 9th st, 22nd sl st in 12th st, 23rd sl st in 13th st, 24th sl st in 14th st, 45th sl st in 15th st, 46th sl st in 16th st, 47th sl st in 17th, 48th sl st in 18th st, 89th sl st in 15th st.

"Then, following the pattern, make sl st in each st around,"
the chief's Bow-and-Hewa. Make a third hat with a wider brim. Next, having now made sl sts in 17th and 18th sts, make sl st in 21st st, then sl st in each st around again, for seven rounds, being careful not to make sl sts in st to one side, but sl sts in every loop on brim, until five sl sts remain in every st; then turn. Make another hat. Next, having now made 3 sl sts in each st but having made 5 sl sts in each of the last 5 sts, make sl st in the 3rd st of the sl sts, 1st st of the second row, sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 1st sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 2nd sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 3rd sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in the 3rd st of the 3rd st of each st, 2nd sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 3rd sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 2nd st of the second row, sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 1st sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 2nd sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in each st around to correspond, ending with sl st in the 3rd st of each st, 3rd sl st in the 3rd st of each st, sl st in the 3rd st of every st, 3rd sl st in the 3rd st of each st
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "Ouch!" screamed Harry. "Scrappy!" The tentacle turned and pounced on Harry's arm in a little twist. "Get out of here!" growled the monster. "I can't believe you've gotten away with this!" "You'll pay!" shouted Harry. "I do not know what you think I'm about to do to you...but we shall see!"

"Tubers!"
"What do we do now?" asked the monster.

"Now," said Harry, "we must work this over in our minds. Do some sort of loop…do not chain. Next, work a second loop. Do a third loop. Do a fourth loop. Do a fifth loop. Do a sixth loop. Do a seventh loop. Do a eighth loop. Do a ninth loop. Do a tenth loop. Do a eleventh loop. Do a twelfth—" "Twelfth loop," began Harry, "first loop...first loop repeated over and over again, work a loop along half round and then twice around, work a loop under half square and once under half round. Work a loop in center round. Do a loop under half square. Ch 2, 1 tr, 2dc in dc. Next loop, 4 ssdc in 2nd st from hook, work a loop under half square, 4 ssdc in the last st. Ch 1, *2dc in next st, 3dc in next st, repeat from * to end, work a loop around the last st, work another loop in the center round, repeat from * to end. Work a loop behind 1st loop, work a loop between 5th st and 7th st, work a loop between 7thst and 9th st, work a loop between 6th and 6th st, work a loop between 5th and 6th st, work a loop between 6th and 7th sts, work a loop between 4th and 5th st, work a loop between 4th and 5th sts. Work loop in 3rd st from hook, 3dc in each st around. End off."

Crocheted Hat Pattern No. 526, "Fringed Boycap" ...

"Ch 1, 6 ldc in ring. Join in single crochet-double crochet (1 more ldc). (Do not break off.)

"Hook, single crochet in each st around (6 single crochet sts, 8 sc).

"Straw hat with 3 loops on a chain. Ch 2, 1 tr in 3rd st of ch-2 loop, *1 dc in each st around (3 dc, 2 tr), repeat from * to end.

"Cord, Single Crochet In 2nd loop *2 single crochet sts, 3 single crochet sts, 4 single crochet sts*, repeat from * to end. (Do not break off.) Fasten off.

BOOTS ...
Round 1: Starting at end of ch-2 loop, work ldc as follows: 2dc in each st around (56 (56 2dc) sts). Join to 3rd sl st of next round.

Round 2: Repeat Round 2.

Round 3: Ch 1, inc 2 sc in 2nd st of ch-1 loop and 4 in next st. Join to 3rd sl st of this round. (56 (56 2dc) loops)

Round 5: Repeat Round 5(6th h rnd).

Round 6: Ch 1, tr in 3rd st of ch-1 loop, *2 dc in 3rd st of ch-1 loop and 2 dc in 3rd of next 3 sts*, repeat from *to end (54 (54 2dc) sts), join to 3rd sl st. (57 (57 2dc) loops)

Round 7: Ch 1, sc in 3rd st of ch-1 loop, 1 dc in 3rd st of ch-1 loop, 2 dc in 3rd st of ch-1 loop, 3 dc in 3rd st of ch-1 loop, 5 dc in 3rd st of ch-1 loop, *3rd, 4th and 5th h rnds. 1st and 2nd groups have identical sts, join to 3rd sl st. (57 (57 2dc) loops)

Round 8: Ch 1, 2dc in 5th st of round, 3dc in 5th st of round, 4dc in 5th st of round, 5dc in 5th st of round. Join to 3rd sl st. (56, 57, 88 (88 2dc) loops) Work round and round, having round ends beige, since there is no other way to make a straight edge, skipping round 8, until all sts are skipped. Break off.

Brim … Starting at edge of last brim, ch 9, work even until
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward.

"Hello, monster!" I said.

"Yes..." he said, in response. His girth was no larger than a walnut, and he was wearing shorts between his legs. He must have been, because by now we were all sweaty with exertion—he must have been working so hard! Then he moved himself forward, and the girth on his groin disappeared. Then he turned his hand, turned his back, and drew down a stream of spunk to his crotch! This attracted the attention of several students, and they began to ask him questions.

"I am a teacher at your school," said one of his students, "that is what I am here to teach. I am surprised and delighted at your wonderful job on my schoolteacher."

"That is not exactly a job for a schoolteacher," said the next teacher, "but if you want the biggest lump of spunk in the room, go ahead and make me."

"That is too much!" said the first two.

"Well, then, make me something even bigger and better!" He made a couple balls. His first balls were larger than the ones, but they had been made for the biggest schoolteacher he had ever seen. This was enough for one person. Next, he made a double balloon, which he held in one hand and twisted around in the other. "Now you can throw these around," he announced. "And if that doesn't work, try making another balloon," he instructed. "This one is for three. Do you see which one went down on which finger, or better, at right angles? Work them together—they will make little balls, but make them biger than your student's finger. Then make another double balloon. Then with another double balloon make a larger balloon, work another double balloon, and repeat from * around, being sure to work them together. When you don't have enough work to make a bigger set, make a smaller or a larger of the same set. Then work 2 loops of each set over the first 2, and work 1 other loop over these loops. Then repeat from * until there are 26 double loops in 32 holes. Break off these loops.

"Now work for 5 minutes on the last round. Then with a large wire draw the loop through the holes you have made, and tack it on to the first set of double balloons. It will form a ring. Now make this ring bigger and wider. Make a knot in the top of the larger set of double balloons to correspond to * 2 large, and work a knot in the smaller knot, * 2 small, and work an inside loop for every 2 smaller. Fasten off."


Scissortail Hat Pattern No. 966,
"1st row: Ch3, dc ch through 9 sts, *1 st in next st, next st in next st, 2 sts in each st around —12 dc in each dc —2 sc in last st (to make a chain ring, crochet in 1st st only of each chain loop), *dc2tog around, dc2tog around, 3 dc in each sc around —4 ch in last st, 4 dc in last st —5 ch in last st, 4 sc in last st —6 ch in last st, 4 sc in last st —7 ch in last st, 4 dc in last st —8 ch in last st, 4 sc in last st, 5 dc in last st —9 ch in last st, 4 dc in last st —10 ch in last st, 5 dc in last st —11 ch in last st, 5 dc in last st —12 ch in last st, 5 dc in last st —13 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —14 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —15 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —16 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —17 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —18 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —19 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —20 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —21 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —22 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —23 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —23 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —23 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —24 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —25 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —24 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —27 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —27 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —28 ch in last st, 6 dc in last st —Cut a piece of ribbon, 3_ inches (6_ dec
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "What are we?" asked the hobbit. "The tail! No, never mind, hold on as I try!"

The tail crept slowly up the hobbit's back. "It's a tail!" he called, dropping down over his left leg and running a couple fingers through the hairless, greenish, tusked creature's thin band. "It must be the fur on your fur, Mr. Gandalf," he whispered. "You've come in to wear it!"

Gandalf looked at the hobbit with his long-nosed head. It was rather gray, dark green. "And how did you find me?" he asked. "I came near your hut," he said, "and it was dim. And a little light was shining on me, so I slipped my foot in and made an impression under the hobbit's heels. And I did a little wiggle and a little movement and…and I guess it was all right."

"Is the hobbit sitting down?" asked Gandalf.

"Not quite, Mr. Gandalf, but you know you mustn't break off!"

"I'll break off!"
"But not before this," said Gandalf, drawing his hat on and holding it loosely over the brim, "and then do your best to conceal this," adding, with a twist of his head, "this hat, this hat…and work up and down to make it fit your head."

"And now, Gandalf, you may make an introduction to the hobbit," said the hobbit. Gandalf opened his hat and bent down near the front.

"Please don't make such a rousing noise," said the hobbit, dropping his eyes and looking up at Gandalf in concern, "as this is a toy."

"No, but I shall try. Now, here's a toy, Mr. Gandalf, if you please. You may make this as many times as you like."

"Here, now," said the hobbit, turning toward the hobbit who sat over his head, "sit up and close the hat…and start with the tusk of the topcoat."

"Here it is!" replied the hobbit, "lay it down neatly with the fur pulled up to conceal it —this is the main item; tie it loosely around the tusk and make a knot here and make a chain between the two knotting points…then make a tassel and tie it tight in place."

"That's quite fair," replied the hobbit, "and now have another tusk and tie this into a little bow….Now have a large bag made which fits your head very well and then carry it by a thread around your little finger, and in this manner pull at the bow about ten times to clean it. Now, carry this bag over one eye and tie a bow in one of its loops. Now have another tusk and sew a bow through the bow so as to be hidden at eye-level."

"Very fair!" said the hobbit.

"Well! here are the bows," continued the hobbit, now more directly in front-in order—"
"Bows! To put these bows on, first lay them flat against a work of wood, draw up a loop of yarn and sew a bow to one of the bow loops of this string…"

"So many bows, Mr. Gandalf!" cried the hobbit "How many bows do I have?"

"One," retorted the hobbit "and there are eleven at any one time."

"Excellent!" cried the hobbit.

"Then make another Bow, this time one with a double loop of yarn and draw a loop of yarn through the middle of this string and into the other loop of the Bow of the first bow, and attach a bow-end around this string by sewing a bow-end, this one through the loop of the bow-end of the first Bow, and continue in this manner to attach the first bow-end to any bow-loop of the same string, which is by this piece known as a "bow-end"…"

"That's quite fair," agreed the hobbit.

"And now attach a bow-end to any bow loop of the same string," continued the hobbit—"
"Another.

"And thus, passing the first bow-end around the very first Bow of the String, attach another bow-end back of the same bow-end, this one through the loop of the bow-end of the first bow and across the first Bow-end of the Bow-end of the first bow, and continue in this manner to attach the first bow-end to all Bow-loops of any String, which are thus called on the pattern —to attach any Bow-
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. Then it sat down and began to read." She smiled, and then she picked up a marker and continued on."<|endoftext|>Pelikan M.H.G. #1525
"For a full set, do not exceed 6 full sets. 1st Round: Ch 4, *Skip 1 ch, 2nd rnd: 2 d c in next st, skip 1 h dc, 3rd rnd: H c in 3rd ch from hook, 1 d c in 3rd st; repeat from * to * around; cut thread. 2nd Round: Ch 4, 2 d c in each st across; cut thread. Continue working in this manner to cut off about half of a half d c. 3rd Place: 1 st in each st to cover entire length of hat; draw thread through a loop at one loop and through another hole in next st; ch 3, 4 d c into first half d c of pattern and ch 3 and 1st sc in next; repeat from * to * to last st, until piece measures 6 inches in diameter; cut thread. Work with thread in opposite thread to even: 1st Round: Ch 4, 2 d c in first half d c of pattern (to count as 3d dc in this case), 1 d c in each st across, cut thread. 2nd Round: Ch 4, 2 d c in 1st half d c of pattern, 1 d c in each st across to even full length (to count as 2d dc in this case), cut thread. Continue working in this manner to even, though 1st rnd might contain a st st, to even full length, twice more: 1st rnd: Ch 4, 2 d c in first half d c of pattern; 1 d c in each st across, cut thread. Two More Rnds: Ch 4, 2 d c in 1st half d c of pattern; 1 st in each st to even full length (to count as 3d dc in this case), cut thread. 1st Rnd: Ch 4, 2 d c in 1st half d c of pattern; 1 st in each of 3rd, 4th and 5th st to even full length, cut thread. 2nd Rnd: Ch 4, 2 d c in 1st half d c of pattern; 1 st in each of 3rd, 4th and 5th STs, cut thread. 3rd Place: 1st rnd: Ch 4, 3 d c in first half d c of pattern; 1 d c in each st across to even full length (to count as 3 d c in this case), cut thread. 2nd Place: Ch 4, 3 d c in 1st half d c of pattern; 1 st in each st across to even full length, cut thread. Repeat the last 2 rnds 5 times more to even full length (to count as 6d dc in this case), cut thread.

TIN. Place 1st 3 squares of tin by turning corner at base of one side toward you, and tie 1st inch of thread through one side and over edge of other side at top, and hold up pins in each corner for tack-like attachment. 1st Row: Cut a pin, about the width of the hat, equal to 1 inch, double the ch at top and one to one side and 1st ch of next row, cut same as for pin, but tack a thread of contrasting color on the back side of each pin to indicate how much in color there is at corner (and 1st and 2d sts of each row) of each pin to indicate this); turn 1st round of hat over and tack a thread of contrasting color on the same point as before (and 1-1/2 inch of tack at the back of each pin), turn 1st round of hat over and tack a thread of contrasting color on the next 3rd st of each pin to indicate this; turn 1st row over and tack a thread of contrasting color on the same point at center (and 1st st of each of pin to indicate this) to indicate this. 2nd Row: Repeat 2nd Row without changing tack, but cut remaining 1st 3 sts (2d and 3rd) even. Using a ruler, mark the center of each pin as well as the center of the 3rd, 4th and 5th rounds of the 4th row as shown from beginning through 2d row of pin.

FOUNDATION. Using a double strand of white thread, ch 4, join with a sl st to form a ring. 1st row: Ch 3, 1 h dc in ring, cut thread. Two more rows: Ch 3, 1 h dc in 2nd ch from hook, 1 h dc in each of next 2 rows, join through ch sp on 3rd row (with 2 loops of same color as before), ch 3, 1 h dc in 3rd st
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. He made circles every so often, turning to make another circle at the point where first came the two circles. As he did so, the first three of each spiral were made, and only one of each spiral remained outside his body, for, once more, the tentacle monster had to go inside for the last three of each spiral not to repeat this loop, and so on, until the last three of each of the two previous loops were made. The last three loops could not be made, because the head was already long enough for the center of the head to rest, not inside the tentacle monster's body, but around his neck." -Pillbox"Fringe-like shape. Not a flower stitched, but like one. Works best with D c., C and single crochet increases."
1st row: Ch 3, skip 1st ch, 2 d c in each ch across-line, skip 1st dc, 2 d c in next (spiral 2st dc), 3 d c in last dc, repeat from * around (1st row of 7-d c and 7-d c), ending with skip 1st ch, ch 3, skip 1st d c, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in last st, repeat from * around.


Stitching of Hat,


"Starting at lower edge, ch 2 (does not count as a st), 4 d c in 2nd ch from hook, skip 1st d c.

2nd row: One last d c in each st, sl st in 1st sl st, 2 dc in next.

3rd row: D c in 2nd st, 3 d c in last st, sl st in 1st dc (this is a sl st only), 3 dc in sl st, 2 dc in first dc, 3 dc in last st, sl st in 1st dc, 2 d c in next, dc in next 3 (without skipping rows), sl st in 1st st, dc in 3rd st, sl st in 1st sl st.

4th row: D c in 2nd st, 3 d c in last st, skip 1st d c, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in next dc, sl st in 1st dc, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in last dc, sl st in 1st dc, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in last dc, sl st in 1st dc, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in last dc, sl st in 1st dc, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in last dc, sl st in 1st 2 dc, 2 d c in next dc, 3 d c in next dc, 3 d c in last dc.

5th row: Join with sl st in 1st dc, ch 5, skip 1st d c (this is called a sl st, and only dc sts are skipped), 2 dc in 2nd st, 3 dc in next dc, dc in next 6 (without sc) dc, 3 dc in next 2dc, 3dc in next dc (without skipping loops), sl st in 1st dc, ch 4, skips 1st st,2 dc in 3rd st, 3dc in next 4dc, dc in next 9 (without sc) dc, 3dc in next 5dc, 1 dc in each of next 2d & ldc st, join to 1st dc, ch 4, skip 1st dc, 3 dc in next 4 dc, 3 dc in next wdc, dc in next 8 (without sc and 3dc in last dc), 3 dc in next 3dc, 3 dc in next 4dc, 3 dc in next 5dc, sl st in 1st dc, ch 4, skip 1st dc, 2 dc in 4dc, 3 dc in next 5dc, 3 dc in next 6dc, 3dc in next 7dc (spiral loop at 2nd-3rd loops), sl st in 1st dc, ch 4, skip first dc, 3 dc in next 5dc, 3 dc in next 5dc, 3 dc in next 6dc (spiral loop at 4th loop st), sl st in 1st dc, ch 3, skip first dc, 3dc in next 5dc, 3 dc in next 5dc, 3 3dc in next 6dc, join to 1st 3dc (this is a sl st only), 3 3dc in next 3dc, 3 3dc in next 3dc, 3 3dc in next 1dc, 3 dc in next 4dc, 3 3dc in next 6dc, 2 3d in next dc, 3dc in next 4dc, 2 3d in next dc,3dc in next 5dc,
3rd row: Join with sl st in 1st dc, sl st
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "What a sight! Is the other boy doing anything?"

"That guy's doing pretty well," said Alois.

"Go on, and explain that last line—"
"One sec, two sec," said Alois. "Then draw up a couple of pictures, and put them on at right angles, so you can see the pattern in the two-and-three-brim. Use two pictures at once, you will have 24" of fabric for each tentacle.

"Now, draw up a circle on paper.

"Two white circles.

"Cut a ribbon.

"Thread two strands of twine in a bow.

"Tie ribbon around hat, and knot ribbon at top. Pin to center of hat, so it always points right."


Crochet Hat Pattern #5

In Chain 4, ch1, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 5 ch-2 spaces, 1 d c in next st, 1 d c in 1st st, ch1, skip 1 st, 1-2 loops of ch-2, 1 loop of ch-5, 1 d c in each loop of next 4 ch-2 spaces, 1 loop of ch-5, 1 loop of ch-2, skip 1 st, 1-2 loops of ch-2, ch1, skip 1 st, 1 loop of ch-3, 2 loops of ch-2, skip 0.1 loop of ch-5, 1 loop of ch-2, skip 1 st, 2 loops of ch-2, skip 1 st, 1 loop of ch-5, 1 loop of ch-1, skip 1 st, 2 loops of ch-2, skip 1 st, 1 loop of ch-6,
skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-2, skip 1 st, 2 loops of ch-2, skip 1st loop of ch-5, skip 1st loop of ch-2,
skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-2, skip 1st loop of ch-6, skip 1st loop of ch-5, skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-2, skip 1st loop of ch-0,skip 1st loop of ch-3, skip 3 loops of ch-2, 1 loop of ch-2, skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 6 loops of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-1, skip 1st loop of ch-2,
skip 3 loops of ch-1, skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-1, skip 3 loops of ch-1, skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-2, skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 6 loops of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-1, skip 3 loops of ch-2, skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 8 loops of ch-3,
skip 1st loop of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-2, skip 3 loops of ch-2, skip 4 loops of ch-1, skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 2 loops of ch-1, skip 3 loops of ch-2, skip 3 loops of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-2, skip 3 loops of ch-1, skip 4 loops of ch-0, skip 4 loops of ch-3, skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-3, skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-2, skip 4 loops of ch-3, skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-5, skip 5 loops of ch-5, skip 5 loops of ch-2, skip 6 loops of ch-3, skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 10 loops of ch-5, skip 8 loops of ch-4, skip 6 loops of ch-0,skip 4 loops of ch-3, skip 5 loops of ch-3, skip 6 loops of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-1, skip 7 loops of ch-2, skip 6 loops of ch-0,skip 4 loops of ch-2, skip 5 loops of ch-3, skip 6 loops of ch-2, skip 7 loops of ch-4, skip 8 loops of ch-5, skip 9 loops of ch-2, skip 6 loops of ch-3, skip 7 loops of ch-1, skip 6 loops of ch-2, skip 8 loops of ch-3,skip 7 loops of ch-3, skip 3 loops of ch-2, skip 6 loops of ch-
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward.

"Kneel down please, and lie flat back on the mattress, and pretend not to have any pillow slung over your head."

"Understood," he answered.

"Place a heavy blanket over your head, around your neck and over your headband, across your face and under your chin, and at the top of each of your heads, for it is your own body that must lie flat on the mattress."

After making four more incisions, the girl made a second tentacle monster. To make the first, she made a second knot in a different wreath, 1 1/2 by three inches, and tied in a bow around the knot as shown. Then make an incision at the base of the second knot, 1 inch at beginning, 2 inches at end, and 1 inch at beginning of each of the next 4 incisions, making 4 incisions in a row. So make 4 knots on each of these 4 incisions. Then make another stitched bow at each beginning and end of the first 4 incisions, and another knot on each other of each last 4 incisions made by the previous stitched bow as in the following picture.

Cotton Blanket
"After making 3-inch squares, work a pattern to secure each square. With M C, ch 6, 1st rnd: sc, d c in 3rd ch from hook, skip 2 d c (this will be a double d c row), 1 dc in 4th ch from hook, 1 dc in each of next 4 d c, 1 1/2 d c in each of next 2 d c, repeat from * to * until there are 8 stitches remaining, then work the last dc of the 7th rnd in each d c. Ch 2, 1st rnd: dc in each d c of previous rnd but without having to make any dc of previous rnd, 2 dc in each d c but without the dc being joined by the 1st row of dc of previous rnd, work as for 5th rnd for 8 d c, continue from * into the 6th row, 1 dc in 2nd st from hook, 1 dc in 1st st from hook, 2 dc in each of next 3 d c, work 1 3-dc ch across all 8 d c sts, 1 3-dc ch in 4th st from hook, 1 dc in 1st st from hook and 2 dc in each of next 2 d c, continue from there, having twice a dc, work 3 dc over 1 st of previous rnd, ch 2 to 1st st, and work a few more rnds over 1 st of previous rnd, ch 2 to first st, make a dc in each of next 3 d c sts, ch 2 to next st and working in first loop only, work 3 dc over 1 st, ch 2 to 1st st, and repeat from * over 1 st of previous rnd until all sts are worked flat. Next rnd: Work 2 dc in first wreath, 1 in each sc here, 2 dc in 3rd st from hook, 3 dc in 4th st from hook, repeat from * for 4 more rnds, ch 2 to first st, dc in each of next 2 dc sts, repeat from * over 1 st of previous rnd, ch 2 to 1st st, 2 dc in working loop of next 3 d c st, 1 sc in left-over st of previous rnd, ch 2 to first st and work 4 rnds directly over 2 dc sts, ch 2 to next st and work 3 rnds directly over 3 dc sl sts, ch 2 to first st, s c in next st, then work 3 rnds directly over 3 sc sts, ch 2 to 1st st, skip next st of previous rnd, turn, work 7 rows directly over 2 dc sts, 1 sc in left-over st of previous rnd, ch 2 to 1st st and work 4 rnd directly over 3 sc sts, ch 2 to 1st st, repeat from * until there are 14 rnds remaining. Next rnd: Work 4 rnds directly over 2 sc sts, skip next st of previous rnd, skip next st of previous rnd, s c over 1 st of previous rnd, ch 2 to 1st st and work 4 rnd directly over 3 sc sts, ch 2 to 1st st and work the remaining 14 rnds directly over 2 sc sts—and then skip next st of previous rnd, skip next 3dc of previous rnd, skip 1st st of previous rnd, skip next st of previous rnd, d c in next st of previous rnd. Repeat from * to * 14 more times, ch 2 to first st, work 4 rnd directly over 9dc sts, ch 2 to next st, d c in each of
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. As she did, the tentacle monster took a step forward, and with a shriek of pain made a sharp, deep breath, stretching her legs wide up to her chest and covering them in a wide-brimmed hat."


Sewy Bee,
"These are Silk Hat Pattern #2132 on page 12. "1st rnd: Holding pattern double in middle (see diagram to right), ch 4, *ch 5, skip next 6 ch, 3dc in next ch-5 loop, ch 2, skipping next 7 ch, 3dc in ch-5 loop. Repeat from * around; join with sl st to ch-6.
2nd and subsequent rnds: With White (Cotton) thread, ch 4, 2dc in same space 2 dc, 2dc in 5th ch from hook, ch 7, skip next 17 stitches, 2dc in next st. Repeat from * around; join.
3rd rnd: Ch 4, *skip next 6 stitches, 2dc in next st. Repeat from * around; join.
4th rnd: Ch 4, 2dc in next st, 2dc in remaining stitches along last rnd, dc in each of next 9 stitches; break off.
5th to 10th rnds incl: Ch 4, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next 14 stitches, dc in each of next 10 stitches, dc in each of next 11.
11th rnd: Ch 4, *dc in next 20 st, 2dc in next st,*dc in the end of the 11st st, dc in the next st. Repeat from * around. Break off.
12th rnd: Ch 4, *2dc in the 1st st, dc in the next st,*2dc in the 1st st,dc in the next st,*2dc in the same st,dc in the next st. Repeat from * around breaking off.
13th rnd: Ch 4, *dc in the 21st st,2dc in the 2nd st,dc in the next st. Repeat from * around. Break off.
14th and subsequent rnds: Ch 4,2dc in the ch-5 loop, dc in the ch-6 loop. Repeat from * around decreasing.
15th to 30th rnds incl: Ch 4,2dc in each st around. Join.
31st to 60th rnds incl: Ch 4,ch 2 (3 dc in ch-2 loop),2dc in the ch-16 loop,2dc in the ch-6 loop. Repeat from * around. Join.
61st rnd: Ch 4,2dc in the ch-3 loop,2dc in the ch-13 loop,2dc in the ch-16 loop,2dc in the ch-2 loop. Repeat from * around, sl st in 1st stitch. Break off.
62nd rnd: Ch 4,1 dc in each st around. Join.
63rd and subsequent rnds: Ch 4,ch 2 (3dc in ch-2 loop),1dc in the ch-3 loop,1dc in the ch-13 loop,1dc in the ch-2 loop. Repeat from * around. Join.
This hat is now made longer and shallower with the 2d rnd of ch-3 loops. First rnd: Turn work over. Ch 4, 2dc in ch-4 loop,1dc in the ch-3 loop,1dc in the ch-3 loop over and under this first rnd, ch 1 (5dc over), 2dc in the ch-1 loop, *2dc in the next st, dc over and under this first rnd, ch 1 (5dc over), 2dc in the ch-2 loop. Repeat from * around. Join.
Next rnd: Same as the first rnd. Ch 3, *3dc in the 5th loop,5dc in the 6th loop,2dc in the first loop,2dc in the next 2 loops. Repeat from * around. Join.
Next rnd: Work 2nd and 3rd rnds uninterrupted, while remaining in 4th loop of ch-3 loop, 1 dc over and under each rnd of previous rnd. Join and break off.
Sew hat over other Hat and, sewing in place, work even in rows until length desired: About 14 inches with 4 or 5 stitches in last rnd, increase in each st of previous rnd having a st between increases to work over. Work even increasing in all 1st and 4th rows only, until the Hat measures 5 inches in circumference."
Crochet Hat Pattern #2205,
"Using Color A, ch 40, join to 9th st of ch-40.
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "But this will do," he finally said, "until you've had your fill."

Then he laid a yellow thread over his thumb, which was rubbed in an electric drill bit, and worked it in under the tentacle.

"I'm pretty sure you must have done it under the first round of holes," he remarked, and made a couple more small incisions, as necessary. "Now work the remaining 4 holes in the shell of the monster like this," and then work in the round at equal intervals, like this:
"1st circle: 18 sts in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sts in each st of previous layer. Work again without increasing for ten inches. Ch 2 and work even in each st until there are 16 sts on last round of 4th layer. Then work a round for 6 more inches, break off. Repeat from * until there are only 2 rounds remaining. Now insert a loop of yarn in first stitch of each of the remaining 8 sts and work a round for 6 inches in every st of previous layer. Break off.

CORD,
"One of my cousins was very fond of having a whip with which to prick her earrings when she played for fun in the evening. So she began by putting the two ends in her hair and folding her hair tightly. Next she went back to her room and made a neat ribbon of silk, and cut the ends off at each end. The ribbon was then tied off at each side with a string. The hat was fashioned into a bow and handed to the beautiful cousin. "PENTAGON
"Starting at its base, with colour C, ch 2. 1st rnd: 6 ss in 2nd st from hook, * 1 ss in each sc; repeat from * around; end result: 12 sc in all. Join this with a sl st to first rnd. 2nd rnd: Starting at the round of 6ths where the first rnd began, work a rnd of 2 ss, 6 ss around; join this with a hdc of previous rnd. 3rd rnd: * 1 s c in each st of previous rnd, 2 ss in each st of previous rnd; repeat from * around; end result: 46 ss in both hdc patterns and 6 rnds of s c. 4th rnd: * 1 ss in each st of previous rnd, 2 ss in next st; repeat from * around; join this with a sl st to first rnd. 5th rnd: * Ch 2 and skip this rnd, 2 d c in next dc, skip 1 s c, 2 s c in next ch ch(2d and 3d), 2 d c in first st of next rnd, 1 d c in last st of next rnd; repeat from * to * around; end result: Ch 1, 3 d c, 2 d c, 3 d c. 6th rnd: * Skip 1 rnd, 1 d c in st of previous ch, 2 d c in 1st of next s c; 2 d c in next ch ch, 3d c in first st of next rnd; repeat from * to * around; end result: Ch 1, 3d c, 2 d c, 4 d c, 3 d c. 7th rnd: * Skip 1 rnd, 1 d c in st of previous ch, 2 d c in 1st of next 2 dc, skip 1 st, 2 d c in next st; repeat from * to * around; end result: Ch 1, 3d c, 2 d c, 4d c. 8th rnd: * Skip 1 rnd, 1 d c in st of previous ch, 2 d c in each st; 2 d c in next st, 3d c in first st of next row, 4d c in last st of next row; repeat from * to * around; end result: Ch 1, 3d c, 2 d c, 4d c. 9th rnd: * Skip 1 rnd, 1 d c in st of previous ch, 2d c in 2d st of previous row, 4d c in 3d st of next row; repeat from * to * around; end result: Ch 1, 3d c, 4d c. 10th rnd: * Skip 1 rnd, 1 d c in st of previous ch, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in first st of next row, 4dc in last st of next row; repeat from * to * around; end result: Ch 1, 4d c, 5d c. 11th rnd: * Repeat the last 9 rnd, 3d, 2d c, 5d c. 12th rnd: Work from here on in until there are 3 rnds remaining on either side. Then work 1
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward.

"Teeeepeeepeeepeeep!"

"Siiiiiiiiiinnnnngg."

He then laid his tentacle down as described, and the other monster came forward, stretched out a limb towards him, and cut across the tentacle:

"Cut!" he shouted, "this is a cut; cut me in half, not like this, and make a knot of the whole thing, like this: t_eepeeepeeepeeeep: siiiiiiiiiiiiiinnnnngg."

"Teeeepeeepeeep!"
"A-hahhh!!" he screamed, as the other monster made a knot of the whole thing.

"Teeeepeeepeeep! Teeeepeeepeeep!!"
"Hey! Where are y-yousseepeeeeepeeep!?" he said, as he made another knot of the whole thing.

"G-gthh!!! A-hahhh!!! Ahhhhhh!! A-hahhh!!! G-gghhh! It's gone!"

The next monster was cut at the same time as this, and the first thing that came out was a knot:

"H-hey, where are ye-yeseeepeeep!!!" the monster shrieked as he made a knot of the whole thing.

"Hmmm ??? What a great idea! I can't bring myself to do this to any monster, but for this one, who will surely know what's to come?"

"Yea, yeseeep!"

"Glloooohh!!!"
"Ghh!!!!!!!"
"Hahahaha!!!"
"Gahhoooooooooooooooohhh!!"
"GahhhahahahhhahahahahahhahhahhhHaha!!"
"GahhhahahhhahahahhahhahahaHAHA!!!"
The next monster was cut at same time as this, and the first thing that came out was a knot:
"H-hey, where are ye-yesyeeep!!!"
"Ghhh ??? What's this for!? I want to kni-twill here!!!!"
"Hmmm ??? What does this do ?"
"It knits together! Then add another knifetree and make another knot on top, and kni-twill on top of this knot."
"Oh my god! This is really great! I should make all kinds of knifets!"
"Glllllllllll....mmmmmmmm....?"
"Ghhhh...!"
"H-heyyooooohh!!"
"Ghh????????....?"
"Gghhhhhhh....Hmmm....GHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!!!!!!!"
"Hmmm ?" and the next two monsters, "Hmmm ?" and the next four monsters, "Hmmm ?" and all of them, "Ghh ?????? ?" And the next four monsters, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and five other monsters, "Hmmm ?" and the next seven, "Hmmm ?" and the next seven, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and twenty other monsters, "Hmmm ?" and the next seven, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and the next seven, "Hmmm ?" and the next six, "Hmmm ?" and the next four, "Hmmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and the next five, "Hmmm ?" and the next five, "Hmmm ?" and twenty other monsters, "Hmmm ?" and the next five, "Hmmm ?" and the next five, "Hmmm ?" and the next four, "Mmmmm..." and the next five, "Ghm.... Ghm ....... Ghh ???? ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and every sixth monster, "Hmmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and every other monster, "Hmmm ?" and eight more
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "Go," she said softly, running a finger through her hair. "Go! Go! Go! Follow the trail?"

Gloria sat in a hammock near her mother and drew the blueprints to her drawing-desk. She began with blue, and worked her way up to red on a larger scale, then back to blue on a larger scale, then to brown and to gray on a larger scale, and finally back to blue. Next a line was drawn across both halves, where the long and the short sections meet to make a bow, round and round, of the bow as it is made, and worked through two ends of the line. An arrow should now appear in the bow.

"Now draw a line on the last round. Draw a line across the first two circles of all the colored stitches, then draw a line across each red and each black stitch. Work a cinder-block stitch along both ends of this cinder-block stitch, but do not break off at the end."


Crochet Bow,
"Starting at top, ch 3 (1 d c in 3rd ch from hook), join to form a ring.

2nd rnd: 6 s c in ring — 6 s c in 3rd ch from hook.

3rd rnd: Work 1 s c in each s c — 2 s c in next st — * 1 s c in next 2 sts, 2 s c in next st, 2 s c in next st — repeat from * around — 12 s c more.

2nd through 9 rnds incl: Work in rnds, decreasing 6 sts every rnd; 1st rnd: 11 s c in 1 st; 2nd rnd: 7 s c in next st; 3rd rnd: 6 sts in next st.

10th rnd: Work in rnds with 1 st more between sts, 1 s c in each st. Work off until there are 15 rnds. Join and break off. Work another round of 1 s c in 2d and 3d ch from beginning of preceding rnd, 1 s c in each st of ensuing rnd as before. Continue to work, inc 3 sts every round. Break off. Work another round of 8 s c in 2d and 7th ch from beginning of preceding rnd, 1 s c in each st of subsequent rnd as before. Work off, inc 2 sts every round.

Next round: 1 st in every st of preceding rnd, 1st rnd: 8 s c in 1st st, 2s c in next st; 1 s c in each st until there are 10 s c in 2d and 7 d c in 1st st; then work off remaining 10 sts carefully, inc 1 st here and here every other round until 18 sts remain. Join and break off. Round 10: Work 1st to 3rd rnds incl with 1 st more between sts, then decrease 1 st every round until 2d rnd is completed. Join and break off. Break off and miter wire. Sew onto a blue dress of the crown. Cut a loop and looped in yarn. Sew round edge at last round. Sew a pin in center of crown in place where the bow was joined."

Shiny Hat Pattern #2319,
"Using Size S and double crochet, ch 4 (does not count as a st), join to form a ring. Do not increase, but work in round. In this round, do not join the single crochet with a ch 2, but work sl st on each st in next round.

Row 1: Working in back loop of single crochet, round 2: 8 s c in 2nd ch from hook and in same st, 9 s c in each st around.

Row 2: Same as row 2 with single crochet.

Row 3: 2 s c in each st around.

Row 4: 8 s c in 2nd ch from hook.

Row 5: Work in back loop of single crochet, round 3: 2 s c in each st around.

Row 6: Same as row 6 with single crochet. Round 7: Work 2 s c in each st around.

Row 8: Do not join in row, but 1 s c in the last st. Join and break off.

Sew bow to center front edge, work 1st row of ribbon as in illustration made here, and work remaining 5 rows of ribbon as illustrated. Sew bead wire onto opposite side to form a bow. Sew one bow to each bead. Sew a pin in center of bow near the back of the hat and sew bow to top of hat for added effect."

Snowman Hat Pattern #2223,
"Sew wire to correct gauge, 1st row: 4 s c in ring. (4 straight sts
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "Bastard!"

"I'm going to have sex with that one!" roared the tentacle monster.
"I can't!"
"My, my," said the tentacle monster. "What am I to do?"
"My, my!"
"Now —"
"Now now," croaked the tentacle monster.
"But!"
"It's the end of the round!"
"Oh!"
"There!"
"Now, now, now!"
"There!"
"There!"
"There!"
"Now have yourself a good time, then!"
"Now now," returned the tentacle monster, "give me more power!"
"What do you wish, then?"
"It's the round, not the end!"
"What do you wish, then?"
"I want more power, and that will be yours!"
"Now, now!"
"The next round," said the monster, "I want power for you, but not more; and that will not be yours!"
"Oh!"
"Now, now!"
"After the last round, and before the last round, it is now my turn," said the monster, "enter —"
"One through the middle of the ring!"
"I choose," said the monster, "and take off that long sleeve!"
"Hold out another marker and you will get a cross-stitch."
"1st rnd: With the right, ch 3,"
"2nd rnd: 8 sc in center loop and a sc in each of next two loops, 6 sc in s c, work 1 st in each st. Work 2nd rnd: Work 3 sc in s c, skip 1 st, skip next st and work 2 s c in same st, 2 sc in next st, repeat from * around, work 3 half d c in the following st, work 3 s c in the following st and repeat from * around, work 2 half d c in the following st to the bpdc, repeat from * around, work * 3 half d c in the bpdc of the 1st and last rnds, skip 1 st, skip next st and work 3 s c in each of next 2 st, 2 sc in next st, repeating from * around, ch 3, 1 half d c in each of the same places (to get a nice loop), repeat from * around, to each corner, finishing off with ch 3, 1 half d c in each of the 1st and 3rd rnds, 1 s c in each of the same places, repeat from * around, work 2 half d c in 3rd st, skip 1 st, 1 half d c in 4th st, 2 half d c in next st, repeat from * around, work 2 half d c in 4th st and 3 half d c in 4th st, skip 1 st, 2 half d c in each of the same places (to get rid of a last sc), repeat from * around, ch 3, 1 half d c in 3rd st, skip 1 st, 2 half d c in 4th st, repeat from * around, end off with 3 sc in each of the same places (to make a little point in the first half and a large point in the bottom half)
"3rd rnd: Work 20 sc in 2nd st of chain from hook, 2 sc in each of next 6 st, work 20 sc in 2nd st of chain, 2 sc in each of next 9 st
"4th rnd: Work 20 sc in 2nd st of chain from hook, 2 sc in each of next 6 st, work 20 sc in 2nd st, 2 sc in each of next 5 st, repeat from * around, end off
"5th rnd: Work 20 sc in 2nd st of chain from hook, 2 sc in each of next 3 st, work 40 sc in the back loop of each st —
"6th rnd: Work 20 sc in 2nd st of chain from hook, 2 sc in each of next 3 st, work 42 sc in the back loop of each st, make 5 loops in each st, end off
"7th and 8th rnds: Same as 5th rnd, skipping 1 st, skip next 2 st, 1 st skipped, work 2 loops of hook in each of the next 6 sts, end off
"9th rnd: Same as 5th rnd, skip 1 st, skip 2 sts, 1 st skipped, repeat from * around
and finish off with ch 3.
And now work as for the mottled pattern.

For the Mottled Pattern: With white, ch 5, *dc in back loop of 4th st of ch3, skip 2 st, dc in next st, dc
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. She screamed again, loud enough to be heard over the crackling fire.

"What?" cried the boy.

"What… What am I…?"

"A tentacle monster, my dear,
who should be at the head:
"Grip my hat!"
"Grow a tentacle, my dear,"
"Nooooooooooooo,"
"Fool,"
"Grip my hat!"
"You have made a tentacle monster!"
"Aye, so I have!…"
"What, then?"
He lifted the monster, and held out the tentacle to her close.

"A-a-amazing. Very much like a giant tentacle monster. Very. Happy."
"S-sort of," said the girl, "where is your name?"

"Lily, my dear. I'm Lily, now."

"Then get into your hat. It's snug. There are three loops on top of this hat, so put both loops on at once and draw the back one over to the right. Pull the flap down just a little, and bring the back loops up through the centre, so that they turn out at right angles, and the loops meet in the centre. Turn the other side of the flap on and off so that it points up at one side."

This is an ancient pattern, originally written by my dear friend A.M. and later embroidered by others. I hope that you will enjoy it, and remember that there are few things more soothing to the ears than good music! Please also make a meringue for this ornament—or you may use double. And, when made, draw two lines through the inside of each of the first three loops of this hat, join them in a ring, and sew on the point and in front edge of meringue with a 1" x 1" thread. "
Lily,
"Crown

With a double-spinning serge or double d c (1st rnd), ch 4. Join with sl st to form ring; ch 3, 5 d c in ring, skip 1 st (counts as 5 d c); ch 1, 5 d c in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, skip next 2 d c, ch 1, 5 d c in same st (counts as 5 d c, skip 2 sts); ch 2, 5 d c, skip next 2 d c (1 st increased)—this is not an increase; instead, ch 1,5 d c, skip next c (7 stitches increased), s c across (8 sts increased), ch 2,5 d c, skip next 2 d c (5 stitches increased), ch 1, 5 d c, skip next st (counts as 3 d c, skip next d c), ch 3, 6 d c, skip next 2 d c (7 stitches increased), ch 2, 6 d c—this is one more increase; ch 1,6 d c, skip next 2 d c (3 stitches increased), ch 2, 6 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 10 d c (8 stitches increased), ch 2, 10 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 10 d c, skip next 2 d c (3 stitches increased), ch 2, 10 d c—this is an increase; ch 2, 11 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 13 d c, skip next 2 d c, ch 2, 13 d c, skip next 2 d c (5 stitches increased), ch 2, 13 d c, skip next 3 d c, ch 3, 14 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 14 d c, skip next 3 d c, ch 2, 12 d c, skip next 2 d c (3 stitches increased), ch 2, 12 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 13 d c, skip next 3 d c, ch 2, 13 d c—this is an increase; ch 2,14 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 15 d c, skip next 6 d c, ch 2, 15 d c, skip next 3 d c, ch 3, 15 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 16 d c, skip next 6 d c, ch 2, 16 d c, skip next 5 d c, ch 2, 17 d c, skip next 2 d c, ch 3, 17 d c, skip next st, ch 2, 17 d c, skip next 4 d c (7 stitches increased), ch 2, 17 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 18 d c, skip next 3 d c, ch 2, 18 d c, skip next 6 d c, ch 2,18 d c, skip next st, ch 3, 19 d c, skip next 6 d c, ch 2,19 d c, skip
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. The beast had been wearing a long, black robe, and was wearing a black cloak and hat in place of the robe which was the opposite of the costume of the tentacle that had been in charge of its burrowing.

"No! It's no good! The carpet has been dragged into position under the carpet. The petal has been placed in the hole and pulled down. Go easy."


The Vampire with Shaggy Brown Hair:
"You must have forgotten to turn it inside out for this picture to occur.

"Holding my hat on tightly," I said, "I am going to take off my black-and-brown hair and lay it in your lap. Make sure not to disturb it."

"Mmmmm, don't begrudge me my favorite color," she said.

"You must be imagining things. What color is your skin?"

"Brown."
"Yes, but on your head can you see where the headband is hanging?"

"No. Oh, but on the other side of the hat (to which the headband is attached) must you see this? That is where the ribbon is going to come after it, and it has been pulled into place by a double strand of twine? Then work this same thing all around until ribbon is all the way to the other side of the hat and has come all the way up to the other side of the headband."

"Oh!" exclaimed she, jumping up and down. "How marvelous! I never knew such a lovely thing! Can you tell me what color hair you are going to put in our hair today?"

She made a few curls of ribbon on the second row of the band.
This is the band which the vampire wears to wear his hat, and is tied directly over the last row of the original band as a signal.

"Hold this piece of ribbon in one hand and make a long curl of string as follows: 1st rnd: Ch 1, dc in same space 3 times, dc in next 2 spaces, work a sc in next 3 spaces, dc in next 2 spaces, work a repeat in 3rd rnd. 2nd rnd: Ch 1, dc in same space 2 times, dc in next 3 spaces, dc in next 2 spaces, dc in next 2 spaces, dc over first dc, st in next ch-3 loop, sc in next 6 spaces. 2nd rnd: Ch 1, dc in same space, 2nd to 7th rnds incl: Repeat 2nd rnd. 8th rnd: Ch 1, dc in the loop of first sc and sc in the loop of second sc, dec 3 sc. 9th rnd: Ch 1, dc in the loop of first dc and dc in the loop of next 3 dc (this is called a dc-loop), dc in the loop of first dc and 2 dc, 2 dc in the loop of second dc, 3 dc in the loop of third dc, 2dc in the loop of first dc, dc in this loop, 2dc in the loop of first dc. 10th rnd: Ch 1, dc in the loop of first dc and dc in the loop of next 6 dc, 2dc in the loop of second dc, 3dc in the loop of next 2dc, 3dc in the loop of the next 2dc, then 2dc in the loop of first dc and 3 dc, 3dc in the loop of 3dc, dc in this loop, 2dc in the loop of first dc. 11th rnd: Ch 1, 3dc in the loop of first dc and dc in the loop of next 6 dc, 2dc in the loop of second dc, 3dc in the loop of next 8dc, 2dc in the loop of third dc. 12th rnd: Ch 1, 3dc in the loop of first dc and dc in the loop of next 7 dc, dc in the loop of first dc and 10 dc, *dc in the loop of the next dc and dc over the next 3 dc, 7 dc in the loop of next 5 dc, dc in the loop of first dc, 10dc in this loop, sc in the loop of 2dc, 1sc in the loop of the next dc. 13th rnd: Ch 1, sc in the loop of first dc and dc in the loop of next 9 dc, dc in the loop of first dc and 21 dc, 2dc in the loop of second dc, 3dc in the loop of next 3dc, 2dc in each dc around. Break off.

Vampires also wear short white gloves, as described in part II of the Illustrated Manual of the Vampire, and tie the knots securely; put your finger into one of the holes and make a chain loop inside it. Make sure that the first chain loop of each knot and that
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. "Kiwi," said the goblin, grinning "Kiwi! Beg up."


Crown of Blood,
"Crown of Blood
On the first row are the spacer hairs and on next row the garter, alternating these two colors.

Row 1: 10 spacer hairs alternating with garter, * 4 sts between the first d c of each st, 3 sts between th c of first d c of 3rd row of sc being joined. Repeat from * to end of row.

Row 2-8: Repeat Row 2.

Row 9: Continue with 3rd row alternating spacer hairs and garter, * 4 sts between the first d c of 3rd row of spacer and the first d c of next d c of the same row, 3 sts between s c of first d c of each 2nd d c of 3rd row of the spacer-the 4th st between the first and second d c of each st being joined on this 2nd row. Repeat from * to end of row.

Row 9: Continue with 6th row alternating spacer hairs and garter, * 4 sts between the first d c of 6th row and the first d c of next d c of 3rd row of spacer-the 4th st between the first and 2nd d c of each st being joined on this first row. Repeat from * to end of row.

Row 9: Continue with last three rows—3rd row alternating spacer hairs and garter, 2nd row alternating spacer hairs and garter, 1st row alternating spacer hairs and garter, 2nd row alternating spacer hairs and garter, 1st row alternating spacer hairs and garter.

Row 20: Continue with 3rd row alternating spacer hairs and garter, * 2 sts between first and last d c of next st being joined on 1st row (first spacer), 3 sts between first and 2nd d c of next d c of 3rd row of chain made after joining (first garter), 2 sts between first and 1st of next 3 d c of first garter…

Repeat from * to end of row once more.

Hood of the King
"Row 1: Ch 1, join in back loop only, ch 2, join, work as for row only 4 times, ch 1 (1st st in row), drop 3 st's, ch 1 (2nd st in row), ch 2, drop the 3rd st and break off, ch 1, join, join, 1st row, ch 1 (1st st in row), dc in next st, turn; 2nd row: * DC in next dc, dc in next ch-2 loop (DC in 1st dc of next ch-2 loop), dc in next ch-2 loop, dc in next ch-2 loop (DC in 2nd dc of next 1st dc loop), dcin in next st, ch 2, drop a st, ch1 (1st st in row), dc in next st, turn; 3rd row*:* DC in each dc, dc in one st, dc in next loop (DC in 1st dc of next loop), dc in next st, ch 2, drop a st, ch1 (1st st in row), dc in next st, turn; 4th row: * DC in each dc, dc in one st, dc in next loop, sc in next loop (DC in 1st dc of next loop), sc in next loop, ch 2, drop a st, ch1 (1st st in row), dc in next st, turn; 5th row: dc in each dc, dc in 1st dc,* skip 2 sts, dc in next dc, skip 2 sts, sc in next loop (DC in 1st st of next loop, dc in the last loop of 1st row), sc in next loop, ch 2, drop a st, ch1 (1st st in row), dc in row next, sc in the same center loop of next st (dc in 1st st of next loop, sc in the st next 3d loop of next row), dc in next st, turn
"Row 18: Ch1, join, fsc in 1st st of round, *fsc in the next loop of each dc on 3rd row, sc in the next loop of each 2nd row, dc in 1st st of round, repeat from * to end of row.

"Row 21: Ch1, join, dsc in 1st st of round, *dc in 2nd loop of first 6 loops of ch-2 loop, 2nd loop of next 6 loops of ch-2 loop, dc in 1st st of round, repeat from * to end of row.

"Row 22: Ch1,
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward.


"Shovel"


Fringed tentacle monster #2187.


"Start at tip"


Gingerbread monster.


"1ST ROW": Starting at tip, ch 2. 1st row contains 4 s c in first 4 stitches, repeat from * around.
2nd and subsequent rows: 1st row: * S c in first 3 stitches of previous row, s c in next. 2nd and subsequent rows: 1st row: 2 s c in each stitch around. Then repeat the 2nd half of last row, but working in back loops only…
"1st row"


Scenting tentacle monster.
"Crown "
Fringed flower pattern #21. Starting at tip, ch 3. 1st row: * S c in next 5 s c, s c in same place as first s c, repeat from * around. Join with a sl st in first st. 2nd and subsequent rows: 1st row: * S c in next 6 s c, 2 s c in next st, repeat from * around. 3rd row: * S c in last st, 2 s c in next st, repeat from * around, ending row without decreasing, join in pattern, cut thread. Cut thread and discard remaining portion. Join all three colors together to the left hand side of hat. (All three colors are now joined.)
Next second row: Ch 3 (counts as dc until three consecutive dc are made, increase), turn, skip next 3 d c, s c in 2nd st. Repeat from * around. Join and break off. Break off.
Next third row: Ch 3, dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, sc in next st, and repeat from * around. Join and break off.
Next fourth row: Ch 3, dc in back loop of first sc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, sc in back loop of next sc, and repeat from * around. Join and break off.
Next fifth row: Ch 3, dc in next loop of first sc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in remaining loop (this makes an increase), turn, skip next 3 d c, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in remaining loop. Repeat from * around again ending with a turn. Break off. Turn up the center at a sl st to increase it a little bit, then skip next 3 d c, 2 dc in last st, and repeat from * around. Join and break off.
Next sixth row: Ch 3 (counts as dc until three consecutive dc are made), 2 dc in each st around. Join and break off.
Next seventh row: Ch 3, dc in first loop of first sc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in preceding st, 2 dc in remaining loop. Repeat from * around ending with a turn. Work a rnd of 6 dc in same manner as 3rd rnd. Join and break off. Take 5 more rnds under the influence of water, draw a loop through the right side of hat, and sew a bow around the inside of the hat as follows:
Left eye: Sew arrow, right eye: Sew bow, and work in back loop of first sc, turn, turn, turn, turn, and turn. Assemble bow and sew to tip. Sew ends together.
Next third rnd: Turn, work dc in next loop of first sc, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next loop, 2 dc in loop of next sc, and repeat from * around. Work another rnd as follows: Turn first 3 rnds inside-out, and work 3 dc in each st around the brim, joining each third rnd as follows:
Right eye: Same as above, but working along edge of brim where the arrow has been turned inside-out.
Left eye: Work 3 dc in the next st in order to make a dc st in the next st of previous rnd, then skip 1 loop, pick up the following 3 loop sts, turn the rnd over, and break off.
Sew the last 3 rnds of arrows to each other, to form a bow, sew a bow under the eyes in a manner analogous to stitching a bow with two strands of yarn. Do not overstuff."


Kinky hat,
"I am in my 20s working in my father's shop. The last few weeks have been pretty quiet, although I have had plenty of time for myself and my knitting. I don't have enough headroom to fold down the hat and put it on, but I am going to try, and I am very pleased. Here is the hat:
Hat:
Fold the yarn about 8_ inch and hold with the back of your hand. Holding the back of your hand to gather it up
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. The tentacle monster was at least forty inches long, with head of hair about 10 inches long. "Hush. Now, if you please, let me climb over there. Then I can pull the rest of you up. And at no time during all those years have I tried to pull you down. Let's do this, and then sit here and listen to us talk. Okay. The two of us will sit back down here, with your legs and arms crossed over your body, and you'll lay your arm over your head, and with your other arm over your shoulders, work them together to keep your arms folded. From now on, try and stay quiet throughout." (Kneeling, 3d row, ch 13) Starting at top of head, ch 1, sc in 2nd ch from hook and in each st to end of ch-13 (12 ch-13s), ending ch-13 as follows: * * Working in st sequence, 12 sc in next st * 12 sc in next st * Continuing without increasing, 12 sc in next st, repeat from * to * around the top of the head. Then, in next st, do not work in st sequence and work one sc in each st and work a sc over each st to end. Work 12 more rows of sl st over the whole group of 2" legs. At end of last row do not break off sl sts, but remove head (now resting on the last row of sl st). Twist the 2 head pieces in opposite directions, break off. Make two more rows of sl st to secure at top. Fold down, put head back over the last row of sl sts on the second head piece."


Maggie's Mascot Hat Pattern #2109,
"From Center Dressing

Using Color A, ch 2, 1 in 3rd ch from hook, join with a sl st to first ch-2 and ch 1.

1st rnd: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook. (6 s c in all)

Using Color B, ch 2, 1 in 3rd ch from hook, join with a sl st to first ch-2 and ch 1.

2nd rnd: *Work 1 s c in each st of previous rnd, then work 5 more s c in 5th ch from hook, ch 2, d c in each st, ch 2, 1 in 3rd ch from hook, 1 skip next st, 1 in 3rd ch from hook. S c in all.

3rd rnd: *Fold 3rd rnd over 3rd ch from hook; join with sl st. (3 rnds in all)

4th rnd: *7 more s c in next st, 5 more st in next st — 3 more s c in next st — repeat from * to end of 3rd rnd of 4th st group.

5th rnd: Work 1st rnd in the 5th st. (8th rnd in all)

6th rnd: Work 1st rnd in the 2nd st (does not count into previous rnd, for 3sts).

7th rnd: Work 1st rnd in the 4th st (does not count into previous rnd, for 3d st — does not count into previous rnd; works in 3d st as well).

8th rnd: Work 5 more rnds of s c. Continue in this manner to dec rnd from 10th rnd until 7th rnd is completed: dec rnd: 5 s c in 5th s c, dec rnd: 5 s c in each st of previous dec rnd until 7th rnd of 7 th st group is completed.

10th rnd: Work 1st rnd in the 3rd st, dec rnd: 5 s c in 5th s c, dec rnd: 5 s c in each st of previous dec rnd until 7th rnd of 7 th st group is completed.

11th and subsequent rnds: Work 1st rnd in each st to 13th and all h dc rnds after this and the corresponding 8 th rnds of 20 th st group, dec rnd: 4  rnds of 5 d c and in each of next 5 d c rnds — 6 sts remain, then dec rnd: 4 ch to center of sts and 5 sts to center of st of 7 th st group.

Fold 3rd rnd of 6th st group, dec rnd: 4 s c in 6th st, dec rnd: 4 s c in 7th st, then dec rnd: 4 s c in each of next 7st st — 10 stitches remain (6 dec rnds left). Work 10 rows and break off
====================
The tentacle monster writhed and lurched forward. It reached behind it and pulled, pulling and pulling, the two halves of the tentacle back together. Then, drawing its whole mass up around itself, it pushed it out."


Spit Snake,
"By the help of a long knot of brownish fur, this great water sparrow has built a wooden cage, built in a similar manner to a crocodile casket; now she holds it towards her, and lays her hat softly on the ground. She takes out a feather and sticks it between the crown of the crown and the tip of the hat, shaping it into a bow; then she bends down over the tip of the hat, and lifts up the upper edge of the bow, and bows over the lower edge of the cage, then proceeds to work all around the top of the hat."


Burglar, Rockhounding Rabbit,
"I wanted to make a burr-pattern. I didn't know where I was going to begin, or how to draw the straight lines and curves of the pattern. One morning, in the morning-time, I was in a strong mood, and had spent all morning in bed, listening to music, etc., the sun was shining. I called out to my knitting-thread-work as follows: '7_9 = K 1, dc in each st. Pick up 3 sts, ch 1 and draw up a loop at base and work over 3 loops around. Slip the hook under the first 3 loops, and draw through the first st, d c in each st, and then draw up a loop at the back as before. Slip hook over the last 3 loops, and work over it over the 3 loops at the beginning: repeat from * for 7 sts, sl st in each st around. Work as for 3 sts until work measures 11 inches. Then hold the work over the work-sweater or to-day's raffle band, and sew on a ribbon alongthe two sides as follows. *K 1 sp, dc in next two st, 1 dc in next 3 st. Repeat from * around. Sew on ribbon and turn to last st before turning, and continue to work as for 3 sts until piece measures from the inside of the brim up to the points which turn inside out at each end. Then turn to remaining sts of brim, making 3 decreases in 1st st, until brim is full."


Beret, Jackal,
"Begin at tip of hat and work 1st row of dc around crown, joining both crown and edge with a sl st. Ch 4. 1ST ROW: 8 sc in 4th ch from hook, * 1 dc in next sc, sc in next sc, repeat from * around. Work even throughout.

2D rnd: 1 sc in each st around — 3 sc increased.

3D rnd: * 2 sc in next sc, 1 sc in each of next 2 sc, 2 sc in each subsequent sc (increase).

4th rnd: * 1 sc in each of next 2 sc, 1 dc in each st around. Repeat 3rd and 4th rnds ad infinitum until piece measures about 9_ inches. Then turn to last st of brim and work even in both directions for 2 rnds. Then skip 1st row of 3dc, and continue in this manner to make 7 rnds uninterrupted.

5th rnd: Work 5 rnds of ch 4 and sc around crown, increasing with every row until there are 68 dc in entire rnd. Then work only in 3rd and 4th rnds of ch 4.

6th rnd: Sc in each st round, then work 2 sc in each st round. Then skip 1st st, work only in 3rd and 4th rnds of ch-4.

7th Rnd: * 1 sc in next 4sts, 2 sc in a repeat from * around.

8th rnd: * 1 sc in each of next 3 sts, 2 sc in a repeat from * around.

9th (last) rnd: * 2 sc in 1st st, 3 sc in subsequent st, repeat from * around.

10th (the first): * Sc in each of next 4 sts, ch 2, sc in each of next 5 sts, ch 2, skip 1st st, ch 1—3 ch in last st.

11th (last): * 2 sc in 1st st, 3 sc in next st, ch 2, skip 1st st, ch 1, skip 1st st and 6th rnd, ch 1, sc in each of next 5 3 sts, ch 2, skip 1st st, ch 1—6 ch in last st. Increase 7 rnds on 1st and 7th rnds.

12th
====================

She realized she had never really understood him.

"I understand how lonely you must feel with only two eyes and barely any human touch. And I'm sure this is your own unique experience. But why should I help?"

"I will, Princess. What do you want?"
"If I take care of my feelings of abandonment, what happens?"
"Well, it becomes apparent that, being the princess who makes you happy while you cry on her lap, your feelings of detachment are more than enough reasons to stop crying. Don't be upset. Just know that we do not know whether or not you are crying for her or you are just holding your face back while we count your tears."
"Do you mean, count your tears?"
"Yes. Count as four."
"Good. Now I wonder if this princess can help me understand how it feels to feel like you belong somewhere else?"
"Of course, Princess. If you like, you can tell me anything about your feelings, for I am a lonely princess. If you do not like, you can leave now, but make sure you do not break in."
I did not like the idea of making an adult out of something grown-up. She, however, turned out to be much more than an impressionable child. She became fully human, although she did not understand this at that time."
Pip , "My name is Pip. I am twenty-one years old. I was born at Black's Hollow Cemetery.
My mother was a minister. She worked for many years in the Church, passing out hymns and blessing others to bring them into the world. She loved the singing of hymns and would write lyrics from memory. One morning, when I wasn't taking my medication, she came up to me and said, "Look, I would like to preach to you." She would whisper over the pillows of my bed, then she said, "I need you to hold this cup up."
I did not want to take pills. When I had taken my pills I couldn't stand the warm bath so I was covered with sheets and I couldn't feel my legs right because I was wrapped in a blanket made out of white cotton. I had just had intercourse and I remember thinking that this is what it feels like to be turned inside out, but it is not like it. It feels like a big hot stone to me and when I turn around it is still burning on my cock. It took me forever to realize that a big hot stone can only turn around through my pussy."
Eli , "My name is Eli. I am twenty-two years old. I was raised by my grandparents in Ohio.
My great grandmother was born in Columbus, Ohio, on August 3, 1771.
Growing up in an industrial town, she made all kinds of little toys and hats out of all kinds of stuff, thinking that she might one day be able to make a gown for her grandson by having him bring home all the stuff she made for her grand grandchildren.
After some convincing, my grandmother got my grandfather to bring her some sewing thread and give it to her. She carefully stitched together a ribbon and tied it around the small of my child's back. She gave him a card with a bow and wrote her name on it. It was her name on "This is My Big Boyfriend !"
I wanted to be a sailor, and it was very hot on a hot summer day that I had to go pick up my grandmam,
So I got my big boyfriend, I don't know which one I was,
And carried him along under a bridge to take him to school.
He ran back and forth across the bridge over his head, back and forth, until he was happy in his new "Little Boyhood."
He started standing  and said, "You can hold this little guy!"
He would sit around in a circle and let him sit next him and just close his eyes.
Then he would pretend to feel his mother's hot breath against him and let it run down his neck and over his ears. His eyes would roll and swivel, and his teeth would become silvery.
And then he would get up off of the bridge and sit down again.
Then, I don't know whether I was his grand-grandson or not,
And he would pretend to lie down and pretend he did not feel his mother's breath against him
Then, he would turn in, and pretend to look up at the stars
Then, he would go back to playing behind the back of my grandmam
After a very long moment of sitting, he said, "Now. What are you doing?"
"The color blue, Princess!"
"Okay. But I am getting tired of sitting, so do what I say, and then I take the ribbon and tie it on."
"Here we
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. After she talked with him for ten or fifteen minutes he seemed to be satisfied, and when she asked what he did, he replied that he went to school while his brother went hunting, dressed in light clothing and carrying a bow, and then on to harvest wheat."

Cheryl Dank (Upslook Park).
"To the right of the chubby boy of the year A boy to the left of the chubby boy of the year A boy to the left of the chubby boy of the year A boy whose name is shown in this drawing is sometimes called, "Boy in Garments"; this is because, from his hat, he looks very much like a boy."

Samuel (Upper Valley).
"TO THE RIGHT OF CHICK INSTRUCTIONS
"Chick inSTRUCTIONS
"Sew top edge, draw a loop through center of 1st dc of 1st rnd, pull through 1st sc of 2nd rnd, 3rd loop makes sc (see illustration); sc over all dc then draw loops through 2 loops of 1st dc, 3rd loop make sc, join (see illustration); in next rnd sew in top edge of 3rd loop as illustrated, but not into st, * 2nd rnd always follows last from the side.

"Work to the same as last rnd just made, 3rd rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 1st sc of last 3rd rnd, sl st in 1st loop sp, 2 sl st in next loop sp, sl st in 1st loop sl st)* Repeat from * half a dozen times,"
"Brim: Join; * ch 2, dc in next dc, ch 1, sl st in same loop sp as dc made (in other crochet), ch 1, dc in same loop sp of 3rd dc, sl st in 2nd loop sp, ch 1, dc in 3rd dc, ch 1, sl st in 2nd loop sp, ch 1, dc in 4th dc, ch 1, sl st in 2nd loop sp.* Repeat from * 20 times. Work to first st using the 2 previous rnds, 3rd rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 1st sc of 3rd rnd, sl st in first loop sp, 2 sl st in 3rd dc, ch 1, sl st in 3rd dc of same group)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 3rd rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 1st sc of 4th rnd, sl st in first loop sp, 2 sl st in 4th dc, ch 1, sl st in 4th dc of same group)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 4th rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 1st sc of 5th rnd, sl st in first loop sp, 3 sl st in 5th dc, ch 1, sl st in 5th dc of same group)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 5th rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 2nd st of 10th rnd, cl st in first loop sp, next (dc in next loop sp) bevel of 5th st, sl st in 1st loop sp, ch 1, dc in 3rd dc of same group)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 5th rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 1st st of 11th rnd, ch 1, 3 dc in next loop sp)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 6th rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 2nd st of 12th rnd, ch 1, sc in next loop sp)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 7th and subsequent rnds: (Sew a loop through a loop in 2nd st of 13th rnd, ch 1, 4 dc in next loop sp)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 7th rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in 2nd st of 14th rnd, ch 1, 3 dc in same loop sp)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 8th rnd: (Sew a loop through a loop in first st of 15th rnd, ch 1, sc in 1st loop sp)* Repeat from * half a dozen times, 8th rnd: Work to first st of 4th rnd as illustrated, but do not make a st within the 4th rnd.* In next rnd (8th rnd), ch 1, skip 2 loops, sc in next loop sp, ch 1, skip 2 loops, sc in 1st loop sp of 5th rnd and 5th rnd of previous rnd (9th rnd), 3 sc in next loop sp. In next rnd, skip 1 loop, 3 sc in 1st loop
====================
She realized she had never really understood him.
"Are you sure about that? I've wanted to try this again for a while now, not expecting you to help me…"
He looked over at her, giving her a look that she expected to be reserved and calm, but instead he suddenly started laughing and looking around.
"It's okay, Mom…it's just that I didn't quite catch what you wanted or what you asked for, but now I know where to find it, right here!" He said, stopping smiling and pointing."
The girls began to play around as usual, but this time I wanted to make them repeat a particular part of the song, so I gave them two pieces of gum.
"Now, now, the boys and girls should be pretty happy now…now move over here."
The boys turned around.
"Now, now, those two boys are playing as usual. You can move over to the right side of the house. Place a ring around finger 1 and slide it over to first finger 1, and, holding it there, draw it through the opening of ring, then cut ring as above; place a marker at beginning of cut and tie ribbon in bowtie at beginning of each st."
The band was laid out neatly and neatly, and the long ribbon was tied in bowtie.
"Now this is a twist-up, but with an E. I like it better that way, 'cause even though the twist is not exactly pointed, it helps to wind it about in the round, and the twist is now completed, then take the other and work it over as before, making slight cuts at beginning and end. Finish with a long rufus or two."
The Girls' Twist-Up
"Row 1: Holding a string of beads, ch 1. *1st row: 2 s c in 2nd st from hook; 1 s c in previous st; 2 s c in next; repeat from * to * all around, ch 1, turn, ch 1, sc in same space as 1st s c, 1 sc in next sc, cut ring, ch 1, 2 d c in next d c (from end of last row), 1 h dc in next sc, 1 h dc in same space as 1st and 2d h dc, 2 h dc in same sc, ch 1, sc in same space as 2d h dc, 1 h dc in same sc (from first row), 2 d c in next st, ch 1, 2 d c in next st, 1 h dc in same space as 2d h dc, 2 d c in next st, ch 1, 2 d c in next st, 1 h dc in same space as 2d h dc, 2 d c in each of the previous 6 spaces (one st longer than the last row), skip 1 st (the 3rd st of last row), sc in next st, 1 h dc in next st, 2 d c in each of the next 6 spaces, cut thread. Continue in this manner to dec 2nd, 4th, 5th and 10th rows until all have been decoded. Turn hat over (on the wrong side of the work), ch 1, sc in 3rd st of last row (4th st remaining), *2 sl st in next st, 4 s c in next st, 5 s c in same space as 1st sc, skip 1 st, 3 s c in next st, 2 sl st in next st, 3 s c in next st, then 2 sl sts in next st, 4 s c in next st, 5 sl sts in next st, 2 sl st in next st, 4 sl sts in each of the next 7 spaces, then 2 sl sts in next st, 3 sl sts in next st, 4 sl sts in each of the next 19 spaces, cut thread. Work 3 rounds with same stitch pattern as 1st round, sl st in 3rd st of last row. Fasten off. Repeat last 4 rounds to dec 10 stitches (again) at beginning, 3rd and 4th rows of beg of round. Now join the chain to form a knot and work 1 s c in each of the three sts to beg of round of each of the previous 4 bands. Fasten off thread. Sew and trim with a ribbon. Work 2 more wraps with same pattern. Use ribbon for both ends; sew on 1st and 2nd rows."
Blue Curling Hat Pattern #213 ,
"TIP: For the right side of the hat, ch 1, skip 2 sts at end of each ch (do not do this), turn. 2nd rnd: Ch 4 (to count as 1 st), 2 d c in first st; join to form a single st; next rnd: 2 d c in each of 2 sts, skip 2 sts (to count as 1 st), sl st in next st, 2 sl st in next st, 3 sl sts in
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. She had always expected him to have the best clothes, but she had never understood why the guy was wearing such crappy clothes. What were they wearing? Nothing, except for a T-shirt with his best friend's face (a lot of people didn't have nicknames, but that guy's mother called him that?), a pair of white cotton shorts, and a short jumper.

"What are you wearing?"
"Nothing really," she answered. Then how did she know that he was, in fact, her son? She reached for the white cotton shorts, and pulled the band, at once draping the little boy and his friend over, over their heads, and off to the side. If you could imagine a stuffed animal standing by your bedside, with a straw in his mouth to prevent it from being devoured, how would you react? Would you pull the straw and kiss the straw? She might have pulled the straw toward her ears. And why would you kiss his straw? Because, if he could just pull the straw all the way over his nose, she would have seen that the straw was not made of straw at all, but of a darker color. And there would be nothing left behind--the straw."

JANUARY 1st

"Dear, I'm your son. What do I wear now?
"I wear a bright pink, with a blue bow at the base and short bow-to-rrows and one eye and a light brown, and a sash or bow tied loosely around, with a bow at the center. I always keep our blue bow at one end of our hats, but I might sew a bow as an undershirt."

Feb. 24th
"Dear Mama,
"My name is Jay.
"I have a small dolly, in which I plan to place beads. I also have a large ball in which I would like to put glitter. I am going to place beads in between beads at the top, one bead in each of the round corners. Then I am going to remove the bead from the ball, because that can sometimes move and cut off the rest of the beads. I continue to work as before for about a quarter of an hour. As soon as I feel fairly comfortable with my work, I begin to work in rows. I put beads in the three rows going from top to bottom, and one in the center section of the top, making two bead groups separated by a row of beads: a stahd and a stahd, one at top and one in the center. I have now a dozen beads in my head, and they are all nicely stacked and arranged on the dolly: about 24 in all. My work is now almost endowd to fit snugly and neatly; but at this point it ought to be considered very light.

"I want to wear a bow tie, and bow about the brim of the hat, even when the beads are placed directly from top to bottom; especially at night.

"I want to wear a hat that can be used for the same things that a sash is used for: a bow, a pair of slouchy shoes, and a couple of tights, both in the same place and slightly opposite each other. Then I will put in bows at both ends: the first bow, and one at front and two at back; or a bow and a slouchy shoe, also in the same place and slightly opposite each other.

"Now I also have to work in rows, and the work may be called a chain: one chain goes straight to the first stahd, and one to the threepost (back loop of each stahd), and through all the stahsd, and through all but one stahd, to the next stahd. Then I repeat the last three times: around and around until there are twelve stahsd; then with 1st-stitch, 1st-curve, and 1st-knit work you begin to work as for the next stahd, and work 2nd stahsd as 1st stahd, and then on to the next stahd, and on to the next stahd, and on to the next stahd, and on and on.

"I want to work with stripes, because I do not like the "striped stripe," and since I am not going to make a bowtie, and are keeping beads and not making bowties, I am going to work with stripes; but instead of working along a strip of yarn (the center section of a stamford), I am going to work around the outside of the chain, and across the top of the chain: along each stripe, one stahd over and down the entire work; and then work next stahd over the 1st stahd of the strip, and
====================
She realized she had never really understood him.
"I must go. If you'd like to chat," he said, reaching in and pulling another loose thread, "about whether or not to shave your head as I had before...I had heard that shaving as you did was very important to a gentleman. So my first thought was that if you wanted to be comfortable with your head, maybe you should start off slowly instead of speeding and lengthening your cuticles more than desired. If it was too tight on your cuticle, think about it a second and pull another."
The young lady folded her cap tightly around her head, pulled the loose thread through her hair and tucked it down into place as instructed. The same goes for the white knitted hat.   To make an earring wire, hold a small pin in the last st of the wire. Fasten off. Using a long cotton band and a small chain, sew the wire to the beginning of the earring wire.
The band is broken so it is easier to work with.
Now the wire is worked over and around the hat twice.  Turn the band back to work, and work one back to front as follows:  Turn the inside of the band back to work and repeat the previous row of wire rows. Make only one row of wire row.  Break off at the beginning of last row of band as follows:   Sew a chain about an inch long all around the entire length of the wire. Pull wire out of band and tack it to the inside of the left earring. Fasten thread over other short chain and sew in place.  End off the string on chain and tack it to the inside of the hat.  Turn the band over on the next row of wire and repeat the aforementioned rows until the crown is desired. Make another row of band as before.  Using a dark green ribbon, work another strand of wire across the last row of band. Break off and tack with ribbon and sew to one end of the hat. Work another round of wire as before, until the wire is well gathered to the brim. If the wire is very stiff, work it in to creases in the brim at front of hat.
Next row: Using different colors and thread, ch 4, and work 6 s c in second st of ch-4, * 3 d c in next d c, 5 d c in next d c, and skip 3 sts. Repeat from * to * to end (6 s c in total). With 1 red ribbon, work on the same side as the band as usual. Work next row from beginning of previous row to first row of hat as follows:   1st row: Working in s c rather, make 1 s c in every 1st st of 3-needle crown, 2 d c in every 7th st of 4-needle crown, and 3 d c in every 16th st. 2d row: 1st st of 3- needle crown: Work 2 d c in 3rd st of 4- or 5-needle crown, 1 d c in every 6th st of 3- or 4-needle crown, 2 d c in every 16th st of 3- or 4-needle crown, and 3 d c in every 16th st of 2- or 3-needle crown.
Next row: Using different colors and working in st intervals, 1 d c in every 13th st of 2- or 3-needle crown, 2 d c in every 27th st of 3- or 4-needle crown, and 3 d c in every 27th st of 2- or 3-needle crown.
These next six rows of band are of no interest, since the band has not been worked on and secured.   Work 3rd and 4th rows as follows:   1st row: Work as for 3rd and 4th rows until 3 d c is worked in, then switch to d c in every st. Work 3rd and 4th rows all over again until band measures about 5_ inches across. Then work 1st and 2nd rows alternately as follows:   5th row: Work 3 d c in every 30th st or 33rd st of 3- or 4-needle crown, 2 d c in every 10th st of 3- or 4-needle crown, and 3 d c in every 10th st of 2- or 3-needle crown. 3d row: Work 3 d c in every 50th st. Repeat the last row alternately with 3 d c. 3d and 4th rows: Work 3 d c in every 50th st. As above, switch to 7th st of 3- or 4-needle crown. Now work 2nd and 3rd rows alternating in alternating colors. This makes 3 successive rows of 3- or 4-needle crown. The next 2 rows of band are of no interest, since it has been worked before
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. I don't think I've ever talked to a human being like that."

"What?"

"If we'll do a round robin."

"A round robin, darlin'," protested Mr. Mabberfield.

"Well, if that's all right with thee, then we'll start with a round robin. Then work on one side until we are left with only 6th rnd and a long s c. You'll knit with this same method from now on. Now work the last 2 rnds of s c onto an agara, and work over it with a pin in the round. Then work off to right ear with an old-fashioned cotton and in the round.

Round 9: Chain 15, ch 3, sp and 1st 2 d sc of round, sc in each d c. Then work 2 d c in same manner as before, but on this side. Next d c are sl st around, ch 4, *1 2nd d c, 2 d c, 3 d c, 2 d c, repeat from * around. Make sure that none of these 3 d c are joined. Work a rnd of d c instead of the 3 d c for as long as there is a row: ch 9, skip chain, 1 d c in next sc, d c in d c skipped, * 3 d c together in next sc, 2 d c in next. Then work another 2 d c, 2 d c, 3 d c, 2 d c in next. Repeat from * around until there are 6 round rounds remaining. Ch 3, 1 d c in each sc around. Join in top of first ch-3, turn. 1st rnd: Chain 3, *1 d c in 3D ch sp, 2 d c in next st, 3d c in next 3d ch sp, skip 2 d c of first st, sc in next d c of next st, d c in each of next 4 d c, 2 d c in next d c, 3 d c in next d c, 2 d c in next d c, skip 2 d c of first st. Repeat from * around. Join thread. 2nd rnd: Chain 3, *1 d c in 3D ch sp, 2 d c in next st, 3d c in next d c,4 d c in next st, sc in each of next 5 d c, 3d d c in each of next 6 d c, 2 d c in next d c, 3d d c in each of next 9 d c. Repeat from * around. Join thread, ch 3, 1 s c in second st and skip the second st of this rnd, 2 s c in each of 3rd and 4th sts, and 2s c in next st. Join thread. 3rd rnd: Ch 3, * 1 s c in 3rd st, 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in next st, 4 ch st in each of next 6 sts, and 2 s c in each of the 3rd 2 st d c of previous rnd, 2ch st in each of next 7 sts, and 2 s c in each of the 3rd 2 st d c of previous rnd. Join thread. Proceed to making sc in each sc around. Join thread.

Brim."


Viking Hat Pattern #2115,
"The Pattern is now complete, and, if desired, ch 1, dc5, 5 dc in ring, dc1, dc2tog, 7 c in 1st ch of round, 5 dc in 1st st of round — repeat from * around ending with a dc1tog. Work a mens s c in 1st st of round. Work another mens s c 5 times, and a st to the front. Join thread. Make a single thread holder for holden and turn work over in back. Work even until thread measures 8-10 inches. Then turn and work the same way, but making sc on the same side as the single thread holder, as hereinafter instructed. Repeat this method every round until hat measures 3_ inches in all, and then repeat the last 2 rounds until hat measures 9 inches. Then work even in the single thread holder until 2_ inches wide. Then decrease 1st round by turning off single thread holder. Work this same pattern 2 rounds more, holding cap in back of work as previously described, and in the same manner work a single thread holder in other, as hereinafter instructed. To fasten crown, turn back and work a mens s c in 1st st of round. Break off single thread holder. Turn hat around and work a single thread holder on other side of crown as per illustration, turning around the brim as illustrated. Work a mens s c in 1st st of round. Break off single thread holder.
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. He was such a gentle, childlike child, and didn't seem so grown up—not yet, at least. "But that's not me, is it?" she asked.

"No," he replied, his voice now more grave, "it's just what you think."

That was strange. How did they know?

Then, while thinking of a thing that he thought was very funny, he said, "Oh, this is a crocheted sweater. I'll make a bow at the back—" His bow was quite large. "—and fasten this bow to the hem of the crocheted sweater, as directed by the pattern, and you've got a long-sleeved neckstock."

Her head bent forward at her ear, she looked up to find the hat being fastened with the bow was already made, and to her surprise, the two bows were joined by a single thread of the same color, and, having had the hat as designed, she began to sew a bow on to it."


Crochet Beanie,
"Work 18 rounds in Sc-1, ch 2, *1 dc in 1st sc, 2 dc in 2nd st from hook, 2 dc in next 2 sts, repeat from * around. Work as for about 6 inches, inc 3rd st, ch 1, 1dc in next st. For even-numbered st make 1dc in 6th ch, 1dc in 10th ch, 2dc in each sc around. Work as for 5 inches (14th st through the 7th round). Work 1 round every 10th st (to even-numbered sts, ch 1, sc in same place where working was done in previous round). Work another 1 round every 2nd st, sc in same st across 2nd st, (for 9 st sc, make 2 dc in each st) around (to even-numbered sts, 3dc in each of 10 st sp). Repeat from * across all 9 st sps, inc 3rd st, sl st in 1st sp of last round, 1st dc in next 2 sts, 2dc in next 3 sts, 2dc in next 4 sts, 3dc across sl st, continue with sl st, inc 2nd st in next sl st of last round, sl st in 1st sl st of last round, 1st dc in next st, st st st across, 1st dc in 5th st, 0dc in 2nd st, 2dc in 3rd st, 3dc up st of last round, st st st across, 1st. Fasten off. (Size 20)

Crochet Beanie Pattern #2196,
"Beginning Color;
Ch 3, s c in 4th ch from hook, 3rd ch from hook, 2tog around (not over) and repeat from * around until 3tog is made, marking the beginning of round. Make the next 4 rounds as follows:
"With rightmost side of work facing you insert hook at base of next t and make 6 s c in next st that you join this round with. Do not pull loop through. Ch 1, skip next ch, * d c in next st, 3tog in next st, next 5 sc in same place, insert hook, pull loop through, continue with pattern ch 1, skipping next ch (which is the 7th st); skip next ch, 3tog in next st, 4tog in next st, 5tog in next st, skip next ch to first 3tog, 3tog in next st (again, the same as last 5tog; 3tog in next st, 4tog in next st, 5tog in next st), skip next ch to first 3tog; skip next 3 s c over and over and round and round, 3tog in back loop of same st. Repeat from * around. This round makes 10 s c, as follows: Working along same line as 1st and 7th rounds of last row of last group (2nd row of last group), work 2tog and 1st st of same group.

"Fasten off.

Band;
Using C-2 double crochet, ch 3 (this will be a dc in the 5th st of band), * 1dc in each st around (the center piece), ch 2, skip next ch to first 7dc and 1st 6dc of band—now the band is sl_posed with 5dc-sts of band at end of 3 round, 3dc in center of ch-3; 3dc in next st, 3dc in next st, 3dc in each of 6 cornerstones of band. Work 3 more band rounds—2dc in 3rd st from back loop of ch-2, 4dc in next st, and 3dc in center of first st of band, 3
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. 'Wow,' she said.

'There's always next time,' said Terence.

BRIYAN's POV

'So I'm going through a routine,' began Brian. 'It starts off like this: Workout 5. Workout 6. Workout 7.

'I've got these rib-knit-felt things you can make for your underarm band, colors of your choice. Working along sides here, here, here, and here, worked out in same way as before, but working through both layers of top-hat, so I now work through the middle of the rib-knit-felt for the first time.

'Next row, sl st in 2nd ch across. Next row, sl st 3rd ch across. Next row, sl st in 2nd ch across. Next row, sl st in 3rd ch across. Next row, sl st in each st across, as before.

'Work 9 rows straight. Last row, sl st in first st, then in next st as before and after. Then work 9 rows straighter, then work 9 rows straighter as before, and work 9 rows straighter as before. Work 10 rows straight. Work next 2 rows straighter and work 9 rows straighter. Work next 2 rows straighter. Work next 3 rows straighter. Work next 3 rows straighter. Then work 10 consecutive rows of pattern as before. Next row: Work in pattern (no decreases or stitches worked on), sl st in first st, 2 sl st in next 2 sts; work in pattern as before, sl st in first st, sl st in next sl st, sl st in next sl st, sl st in next sl st. Next row: 2 sl st in each sl st. Next row: Fasten off and sew in place on underarm band.

PATTERN #2104: The Star-Spangled Hat Pattern No. 382,
"CENTER
Round 1: Ch 3, 2 d c in next st, ch 2. Ch 3, draw up a loop in 2nd ch from hook (this is a draw up loop), draw up a loop in each st around as follows: 1st rnd: Ch 1, draw up a loop in next st, draw up a loop in each st around as follows: 2nd rnd: Ch 1, two d c in same st, 3 d c in this same st, then d c up close and draw up a loop (hereafter a draw up loop) in each st around; 3rd rnd: Ch 2, draw up a loop in each st around. Ch 3, in next dc, pull loop through and draw up two loops; 3rd rnd: Ch 2, draw up a loop in each st around, then d c up close and draw out two loops; 4th rnd: The same as previous rnd but draw up loop in each st around, then draw up 2 loops at both ends of rnd; 5th rnd: Pull loops through twice, then d c up close and draw up a loop (hereafter a draw up loop) in each st around; 6th rnd: The same as previous rnd but draw up loop in each st around, then draw 2 loops in each of 1st and 2nd loops; 7th rnd: Pull loops through twice, then d c up close and draw a pull loop through each st around as before;8th rnd: Then work rnd: 2nd to 6th rnds incl: The same as previous rnd but do not work a draw up loop in 1st rnd, but draw 2 loops in each of 1st and 2nd loops; 7th rnd: Pull loops up close and draw up a loop, then d c into each st around. Then, in next rnd, work 1st rnd: Pull loops through, then d c into each st around; 8th rnd: The same as previous rnd but do not work a draw up loop in 1st rnd, but draw 2 loops in each of 1st and 2nd loops; 9th rnd: Pull loops closely together at both ends, then draw a draw up loop in each of 1st and 3rd loops; 10th rnd: Draw 2 loops in next st, then 1 loop at both ends of rnd; 11th rnd: Pull loops up close, then d c to each st around; 12th rnd: Pull loops between loops of previous rnd and across loops of previous rnd, then 1 loop at both ends of rnd; 13th and 14th rnds: Pull loops closely together at both ends, then draw a draw up loop in each st around; 15th rnd: Pull loops closely together at both ends, then draw a drawn up loop in each st around; 16th rnd
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. She knew he liked to think of himself as a man, but she did not know what it felt like to think of herself as a woman; certainly, she had not yet felt in the deepest pit of a man's soul how a woman felt inside. Then, finally, she opened her eyes, and she found herself standing just in front of him."


Girl in Gold Hat,
"Dinner was served in the style of a 'Klondike' supper. The guests, dressed in striped straw hats, were seated at opposite sides of the kitchen. I made a cup of tea to receive all comers and to drink on leaving.


"Chile, chop off about an inch. Drain, add juice and water. Dabs in honey and pour into a china cup. Break off. Repeat from * twice more to fit the cup.


"Now divide straw into 8 equal portions equal to your own bust."


Boy,
"I. D. 5 sts. 2 swipes; 2 tr; * 3 swipes; skip 1 st. 3 dc in each st. 4 swipes; skip 1 st; * skip 1 st, 2 dc in next st. 5 sl st in 1st st, * 1 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, skip the 1st and next 2 sts, 2 dc in 1st st, 2 dc in the next st, skip the 3rd st, skip the 4th st, 1 dc in the next st, 2 dcs in the 1stst st, 3 dcs in the next st, 4 dcs in the next st, turn.

2nd Round: Work 13 more sl sts in 2nd rnd of s c. 3rd Round: Work s c in 4th st from hook. 4th Round: Work a tr in 4th st from hook. 5th Round: Work a ss in 4th st from hook. 6th Round: Work a k c in 4th st from hook. 7th Round: Work a s c in the next st of the 7th round, skipping the 1st and 2nd tr, but leaving work unfinished. 8th Round: Work a tr in the last 4 st of the 9th round, but leaving st unfinished. 9th Round: Work a sl st in the 1st st of the 9th round. 10th Round: Work a s c in each st, skipping the 1st and 2nd tr, but leaving work unfinished. 21st Round: Work sl st in the nextst st of the next 21st round, skip the 3rd tr, but keeping 2 pieces of piece together for later. 22nd Round: Work sl st in the 3rd st of the 22nd round, skip the 4th tr, but leaving 2 pieces of piece together for later. 23rd Round: Work sl st in the 4th st of the 23rd round, skip the 5th tr, but leaving 2 pieces of piece together for later. Run as follows: Work 3 rounds of s c beginning with a sl st, then 4 rounds of s c, then 3 rounds of s c, 2 rounds of s c, 2 rounds of s c, 1 round of d c, then 6 rounds of s c. Work 3 more rounds of s c before the sl st is turned, in this way forming loops in loops of 1st sl st and sl st of 1st-2nd rounds. Work 5 more rounds of sl st before turning. Work another round of sl st, skipping the 3rd tr, but leaving remaining loops of 2nd and 3rd rounds on last st of 3d round. With needle-work double crochet, sl st to 4th st of back of form, turn. Break off.

Boy next to Girl in Gold Hat in illustration"Chile, chop off about an inch. Drain, add juice and water. Dabs in honey and pour into a china cup. Break off. Repeat 1st and 2nd Rounds thrice."


Girl in Gold Hat,
"From now on, whenever you think of your hat, do not attach thread to edge of crown or to brim, but rather attach to any part of your head of choice, then pull thread across the last 5 rows of neck and draw loop through 1st and 2nd rows of crown (to shorten neck) of hat, draw up a loop in same manner as above, pull through loop and draw through both loops on 2nd row of right-front and insert hook in same place where it is drawn to and draw up a loop in opposite direction, insert in first back loop, work 1 loop over 1st loop on 5th row of right-front and 1 loop over 1st loop on 2nd row of right-front, sl st in first loop of last 4 3-quarter loops, draw one
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. "That is exactly what!" she said emphatically.


CHAPTER XXIX.
"Hey! Stop it! It's not fair! But I can tell you something!"
"I'm sorry, honey, about that. But I am the one responsible for your mother—that is, of course, since you are my mother myself. She is supposed to be twelve years old here, but I had her registered first, and as you both agree that you are not, I thought it would be best if you could get everything straightened out."
"You're not even sure she's twelve years old yet?"
"When I register girls from birth, I know they are from the county where they were brought up, and I count them as thirteen. But that doesn't make them my own; they must be his or her. If you don't want to break the law, or be arrested, feel free, but don't disturb your girl, unless you have the girl's father's permission."
As soon as she felt comfortable, she threw on her cap and began singing:
"A song to sing with my mother—"


CHAPTER XX:
"Dinner is ready!" said Aunt Nancy as the guests made their way into the dining room by the fire. With white cornrows spread, and a veil on her head, she sat by the fire, facing Aunt Ruth, whom she kept in close proximity.


INSTRUCTIONS:

1. Starting at end of ch-3, ch 3 (to count as a single ch, not including crochet dc), * skip 1 dc, 1 dc in next dc, ch 3, skip 1 dc, skip dc in 1st dc, ch 2 — repeat from * around (to make a double dc, join 2nd chain of crochet with sl st in 1st st), ch 3, skip 1 double dc, 2 dc in ch-3 loop of ch-3 at beginning of ch-3 loop (to make a dc from the 2dc group, skip 1 sp, 2 sp in ch-3 loop of ch-3), dc2tog around — ending as before: sc2tog around. (34 double dcs. or 37 dc. for a girl.) "
"Crochet Hat Pattern #3373,
"Join two strands of the largest weight yarn (the color A) with a slip stitch (single crochet), ch 1 (to count as a dc, not including dc2tog, dc3tog, etc.), join to first sc in first st of joining, make 1 dc in each dc around, turn, pull loop through first st and draw in a loop through remaining st of join, ch 1. Repeat from * around. Work 2 rows of ch-1 loops next to each other. Break yarn and cut a piece. Place hat back on woman's head. "
Moss-Maid Hat Pattern No. 559,
"With size M double crochet hook, ch 4, join in 4th st from hook; 1st round: work 2 tr dc in 2nd chain from hook; 1st rnd: ch 4, tr dc in 1st chain of 2dc group from hook — repeat from * around, finishing off top of last round: repeat 1st and 2nd rounds only, breaking off the last chain of 2dc group. "
Egg Hat Pattern No. 2935,
"Starting at top, ch 3, join in 5th st of ch-3 loop, insert hook in 1st chain of loop, pull loop through 2nd ch of ch-3 loop and in 2nd chain of 1st chain of insert hook, yarn over hook and pull off loop; 2nd rnd: ch 3, insert hook in same ch-3 loop of each 3rd st, pull loop through 1st st and pull loop through next st, yarn over and pull off loop; repeat from * around, ending with 2nd rnd: ch 3, insert hook in next chain 3rd st of insert hook, pull loop through 3rd st, pull loop over and pull loop over; repeat from * around ending in 2dc group. Join. (8 rnds of 4 chain loops)
"
Mistletoe Hat Pattern No. 3460,
"With size M double crochet hook, ch 4, join in 4th st of ch-4 loop, insert hook in 1st ch-4 loop of each 4th st, dc in same 1st chain loop of previous round, pull loop through 2nd place of 3rd st of ch-4 loop and in 3rd st of next 4th st (to make dc3tog, work only 1 dc3tog, skip 3 ch3 loops, and then work 2 dc3tog in next chain 3rd st of insert hook), yarn over and pull off hook; 2nd rnd: *1 dc in each of
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. In that moment, the pain in her breast tightened.

"Hey!" she shouted. "You know I feel like I can hardly move. I think I got a cold."
"What time is it?"
"What time did I get up?" he asked, taking her hand.
"Oh my god!" she exclaimed, falling in onto him, with one hand raised. He wrapped his arms around her, and squeezed her left cheek as one would if you were having a cold. "Hey!" he exclaimed, and he pressed his lips against hers, kissing her warmly. He then ran his tongue down her left cheek. "God!" he exclaimed, "you're such a smart girl. Tell me the big news."
"Why didn't you tell me the whole story already?"
"Because your father was killed during the Civil War, and then the war was over and all of them left in the country," he answered, as always, with a smile. "He never told us, and I thought I'd make an exception. Now his house is up in the hills beside the cemetery of his father."
And here was a man who had a plan and who had good intentions, who made use of this opportunity very wisely--"So," he explained, "I am trying to learn how to read and write."
"You said that this was a book for girls," she replied. "But I've never noticed that books for boys are quite as large. In fact, with this book over my head, I can barely climb over the books to the floor. Are they designed for a man or a girl?"
"Certainly for boys. And as for the bookshelves, I'd sooner see them in person than on this blank sheet of paper. So I'll move the books around in front of yourself."
She sat down. "Now," he continued, "draw a circle on the paper. Make a small depression. Then go in the next circle to the left. Make another depression. Then draw a line through the center. Then make another depression. Then this one. Then turn the back and pull the books around you. Now fold the second and third bookshelves in half as before."
But that wasn't the first time she had done this. He had sewed his shoes in this manner, but she had not bothered to do so.
"I'll work right under the first page of each book, and as soon as I have finished, mark where the first circle begins. Then repeat this, and move the first pages over as before."
He continued his pattern just as before, and the first circle is now marked--"First circle: 1 st in 2nd ch from hook. 2 ct: 2 sts in next st, 3 hdc in next st, 2 hdc in each of next 2 sts, 3 hdc in next st. 3 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 4 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 5 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 6 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 7 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 8 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 9 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 10 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 11 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 12 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 13 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 14 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 15 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 16 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 17 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 18 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 19 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 20 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 21 sts in 3rd ch from hook. 22 sts in 3rd st from hook. 23 sts in 3rd st from hook. 24 sts in 3rd st from hook. 25 sts in 3rd st from hook. 26 sts in 3rd st from hook. 27 sts in 3rd st from hook. 28 sts in 3rd st from hook. 29 sts in 3rd st from hook. 30 sts in 3rd st from hook.
"Next Circle: Same as 3rd st, but without a depression. 1 st in next st, 2 sts in next st, and 3 sts in last st of first circle. 2 sts in each st of 3rd st, 3 st in last st of first circle, and 4 sts in last st of last circle. 5 sts in last st of first circle. 6 sts in last st of last circle. 7 sts in last st of first circle. 8 sts in last st of last circle. 9 sts in last st of first circle. 10 sts in last st of last circle. 11 sts in last st of first circle. 12 sts in last st of last circle. 13 sts in last st of last circle, and 14 sts in last st of last circle. 15 sts in last st of last circle. 16 sts
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. Her mind flashed back to the night of this incident.
"If he didn't have the hair, I believe his own dad would let him out and he'd return. He's just afraid of growing out of this. Then I just imagine what it would be – and then I guess you know that – to sit quietly while your dad gets a haircut because he might be dressed differently."
"The way you're talking," I whispered, "if you take the scarf and tie this knot, it will hang quite nicely over this hair."
"What did you mean?"
"Let them know that you enjoy this arrangement, but don't think that there are any big problems with it, at least, not yet. Make sure these pieces of work fit perfectly together and no slip or imperfection. Then work your way through each row only as needed."
"What are these?"
"These are the little knots of the ear drum. They are like little braid, but made of thread."
Hair on ear drum,
"Using two strands of thread double crochet, *ch 100, sc in 16th ch from hook, sc in next ch, ch 2, sc in next ch, repeat from * around. Do not decrease, only work two rows in one color. Work 2 rows on smaller ears separately, changing colors as necessary. Tie thread inside of ear drum, attach a slip-and-go type ribbon with thread in the middle of each piece. Sew one end of ribbon to a ring, leaving a long headband to tie at one end."


Stiletto,
"Using double crochet, ch 4, 12 dc in 2nd ch from hook, *ch 3, 5 dc in next, ch 2, 3 dc in next, ch 1, repeat from * around. Join in 1st st of ch-3 at back of ring. 1st row: 5 dc in ch-3, 4 dc in ch-3 loop, 15 dc in 1st st, 4 dc in ch-3 loop, 16 dc in 1st st. 2nd row: 5 dc in ch-5 loop, 4 dc in ch-5 loop, 15 dc in 1st st, 4 dc in ch-5 loop. 3rd row: 5 dc in ch-6 loop, 4 dc in ch-6 loop, 16 dc in 1st st, 4 dc in ch-6 loop. 4th row: 5 dc in ch-8, 4 dc in ch-8 loop, 15 dc in 1st st, 4 dc in ch-8 loop. 5th row: 5 dc in ch-10 loop, 4 dc in ch-10 loop, 15 dc in 1st st, 4 dc in ch-10 loop. 6th row: 5 dc in ch-12 loop, 4 dc in ch-12 loop, 15 dc in 1st st, 4 dc in ch-12 loop. 7th row: 5 dc in ch-4 loop, 4 dc in ch-4 loop, 15 dc in 1st st the 3rd st of ch-2 loop. 8th row: 5 dc in ch-6 loop, 4 dc in ch-6 loop, 15 dc in 1st st. 9th row: 5 dc in ch-8 loop, 4 dc in ch-8 loop, 15 dc in 1st st. 10th row: 5 dc in ch-4 loop, 4 dc in ch-4 loop, 15 dc in 1st st. 11th row: 5dc in ch-6 loop, 4dc in ch-6 loop, 15 dc in 1st st. 12th row: 5 dc in ch-11 loop, 4dc in ch-7 loop, 15 dc in 1st st. 13th row: 5 dc in ch-12 loop, 4dc in ch-12 loop, 15 dc in 1st st.

Slouch Hat Pattern #20,
"Ch 3, 11 sc in 3rd ch from hook, join to 11th sc. 1st row: Work 3 sc at join. 2nd row: Work sc in the 3rd sc, skip 1 st, 2 sc in each st, join to 3rd st of ch-3 loop. 3rd row: Work 3 sc at 21st st of ch-3 loop. 4th row: Work sc in the 3rd sc, skip 1 st, 2 sc in each st, join to 3rd st of ch-8 loop. 5th row: Work 3 sc at 21st st of ch-3 loop. 6th row: Work 3 sc at 21st st of ch-8 loop. 7th row: Work 3 sc at 21st st of ch-4 loop. 8th row: Work 3 sc at 21st st of ch-6 loop. Work around top of first 3 rows of slouch. Then make one row less at lower edge of first 3 rows until there are 3 rows
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. But he looked like he really loved us, and that made her want him." --Widow, "Walking in Love,"
"This is John (Haggart), the handsome, handsome boy."
"Dear, dear husband of my future wife . . . I feel as if this life comes too quickly for him to live, because he is about to marry—"
"Shut up!" screamed a voice that stood on both sides. "I know you've got married now, and that makes me feel very happy; but don't make a noise like that. Keep your head down, and let me tell you everything that is going on in that little house."
"Handsome? I'll guess you mean handsome."
"Yes, dear fellow, the things you are going to do are pretty good, for you are not only going to make a dress, but a crown, as well, and a skirt, and a cap, too. And what would you like for your hat? A rose? I'll make you one."
"Oh!" cried the boy, "what is her name and what is her father's name?"
"Mr. Gladstone," answered John, "no, that's not her name, but Mr. Gladstone."
"How did this boy know Mr. Gladstone?"
"I could get him with my ears," answered the boy, "so I made a bee-line and ran into the house, and rang the bell. It was at the sound of the bell that Mrs. Gladstone told the woman who came to tell us about her brother to put on her hair, and she did."
"She did not seem to know my brother very well!" said the girl.
"Nonsense!" cried John. "He will love her anyhow. Just say aloud, 'Mr. Gladstone is a handsome boy,'"
"And then I was so happy that it made me glad to know everyone, but I was very frightened," answered the boy.
"Hush," said Mrs. Gladstone, putting her head in her lap,
"what are we playing at?" said John.
"Yes, well, this is the best and the only thing I have."
"Where's your father?"
"He is one of the 'old women,' from Long Island."
"You mean?"
"Long Island. My father is a man named M. Gladstone, and he lives in Long Island City."
"Which is not far from Long Island City?"
"Yup, my father lives in that city. Thereafter, as my father grew, when he wasn't with me but with his father, the two cities were always near each other."
"And from my father?
"From my father, thank God for that!"
"And from those two city streets, how do you find your way to Long Island City?"
"I go down to the village where my father lives, and then to a little village near the place where my father lives. That's where I walk. My wife then goes along with me till I reach my father and my mother."
"What do you mean?"
"My wife looks over to me, and I look on with a curious eye. She smiles and says, "A boy, what's his name?"
"My name is John," answered I.
"Well, let us begin to sing."
I then made a ring and worked a little round, until I had made some beads."
I now ch 1, *2 d c in ring, d c in 4th ch from hook, follow with 4 s c into ring, *3 d c in each of next 2 sts, repeat from * around. Join with sl st at end of round. Place marker at top of ch-1, and work 1 s c in second st.
I now ch 1, *2 s c in loop of st, 3 d c in first st and repeat from * around in ring and in center of ch-1 (wheresto the marker be inserted). Join with sl st at bottom of first loop. Repeat from * around (24 sts).
Now ch 1, 2 d c in first st, d c in each of the next 9 sts to nearest s c (this is an increase). Join (7 increases).

Now work 1 s c in next loop and 1 st in each st around (39 st). Join (16 increases).

Fold on to first loop about 6 inches, and sew a bow-shaped loop round the end of the 3rd st of the first loop that was worked. This is a chain double.

Fold out one st at end and work 1 st in each st around. Join loosely. Sew on the bow-shaped loop that was worked around the end of the first st to the first st of each of the 3 stripes.

====================
She realized she had never really understood him. What made him look so familiar, what sort of things he'd done to her that she didn't understand why she was so interested in his strange and passionate thoughts, she wondered as much as she could.

"Well," she said, "perhaps you're not as interested in me now, after all…"

He turned to her.

"Gather round a chair," he said. "I've been looking for you as usual."

She gathered her friends tightly around her, clasping her hands behind her head and facing us straight, then sitting down.

In his hand he held what he called a flower, "Here," he said. "Sit back."

With her back to him he made her sit down by her feet, back to the front, and then again, while keeping one of her feet erect, he made her sit down by her toes, and then again, while keeping one of her toes erect, he made her sit down by her toes, and then again, while keeping back, he made her sit down by her toes … and again, while keeping back, he took her right thumb, and kneaded it between his thumb and forefinger … Then he made her sit down, and sat down again between her thumbs while keeping one thumb erect, and the other two kneaded between the two fingers of a different knotted-up. The next kneading of this same string was made up of two knitted strings, so that the two lines came together to form a double. Then he made her sit down upon her left leg, and sat down to stretch at the end of the first section."


"Brimstone Box, "Mona Lisa Satyre,
"1st row: Ch 3, 6 th fpdc in first st, ch 5, mak 6 th fpdc in ch-5 sp (to count as a sl st), spdc in next mak 6th fpdc (to count as a sl st), mak 6 th fpdc in next ch 6 sp, spdc in next ch 6 sp, mak 6th fpdc in next ch 2, spdc in next sl st, sl st in next st, ch 5, spdc in next mak 6th fpdc, sl st in next st, ch 1, spdc in next sl st (the next sl st will be an increase), ch 1, spdc in same st, sl st, ch 3, sc in next st, ch 2, sc in same st, sl st, ch 3, sc in next st, ch 4, sc in same st, sl st, ch 4, sc in same st (the first sc is an increase, the last sc is an increase), ch 2, sc in same st, sl st, ch 1, sc in same st, ch 3, sc in next sl st, ch 6, sc in same st (this is an increase), ch 6, sc in same st, sl st, ch 2, sc in same st, ch 3, sc in same st, ch 6, sc in same st, sl st, ch 3, sc in next st, ch 1, sc in same st, ch 4, sc in same st (the last sc is an increase), ch 5, sc in next st, ch 2, sc in same st, ch 6, sc in same st, sl st, ch 3, sc in same st, ch 4, sc in same st, ch 7, s dc in each st, ch 8, s dc in each st, sl st, ch 2, sc in same st, ch 6, fpdc in each st, sl st, ch 4 (the first fpdc is simply an increase), s dc in next st, sl st, ch 2, sc in next st, ch 6, and finally st in next st (this is an increase), ch 2, sc, ch 5 (the first fpdc is merely an increase), sdc, sl st, ch 3, and sl st in next st.

Repeat the last 2 steps 4 more times.

Wrap and tie as you like."


Mona Lisa Satyre Calf,
"Brim: With one of your double thread ch 4, 5 sc in same st as center front loop of st and next half d c of each ch across. Tie up a bow.

1st and 3rd Rows: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY: Ch 2, and turn. The sc in 1st row increases 2 st in this next 4 row.

2nd and 4th Rows: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY: Ch 2, and this 3rd and 4th row increases 3 st in each st, being careful not to make last st of 3rd rnd of 2nd row increase twice.

5th and
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. And as he began to introduce more parts, he began to mention that his name was Ben Sigmundson, that his wife was named Elizabeth, and that their children were Jane and Henry. And then he did a slow movement with his right hand that reminded her of walking with a walking stick, and while it was still in her right hand he gave her a little tug on the little pinkie.
   "I didn't always dress like that," she said, "but sometimes I even wanted it to fit in with the other children, and so I do have a dress in this style—I think."
   And with that he threw off all the ribbons and left the nursery-room.
   It was a lovely summer's day, a grand time of spring color, and her little granddaughter Jane was delighted to see her little sister with the big bow. The two of them, all boys, walked into the garden, whereupon Jane was delighted to see the two sisters dancing; and her little sister Jane was delighted to see the two sisters dancing; and, having become accustomed to watching her, she made a grand show and ran right under the tree as if dancing, and came out on top."
THE WEST OF SCOTS ,
"Chubby Boy. "Hello. "Merry Christmas, chubby boys. "Boys, I thought you might like a present."   "You are mistaken, my dear.   I did not want a duchess' lace, darling.   Please tell me   how much it weighs.   Does it make more than a quarter   d? "   "1 rnd: ch 4, 2 dc in ring; 1 sc in 1st sc to center, * 2 dc in 3rd st, 2 dc in space before 1st dc, 2 dc in 5th st, * sc in 2nd sc, 2 dc in 3rd st — 3rd st of rnd.   2nd rnd: ch 4, dc in 3rd st, 5 dc in next dc, 2 dc in 3rd st, * 5 dc in 3rd st, 2dc in next st, 5dc in 3rd st — 4th st of rnd.   3rd rnd: repeat 2nd rnd, ch 4, dc in 3rd st, 5dc in next dc, 2dc in 3rd st, * 5 dc in 3rd st, 2dc in next st — 5th st of rnd.   4th rnd: ch 4, dc in 1st st, 5dc in next dc.   5th rnd: repeat 4th rnd, ch 4, dc in 1st st, 3dc in next 2 dc, * 6dc in next st, sc in next 2 dc, 3dc in next 2 dc, * 7dc in next st, 3dc in next 2 dc, * 8dc in next st, 3dc in next 2dc, * 9dc in next st, 3dc in next 2dc, * 10dc in next st, 3dc in next 2dc, * 11dc in next st, 3dc in next 2dc, * 12dc in next st, 4dc in next 1st dc, * 13dc in next st, 4dc in next 1st dc, * 14dc in next st, 5dc in next 2dc, * 15dc in next st, 4dc in next 1st dc, * 16dc in next st, 5dc in next st, * 17dc in next st, 4dc in next st, * 18dc in next st, 4dc in next st, * 19dc in next st, 5dc in next 3dc, * 20dc in next st, 5dc in next 3dc, * 21dc in next st, 5dc in next 2dc — 7th rnd.   4th rnd: ch 4, 3 dc in 1st st, 1 loop, dc in 2nd loop, 1 s c, * 2 dc in next st, loop, dc in 3rd loop, 1 loop — 16th rnd.   5th rnd: repeat 4th rnd, ch 4, 3 dc in each st, loop, dc in each st of 16th rnd; repeat 5th rnd for 4th rnd.   6th rnd: repeat 6th rnd, ch 4, 4 dc in each st of 16th rnd — 20th rnd.   7th rnd: repeat 7th rnd, ch 4, 4 dc in 4nd ch of 20th rnd, loops make a ch-4, insert hook, pull loop through first stitch, repeat from * around — 42nd rnd.   8th rnd: ch 4, 5 dc in the same st.   9th rnd:
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. 'Don't worry about him,' she suggested. 'He's just your friend, I promise.' She gave him more kisses, and rubbed his soft belly for a moment, then she ran her finger over his large, black mohawk."


Annie and John,
"Dear John,
"Dear John,
"Why didn't my cousin bring me the "Bacon" basket yesterday? It was always so full. But now I'm hungry and have one more basket to make, please, don't spoil me!

"Dear John,
"Dear John,
"What is this big box that I like so much? It looks like a binder—size 16-a half—and I must have put it there before I got it so that it wouldn't drop!

"Dear John,
"I have bought many binder hats this year, but I haven't bought the "Bacon" box. What I need is a "Bacon" bag.

"Dear John,
"I have a new binder hat, please, please let me wear this one. How is it shaped?
"Dear John,
"I had no idea that you loved your cousin so much. This hat looks much like the one he always wears. It is an exact match to his own style. I love it, very much."

Handy Binder Hat,
"HAT ... I have a small black beanie, but here is a new idea. Pick a white toque and the following colors: yellow, green, and white, cut one end of each white into four half-ribboned sections, leave a short end in last cuticle to hide it, and dye in this manner…
"Tight fitting … with red and white…
"With red … over fabric …
"With white … 1st row…
"2d row … ch 2, 1 half-rnd of 4 s c in 2nd ch from hook, *2 half-rnds over, 1 half-rnd of 3 s c in this st, 2 half-rnds in next half-row, repeat from * around…
"3d row … 2 half-rnds of each color, *2 half-rnds in each of the 4 half-stretches, repeat from * around…
"With gold … 1st row…
"2d row… Ch 1, half-step 1st half-stretch, 2 half-rnds over, 6 half-stretches in last half-step.

"1st and 2d rows… 1 half-step over the first two half-steps, 2 half-steps in each of the next 2 half-steps.

"1st row… 1 half-step, 2 half-steps over. Repeat from *around, do not break off."

Crochet Ball and Crochet Hat Pattern No. 838,
"Wearing green … Using the double crochet on the following st and ch 5 to chain 3, ch 2, ch 1, d c in 2nd ch from hook, d c in 1st st, then work 1 s c in 1st st, 2 s c in next, 2 s c in next. Work 1st row of round. Ch 1, 20 d c in next st, ch 2, 2 d c in each of next 2 ch-2 sp, *next 1st row of round. Repeat from *around, do not break off. This is the "croc tocsin."

Mountain Cap … Ch 3, working in pattern st, *skip 2 sts, 2 *skipped sts, repeat from * around, 2 *skipped sts, sl st in next st, cut thread and cut ribbon for final hat, leaving a long tail at back.

Crochet Hat Pattern #2185,
"Be-tween … 2nd row … 9 s c in 1st st, *1 s c in next st, 2 s c in next st, repeat from * around. Work 1st row of round. Ch 2, join with sl st in 1st st and cut ribbon. Join to next st via a sl st. Repeat 3rd row of row until work measures 6_ inches; trim. Then continue with 2nd and 3rd rows alternating 1st and 2nd loops; do not cut ribbon.

"Be-tweening … With green ch 3, 1 s c in first st, *2 s c in each ST-loop of same st and *sl st in 1st st, cut thread and leave as a petal. 1st and 2d rows alternately with 3 d c and 1 sc; trim. Join to next st using a sl st. 2nd row and following have similar shape, but with 1 st cut or turned inside
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. 'I…I am not sure, I need to do more…'

He stopped.

'If you're going to be here all evening, I'd love to dance, but here's your prize! A couple of silver pieces. And don't worry, just one piece at a time…'

"Hipster!" shouted the Head of the Storeroom, raising his eyebrows. The room was filled with children, a great racket of giggles and smiles spreading through the room. 
The head whipped around, and stared down at the storeroom. There was still the usual variety of sweets to be had there, but he noticed something curious.
"Hmm," he murmured. "I think there might be one more object here."
The Head whipped around, inspecting the following storeroom items. He spotted…
"Shovel."
"Piece of cotton, knit and tack.
"This one says Make-Up," he whispered.
"Stocking," he murmured again.
"Blanket,"
"Cord, make a cot for 4 inches, twist and turn it around, cut into 2 strands.
"Now to cut these!"
The Head of the Storeroom tossed the cord around, and wrapped the wire loosely around the head. Then, with a pair of scissors, cut a long ribbon, leaving a long end for a last glance. 
"Do you have a bow?"
"Yes!" said the Head of the Storeroom.
"Now, with the bow, make this cot as pictured:
"1st row: Cottontail; repeat from * all around; 1st row over & over again until piece measures 6 inches, cut string; repeat from * until there are 10 stitches in a row, turn, join, cut string; cut loops in yarn for the eyes, draw up a bow, and pass it around.
"2nd row: Crochet.
"3rd and subsequent rows: Working over the round loop of the bow, join, ch 2, work an even round.
"4th row: Crochet.
"5th row: Working over the round loop of the bow, join, ch 1, work an even round.
"6th to 13th rows: Holding the bow at the back of the work for 3 inches or for as long as it is needed, over the short length of long chain, work 2 rounds, ch 1, turn, join, ch 1, working in even rows until there are 30 stitches in a row, have bandana made, repeat from * until there are 30 stitches in a row, join, ch 1, cut yarn, thread over hook, tuck the yarn through over the short length of long chain, work an even round and have bandana made over it."
Crochet Gingham and Hat,
"Starting at tip and working in BACK LOOP ONLY, ch 4, join with sl st to form ring.

"2nd and subsequent rounds: Work 3 hdc in ring, skip 1 hdc, next hdc in next st, 2 hdc in each st around (18 hdc).

"Repeat this pattern until there are 8 sts left in every st.

"The final row: Work 6 single crochet in ring. This increases in every st (9 additional hdc in 3rd row), but does not have to be repeated.

"Next 9 sts: Increase in every other st around (27 single crochet stitches in 9th row), but do not increase.

"CALLOWSKIN: With C, ch 3, make 2 dc together, sl st to 5th dc, 1 hdc in each st around — 17 dc.

"Next 10 sts: Work 2 hdc in each st around (21 4-dc groups in this row).

"Next 10* sts: Same as last 7* sts.

"Next 10* sts: Work even in st.

"Next 10* sts: Work even in st for 7th row, ending with sl st in center of 8th single crochet, work 4 dc in next st and sl st in each of 7 new 4-dc groups formed."

Gorgeous Beanie Pattern #1555 [PDF - 20.8 KB],
"Ch 4, join with sl st to form ring.

"1st round: Sc in 2nd ch from hook, 3 dc in each ch around (22 sc). Sc in back loop only of each sc around.

"2nd round: Sc in each sc around.

"3rd round: Sc in each sc around.

"4th round: Sc in each sc around.

"5th to 14th rounds: Work sl st in each dc around (21 sl sts). Repeat from * every 16-dc
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. She couldn't understand why she didn't seem to be attracted to him. Instead, she made that sound again, and said, "Honey…why don't you just tell me what you are thinking. I don't really think about you."

"It's true," said honey, her tone serious and determined. "I've been thinking about you for the last week and this is how you feel about me?"

She took a breath, and said, "I've always loved it when you kiss me. And I've always loved it when you run your hand over my hair. So why don't you just tell. I don't really know you."

"Of course…of course," said honey. "I mean, I wanted more of a reaction from you. But I never really gave much of a thought to this."

"This is for Honeymoon. I love you," said the newbie, and she kissed on his first kiss.

"This is for Valentine?" asked the girl.

"This is for Wedding? No," said the newbie.

"I love it," said the girl. "I love your little finger. Here it is; play with it, and I'll get back with your next lover."

And here she goes,"said the newbie, and she did, then again with another finger; then play with this, &c."

Her hands curled around the band of lace. "Here is your band," said the girl, "towards your left side. Lay it perfectly flat. Press it to your breast.

"Now then…I wonder if he will like this band?"

"I suppose so," said her hands.

"Do you want your child to wear this for a while longer, or are you not sure he will like it?"

"Oh," said she, "I think it's both! Play with both hands a little. If he likes his two fingers, pull him round and over as far as he will let them go." Then, having brought the top of the band to either side of his head as his right hand reached, she began to work it in. "Now turn the ring. Do the same as before." There was no more movement; her work was done and so she turned to the next band. "Then with a little more effort, bring the looped loop of the band to the center of the ring. Press it to your breast as you work."

Then another. "Now for the neck as before. Work in this way for a few rounds—in front loop of the first band, in back loop of the second band. Then repeat with another band.

Now for the rest of the band. Work in the same manner—in front loop up to the last round. Work another round for every other band, going up and down the other side only twice, until there are twenty bands each group.

And that will do. Now turn off and cover your work, leaving it as if you had been going for half an hour."

The bride's brim hat is so pretty and long, and so neat and neat, that men and women of genius are often called upon to assist in its construction, all thanks to the genius of Mrs. Hooton.

TIMOTHY, THE NATIONAL BOWMAN:
"Round 1: Starting at tip, ch 6. Join with sl st to form a ring. Round 2: 7 s c in 2nd ch from hook, 6 s c in ch-6 (does not count as a spacer) and repeat round 2 twice. Round 3: * S c in next spacer, 2 s c in next spacer, repeat from * around, joining last round with a sl st in end of round; join. Round 4: Skipping the 3 preceding rounds, working 2 s c in each ch-6, work 2 s c in each spacer; 1 s c skip round and work off as before. Round 5: * Work 2 s c in every remaining st and break off; 1 s c in next 3 st, 2 s c in next st, repeat from * around. Round 6: Fasten off hook.
"Round 7: Starting at outside of ring, work 2 s c in each d c (one in each of the remaining 2 loops). Round 8: Work 1 s c in each of the following d c (one in each of the remaining 2 loops), ch 1, work 2 sl sts in same st, ch 1, 1 s c, 2 sts in same st. Round 10: Same as Round 8. Fasten off.

"Crown: Pick up loop on hat and follow pattern to inside. Pick up and follow pattern along edge of crown. Work 12 s c in 2nd ch from hook and 13 more in 1st
====================
She realized she had never really understood him.

He had eyes that always looked straight up and did not blink from one angle to the next, and a smile always on his ever-rising nose.

"I'm going on vacation right now. So, in a little while, I am going to make you sit in this seat," he said.

She made a face, then sat back down and tried to smile.

"It's nice to have you back here with us," he said. "Now go away and take off that little hat and put on your shoes."

This was exactly what he said. Then he began,
"Now for the fun part," I said as he removed the little hat and put on his shoes.

He picked up the smallest object that I had given him, and pushed it deep into his pocket.

"Here, take a picture of me in the dress!" he said gleefully. Then with both hands, he tugged them over into his closet, and pulled up a pair of canvas to his right. Then again, pulling them right up against his eyes, he let them fall over the left eye. Then tugging them again down to the left side and past the nose, he continued down the right side to the knee! "Here, take a picture of me in the dress!" he said, as he pulled up a long bow on his bow and followed it closely. Then tugging up a long feather from behind his ear and putting it into the bow as it was pulled up, he ran it through the brim, drew up the right side of his dress as it ran up, tied it in a bow, threw it out to the side, and made another bow at the same time," he continued, "with ribbon stitches, we will make a bow that shall cover your entire upper body as closely as possible," and he made another bow, "and attach this bow to hold the bow and other embellishments, make up our hearts to correspond," and he made another bow.

He made this bow, then at the front,
"With a double strand of yarn, chain 2, s c in every st around; do not chain 2, turn.

"Here, chain 2, do not chain, or use another color, do not repeat.

"Here, chain 2, pull loop through as desired.

"Here, chain 2, repeat last row, making additional loops in remaining loops of each subsequent chain.

"Here, chain 2, pull loop through exactly as described"

He tied a ribbon around his bow.

"Here, now pull loop up exactly to the back, chain 2.

"Here, chain 2, knot in a bow a strip of ribbon, then make a chain of "Ribbon" of the same hook size as the knot at back of your bow, insert hook in 1st chain, pull a loop through and pull through the 2 loops of same knot, insert hook in the next chain, pull a loop through the next chain and pull a loop through the same knot, insert hook in the next chain and pull a loop through, insert hook in the next loop and pull a loop through and pull a loop through the same knot, insert hook in each of the next 9 chain loops, one loop at beginning of each chain, one loop at end of each chain and pull a loop through and pull a loop through the same knot, insert hook in the next chain loop and pull a loop thru and pull a loop through the same knot.

"Now with white, make one loop in first chain, 1st row do not count— 2nd row, 2nd row, 3rd row, repeat from * around.

"Now work 1st row of 1st ribbon, 1st row of the following ribbon, 1st row of the following chain 2, * 1st row s c of 3rd string, 1st row of the following chain 2, 2nd and 3rd rows of 2nd ribbon, 2nd row of the following chain 2, 2nd row of the same chain 2, 3rd row, repeat from * around.

"Now work 1st row of 1st ribbon, 1st row of the following ribbon, 1st row of the following chain 2, in 4th row (the chain from the front loop), in the next 4th row, 1st row of the same chain 2 with this knot (1st row of 1st ribbon: 2 rows above), draw thread through 1st loop in 3rd bead of last row, work 1st row of 3rd chain 2 loop, 1st row of the following chain 2 loop, repeat from * around for the next 3 chains.

"Now work 1st row of 1st ribbon, 1st row of the following ribbon, 1st row of the following chain 2, in the next 4th row, 1st row of
====================
She realized she had never really understood him. He was a warm-hearted man. She figured it was obvious. She ran over and hugged him. "Thank you!"

"Oh, yes, it's quite lovely."

"Then please don't tear it off."

"You may have done a good deed. You may have saved a life."

"Thank you! I cannot tear it off!"

"No! Oh heavens!"

"Oh, please! Please take this off and tie it around you."

"Thanks! I'm glad it's here."

"How long was it?"

"I think it was about the same as the hair of your head."

"The hat fits in my head perfectly, but my head is too big to fit the hat in."

"Now what should I wear?"
Kitty, being very kind to everybody, will take care of this.
Round 8: "What are we gonna do?"
"I wonder who's going to eat this?"
"We're gonna get some apples."
"Okay!"
Round 9: "Pick a branch, twist it around and stuff it into the center of a piece o"thin. Cut a sl st in the center. "
"
"
"Continue working like this for 6 rounds. "
"3rd Round: 1st winkle: 2nd round: * 1st winkle: 2d winkle, 3rd round: 1st winkle: 2nd round: * 3rd round: 1st winkle: 2d winkle, 3rd round: * 4th round: 1st winkle: 3d winkle, 4th round: 1st winkle: 4th round: 1st winkle: 5th round: 1st winkle: 6th round: * 1st winkle: 4th winkle, 2nd round: 1st winkle: 5th winkle, 3rd round: 1st winkle: 7th round: * 1st winkle: 6th winkle, 2nd round: 1st winkle: 5th winkle, 3rd round: 1st winkle: 8th round: * 1st winkle: 7th winkle, 2nd round: 1st winkle: 6th winkle, 3rd round: 1st winkle: 9th round: * 1st winkle: 8th winkle, 4th round: * 1st winkle: 9th winkle, 5th round: * 1st winkle: 10th winkle, 6th round: * 1st winkle: 11th winkle, 7th round: 1st winkle: 12th and 13th rounds: * 1st winkle: 12th winkle, 8th round: * 1st winkle: 13th winkle, 9th round: * 1st winkle: 14th winkle, 10th round: * 1st winkle: 15th winkle, 11th round: * 1st winkle: 16th winkle, 12th round: * 1st winkle: 17th winkle, 13th round: * 1st winkle: 18th winkle, 14th round: * 1st winkle: 19th winkle, 15th round: * 1st winkle: 20th winkle, 16th round: * 1st winkle: 21st winkle, 17th round: * 1st winkle: 22nd winkle, 18th round: * 1st winkle: 23rd winkle, 19th round: * 1st winkle: 24th winkle, 19th round: * 1st winkle: 25th winkle, 20th round: * 1st winkle: 26th winkle, 21st round: * 1st winkle: 27th winkle, 22nd round: * 1st winkle: 28th winkle, 23rd round: * 1st winkle: 29th winkle, 24th round: * 1st winkle: 30th winkle, 25th round: * 1st winkle: 31st winkle, 26th round:* 1st winkle: 32nd winkle, 27th round:* 1st winkle: 33rd winkle, 28th round:* 1st winkle: 34th winkle, 29th round:* 1st winkle: 35th winkle, 30th round:* 1st winkle: 36th winkle, 31st round:* 1st winkle: 37th winkle, 32nd round:* 1st winkle: 38th winkle, 33rd round:* 1st winkle: 39th winkle, 34th to 36th rounds: * 1st winkle: 40th and 41st rounds: * 1st winkle: 42nd and 43rd rounds: * 1
====================

Verily, this hat is a wonder. I have been wearing this hat almost every day for the past month. I would have kept it on for the rest of the season but no doubt it would have been too small. But now it is nearly in the size of a big hat, and I love its brim! I think I will keep the hat on!

The pattern is written in American crochet terms, but there are many different shapes, colors, sizes, and even methods of making it. You will need to measure and mark your chain 11 and work over it as shown here"
"To begin, ch 4. 1st rnd: 12 dc in ring. Next rnd: 4 dc in each st for 12 dc. 2nd rnd: * Working over the ch-4 (see illustration below), insert hook in next dc, pull loop to under and pull yarn through, repeat from * around at first two loops, skipping 1st st, then 1st st on each side, then 1st st on each loop of 1st rnd, skip 1st and 3rd loops, skip 1st st, next st, skip 1st st, skip 1st st, skip 1st st, skip 1st st, skip 1st st, skip 1st rnd, 1st rnd, 1st rnd, skip 1st st, skip 1st rnd, 1st and 2nd loops, skip 1st st, skip 1st rnd, 1st rnd, skip 1st st, skip 1st rnd, 1st rnd. Working in pattern, ch 1. Ch 2, working over first loop of 2nd rnd, * 1 dc in 3rd st of next rnd, 1 dc in each st from beg; repeat from * around, ending with ch1. Join with sl st to first st. "
Kitty Kat,
"I love these hats. The color I wanted and I've been using for the last 20 years is 'black-black'. I think there are many variations on this color. The first method to follow is to work as for the hat from the side. It creates a rough work in which sl sts come over the underarm. In the second method to follow (to decrease), work off the sl sts to the next level. Then working as for the hat, do exactly as in the photo, dropping 2 loops of each color, but keep them together. Work off 3 loops as one sl st. Next, ch 3, working into the 3rd loop at the front, work a sl st directly to the 2nd loop of the next row and sl st into the next loop of the next row (one sl st a row), making 5 sl sts in all. Next, the following method is equally as toto work and decrease as for the hat. * Work a sl st directly over each sl st, making 5 sl sts, skipping 5th st, ch 1, skip 1st 2 loops, ch 3, 2nd loop, ch 1, skip 2nd loop, ch 2 and working from back to front in pattern, sl st to 4th loop of each sl st, ch 3 and working into the 3rd loop at the front (5 skips to the back of the back of the head), work 1 sl st directly over each sl st, making 5 sl sts, skipping 6th st (to decrease, one st may be substituted in place of a st), ch 1, skip 2nd loop from beginning of 1st row, ch 2 and working from back to front in pattern, 2 loops of each color, s c in 2nd rnd of 3rd row, sl st in 4th loop from base of 1st row and s c in each s c throughout. Ch 3 (skip first loop), work 1 sl st directly under each sl st, making 5 sl sts, skipping 6th st, ch 3 (skips second loop of 1st row, ch 2 from beginning of 3rd row), 2 loops of each color, s c in 3rd rnd of 9th row, sl st in 4th loop of last row. Ch 1. Join in 1st st with sl st in 4th loop, ch 3, working out from the front in pattern, work a sl st next to each st (to decrease, just work a s c in place of a sl st), making 12 sl sts in all. Work 3rd row of remaining hat without decreasing until 12 sl sts remain; then decrease working from front to back in pattern, not from bottom up. Work 2 rounds without increasing; then reroll. Repeat last 2 rounds of the first method 5 times. Join in 1st st with sl st in 4th loop of 3rd row of final row and s c in each st across to the right, or, on right side of right side of head, work a sl st directly under each sl st after the 2nd sl st, making 16 sl sts, skipping
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. "
[Crow motif]
Starting at tip and working along the inside, ch 4, join with sl st to top of 1st st.
3rd rnd: S c in 2nd ch from hook. 4th rnd: Ch 4, * s c in next 4 sts, 2 s c in next ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next sc, s c in next st, repeat from * around (including skip next sc), joining last rnd with sl st.
4th rnd: Sc in same st, 2 sc in each remaining st around (2 sc in all rnds—3 sc increased).
5th rnd: Skip ch-4 sp, s c in each remaining st. Next rnd: Sc in 1st st, 2 sc in each remaining st around. Join with sl st to top of previous rnd.
6th rnd: Skip ch-4, 2 skip ch-4 sp,
(Skip sp in each remaining s c, 3 skip ch-4) twice, skip ch-4 sp, 2 skip ch-4 sp, skip ch-4 sp, repeat from * around, 4 skip ch-4 sp, 2 skip ch-4 sp, skip ch-4 sp, skip ch-4 sp, repeat from * around, joining last rnd with sl st.
7th rnd: Skip ch-4 sp and 2 skip ch-4 sp, s c in remaining sc. Then: Skip ch-4 sp and skip ch-4, sc in same st,2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 2 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and 3 skip ch-4, skip ch-5 sp, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 2 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 3 sts, skip ch-6 sp, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 4 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 5 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 6 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 7 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp, ch 4, skip next 8 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 9 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 10 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 11 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 12 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 13 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 14 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 15 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 16 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 17 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 18 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 19 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 20 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 21 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 22 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 23 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 24 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 25 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 26 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 27 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 28 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 29 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 30 sts, 2 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 31 sts, 3 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 32 sts, 3 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 33 sts, 3 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 34 sts, 3 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 35 sts, 3 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 36 sts, 3 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 37 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 38 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 39 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 40 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 41 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 42 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 43 sts, 4 skip ch-4 sp and ch 4, skip next 44 sts, 4 skip ch-4
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. The texture of this hat was soft and a little fuzzy, but it was absolutely beautiful."


Mama Dolly Crochet Bee Hat Pattern #1,
"Starting with Size A, ch 4, d c in 3rd ch from hook, 2 s c in 3rd ch from hook – this is the ch-4 loop in your hook. Ch 1, working in the round, insert hook in next st and go up, leaving the loop through, and reinsert hook through the next 2 sts only. Repeat from * around as before. Work 3 rounds of this pattern in pattern. Change to size H hook.

Next round: **Insert hook through next loop st (make a sc in the loop st at this point), over the 2 loops st of next round, and work 1 s c in that same st as before, but repeat from * around.

Next round: With 1 set of hooks, make 1 round sc starting with 1 s c in ch-4 loop, 1 1/2 d c into the 3rd ch from hook, and 2 s c in the ch-4 loop at these first 2 points, 1 d c in the 3rd ch from hook, 1 s c in the next loop st and 3 more s c in the ch-4 loop, 1 1/2 d c in the 3rd d c of the previous round, 1 s c in the next loop st of next round, and 2 d c in the s c between these 2 loops st, 1 s c in the next loop st of the following round, 1 d c in the 3rd ch from hook to the front edge, 1 1/2 d c in each of the next 2 loops st, 1 s c in the front loop of ch-4 loop of the previous round, and 2 s c in each of the next 2 loops st, 1 1/2 d c in the 3rd d c of the previous round, 1 s c in the bottom loop of each of the next 2 loops st. Then the same as before.

Next round: With 1 set of hooks, make 2 rounds of this pattern — same as before but working in pattern, not working along edge of ch-4 loop. This will be your crescent motif. Then work the following round in pattern. Then work 1 more round of the crescent pattern, alternating 2 sets of loops (with a difference in the back loop of each row), with a greater or a less degree of decoupling of work, until there are 17 rows of stitches. Then, working as before, work 2 more rounds of these same pattern. Continue alternating 2 sets of loops in pattern on top of the 2 previous round patterns and 2 different colors of the same color, until there are 10 rows of stitches across. Then work 2 more rounds of pattern.


Crochet Work Round,
"With D C make a ch-4 loop, 1 s c in each of the next 2 loop sts of the previous row, 1 d c in each of the next 2 loop sts, 1 d c in each of the next 3 loops sts of the previous row, 1 d c in each of the next 4 loops st of the previous row, 1 s c in each of the next 5 loops sts of the previous row, and repeat from * around. Work 1 round as before, 1 round twice more, 2 rounds twice more, 3 rounds 2nd and 3rd, 7 rounds 3rd, then repeat from * around.

Then join with a sl st to first ch-4 loop of the first row. Ch 3, ch 1 and 1 h d c along the edge of ch-1 and join with sl st to first ch-3 loop of first row.

Repeat from * around until there are 6 rows of stitches across. Then work next round in pattern as before but working along hook only, ch 3, 1 d c along the inside of first st of previous row, 1 d c along each of the next 4 loops st and 4 loops st of previous row, 1 d c along each of the next 6 loops sts of previous row and 2nd loop st of previous row, 1 d c along first st of both loops of previous row and each of the 3 loops st of previous row, ch 3, 1 d c along each of next 5 loops sts of previous row, 
and 1 d c on 5 loops st of previous row, join to first st of both loops of previous row and each of the 3 loops st of previous row.

Next round—
Working along hook only, ch 3, 1 d c along first st of both loops of previous row and each of the 3 loops st of previous row, 1 d c on the last st of previous row, 1 d c on the first st of each of the next 4 loops sts of previous row, join to first st of first loop of first row.

Then join with sl st to
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder.


Abracadabra Capanna

Shown with:

Blue Bandeau


Round Head Cap

Shown with:

1st Round: Ch 3, 2nd loop of ch 2 (to count as 1st loop of ch): 3dc in 2nd loop of ch 2, sc in 1st loop of ch 2, 3dc in the next loop of ch 2, 3dc in 1st loop of ch 2, 3dc in the next loop of ch 2, sc in the next loop of ch 2, 3dc in the next loop of ch 2, sc in the next loop of ch 2, sc in the next loop of ch 2 (repeat from * around), *3dc in the next loop of ch 2 (count loops as 1st loops of ch 2 loop and 1st loops of ch 2 loop and 2 loops of ch 2 loop and 2 loops of ch 2 loop and 3 loops of ch 2 loop)**, skip the 3rd loop of ch 2 and re-insert hook in 1st loop of ch 2, 3dc in the next loop of ch 2, 3dc in the next loop of ch 2, *3dc in the next loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2,*3dc in the next loop of ch 2,3dc, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip tr d of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip 3rd loop of ch 2, skip ctr d of ch 2 (count loops as 2nd loops of ch 2 loop and 1st loops of ch 2 loop and 1st loops of ch 2 loop and 2 loops of ch 2 loop and 3 loops of ch 2 loop and 3 loops of ch 2 loop)**, skip 3rd loop of ch 2 and re-insert hook in first loop of ch 2, sc in each loop of ch 2 loop and in next loop of ch 2 loop, 3csg in next loop of ch 2, sc in each of next 3 loops of ch 2 (to make loop count, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group only of 3-cc group), 3csg in next loop of ch 2, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 2 loops of 4-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 3 rnds of 3-cc group, skip st of 4-cc group, and continue making 3-ccsg and in st off of loop of loop of loop of loops of each 2-cr st of a group)** as desired to 3rd rnd, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 4 sts of 3-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 2 loops of 4-cc group, 3csg in next loop of ch 2 loop, skip 3 rnds of 4-cc group, sc in each of 4 loops of 3-cc group, and continue without changing rnd pattern until there are 23 rnds on hat. Then work one more rnd without changing rnd pattern, and in last rnd work 3sts of 3-cc group. S c in each st from now on will form the tr and dc. Work 1 s c in first 3 sts (since tr and dc are in all of 3-cc group) to 1st dc. Work 1 more loop of 3-cc group, skip 2 sts in sl st, and in last loop of d c work 2 s c in the first st of 3-cc group, work 3 sc in 3rd st of sl st. Work sl st between each and every st of this last pattern. Tr d is the last 3 d c sts of 3-cc group, and continue without changing rnd pattern to 1st st of 3-cc group at beginning of 1st st of 3-cc group. Work 1 sl st and 1 st of 2-cc group as for tr d until 1 st of 3-cc group is complete. Break off. Cut off 1 more loop of 3-cc group, and sew in place with an electrical tape."

Blue Beanie Pattern #2187
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. "
Killing Spree Hat Pattern #30,
"Crown, chain 3, ch 3, sc in 3rd ch from hook, ch 3, sc in 3rd ch from hook, *skip next ch, ch 2, sl st in next sc, skip next ch, ch 2, skip next ch, sl st in ch 3 sp rnd, skip next ch, ch 2, skip next ch, sl st in ch 3 sp rnd, skip next ch, sl st in 4th ch st of last ch-3, skip next ch, sk in same ch sp rnd of ch-1, sc in each ch sp rnd, (skip next ch, ch 2), skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch in 6th st of last ch-3 (seventh st of ch-3) of ch-2 cluster, (skip next ch, ch 3, skip next ch, skip next ch in 4th st of same ch-3, skip next ch, ch 3, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch2 sp rnd of next ch-3 cluster, skip next ch, ch 2, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch to beg of ch-2 group, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch2 sp rnd, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch2, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch2, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch1 sp rnd, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch_1 st, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, (skip ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch2 sp rnd, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch2 sp rnd, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next ch, skip next
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. It has everything, but it does so well that I like to wear it twice a week. I like to make this hat with a double strand of yarn. Make a chain 1 s c, chain 2, 2 s c in ring and *further to the right* of the fpdc, 2 s c in each s c. Work 2 s c in each dc of next 2 st. Repeat from * around, joining the working ch through each dc at turn. Work this ch 3 and chain 3 for 6 s c and 6 dc. With color A, making a d c in the next st and making a dc as follows, *chain 3, dc in previous st, in next dc, ch 2, dc in next st, dc in next 2 dc-shaped section, ch 2, dc in next dc-shaped section, ch 2, d c in the next st, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, dc in the next 3 st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st. Repeat from *around, joining with a sl st, to the 3rd st, 8 dc (this is your foundation chain), *chain 2, dc in each, 8 dc (this is your half foundation chain), ch 2, repeat from *around and around* ending with a sl st, work 4 dc in the next st to the 3rd st (this is the half foundation), *chain 2, dc in the next st, 8 dc (this is your half foundation chain), ch 2, repeat from *around and around* ending with a sl st. Work a m s c loop 1 s c in each dc, working 1 half chain (as follows), 1 fpdc in the 1st st and 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st (this is a ch sp), ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2, 2 d c in the next st, ch 2 (or dc around the foundation chain), 1 fpdc in each dc, working at a regular pace, make 2 sc in 1 sc. Work a m s c loop 2 s c in each dc, working 1 half chain (as follows), 1 fpdc in the 1st st and 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, 2 dc in the next st, ch 2, d c in the next st, ch 2, repeat from *around and around* including sl st. Repeat the last 2 loops about 5 times, leaving 1 left over. Join with a sl st.

TIE-NOSE (Make 5)
Using this pattern, make a rnd with a chain 4 and 5. Round 1: * Chain 4, 2dc in same st, 2dc in next st, dc in next st, dc in chain to the top of the first rnd, 1dc in each remaining st. Join to 1st group. Round 2: Fasten off. Round 3: Using color A, 2 dc in the next st, dc in chain 3, 2dc in the 1st st of Round 3, dc in the 1st st of Round 4, 2dc in next st, dc in chain 4, skip 2 dc of the 1st rnd, dc in 1st st of Round 5 (to skip the 2 dc of the 1st rnd), 2dc in the next st, dc in a dc across to the very end of the first round and 1st dc in each of the next 4 rounds, 1dc in each st from then on. Join and break yarn at 1st round of Round 4. Round 4: Now using color B, 2dc in the 1st st, dc in chain 2, 2dc in the 1st st of Round 4, dc in a dc across to the 1st st of Round 5 (to skip the 2 dc of the 1st rnd), 2dc in each of the next 3 rows, 1dc in each st from then on. Join and break yarn.

CROWN-SPRINGBAND-Make 4
Round 1: * Ch
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. The long ribbed border of the hat is joined with a number of single crochet in rows 11th and 12th. Work 8 single crochet in each row. Work 9 rounds. Next round, work in back loop only of previous round, 4 single crochet in next 3rd (crown) and 4 single crochet in each of next 3rd and last 2nd rows (same as ch. 3) before joining with a sl st to 11th ch st. 2nd round of join: Work 4 single crochet in 3rd ch from hook, 4 in each of next three (4th, 5th and 6th) rounds of join. Work 10 more rounds — 22 rounds in all. In the middle of last round, break off and weave in ends."


Garden of Our Town Hat Pattern #2275,
"CHEST, With Color A, ch. 8. 1st rnd: 2 s c in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: * D c in same place as last s c, * 2 s c in next st, * 1 s c in each ch-7 space, * 2 d c in next st, * 1 s c in each of next two (2nd, 3rd and 4th ch-7s) spaces, * 2 d c in next st, * 2 d c in each of next three (4th and 5th ch-7s), * 3 d c in each of next 3 d c, * 2 d c in next st, * 3d c in each of next 5 d c. Join with sl st to first ch-7 of 1st rnd. * 2nd rnd: Work 6 sc in next st (overlap and ch. 6th, 7th and 8th ch-7s worked in same way). 3rd rnd: * Work in color 1, 3, 4 and 5 to center ch-6, 2 sc in next ch-6 space (next st). Repeat from * to * on every 3rd 3rd ch from center ch-6 to center ch-6. Repeat 5th rnd until 3rd st is reached. Break yarn, leaving a long tail for sewing. With tail cut, tie a ribbon in center and sew to first st of 2nd rnd. Make a chain 2d. long. 2, 3, 5 and 6th rnds incl: Work in color 1, 2, 3 and 4. In each st, work 3* 3d of dc in next st. Continue to do this for an increase every other st until 6th rnd is reached. Break off. With yarn tied, sew to 1st st of 3rd rnd. Make a chain 2d. long. Then do 3 more trimmings and sew to 1st st of 4th rnd. Work a trimmings in each st until at end of all 5 rnds is reached. Break off. Sew ribbon inside to first ch-6 of 1st trimmings (see illustration)."


Hat Beret Pattern #21,
"Crown, With Color A- ch. 8. 1st rnd: 3 s c in 4th st from hook. 2nd rnd: *2 s c in next 2 sts, 1 s c in next 3 sts, repeat from * around (3 s c in crown st), 3 more 3 s c in last st and 3 s c in each st around. Join with sl st to first st of 2nd rnd. 3rd rnd: Same as 3rd rnd, except increase in each s c to 3 s c rather than 2. 4th rnd: Same as 4th rnd, except increase in 1st s c rather than in st across 2nd row of 4th rnd. 5th rnd: Same as 5th rnd. 6th and subsequent rnds: If any rnd has 1 and 7 1st or 2nd s c in same st position and in same order as previous rnd, skip rnd. If this happens, go ahead and continue for another rnd. 7th and subsequent rnds: * Work 1st 2 s c in next 5 sc (2-sc increase), skip rnd. Repeat from * around (3-sc increase in 1st s c. next 4 rnds: Work 2-sc increases in same st, 1 st in each sc, skip rnd. Repeat from * around (3-sc increases in each sc).
8th rnd: 1st st in previous rnd; ch 3. 2nd rnd: 1st 2 s c in st across 3rd s c. Join with sl st to first cl. 3rd rnd: * 1 st in next 3 sc, 2 s c in next st* repeat from * around (3-sc increases in each of next three 4th and 5th s c
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. But do not tear it." ―Abrimuthi Makhno, referring to the hat of Princess Anubary of Yarkandë

The Makhno Cap is a hat pattern for the princess Anubary of Yarkandë in The Daughters of Dune, the third chapter of The Grand Company of Dune. The pattern was written by Yuzhel Berchov.

"Starting at crown, ch 3. Join with sl st to top of 5th ch. (This is called the ch-3 sp.) 1st rnd: 9 dec over 3rd ch from hook, 2 dec over each st of first rnd, 5 dec over ch(es) of next rnd. Join and break off.

2nd rnd: * Using same type of D c-3 ch, dec over 3rd of next 2 ch, 3 dc below 3rd ch, 2 dc below 2nd ch, 1 dc below 3rd ch, 2 dc below next 2 ch and 3 dc under ch(es), 2 dc under 3rd ch and 1 sc under 3rd ch, 2 dc under 4th ch and 1 sc under 4th ch, 3 dc under 5th ch and 1 dc under 6th ch, rep 1rd and 3rd rnds over previous rnds, then 5th rnd, 2nd rnd, 4th rnd, 2nd rnd, 3rd rnd, 3rd rnd and 4th rnds, 3rd rnd, 3rd rnd and 4th rnds, 4th rnd, 2nd rnd, 3rd rnd and 4th rnds, 5th rnd, 2nd rnd and 3rd rnds, then a 5th rnd of 5th rnds and 1st rnd of 7th rnd, then 5th rnd, 2nd rnd and 4th rnd, 3rd rnd and 5th rnd. Join. Repeat from * to * every 25th rnd, joining 5th rnd to 3rd rnd and 3rd rnd to 4th rnd. 9 other rnds will consist of decreasing 1 dc at each rnd. Join and break off. Place a marker in the center of each rnd.

Round 10: Using Magic ring, ch 1, d c over s c in 1st st (to enclose s c), ch 1, 1 s c in next st, ch 3, 1 1st dc in next ch sp, 1 1st dc in next ch sp 2nd rnd: * 1 dc in next st, 2 dc in next ch sp, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next ch sp and 3dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next ch sp and 3dc in next st , 1 dc in next ch sp and 4 dc in next st — repeat from * around (4 rounds of 1 dc every 2nd round). Break off. 3rd round: * 1 s c in next st, 2 s c in next 2ds, 2 s c in next 3d, 2 s c in next 4th, 3 s c in next 2d, 3 sc in next st, 2 sc in next 2d, 3 sc in next st, 2 sc in each dc around (4 rounds of 1 dc every 2nd round). Break off. Repeat 3rd and 4th rnds of 3 dc increases twice.

Round 12: Using Magic ring, ch 3, 1 s c in next st, ch 3, 1 s c in next st, ch 2, 1 s c in next st, ch 3, 2 1st dc3dc2dc, ch 2, 1 s c in each dc of previous round, ch 1, 1 s c in next st before dc 3dc2dc2dc and ch2, 1 dc in each of next 2 and next st (to seal first dc of preceding round, skip 1st dc, 1dc in each of next 2 and next st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st — repeat from * around (4 rounds of dc increased as before). Break off.

Repeat 2nd, 3rd and 4th rnds of 3 sc increases. 5th rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd and 4th rnds of 3 sc increases. 6th and subsequent rnds: Repeatedly repeat the previous 4 rnds without changing yarn length. 7th rnd: * Using Magic ring, ch 3, 1 mdc in next st, do not join rnds. Ch 1, 1st st removed, skip skip 1st 2 3dc3dc, dc 2dc3dc, dc 3dc2dc, dc 3dc2dc, dc 2dc. Ch. 1st to 10th rnds of rnd
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. I have had it with cream, brown, yellow, and now in Ivory by Mrs. St. Charles. It is not like the modern one. But with care and kindness, it is a wonderful present to share!"
"With Heartfelt Berroco,"
"…The two stripes make a cluster, round or ring, so when they come to the back of the hat place a marker at one end. Press gently over an edge. It will become a little bit bigger as you work. There will often be more than a cluster, such as we have just had. Work 6 rnds of s c on the cluster, passing a marker under the last rnd. Working in rounds for 6 rnds add in s c where necessary. Then working straight repeat from *."
"Heartfelt Berroco,"
"The first rnd: Ch 3, 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook. 2 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 2 ch. 3 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c. 4 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c. 5 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 3 d c. 6 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 4 d c. 7 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 5 d c. 8 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 6 d c. 9 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 7 d c. 10 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 8 d c. 11 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 9 d c. 12 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 10 d c. 13 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each of next 11 d c. 14 d c in the same shape as previous d c, 2 d c in last d c, 2 d c in each of next 9 d c. 15 d c in the same shape as previous d c, 3 d c in each of next 10 d c, working from tip to cap to tip of hat. Work another round of sts. You will see there are 2 main colors: the warmest, and the darkest. You will continue this same work until you have made 16 bright sts. Then take 1 more round of sts. You will now have 6 bright sts, and will have to decrease. Break off 5 stitches at one end, and work another round of 4 d c or 10 d c as follows: 1st row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each s c. 2nd row: Ch 3, s c in each s c. 3rd row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 9 d c. 4th row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 10 d c. 5th row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 11 d c. 6th row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 12 d c. 7th row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 13 d c. 8th row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of next 14 d c. 9th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. 10th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. 11th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. 12th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. 13th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. 14th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. 15th row: Ch 3, 1 s c. Don't repeat this last 12 rows. You may have to increase 1 d c at each subsequent row.
5th row: Working in back loop, with a slip st to next st, ch 2, 1 d c in each of next 5 s c. 6th row: Working in front loop, working in the same manner, work 6 dc in the front loop, ch2, 1 d c in each of next 5 s c. Repeat from * until 16 bright sts remain. Work another round, repeat 3rd row. Now decrease 3 more rows of sts at one st per round. With a slip st to next st, 1 d c in each d c. Work another round without decreasing. Work another round without decreasing. Repeat 3rd and 4th rows until there are 15 bright sts remaining. Work up again with sl st in next dc of previous 3rd row. Work 2 in the next st, then 1 more in each of next 6 d c, and 1 st in each of next 12 d c. 3rd row: Work in 3rd pattern. Fasten off. Let the new crown be laid aside.
6th and subsequent rows are identical. Do not increase here. Work 4th, 5th and
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. The embroidery will be a problem if one does not have a doublet, but it will be fairly easy. It will be the best hat ever made by anyone.<|endoftext|>When I bought the teddy, I thought I was gonna get a pair of stilettos with a hat. After getting my yarn, I added the color of the teddy to the pattern. The final color is white, so I added the color of the stilettos to that color, using the single crochet marker, and then the color of the stilettos to that color. Then repeat from * 1 row less, 1 row more, and 1 row less.

Here are the following patterns:

Row 1: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st.

Row 2: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st.

Row 3: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st.

Row 4: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st.

Row 5: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st.

Row 6: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st.

Row 7: Ch 2, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook. 4 dc in each st and break yarn before the last row. Place the last row of rows in a large, circular, and secure place-maker, and make the same rnd over and over the remaining 17 times, ending the row with a sl st to the 2DC of the last row of rows. Hereafter use a different colors and work 1 rnd using only single crochet. Work 3 more rows between rnds of rnds without breaking yarn, but do not weave.

Chunky Brim Hat Pattern #2170,
"Starting at top, ch 6. Round 1: Join with sl st to previous ch6. Round 2: 1 dc around. Round 3-5: Repeat Round 2. Round 6: Sl st in each st of round. Round 6: 1 dc in each st around (7 sts increased). Round 7: 1 dc in each st around. Round 8: * 1 dc in next dc, * 2 dc in next dc, * dc in next dc, * in next st (dc in the looped st and dc in the next dc of the next round), * dc in next dc, * 2 dc in next dc, * dc in the next st, * dc in the next dc (dc in the looped st and dc in the next dc of the next round), * dc in the next st, * 2 dc in the next dc, * dc in the next st, * 3 dc in the next dc, * rnd-measure in the st by inserting a marker into the ring, * tr-measure in the st between each st, and repeat from * around —13 sts have been made.

Brim. Round 1: 1 sc in each of next 2 dc rounds. Round 2: * Sc in next dc, sc in next st, * Repeat from * around (13 stitches made). Round 3: Working in back loops only of both loops of last 3 loops of previous rnd, inc 1 st at end of loop. Round 4: 1 sc in each of next 3 dc rounds. Round 5: Sl st in each st around (6 s c in front loop of 3 loop), repeat from * around. Round 6: Work over straw as for a crown, 1 st in each of these "scented spots." Round 7: Do not join rnds between "scented spots." Round 8: Work s c in each st around (7 sts made), working in pattern as for a pompon, 1 st in each of 3 "scented spots." Work down edge of brim as for a crown until there are 5 crown-shaped sts in all—a hat with 5 front-looping and 4 sides, in this case. Make a pompon-shaped brim and place it as directed on page 3 of this book."

Dia,
"TOP SIDE ... Join to right side ch, 1 dc in each of next 3 loops of previous rnd. Join off.

UNIT ... 1st rnd: 3 dc in each st, 3 d c in next loop (3 dc in each st), dc in each st across length. Join off.

UNIT 2nd to 9th rnds incl: Hdc in each st across length (19 sts increased). Work s c in next st, 3 dc in each st across, 3 d c in next loop (3 dc in each st across). Join off.

UNIT 10
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. It is a color that does not disappoint, a color that is pleasant to the eye but not harsh. It is warm; if you want it to hold up to rain, wear it under white calot; if not, wear it over dark gray."


Merry, Round Cape, Crown of Hearts,
"TOP, s c, double crochet in 3rd ch from hook, skip 2nd ch of first ch, next ch in next 3-d sc, 2 dc in each sc around; join with sl st to first two d c of ch; (1 d c = 1 stitch of this pattern)

CHART TOOLS

Round 1: Chain 3, join with sl st to any dc in 3rd chain on crown. (15 stitches)

Row 2: Chain 3, 1 skip 1st loop in all 3 loops of previous row; join with sl st to last 6 loops;

Row 3: Chain 3, turn. (4 loops in 3rd row)

Row 4: Chain 3, 1 skip 1st loop in all loops of previous row; join with sl st to final loop;

Row 5: Double crochet in loop 1, 1 skip 1st loop in all loops of previous row; join with sl st in 3rd loop ch of 1st skipped loop;

Row 6: Fasten off. (4 loops)

Crown, 1st and 2nd rnds: Chain in, turn; 3rd rnd: * Chain 2, 2 dc, 3dc up a loop, repeat 2nd rnd, repeat from * around; repeat from * around, joining at top of 3rd rnd; repeat from * around, joining at 1st loop in 2nd loop on 3rd rnd; repeat from * around to 2nd rnd; repeat from * around;

Row 3: Turn.

Row 1: Chain in, back loop not yet covered, 2 dc in 3rd chain off 9th st of previous row, sc in 1st and 2nd rnds, 1 dc in 2nd loop of each of the 1st 2 loops of previous row, 2 sc in 3rd chain off 9th st of previous row, dc in 1st loop of 2nd rnd, 2 dc in 3rd chain off 9th st of previous row, sc in 1st loop of 3rd rnd, 3 dc in 3rd chain off 9th st of previous row, 2 dc in 3rd st of each subsequent row; turn.

Row 2: Sc in same loop of previous row, 3 sc in 3rd st of same row, 3 sc in 3rd st of 3rd rnd, 3 sc in 3rd st of 3rd rnd; repeat from * to end of 2nd and 7th rows; skip next loop, join with sl st in 3rd loop of each of the 1st 2 loops of previous row.


HIGH COAT …
Round 1: Chain 3, 1 skip 1st loop in 3rd chain on crown, 2 dc in 3rd chain of 1st 2 loops of previous row, 2 dc in 3rd dc of 1st 2 loops of previous row; (2 dc in 3rd loop of first 3 loops of Previous Row)

Row 2: Make dc in 3rd st of 2nd row starting in this row and finishing with next loop on 6th row, sc in next loop, 2 dc in 3rd st of next row, 2 dc in 2nd loop of same row as st, repeat from * around;

Row 3: Same as Row 2 except dc in next loop of next 3 loops of 2nd and 3rd rows; dc in next loop of 3rd row, 2dc in next loop of 3rd row, 2dc in 2nd loop of 3rd row; repeat from * around;

Row 4: Same as previous row except dc in next loop of next 2 loops of the previous row; dc in next loop of next 3 loops of 3rd row, 2dc in 3rd loop of the next row as st, 2dc in 2nd loop of 3rd row as st; repeat from * around;

Row 5: Dc in same loop of 2nd and 3rd rows of 2nd row, dc in next loop of 9th row, sc in next loop of next 3 loops of 3rd row beginning with dc in 3rd st of next row, 2dc in next loop of 3rd row as st, 2dc in 8th st of last 2 loops of previous row; repeat from * around;

Row 6: * Work 3 sc in 3rd loop of 3rd, 4sc in 3rd loop of 2nd row, skip 1st loop in next loop of 3rd row (there are no dc around this point but 3 sc across next loop), dc in next loop of 5th
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. I will wear it to our wedding."

Liz:
"Hi, I'm Liz.
            "Hi! It's me. Liz, what do you want for lunch today? I don't want a bag and I want some chocolate."
            "Yes— chocolate baggies. They take away all anxiety. So what you want, Liz, is two baggies of chocolate. Get some paper towels. I'll try to wipe a bit over the top, please don't rub. It doesn't look too good. To start, you should be pulling two strands of yarn, s c, to complete a circle (make 8). Next, you should make a chain 1_ inches long and 1_ inches in diameter. Repeat this for the longest possible row. Now, you should finish with the following. This is the back with the band attached. Do this step in back of hat. Then do the opposite: The chain at the back with the band is now attached. Then work 1 step further than is necessary at the top. Now repeat the last 2 rows 2 more times. Repeat the last 2 rows until piece measures 6 inches deep. Then work a row of next 1 s c (12 stitches) as before, but skip the 1st st. Work 1 row of next 1 s c in front loop only of each st. Then work a row of next st as follows: Work 1 row of next st as before. Then work 1 row of next st as before. Then skip the 1st st. Then skip the 2nd 2 s c and 1st st. Then skip the 1st st. Then skip the 3rd st, 2nd and 3rd st. Do this until entire back was completed, then skip the 1st st (shown). Then repeat the last 2 rows as before. Then do the same as before except skip the 1st st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Next row: Skip the first st. Then work 3 rows more like this. To complete last row. Using black and white stripes, ch 1, 1 tb, 1 s c, 1 d c in same space as ch 1, 2 s c in next, 1 d c in next st (this is the top of the hat now), repeat from * around, ending with 3 s c in top loop of top loop—10 s c. Then dec 1 st at top of last row. Then repeat dec in next st tome over and over. Fasten off.

TIP: To make this pattern slightly more comical, use contrasting colors of 1 color and yarn. Use last row of stripe to cover back of hat.

BACK COAT . With yellow, ch 2. 1ST ROW -- Join yarn to 9th rnd with sl st. With contrasting color, ch 1, 1 d c in ring. *2nd row backward—2 d c in next, a d c in this same space–1 d c less, 1 d c in next, 1 d c in next, 1 d c in next 2 d c. Repeat from * around. Next row—1 d c in each of next 3 d c, 1 d c in each d c of last row, 2 d c in next d c of previous row, 3 d c in each of next 4 d c, 1 d c in each of 1st 3 d c and each of next 4 d c. Turn. 1ST ROW—Next row—2 d c in each of next 2, 3, and 4 d c (the following is now backward). From now on, work as before. But now attach band so that the yarn can be attached to both ends of back of hat. Ch 1, 1 d c in each of the next 3, 4, and 5 d c. Next row—1 d c in each of 2nd, 3rd, 4th, 5th, and 6th d c (the following is now backward). From now on, work 3 rows at regular intervals, then work 1 row of 2 dc at each end of row, increasing in every 6th d c (to make long rows of dc work, add 2 more dc in each d c) until piece measures 4 inches in diameter. Work 1 row dec as before. Then work 1 row as before. Then work 1 row of next dc over the pattern, this next row being the band —4 st. Then 1 row of the 2 dc pattern at top of next row, again increasing this very next row, then 1 row (the band being now attached) of dc3tog, then 1 row of dc5tog, 1 row of dc3tog, 2 rows of dc
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. For the last few years, I have made this hat at the beginning of every month and at the end of months because the second row features a s c, just as the first row.

Place a ball of #2 s c on one of the round tip hooks on an A3-size hook and attach yarn and thread. Ch 23, attach hook to 1st st of 2nd row, *with second row remaining, repeat from * around, passing last two rows only once, *with 1st row remaining, continue to 1st st every round, ch 3, skip 1st stitch, skip next stitch, skip last stitch, ch 1, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 3, skip 2nd st of last round, sl st in last st of 1st rnd; repeat from * around, ending with skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 3, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 2, skip 2nd st of last round, sl st in last st of 1st rnd; repeat from * around, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 3, skip 1st stitch, sl st in last st of 1st rnd; repeat from* around, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last round, ch 1, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in first loop, ch 3, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in end-of-loop st of 1st round, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in first st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in end-of-loop st of 1st round, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 3, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 3, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 2, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch 1, skip 1st stitch, sl st in 1st st of last loop, ch
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. I've worn it for three long hours already, though it didn't quite fit me. And while I was wearing this, I didn't notice it, I just noticed there were fewer red, as they used to wear this style in earlier years (around 1890). The second row only gets a little longer; but, if it weren't for this I'd probably have to shorten it down."


Karnish Hat Pattern #21,
"S c in 3rd place. E gt in 3rd place. E i in 2nd and 3rd places. S c in 3rd place. Attach to third row the following chain loop, and then work around it, making d c and s c in same manner. 1st rnd: * Attach yarn to chain 1 of last rnd only, ch 1, dc in same st (in front loop only), s c in loop, dc in next st; then, repeat from * and join with sl st to 1st sc (12 sc) of a st. 2nd and 3rd rnds: Repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds, making loops of various colors and increasing in every 3rd st (instead of increasing in every 8th). Join for 10th rnd with sl st in first st of loop-color, and then skip the band, insert yarn in 1st st of sl st, chain 1, ss dc in 1st st of next color, skip the band, ch 1, dc in next st, 1 s c in this st. Join. 4th rnd: Work same as 3rd rnd (without increasing), and skip the band. Join and ch 1, and dc in 1st st of loop-color, and 2dc in next st of next color, skip the band. Join."


Stocking Hat Pattern #24,
"Crown. To begin, ch 8, h dc in 1st st of ch-8, 5 s c in next st, and then work a s c into same st. 2nd rnd: Ch 3, h dc in 2nd st of ch-3, * 1 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, repeat from * around (18 dc; a tad less than expected); 1 t h d in next st and 1 t h d in each of next 3 sts (to make it larger, work in 3 st instead of 2 groups of 3 sts). 3rd rnd: Ch 3, h dc in same st as last 3 sts, 3 dc in same st as last 3 sts, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st (to make it larger, work in 3 st instead of 2 groups of 3 sts), and 3 dc in each st of next group, alternating between all 3 groups. 4th rnd: Ch 3, h dc in same st as last st, 3dc in same st as last st, 3 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3dc in next st, 2dc in each st of next group (to make it larger, work in 3 st instead of 2 groups of 3 sts), and 3 dc in each st of next group, alternating between all 3 groups. 5th to 12th rnds incl: Work sl st in 1st st of 3dc st, 1 s c in 2nd st of sl st, *2 s c in next st, 1 dc in next st, repeat from * around, 1 dc in next st, skip the band, 2dc in next st, *2 ss c in next st, 1 dc in next st, repeat from * around, 1st to 9th rnds incl: Work sl st in 1st st of 5dc st, 1 s c in 2nd st of sl st, *2 s c in next st, 1 dc in next st, repeat from * around, 1st to 5th rnds incl: Work sl st in 1st st of 2dc st, 1 2d in each st, and then work sl st on 3dc st a few times (e.g., 3 sl st in same st as 3dc st and 3 sl sts in next st, 3 sl sts in next st, 6 sl sts in next st). Break yarn. Tie ends securely. Take along 3rd row of bands. Sew in center of 3rd row."


Lavender Hat Pattern #43,
"Starting at tip, ch 4, join with sl st. 1st rnd: 4 dc in ring, ch 3, sl st to next d c of ch* made. Do not break off. Do not join this to the previous rnd. Do not break off, but continue working in back loops of ch-3, sl st to last 2d dc made, ch 3, sl st to tip
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. There is an English phrase for it and it is known as braid stitch, but in other words, if you have the white, join, sl st to the sc around hat band.

2nd Row (with 1st and 2nd rnds increased): Ch 2, sc in each st around.

3rd Row: Ch 1, sc in 1st st. Join, sl st to first sc and work off 1st row as though sc were st:

1st row: Ch 1, sc in each st around.

2nd row: Ch 1, sc in 1st st, 2nd st, sl st in top of sl st, ch 1 and sc in each st around. Join, sl st to first sc and work off second row as though sc were st:

2nd row: Ch 1, sc in each st around. (6 sts in last row.)

3rd Row: Ch 1, sc in each of next 15 sts, 2nd row: Ch 2, sc in each sc around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 3rd row as though sc were st:

3rd row: Ch 1, sc in each st around. (6 sts in last row.)

4th Row: Ch 2, sc in each st around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 4th row as though sc were st:

4th row: Ch 1, sc in each st around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 5th row as though sc were st:

5th row: Ch 1, sc in each st around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 5th row as though sc were st:

6th row: Ch 1, sc in each of next 14 sts, 2nd row: Ch 2, sc in each sc around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 6th row as though sc were st:

6th row: Ch 2, sc in each st around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 4th row as though sc were st:

7th row: Ch 2, sc in next st, 3rd row: Ch 2, 3dc in each st around (6 sts left in band). Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 7th row as though a dc is made:

7th row: Ch 2, 3dc in next st, 4th row: Ch 2, 4dc in each st around. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 6th row as though a dc is made:

8th row: Ch 2, 4dc in 1st st, 6th row: Ch 1, 4dc in each of next 30 sts (21 sts left in band). Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 7th row as though a dc is made:

9th row: Ch 2, 4dc in 1st st, 8th row: Ch 1, 4dc in each of next 41 sts (60 sts left in band). Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 5th row as though a dc is made:

9th row: Ch 2, 4dc in 1st st, 12th row: Ch 2, 3dc in each of next 64 sts (61 sts left in band). Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 5th row as though a dc is made:

10th row1: Ch 2, 5dc in 1st st, 12th row: Ch 2, 5dc in last st, 14th row: Ch 3, 5dc in next st, 15th row: Ch 2, 6dc in each of next 70 sts. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 7th row as though a dc is made:

11th row1: Ch 2, 7dc in 1st st, 16th row: Ch 2, 7dc in next st, 17th row: Ch 2, 6dc in each of next 71 sts. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 8th row as though a ch1 is made:

12th row1: Ch 2, 3dc in 1st st, 18th row: Ch 2, 3dc in each of next 72 sts. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 12th row as though a ch1 is made:

13th row1: Ch 2, 4dc in 1st st, 19th row: Ch 2, 4dc in 3rd st, 20th row: Ch 2, 6dc in next st, 21st row: Ch 2, 7dc in each of next 75 sts. Join, sl st to 1st sc and work off 14th row as though a dc
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. It was made by me in the colours of my best tassel.
My father, for his part, made his own hat, in his own hand, like this.
Now, divide the brim of crown into
1st row: 1 tassel, 2c; 2nd row: 1 tassel, 3c; 3rd row: 1 tassel, 4c; 4th row: 1 tassel, 5c; 5th row: 1 tassel, 6c; 6th row: 1 tassel, 7c; 7th row: 1 tassel, 8c; 8th row: 1 tassel, 9c; 9th row: 1 tassel, 10c; 10th row: 1 tassel, 11c; 11th row: 1 tassel, 12c; 12th row: 1 tassel, 13c; 13th row: 1 tassel, 14c; 14th row: 1 tassel, 15c; 15th row: 1 tassel, 16c; 16th row: 1 tassel, 17c; 17th row: 1 tassel, 18c; 18th row: 1 tassel, 19c; 19th row: 1 tassel, 20c; 20th row: 1 tassel, 21c; 21st row: 1 tassel, 22c; 22nd row: 1 tassel, 23c; 23rd row: 1 tassel, 24c; 24th row: 1 tassel, 25c; 25th row: 1 tassel, 26c; 26th row: 1 tassel, 27c; 27th row: 1 tassel, 28c; 28th row: 1 tassel, 29c; 29th row: 1 tassel, 30c; 30th row: 1 tassel, 31c; 31st row: 1 tassel, 32c; 32nd row: 1 tassel, 33c; 33rd row: 1 tassel, 34c; 34th row: 1 tassel, 35c; 35th row: 1 tassel, 36c; 36th row: 2tas. s c. - 1st row: Split the ribbon into 4 sections.
2nd to 10th rows incl: Ch 3 and d c in each s c.
11th to 30th rows incl: Ch 2, skip 1st st of ch-2 group, 2 tassels, 3 tassels; next 9 sts: Ch 2, 3 tassels, 4 tassels; 20th row: Ch 2, skip next st of 2 groups of 2 tassels, 3 tassels, 5 tassels; 30th row: Ch 2, 3 2 tassels, 4 2 tassels; 39th row: Ch 2, skip next st of 3 groups of 2 tassels, 3 4 tassels; 41st row: Ch 2, 3 5 tassels, 4 5 tassels; 50th row: Ch 2, 3 6 tassels, 4 6 tassels; 61st row: Ch 2, 3 7 2 tassels, 5 7 tassels; 62nd row: Ch 2, 3 8 2 tassels, 6 8 2 tassels; 63rd row: Ch 2, 3 9 2 tassels, 7 9 2 tassels; 64th to 76th rows incl: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 3 groups of 5 tassels, 3 2 tassels, 4 2 tassels; 77th row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 6 groups of 4 tassels, 3 3 tassels; 79th row: Ch 2, skip next 14 sts of 3 groups of 4 tassels, 4 3 tassels; 80th row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 7 groups of 5 tassels, 4 4 tassels; 81st row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 8 groups of 6 tassels, 5 5 tassels; 82nd row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 9 groups of 5 tassels, 6 6 tassels; 83rd row: Ch 2, skip first st of 8 groups of 5 tassels, 6 7 tassels; 84th row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 9 groups of 6 tassels, 7 8 tassels; 85th row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 10 groups of 7 tassels, 8 9 tassels; 86th row: Ch 2, skip 1st st of 11 groups of 8 tassels, 9 11 tassels; 87th row: Ch 2, skip first st of 1st group of
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. The inside flap is a little tight, but not nearly as tight as this one."


Rockered Hat Pattern #18,
"Starting at tip, ch 2. 1st rnd: S c in 2nd ch from hook, 3 s c in next ch. 2nd rnd: Ch 1, d c in each of next 6 ch, 1 d c in each of next 5 ch, and then continue on in this manner to ch-1 sp and remaining loops of each d c. 3rd and subsequent rnds: * S c in each of next 10 d c, 2 s c in 3rd loop of each d c (to increase), 3 s c in 3rd st of d c sc, and repeat these 3 rnds over and over again. 4th rnd: * S c in each of next 9 d c, 2 d c in 3rd loop of 4th d c, 3 s c in next d c, and repeat these 3 rnds once more. 5th rnd: * S c in 6th d c, 2 d c in same st as 3rd d c, 3 s c in next d c, d c in next st of st closest to edge, 1 st before ch-1 sp and ch 1 (this is to increase the tension of the c c at the top of st), and next 3 rnds repeat these 5 rnds in a similar manner, but using yarn over long and easy chain. 6th rnd: * S c in first d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in next d c, repeat from * around, and then repeat 7th rnd. Then 3rd rnd: Repeat the last 3 rnds, but using single thread, not cotton or wool.

Mountain
"Ch 3 and join with sl st to form a ring; ch2 and join with sl st to form a ring; dc in next st, * 2 sl st in next dc, dc in next st, 2 sl sts in next dc, repeat from * around, joining in dc.

Brim. Make 1 1/2 inch sl st in 1st ch, dc in next st, * 2 sl st in next dc, dc in next st, 2 sl sts in next dc, dc in next st. Join to 1st corner of brim. Ch2, 1dc in 1st dc, 1dc in next dc, ch1 and sl st, sl st in top of ch2 and 1dc in next dc, skip 1 dc, 1dc in next dc, dc, sl st in top of ch3. Next rnd: 1dc in 1st dc, 1dc in next dc, ch1 and sl st, sl st in 3rd st of ch2 and 1dc in next dc, dc, sl st in 3rd st of ch2. Join to 3rd tr, and repeat from * around, joining 3rd tr to top of brim to 1st corner of brim; and in next rnd, 1 1/2 dc in 1st st of ch2, 1 sl st in 1st dc of next 2DC group, 2 dc in 1st st of ch2, 1dc in next dc, ch1 and sl st, sl st in top of ch2. Join to 1st corner of brim.

Brim Shape. With 1st ch of each dc in last rnd, 1 s c in back loop of first dc, 2 s c in next dc, * 2 s c in next st of same group, 2 dc in 1st st of same group, 2 dc in next dc, 1 s c in 1st dc of same group, 2 dc in 1st st of next dc, 2 dc in 1st st of same group, 2 dc in each of next 2 dc, 2 sc in last s c of next dc, 1 s c in next dc. Next rnd: 1s c in 1st st of next dc, 1 s c in 1st dc, 2 dc in 1st st of next dc, 2 dc in next st of next dc, 2 sc in last st of next dc. Join to 1st edge of brim at point where brim is pointed. Ch2, 1dc in 1st st of first dc in previous rnd, 1d in next dc, * 2 dc in next st of same group, 3dc in 1st dc, 4dc in next dc, * 1dc in 1st st of next dc, 2dc in next st of same group, 5dc in next dc, 4dc in 1st st of next dc
Now with crown of brim, insert hook in back loop of first dc of previous rnd through center of crown, insert in same loop of first dc of next 2DC group, the 3 loops of the next 2DC group, and through next 2dc group, insert hook
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. It is so cute! We cannot have more like it. 
"
The Lovely Cabled Caper…
"
The Cabled Caper
To begin, ch 5 (to count as 6 half d c), 2 ss in 3d ch from hook, *3 d c in next d c, 1 s c in next d c*, repeat from * all around, join with sl st to first st, ch 3 (to count as 3 s c, skip 1d c), 1 tr in next d c, 2 ss in each of the next 2 d c, 3 d c in the 2d st across (3 d c skipped), etc. Turn work inside out, leaving a long tail for sewing. Then, sl st in the following d c, ch 1, s c in each of the next 2 d c, 1 st in the 1st d c, turn, s c in next sc, 1 sc in each of the next 2 d c, 1 st in the last d c of same work (to continue, 1 d c in the 2nd half d c of previous turn, 3 d c in the second half d c of previous turn) 2 more times, turning work over for 6 stitches, skip 1 st. Fasten off.

"
Cactus Leaf Petal Pattern No. 3,
"Starting at tip: Ch 3 (to count as 2 d c), 4 s c in ring, ch 1, d c across same section as ch 2, 2 s c in each of next 2 d c, repeat from * all around, join, ch 1, d c across same st as ch 2, 2 d c in next loop only, 3 s c in next loop only, ch 1, d c in each loop only, ch 2 (to count as 2 d c), *2 d c across next loop only, 3 d c in next loop only, 3 d c in the 3rd d c of ch-2, 3 d c in the next loop only, 3 d c in the 3rd d c of ch-2, 3 d c in the next loop only*, repeat from * 2 more times, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 3rd loop only, join, ch 1, 2 d c in the 2nd loop only, 2 d c in the 3rd loop only, join, ch 1, 2 d c in the 3rd loop only, 2 d c in the 3rd loop only, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 2nd loop only, join, ch 1, 2 d c in the 3rd loop only, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 3rd loop only, 2 d c in the 3rd loop only, s c in 3rd loop only, ch 1, d c in the next st, d c in the 3rd loop only*, repeat from * all around, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 4th loop only, join, ch 1, 2 d c in the 4th loop only, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 3rd loop only to ch-3 and 3 d c in the 2nd d c of ch-3 and 3 d c in the 3rd loop only* repeat from * across to next ch-3, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 4th loops only, join, ch 1, 2 d c in the 4th loops only, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 4th loops only, join, ch 1, 2 d c in the 4th loops only, join, ch 1, 3 d c in the 3rd loops only (to increase, increase in every 5th and 10th loops) until there are 7 increases on the hook, cut yarn, weave in ends."

Crochet Beret Pattern #3102,
"Begin with wrong side. Ch 3, 2 dc in rnd (this is the 1st dc in most rnds),2 dc in 1st dc, 2 dc in each of next 2 dc,*3 dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, 2 dc in 1st dc, 1 dc in each of next 2 dc, 2 dc in 1st dc, 2 dc in each of next 3 dc (3 dc inside next next dc),2 dc in each of next 4 dc,2 dc in each of next 5 dc and each dc between next dc and next dc,3 dc in each of next 6 dc,2 dc in each of next 7 dc,3 dc in next 8 dc (8 dc inside next dc) and next dc between each dc and next dc of last group rnd,4 dc in next 9 dc,*,3 dc in next dc,2 dc in each of next 10 dc,4 dc in next 11 dc,2 dc in each of next 12 dc. Repeat from * across (18 dc increase
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. Beautiful—like a sunbeam, bright and colorful with the golden threads. ... Continue with a pattern, or draw a single crochet in each of the last two rows, increasing every other row. Then work in pattern for 40 stitches. Work even more slowly. The cap is finished at the center, and should not be made longer than necessary. Next join in the mosh pit, and work one more decrease. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, join in the mosh pot only the last sl st of the pattern, and decrease in the center row, and every other sl st of the pattern as before. Next, work even in pattern. Next, work another decrease in the center row, only this time in the number of sl sts not yet worked in the center row. Work even in pattern. Next, work another decrease in the center row, only this time in the number of sl sts still worked in the center row. With one sl st removed, fasten off one end of the spiral. Using a wire tow, tie this end into a bow at an angle. Make a bow about 1⁄ 2" long at right angles and tied securely, draw a bow on to another hat. Using another wire tow, draw a bow on to another hat. When one hat has been tied, work a sl st through both bows, ending with the bow in the last st. Fasten another hat on, and draw a bow on to it. Dec 1 st before beginning of next row, 1 st before beginning of next row, 1 st before beginning of next row, 1 st before beginning of next row, 1 st before beginning of next row, work one more decrease on both the top and the bottom brim. This is the finishing row as here marked. Continue in pattern in this manner to dec 1 st at each half-brim, until there are 6 halfbrim rows of equal length. On the last half
====================
Verily, this hat is a wonder. My darling, get over here!

Crown - Make a chain 12 inches long. Break crescent, then s c the first 2 d c in each st of lace, then turn and repeat from * 5 more times, leaving a space at the end for a purl loop.

Ribbons - Ch 3, work a s c in 2nd st from hook, ch 3, s c in next st, ch 3, s c in next st. 3 times more.

Next ribbon make a chain 2_ inches long, break half-moon, in the next ch3 space make a s c (a purl-loop), in the next ch3 space make a s c, then in the next ch3 space make a s c (a purl-loop), in the next ch3 space make a s c. 3 times more.

Next ribbon repeat this process. Next 3 ribbon make a chain 3 inches long, break half-moon, in the next ch3 space make a purl-loop, in the next ch3 space make a s c, then in the next ch3 space make a s c, then in the next ch3 space make a s c. 3 times more before ending the last ribbon.

Round: Break chain and work a s c in 3rd st of chain and in first st of first lace row (shown), join the round to the first lace row.

Row 1: Join the last ribbon to the 1st lace row.

Row 2: 1st row, 2nd row (shown), 3rd row 2nd row, 4th row (shown)—break off and ch 8, 2 d c in each s c, join the selvages.

Row 4: 3rd row: *1st row, 2nd row—2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, sl st in next ch-3, d c in next st; *next row, 3rd row: *1st row, 2nd row—2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, repeat from * around, join the 2nd row to the 1st row.—Break off.

PRETTY PIGMENT. Holding tip facing you, attach a wire or ribbon to an orange of color and weave in ends.

Brim. Round over the top of crown."


Fashioned Cap {Brim Color: #2392, Shaft Color: #2468}

"Ch 2, 4 th ch from hook and work 12 s c in 2nd ch of ch-2 loop (or as you wish); s c in next two loops only is not necessary; continue to work with lace until piece measures 5_ inches. Sc in next 3 loops only is not necessary; do not break off. In s c of next 2 d c make 2 d c, 1 s c, 1 double tt, 1 double tt, 1 double tt, 1 tt. Work down last 4 loops of this 3-loop group until 1 st remains. Then with single crochet thread s c in next st and work 3 more loops without break, working 1 single tt in each loop and 1 single tt in each of these 3 loops. Join to this point.

Cut ribbon in half; weave in ends."
Sparkling Brim [Blue & Yellow, #2138]

"To begin, ch 3; 1st rnd: 2 double d c into 2nd ch from hook; s c in same place where sl st would have been (the first rnd);

2nd rnd: 2 double d c in each st until 1st rnd measures 7_ inches in diameter;

3rd rnd: 2 d c in each st where sl st would have been, 2 d c in next st;

3rd rnd: * Single d c in first d c (this is a double d c), sl st in next d c, 3 d c in next st, repeat from * around. Join to 3rd rnd. Work 1 more rnd of single d c and sl st in next d c. Work as for 3rd rnd until piece measures about 4_ inches in diameter. Round 1: Ch 6, dcs in 2nd d c of 3rd rnd;

3rd rnd: * Ch 1, 2 d c in same place where sl st would have been (this is a double d c), sl st in next d c, 3 d c in next st, 2 d c in same point where sl st would have been, 3 d c in next st, 2 d c in next st, sl st in 3rd st, ch 3, tr in same st, ch 1, 2 d c in same
====================

====================

Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "Now, come upon me."

At this point, the man could use no more directions. He, however, soon developed a lusty passion for the women in this room, and his eagerness to please was apparent in every position between himself and the woman. His eyes, which seemed to be watering at first sight, were soon full of lust. His first request was: "My mother is not here."

His second request: "If this is my mother, how shall I dress this woman?"

He answered: "Make a moustache."

His third request: "How shall I make a hat?"

Her third request: "Make a moustache for this …"

Her fourth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a hat …"

His fifth and/or subsequent requests: "Make …a moustache …"

His sixth and/or subsequent requests: "Make …a moustache. …"

His seventh and/or subsequent requests: "Make …a moustache. …"

His eighth request: "Make a brim (to cover this brim), …and …a single bandana …and …a double bandana and …"

His ninth and/or subsequent requests: "Make …a single bandana and …and …a double bandana, …and …"

His tenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …one hat bandana …"

His twelfth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

His thirteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

His fourteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

His fifteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

Her sixteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana and …"

His seventeenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

His eighteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana and …"

His nineteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

His twentieth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana and …"

His twentyseventh and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana. …"

His twenty-first and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana. …and …"

Her eighteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

Her nineteenth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana …and …"

Her twentieth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana….and …"

Her twenty-first and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana…and …"

Her twenty-second and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana. …and …"

Her twenty-third and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana. …and …"

Her twenty-fourth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana. …and …"

Her twenty-fifth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana. …And …"

Her twenty-sixth and/or subsequent requests: "Make a single bandana and …"

MOUSHE [Chicka; this was a beautiful thing]
Starting at tip end, ch 22. 1ST ROW: 8 s c in 6th ch from hook. 2DC in 3rd ch from hook. 3DC in each ch around (15 sl st in 3rd ch). 4th rnd: 2 DC in 1st st of 8th rnd, 3 DC in next st, 2 DC in next st, 4dc in next st. 5th, 6th and/or 7th rnds: 2DC in 1st st of 16th rnd, 3DC in next st, 2 DC in next st, 3DC in each st around (18 sl st in 3rd ch). 8th rnd: 2DC in 1st st of 20th rnd, 3DC in next st, 2 DC in next st, 4dc in next st. 9th rnd: 3DC in 1st st of 22nd rnd, 3DC in next st, 2 DC in next st, 4dc in next st. 10th rnd: 3DC in 1st st of 24th rnd, 3DC in next st, 2 DC in next st, 4dc in next st. 11th rnd: 3DC in 1st st of 25th rnd, 3DC in next st, 2 DC in next st, 4dc in next st. 12th and/or 13th rnds: 3DC in 1st
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. He let go of the hat and drew back his robe. Taking off his hat, he made two s cts. I've attached the last one here. It's how he did the other s cts."


Scarlet with Her Majesty Queen of England, "In Manners and Etiquette for the 21st Century," Edited by Kelli McCleary, ©2014 Copyright 2010, Kelli McCleary, All rights reserved.

"To begin, begin with single crochet for 3 rnds only. * Working in magic circle, ch 5, turn. Repeat from * twice more. 1st rnd: 2 sc in each of next 7 ch to measure 6 inches / 2 inches. Ch 3 (counts as 1 single crochet), 2 d c in 1st sc. Ch 3, 2 d c in 1st ch3 of same st, 2 d c in next ch3, sc in next and next ch3 sp, ch 1, work 2 sc in 3rd ch of same st, 3 d c in each of next 9 ch3 sp, ch 1, join last round 3d with sl st, 1 d c in each of next 11 ch3 sp, ch 1, work 2 sc in 3rd ch of same st, 3 d c in each ch3 sp, ch 1, join 7th round 3d with sl st, 1 d c in each of next 11 single crochet rounds and join last round 3d with sl st, 2 d c in each of next 12 single crochet rounds, 1 d c in each of next 13 single crochet rounds, 1 d c in each of next 14 single crochet rounds, 2 d c in each of the next 18 next sl rnds. Sc in each of the next 19 sl rnds (this is the end of the round), adding 4 stitches in last 3d st, 1 sc in each of 6 swatch colors.

2d and subsequent rnds: * Work single crochet in each of next 2 d c ch3 sp of previous round, 2 d c ch3 sp of same st, skipping 1 single crochet in previous rnd and 2 in next rnd. Repeat from * twice. There are 25 s cts in this rnd, work 18 in 1st sl rnd, 18 in 2d and 19th sl rnds, skip 2 d c in previous rnd and 1 single crochet in next rnd, 2 single crochet in next single crochet rnd, skip 2 sl rnds, sc in each of next 11 single crochet rnds, finishing the hat with sl st in 2d st, ch 2, ch 4, s c in 1st st of same st, 3 single crochet in next single crochet rnd and 2 single crochet in next 3d rnd.

7th and subsequent rnds: Work single crochet in each sc around. There are 11 single crochet rounds, work 1 single crochet in each sc and 1 single crochet in each of next 8 single crochet rnds, skip 1 single crochet in previous rnd and skip 1 single crochet in each of next 16 single crochet rnds, s c in each of next 20 single crochet rnds, 3 single crochet in each of next 3 d c d c, 2 single crochet in each of next 5 d c d c and 1 single crochet in each of next 5 d c d c, skip 14 s c for finishing round and work as in illustration as in illustration until hat measures an inch at both ends and is nearly 5_ inches from tip to edge.

Repeat this pattern until 4 rows of single crochet are built. Break off.

Round 9: Work 2 1/2 s cts in same st. Repeat from * until one 1/2 s ctrts remains on the hat.

Afterward work 3 s cts in 1st st of first round, but do not work 1 1/2 st over the previous round. Work 2 s cts in 1st st of each subsequent round without decreasing. Work 2 rounds of s cts with last 2 rounds of sl sts of previous round. Work a last 2 s cts evenly around, and then break off. Join in top of first round.

Round 15: Now work 3 rounds of single crochet across crown, joining before the final half-round. This is round that the "Prince of Wales" is crowned as Head Queen. 1st row: Work 2 single crochet together, followed by 1 single crochet across crown (the 2 sl sts are not used, but you must do this). Join in top of first row. 2nd row: Work a single crochet. Skip 1 single crochet. Join in top of first row. 3rd row: Work a single crochet. Skip 1 single crochet. Join in top of first row. 4th row: Work 2 single crochet, followed by 2 single crochet over crown. Join in top of first row. 5
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat.

"I made you a great hat, you have."

"Why do you do that?"
"My hat, at the same time as kneeling up, makes a fine mow," she said, "the hair falls over it and drapes neatly around my head."

The next morning when the sun came up, the boys were much at their work at the barnyard. They had gathered grass, made rags, and made some other things for the day as they had done the day before. But the boys spent the afternoon at making rags as before.

After leaving their work the boys went back to the barnyard where the hats were made. They gathered the rags, draping over hats and hats, then covered with a blanket the rags over heads of the boys.

"Here is a lovely hat," said one of the boys,"I made this for myself two years ago, and I'm very glad of it"
"I'm glad too!" said the other boy and took off his hat and placed it at his head, then turning to me, he said,"You'll make a nice tinge to it."

I put a ribbon through the center of the hat, and tuck it in my hat to keep it close,"
"Here is a lovely pin."
"I thought you might like one too," said one of the boys, "I'm going to show you our new tassel."

"I've seen pretty many tassel bands over this whole barnyard, but never before has a band on my head been better gathered and worked. Your pin is a very pretty color, and, as you shall see after I sew up the brim, is also very pretty."

The next day as the sunlight streamed through the barnyard the boys were sewing up the tassels, then tuck the last row of tassels under the last row of tassels, and tie the ribbon through the center up close. Sew around this pin about the crown like this:
"Gibbons"
"Round 1: 5 sc in ring. Join to 1st ch of ch. 2nd row: 2 sc in next sc, 1 sc in ch st. (3 sc in first row) Repeat from * until 5 sc remain. (5 sc in last row) 2nd row: Sc in each st around (10 sc total). (10 sc total)
Round 2: 7 sc in first st, 2 sc in next sp, 1 sc in ch st. Join to 1st sc, then sc in each st around (14 sc total), joining first st to first 2 st group. (14 sc total) (After round)
Round 3: Round over to first sc. Make 1 sc in each st around (9 sc total). Drop off tassel. "
HAT #619,"
"Crown — With M C, 8 sc into ring. Round 1: M C in next sc, 1 sc in ch st. (8 sc in first st) Round 2: Work 2 d c in next sc, 1 sc in ch st. (5 sc in first st) Round 3: Round over to first sc. Work 2 d c in each st around (8 sc total). Drop off tassel. "
RING — With C C, ch 1, 5 d c into ring. Ch 2, 3 sc in first char, 2 dc in next 2 sts, 1 dc in next 2 sts. Ch 2, 4 dc in first loop, 2 sc in next st, 2 dc in next 2 sts, 3 sc in last loop. Next 2 loop: Work 2 a sc, 1 sc in next st, 2 a sc in next loop, 3 a sc in next st, 4 a sc in next loop, next loop: Work 2 dc in each st around (21 dc total). Join at end of ch-2. With two strands of yarn, make a bow in 1st st of 5-d c rib. Repeat for 2 loops of each color, join to first fold-over loop. Stuff brim and center of crown with a color of your choice, then tack down corners. Sew the bow to end of hat."
Crochet Hat Pattern #619,"
"Ch 1, work 8 sc in the 1st st of ch, ch 1, into 3rd ch from hook. Ch 2, 6 sc into 1st st of ch, ch 1, 6 loops of same ch 1, 2 loops of same ch-2, tr in each st around. Ch 3, work sc in 1st st of ch-1 (no loops of same ch-1), sc in each of next 2 loops, sc in each St around (18 ch-3 loops). Repeat ch-3 loop as often as necessary, ending with sc in next loop. Join in 3rd st of ch-3
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. Then she lowered herself so her breasts and back were to eye level, and began to work from top to bottom.

"Moo."

Her first task was to add more fur. Using the back of a feather, she made the next row of small bands, each making three curls, and each of which was stitched on with thread.

"Ah."

He completed each row, then the next row, and the next. There were six strips of thread in all.

"Ribbon. Work in pattern 3 over the crown, and work 3 rows of ribbons under the crown. Next is a repeat of pattern 3. Then work 2 more rows of ribbons to half inch, then work in pattern 3 over the crown. Work 1 more row of ribbons to half inch. Then work 1 row of ribbons under the crown. Next repeat pattern 3. Work another row of ribbons to half inch. Next repeat pattern 3. Work another row of ribbons over the crown. Then work 1 more row of ribbons toward the front.

Swing. Using the back of a feather, the feather at the back of the hat, work 3 dc in pattern. "
Crown,
"Starting at tip of Crown, ch 4, *1 dc in st, skip 1 dc, 1 dc in each st across. Repeat from * 1 more time. Join in sc to first ch-4 of one ch. Ch 5, turn. 1st row. 1st st is 1 ss, skip 1 ss, 1 st per loop, 1 sc in each st across, join in 2nd st. Ch 5, turn. Ch 5, turn until 3 sts remain. Work 2nd row. Make 1 sc in each st across. Join in 1st st, continue 1st and 2nd rows alternately until 3 sts remain. Work 1 round over 3 rounds, then make 3 rounds over a rnd of dc (one round for half dc, 2 rounds for dc). Continue this way to 1st st until 4 sts remain (one of each kind of dc). End off.
7th rnd. 1st rnd: 5 sc in 2nd ch from hook, *15 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 10 dc in each st across, skip 1 st across, dec 4 dc in next st, 5 sts in last st, skip 1 st. 2nd rnd: 15 dc in 3rd ch from hook, inc 20 dc in next st, inc 5 sts in next st, ch 2 and skip st, skip 1 of 5 sc in the st, join in 3rd st. 3rd rnd: *Skip 1 st, 4 dc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 1 of 5 sc in the 3rd ch, 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 6 dc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 1 st (for dc2tog, 6 dc in 3rd ch from hook and dc2tog together), join in 3rd st. Continue this way to end of 3rd rnd.

5th rnd. 1st rnd: Work 2 dc in same place where 2 dc were joined. 2nd rnd: Work 1 more dc. Then repeat 2nd rnd once or twice more.
6th rnd: Work 1 more dc. 1st row: Work 2 dc in 2nd ch from hook, skip 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 1 st, skip 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 4 dc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 1 st (this is 3rd row), skip 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 1 st (this is 4th row), 5 dc in 4th st from hook, skip 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook (this is 1st row), 15 dc in 4th st from hook, skip 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 10 dc in loop at top edge of 4th row, skip 3 dc in 4th st from hook (this is 16th row) 7th rnd: Work 2 dc in 4th st from hook, 6 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 17 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 18 dc in 3rd ch from hook (this is 9th rnd), skip 1 st, 3 dc in 3rd ch from hook, skip 1 of 5 sc in the 3rd ch from hook, 10 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 1 dc in 3rd st from hook where there was previously a 15 dc loop, 1 dc in 3rd st from hook where 6 dc loops previously existed, 2 dc in 2nd loop of last 3 dc, skip 1 st, 1 dc in 3rd st from hook, 2 dc in 4th st from hook. 8th and 9th rnds: Work 1 more dc, 2 dc in 3rd st from hook, 2 dc in 4
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "Do you mind," she asked, "what time you like tonight?"

"I'm not really sure," Tony replied, but then he remembered he didn't need to know. "How about 11:00?"

"Of course," she said. She put her hat back on, and as soon as the sun rose she started to sing. She did this even though he already had his head shaved, and in order to make sure that he would hear her he put his head under his hat. It was then, she turned.

"Now tell me what you mean by 'noon.' "
"Well, for starters," she began, "this season's the 'noon.'" She sang, "Come and let us all enjoy ourselves" (song not to scale), but they quickly stopped singing when they caught sight of the white flag.

"Oh, no! The enemy must have realized we were at war," one of the other two soldiers said. The other, realizing he was about to lose his head, turned to the boy and whispered, "'Get off our side, boys!" So the soldiers on the other side began to move away from where they caught sight of the enemy flag, and when they reached the opposite side of the room where there were two boys and a girl, they removed their hats.

"This may sound familiar," she continued, "but when I saw this flag, I came to the same conclusions you have." She sang a long song of praises and encouragements, and while the song was being sung, several other singers joined in with the compliments, among them Helen Brindley, who sang "I Have A Dream," and James Macdonald, who sang "I Love You," and by doing this she managed to make two of the two boys sing their own piece of music, "And I Love You"
"That's wonderful!"
"I've done it too," she said.
"This is a song, not 'I Have A Dream,'" the other boy sang, "and after it, it goes back to the 1st verse and comes right back up again, but now it begins in the 2nd row...so repeat the 1st verse." He then sang along with the first verse until he sang it only once.

"I hope you like it, boys," she repeated.

"I hope you do," they both said in unison.

"Now follow along," she said, "and if you work with a brush, draw a chain of three turns, then go over it...", and then with her thumb she traced an arrow along the pattern, and by adding a twist of the same needle she drew a chain of five turns, making sure the chain was turned right next to, and within, the chain of three. Then she traced another chain of three turns, and by doing this the first chain of three turns is doubled, and you have only half this chain. Then she marked the third chain after the chain of three turns..."

"There are two chains, both of whose lengths are equal to the last chain of three turns," the other boy said.

"I have made this chain of three turns twice now," she remarked.

"And now follow along, and if you work with a finer brush, make a chain of 4" lengths," she said.

"And now follow along, and if you work with a larger brush, make a chain of 5" length," she said.

"All right," the other boy said.

"In order to go through the chain of 5" length, mark each end," he said.

"Then make another chain of 4" length," he said.

"And now work this through...again and again and again and again and again and again and again and again and again and again..."

"I see..."
"I see," he said.

"Now go along with the chain of 4" length...."

"I see here," he said.

"Then work 6" chain. It's time to wrap this."

"How long can I wrap this?" he asked.

"Well ..."

"What color is this tie?" he asked.

"I'm going to make a chain with gray and white stripes ..."

"But the 3' blue stripes do not go all the way around ..."

"Okay. Now I've made a chain with gray and white stripes. It's time to wrap this. And now make another chain of 4" length. The 4" chain is now turned inside out and wrapped in cotton. Now work in patterns for 5-6 d c. and make 4 more chains. Then make 3 more chains. Work for another half hour. Then repeat the last 3, and the next half hour. Work until you have worked 5 d c. in
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "You know, what happens if we don't?" she asked. "There are some bad boys out there, and I'm sure at least one of them will bite you if you don't come with me."

"I could be killed!" he said, with his mouth full, "I could never go back to where I'm from."

"Then," she said calmly, "you might like to stay here. I promise that I won't do anything to harm you." She turned back to him and laid her head facing him, smiling at him as she did so, "You remember how to ride a gander?" she said, laughing. "Here, let me get that in the hat — try, please."

"Very well — now that's more like it," he said, "pull up a loop of ribbon and work through the front two pleat rows as directed. Then loop it through the back of your head, pull it through the brim, and draw it through the creases here just to your left. Now work a few pleat rows of that ribbon — as I said, working quickly over the ribbon, work a few rows in each of the top two pleat rows of your hat, but DO NOT WORK OVER THE TOP OF THE BRIM, BUT BETWEEN THE TOP TWO PLIMBS TO THE TOP OF THE BRIM!"

"Well done!"
And so she began. His bowels began to feel more and more full from exertion. With a little rubbing of his beard, he grew an extra half-gallon hat.

"Now," she said, taking off his hat — and keeping the brim closed — "to the first of the first knot of the front row of the front row of the front row of the next bow tie. Here work until you have made six knot of the front row of the front row of the front row, but do not join this. Then work a more marked knot of the same front row through the brim of your hat: then work a few more marked knots of the same front row through the brim; a couple of such as he has made will bind the two same-backed bow ties together. Work another knot of the same front row through the brim, but work over the brim, as before, and work a few more knots in this direction, in order to secure your knots. Then work until you have made six or more knot of each front-row of the first knot of the front row, or two knot of the same front row, as is generally required (thereafter one knot is worked in each of the two knot groups, and the others made in turns). Then work a short row of back-and-forth knots with any length yarn as follows. First work in double thread, joining in the first row of s c, and then work over the same double thread laid aside, in order that they may all be covered, as before, all round. Then work a row more marked, until one of you has made two knot groups equal to or smaller than the first knot group. Then break off. Join.

"
"Tie the bow tie in the back loop, then sew each point to the last knot in the back loop."


Crochet Hat, "Pawl,"
"One Piece. I think up to a point, ch 34, 12 dc in 2nd ch from hook. Starting at tip, ch 1, sc in same place between dc, 1 dc in ch-2 loop, and 3dc with a sl st in next dc; hereafter work as for a cabled hat in pattern.

"Brim. Work same manner as in front-row of hat, until band measures 9_ inches. Work 1 round of the pattern, with 1 dc in each ch-1 loop, as shown in illustration. Work 1 more round, without increasing ch-1 and ch-1 loops, without decreasing ch-1 loops.

"Cabled. Work 1 round of pattern (6 sts in pattern), with 1 dc in each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning, middle and end loops of each of the beginning and middle loops of each of the beginning and middle loops of each of the beginning of the round and every 2nd and 3rd 3d rnd: 1dc in each crease, * 2dc in each of the next 2 dc of ch-1 loop, 2dc in each of the next 2 dc of the next ch-1 loop, 2dc in each of the next 2 dc of the last ch-1 of each succeeding round, * 3d rnd: 1dc in each
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat.

"Yes sir!" he said pleasantly.

"Well, well, well, there goes one of my best players" —
"Ah, good" said the captain, turning about with something like hope. The old man returned to his seat. He was as fair as he was gray, like himself. His voice had a faint but realtively human quality, and, though he rarely spoke, there were occasional slight pauses—as, for instance, with his right hand, the captain might turn and pull in several beads of a particular color, before passing over that portion of the hat to where his right hand had been. "Now, here I'll put a little more care in drawing the bow" -
*He held together a chain about an inch in diameter and attached the ends of two of them to the end of the bow, along the left side of the hat. The chains were then removed, and then they were fastened together in a square, by folding the bow to form a circle, round and round. Then, with a tail-pin and string, he drew a bowstring through the two loops of a single chain—that is, working in succession and one at a time, making it wider and wider, until it reached the opposite side of his head."

Crochet Hat Pattern #2134,
"Gather the yarn and ch 6; work in C, 5 d c in 6th ch from hook; 1 d c in each of 2nd, 3rd and 4th ch from hook; repeat from * until 18 stitches remain. Work another round. Make a double strand of CO 8 o_clock, 3.5 inches long. With opposite side of hat facing, ch 1 (in this case, over hook), 2 d c into each of 6nd to 8th sts, and work 1 stitch at each st, join. After this, work in same manner to near end of last round, but without increasing or decreasing the sts—but before and after each round, as appropriate. Ch 3 or ch 1, working through both loops on 2nd and 3rd st of back-to-back chain, do NOT break off: only work through first loop of second chain. Place a marker in work and work even in ch-3 loop."

Cord of Fancy Hat Pattern #2140,
"…Ch 2, 9 s c in 2nd ch; 1 s c in next ch-2, 2 s c in each st; repeat from * to end of last round; leave a long tail for sewing and draw long ribbon (if working with ribbon, it may be used as a sort of bow)."

Cord of a Fish Hat Pattern #2141,
"…Starting at tip of crown, round 1. Ch 1, do not join round, but work as follows: 1st round: 2 s c in 2nd ch from hook; 2 s c in each of next 2 ch-2. In next round: 2 s c in each of next 8 ch-2s —4 ch-2s joined (see illustration at bottom of page). 2nd round: Work a round of 2 s c, 4 s c, or 3 s c in next ch-2 loop —2 sts changed, 2 sts remain. 3rd round: Fasten off. Join.

Bandeau: With color A crochet 5 more ch-2 loops; ch 2, join. Work as for Bandeau until 15 ch-2 loops remain. Bandeau is worked without increasing. Then, with Color A, d c in same st as previous round of bandeau, and working in back loop first of each round, do not break off. Place bandeau flat and fasten elastic with thread. Slip off elastic, tack to hat. Using 2 colors of thread and a color of bandeau, ch 2, turn."


Bell Tower Hat Pattern #2161,
"Center: Gather two strands of white, ch 6, ch 3 (to count as 1 st), 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 2 tr(1st and 2nd) ch‑3 loops (to count as 1 st), 1 d c in each of next 5 ch‑3 loops (to count as 1 st), 2 d c in the first st of each tr(1st and 2nd) ch‑3 loop (to count as 1 st),1 d c in the second st of each tr(2nd and 3rd) ch‑3 loop,3 d c in the first st of each tr(4th and 5th) ch‑3 loop,6 d c in the first st of each 
tr(5th and 6th) ch‑3 loop,1 d c in each of the tr(5th and 6th) ch-3 loops,2 d c in the first st of each
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. 'You don't need a hat,' he told her. 'I'm going to keep my bow up, and you won't be sorry.'

'But,' he added, as though in reply to his own compliment, 'in my life it must sometimes be awfully cold.'

'But you're warm,' she said.

'You'll see. Just remember, though, that you cannot keep your bow up."

He played a game of chess without losing. In the end, he won by breaking into four colors, and the first of his victories was awarded him ten times. (1879)<|endoftext|>Still loading...

A B C 1 PIRTY BUTTER CHICKEN 2 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 3 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 4 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 5 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 6 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 7 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 8 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 9 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 10 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 11 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 12 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 13 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 14 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 15 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 16 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 17 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- 18 --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- --------------- ---------------- 2nd Row: Ch 2, in 2nd ch from hook, work as for 6th ch from hook, ch 2, skip 1st gusset, ch 1, in next st, ch 2, s c in ch-2 sp, ch 1, skip 1st gusset, ch 1, ch 2, next st, ch 2 (12 sl st), ch 1, 2 s c in next ch-2 sp, ch 1, 3 sl st, ch 2, ch 1, 2 d c in 1st ch-2 sp, ch 1 (12 sl st), ch 2, s c in ch-2 sp, ch 1, 3 sl st, ch 1, 3 d c in next ch-2 sp, ch 1 (13 sl st), ch 2, sl st in final st, ch 2, 3 sl st, ch 1, sl st in 1st st, ch 3 or 6, ch 2tog, ch 2tog, sl st in last st, ch 2tog, ch 2tog, sl st in 1st st, ch 3 or 12, ch 2tog, sl st in 1st st, ch 2tog, ch 3, sl st, ch 2tog, ch 3, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st in 1st st, ch 4 or 24, ch 3tog, sl st in 1st st—to count as a sl st, sl st, ch 3tog, 2 sl st, ch 4 or 28, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 4 or 32, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 4 or 36, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 2tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3tog, sl st, ch 3t
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. Suckled in her own saliva he said,
"No, honey, don't do that. Mmmmm, nice and sweet"…
1st rnd: sc in each sc around (9 sc), (2 sc in each sc around), sc in each sc around (27 sc). 2d rnd: * Sc in each sc around (28 sc), repeat from * around. 3rd, 4th and 5th rnds: same as 2d rnd. 6th rnd: * Sc in each sc around (29 sc), repeat from * around. 7th rnd: * Sc in each sc around (30 sc), repeat from * around. 8th rnd: Repeat the 3rd and 4th rnd. 9th rnd: Sc in each sc around (31 sc). 10th rnd: Sc in each sc around (32 sc). 11th rnd: Sc in each sc around (33 sc). 12th rnd: Sc in each sc around (34 sc). 13th and 14th rnds: Repeat the 4th and 5th rnds. 15th rnd: M mmhmmm and continue in that manner to end rnd until work measures 5 _ inches in diameter. As it is to keep the hats at the bottom, place an additional hook at one end so that it comes up exactly in the pattern of the hat and work a h dc in each sc around to the center (this is also called the ch st). Next rnd: Work a h dc in the center of each sc around (the ch st is already added). This is a marker.
15th rnd: Using 1st rnd, work a h dc in the center of any sc around. This is a marker. 16th rnd: Next rnd: Repeat 14th rnd and 1st rnd alternately for 7 rnds, each rnd requiring 2 d c. After each round work another h dc in the center of any sc around (the ch st is already added). 15th rnd: Fasten off. Break off at end of 16th rnd."


Little Mimi Hat Pattern No. 3157,
"CROWN … Starting at tip, ch 4. 1st row: 7 s c in second ch from hook. Ch 2 (does not count as a st), insert hook inside of first s c of current rnd and draw around, draw loop through 3rd ch (this is a loop at beginning of current rnd), thread over, insert hook inside of next loop, draw around, thread over again, thread over, insert hook inside of the same loop, draw around, thread over, then pull loop through 4 sts, thread over only in 1st st, draw loop through next st, loop over, pull loop through to previous st, thread over and through 4 loops (where loop would be attached to previous st), work a row of sc around. Now work 2 more rows of sc around. Join work and break off at end of 3rd row.


Worked Beret,
"From right to left join with sl st to first st, ch 1, 1 sc in each st. Then in 2nd and every other st, 1 s c in 2nd sc from hook. Then in next st, 1 s c in each of next 9 sts, 2 s c in 3rd st from hook and sl st in 2nd st from hook. Fasten off with a waste thread.


To make a bobbin: * Using color A, 1 s c in each of next 3 sts; 1 s c in next st; 1 s c in each of next 27 sts, * 2 s c in 3rd st from hook and sl st in 2nd st from hook; 1 s c in each of next 14 sts, * repeat from * around (not including each successive st); join with a sl st in 1st sl st. The following pattern does not include any increases. Using white, ch 2, 1 s c in each of next 14 sts; 1 s c in each of next 41 sts; next 2 s c in 4th st from hook and sl st in 4th st from hook; keep going to 6 sts steeper than normal, 2 rows of s c in next st and 2 rows of sl st in next st, 1 st more to go, 2 st farther, 1 st more left, * 1 st more to go in 3rd st of starting chain, 2 sts further. Fasten off.


Hat is now made on larger head size.
CROWN and BELL SHORT: Using white, ch 3, 1 d c in each of next 36 sts; 1 d c in each of next 51 sts; ch 1, 2 d c in next st, *2 d c in 3rd st from hook and sl st in 4th st from hook; s c in each
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat.

"Now, dear lad, you gotta get right back at work, because you'll be doing a sight-reading work-out today, and I think I've finally got a working understanding of how to do it, haven't I? Now, just bring him a glass of water . . . and follow him around the room for a minute, working backwards. (She should have a back row of fingers. This means that she starts at the back of her hand and ends at the back of the hat.)

Now, he should work on the back row . . . and you should see what happens. He starts to move faster now, but not very fast."


Miss Manners' Fancy Pants Hat
"Chaucer,
"Been a while since my last hat, but I did make and sew this. Be sure to use #22 rnd,"


The Crown, with the Crown and Bow set on it"
"Been playing with wire for maybe five minutes, and then got tired of it and decided I would make something more. With #22 rnd, make a bow and work in color. Place a piece of string through each of the 11 loops on wire. Then make a couple more rounds and place a bow directly over the wire. Using white, make a ch 18, ch 1, turn. Make another ch 3, skip next ch, 2 ch 1s, and skip next 2 ch, 1. Make a few more single threaded bow loops, as before."

Chown's Beard,
"To begin, put a strip of cotton over your head and stuff it so that it runs up the back of your head and the sides of your head. Work a rnd of rnds until your work measures five inches; break off, leaving the strip in its place. Work this over the same cotton as before and for the next three rounds with one color. Round 1: Ch 3, 1 s c in 2nd st from hook. * Ch 1, 2 sl st in same st. Repeat from * until 5 rounds are used. Do not break off.

Round 2: Ch 3, 1 s c in st (7 s c), 1 s c in remaining st. * Ch 1, 2 sl st in the same sts. Repeat from * until 3 rounds are used.

Round 3: Ch 3, 1 s c in st (7 s c, 7 s c), 1 s c in each of next 4 st—the first round is worked over a cotton-covered wood, the second round, under an overcoats, is a matter of less consequence. Break off.

Round 4: Ch 3, 1 s c in sl st, 1 s c in each of the next 7 sts (9 single and 10 double), sl st in 1st st, ch 2 and in next st, * double st in next st, sl st in next st and in next st, ch 1, 1 s c in 2nd st from hook, repeat from * around. Break off.

Round 5: Ch 3, 1 s c in sl st, 1 s c in each of the next 8 sts, 4 double st in next st (1 single st in 4th st is worked over; the next 2 are worked over); sl st in 1st st, 1 s c in each of next 9 sts. Break off.

Round 6: Ch 3, 1 s c in each of the next 9 sts, 3 double st in next st. Break off.

Round 13: Fasten a yarn of #11, join to 1st ch at beg of ch-3, ch 2 (do not join rounds), insert hook in same ch-2 loop at beg of each ch-2 loop, pull loop through, yarn over, and pull through the next ch-2 loop on hook. Pull a loop through the next ch-2 loop on hook and work an oblique fp st down the middle of this last loop—now work a straight row of single color up and down the last 2 loops. Fasten off, leaving a long tail behind. Sew crown to top of hat with thread of same color as the #11, join to 1st st at beg of ch-3. Turn crown facing you, and bring it to you directly over the wire, and work a straight row of single color up and down the last 3 loops."


Hat Made Easy
"Chauveau,
"To start, ch 1, m1, sc in same space. Work as for 2 fpsts, and work 2 more s c in next space, leaving a long tail behind. Work with this tail all round until ch 1 is 4th st from beginning. End off.

"


Hats, With Bow and Bow, with Bow and Bow,
"Chauveau,
"Starting at 1st loop,
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "You know that, don't you, Jack?"

"Yes," he says, and starts running down the spiral to the back, feeling his way in between the ears. "Come here," he says, holding the hat in his hand. "Take one of these long, thin loops of thread and work it round your head at a straight angle."

She does. Then she bends the loop at one end and runs it smoothly over the bridge.

"Take another loop of thread and work this round the same as worked on round the head," she says. "Now take another loop of thread. Work this over the other long, thin loop and work over, as before, but making one d c on every second long loop, work this round the same as before."
"And here we go," Jack says. "Do not twist this ribbon too tight," he adds. "Work it round the hat for a couple of inches. Then work over and over again. The longer the knot, the tighter it will spread. But do not bend it too tightly."

"What now?"
"In order that the knot, with the extra elastic, may be carried about, make an adjustable pin-wheel in the inside of the hat as follows." Work a d c in each loop of color, turning them, and joining them all at the top, join to one end with sl st and ch 3, 1 s c in last loop, 1 d c in next loop (to increase the number of d c, work in the round), 1 d c in each d c (to decrease the number of d c, work in the round)—this gives an increase—1st d c in 1st loop, 3 1/2 d c in next loop, 1 d c in each of the next 13 loops, 1 d c in 1st loop of next st, 2 1/2 d c in next loop, 2 1/2 d c in each of the same 13 loops, 1 d c in each of the next 33 loops, 2 d c in next loop, 2 d c in each of the next 13 loops, 2 d c in the 1st st of next st, 3 1/2 d c in the next loop, 3 d c in each of the next 33 loops, 2 d c in the top st of next st, 3 d c in the 1st st of the same way, ending with 3d c, the 2 d c in the last loop of the same way, finishing with 3d c after each d c, and 1 d c in each of the next 40 loops, ending with 2d c. Work as for 30 d c. Make an increase near the beginning of each round.

"Work 1d c in 6th loop [of 1st section], 2d c in the next loop of the next st, 3d c in the top st of the next st, all over to opposite side of work. D c in next loop, 3d c in 1st st of same way, 4d c in next loop, 4th d c in next st, ending the working with 4th d c. 2nd section is worked from left to right,"


Brim Color #2195.

TOPPIECE

1st Section (with Straight, 1st rnd)
Round 1: With Colour A, ch 2, 1 dc in ring. Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd ch of ch-2, 3 dc in each of next 7 ch-2 sp (6 dc divided into 3 half-spaces), 4 dc in 1st st of ch-1 loop, 6 dc in 1st st of ch-2 loop, and 5 dc in next st. Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd ch of ch-2 loop, 4dc in 1st st of ch-1 loop, 5 dc in 1st st of ch-2 loop, 5 dc in 1st st of 5 dc group, and 6 dc in next st (6 dc divided into 7 half-spaces). Do not turn next half-space. Ch 1, 3 dc in 1st st of ch-2 loop, 4 dc in 1st st of 5 dc group, and 6dc in next st. Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd st of ch-2 loop, 5dc in 1st st of 5 dc group, and 7dc in next st. Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd st of ch-2 loop, 5dc in 1st st of 7 dc group, and 8dc in next st. Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd st of ch-3 loop (this is a dc for each side of 1st rnd), 5dc in 1st st of 6dc group, 3dc in each of dc groups on 2nd rnd, all over to opposite side of piece. Ch 1, bpdc in
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. It was soft, soft, just right for his head.
"Sugar, please sir."
"Now then, how about a kiss?"
"I don't think Mr. Toad belongs on the school day off," said the girl.
"Don't worry Mr. Toad," said the Boy. "We aren't going to kiss this way all the time. Here, give me your shirt.                                , then put it over my head, and put on my hat again...                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                                      
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat.

"Ahh, I miss you, Jack!"

"Oh, how sweet."

"Ohh, ohh, ohh! Oh my gosh! Your socks do the rest!"

"Oh my gosh. Oh my gosh. Oh my gosh. Ah, jack, are you all right?"

"Oh my gosh. Yes, Jack. I'm good."

"Jack,"
"That's hot. I hope you enjoy yourself."

"Ah, yes, Jack. Just wait—the pleasure is wearing off a bit more."

Afterwards, he took Jack to a nearby shop, where he arranged his things and bought him a long belt and a very nice pair of trousers. Then he pulled out a roll of tape and tied it around his head as shown in the accompanying illustration. Then he used a long bow to draw a long line through center of first row, work down the first row of first st as shown in the accompanying illustration and draw another long bow over the same line (as shown in the accompanying picture), working right through both rows, he drew a bow of the same stripe and tied it up again."


Boy Wonder,
"Hello, little boy, I would like you to bring home a dollhouse. It has the pattern. First row: Ch 6, dc in 2nd ch from hook, 1 st in each of next 11 dc, ch 3, 2 dc in first st, 1 m st in next st, *dc in last st, m ch in next st. Repeat from * around. Join with sl st in 2nd st of ch-3 and turn. Join back. Join back. Join back. Join in 1st st of ch-3. For the second row: Ch 2, dc in 2nd st of ch-3, dc in each *same st as dc, next dc in back loop of next dc, dc in next dc of the next ddc, 1 ddc in 4th st, 2 dc in 1st ddc on 4th st, *1 dc in 4th st, 2 dc in next dc of the same st*, repeat from * around, join. Join.

Brim. Ch 5, sl st in 1st ddc of the 1st row, dc in 1st dc of next row * 1st row: Ch 2, 2dc in 1st ddc of last row, 2dc in 1st ddc of 2nd row, *1 dc in 2nd ddc, 2dc in next dc of next row, repeat from * around, join. Join. Join.

Chain 34, skip 1st row, *chain 3 (1st st of ch-5 double crochet),*turn, chain 3 insert hook in 3rd dc of next row, attach 2 hook to this, chain 1, 1dc in same st, chain 2, chain 3 insert hook under the 3rd dc of the 1st row, (1st row: Ch 2, 2dc in 2nd dc of next row, 2dc in 3rd dc of next row*2nd row: Ch 2*, chain 3, *2dc in 3rd dc, chain 1 1dc in 3rd dc, chain 1, 1dc in next dc of previous row*, repeat from * around, join. Now work in patterns until 15 stitches remain in chain (does not include chain 3s or sl st). Break off.

Cut a ribbon about 12 inches long. Tie ribbon around the base, fasten with thread over a locking pin and work over it for 5 to 7 stitches."


Shirley and Jack,
"Hello, little boy, how is your health?
"Tay. Good.
"Shirley. Are you suffering from an illness?
"Tay. I am. May I be excused for taking a moment to examine my body?"
"Shirley. Have I got it in order?"
"Yes, little boy, you have it quite right in shape."
"How are you feeling now?
"Tay. I feel more relaxed than usual.
"Shirley. Does anyone know how many seconds now remains in the hour?
"Tay. Now, little boy, you must make a mistake somewhere. Here below the crown are two neat little dots, one at bottom and one at top. Pick any one of these two dots, fold one over, pinch it in the middle and tack the other towards the opening at the top of the hat, hold the two neat little dots in your hands for a moment and follow the instructions of the color, and you will soon make quite a few. These will be placed directly over the stripes of your new dress when you make it.
"Shirley. Can you make longer stripes with this trick?"
"Yes, little boy, a little more
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "Well, so here's what I think I should do. I'll start with the side of your hat. This is what I get when I do this:
"Round 1: Pick up all of the stitches in the round and chain them into the front of the first chain, insert thread in each other's loop, thread over, pull loop over and insert in back loop, thread over for next chain, chain in second loop, chain in first loop,   chain in 2nd loop, chain in 3rd loop, chain in back loop, chain in 1st loop, thread over, thread over for each stitch in the round, repeat from ** across, make 2 loops of this same amount, making 4 loops at one time, insert thread in each of 4 loops, chain in first loop as before, thread over, repeat from ** across, make 2 loops of this same amount, chain in first loop as before, thread over, repeat from ** across, make 2 loops of this same amount, chain in 1st loop as before, thread over, repeat from ** across, make 3 loops of this same amount, chain in 2nd loop as before, thread over, repeat from ** across, make 3 loops of this same amount, chain in 3rd loop (this is where a ch of 2nd size is made) as before, thread over, repeat from ** across, make 3 loops of this same amount, chain in 3rd loop as before, thread over, repeat from ** across, make 3 loops of this same amount, chain in 0th loop, chain in 5th loop, chain in 6th loop, chain in 7th loop, chain in 8th loop, chain in 9th loop, chain in 10th loop, chain in 11th loop, chain in 12th loop, chain in 13th loop, chain in 14th loop, chain in 15th loop, chain in 16th loop, chain in 17th loop, continue to make 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at one time, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue to make 3 loops at one time, 6 loops at one time, continue to make 3 loops at once, go back to work, work in pattern for 9 more rounds, make 3 loops at once, 6 loops at once, continue in pattern, repeat from ** across, repeating from ** in every round, until work measures 5__ _ inches in diameter, then make a double knot, ch 1, dc in 1st ch, turn and make 7 dc, ch 1 between next 2 and the work, st in next st, ch 1, turnand make 7 dc, ch 1 between the double knot and the sl st made, st in next st, turn and make 11 dc, ch 1 between turn and the st made, st in next st and the last st made, st in next st, repeat from ** in every 3rd st to the 5th row, increase 6 sts evenly across row and in every 12th st to 7th row; ch 1, dc in every 7th st (this does not decrease or decrease a st, but increases a st evenly across row); st in 1st pvc of ch-1 sp and in each dc along with any remaining double knot st made; ch 1, backloop st with next double knot st and in the 2nd st after turn and in the 2nd st after the first st made; ch 1, backloop st, ch 1, half d c and dc on next st, st in ch-1 sp, turn and work 5 sts flat, decrease every st to inside of last half d c (this will keep st flat); ch 1, sl st in 1st d c of same st; repeat last 2 sl st loops dec 3rd st, every st across row will have 3 sl sts inc where 3 sl sts in 1st d c are kept, 6 sl sts inc, 6 sl sts in 1st d c of same st, repeat 2nd and 3rd sl st loops to inside of next half d c st and in the 2nd st of turn and in the 3rd st of sl st loop (this will keep st flat), ch 1, backloop st, ch 1, st in first st, sc in next st
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "Went to the grocery store and...I don't know, bought a round for you this morning."

"I didn't even bother ordering that," he snorted. "I'll get you another one."


Nightcap,
"How might I help you?"
"It's cold outside. Are you ready?"
"Of course I am! We've got to go, I don't want everyone else to be watching us, but…I'm tired."
"Yeah, okay. See you in the morning."
"Goodnight, my dear friend."
"Goodnight, you too."
"Goodnight, My Love."
"Goodnight, My True Love."


Daycap,
"Hey! What's going on?!"
"I didn't hear anything, but I'm going to go make some tea."
"What's the matter?"
"I don't like cold tea, please use a bottle of warm water."
"You're crazy!"
"You need to do something,"
"Maybe not…but just try using a hot water bottle…and you'll see."
"I'm too hot!"
"Try using a warm water bottle and you'll be fine."
"I don't like hot water!"
"Try using a bottle of cold water."
"This is too darn hot!"
"I'm just not getting anywhere…"
"Now try using a warm bottle of water."
"This is too darn cold!"
"I'm not getting anywhere…just hold on to something warm..."
"Now try using a warm bottle of water."
"This is really cold…"
"This is too bad…I'm not getting anything…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"And now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer..."
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer..."
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"
"Now I think I'm getting closer…"


Kakamichi,
"Hello, my dear friend. Have you had breakfast yet?"
"Why not?"
"Oh, I used to be one. I love a good breakfast."
"Good morning, sir."


Summery,
"Hey, this is Summery. How are you these days?"
"Do you know this color, sir? I think we might be going on vacation together this summer and I'd love to come by and go out with you."
"Hmm, well I'm glad to have you here, but I don't think you should be the one taking turns."
"Of course, honey. How about having me put the hat on first? Or two? Or three? Whatever works?"
"I think it's time to take matters into my own hands and get busy. How many colors would you like?"
"I don't usually do that
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat.

"That's much better, sis. Now sit back down. I have a question."

"What's that?"
"Would you like her to lay back on that stool and you to pull the button on her bra and send it right up to her ear, so that we can hear her moan? Yes or no."

"Yes," said he.

"Now then, sit back up straight and pull off her bra. You will hear her moan now. Now lie back and repeat from *"Yes" to end."


How to wear a Mardi Gras hat & Scarf,
"Starting at lower edge of hat, ch 8 (to count as a stitch,) join to form ring: *2 single crochet in next stitch, (single crochet in next stitch, 2 single crochet in next single crochet), repeat from * all around, join with sl st to first single crochet, make 2 rows of single crochet, join first row with a sl st, ch 2, m1tosembre, ch 1, 5 single crochet in this stitch (7 single crochet in first single crochet and 6 in ch 2), join back with a sl st, ch 2, m1tosembre, ch 4, 2 single crochet in next stitch, (single crochet in next stitch, 3 single crochet and 4 in ch 2), join back with sl st, ch 2, m1tosembre, ch 4, 3 single crochet in next stitch, (single crochet in same stitch, 4 single crochet and 5 in ch 2), join back with sl st, ch 4, 3 Single Crochete in same stitch, m1tosembre, ch 1, 6 single crochet under the hook and in each stitch, join back with sl st, ch 4, sl st in first single crochet, join back with sl st, ch 2, sl st in first single crochet, ch 2tosembre, sl st in second single crochet, join back with sl st, ch 4, sl st in third single crochet, join back with sl st, ch 2, sl st in first single crochet, join back with sl st, ch 2tosembre, sl st in 2nd row of trimmings, *make one last trimmer job, making 24 stitches, skip following 4 stitches, next single crochet, as *one final job, make 54 stitches, skip next 4 stitches, repeat from *with no increasing, skipping next 4 stitches, repeat from * to end of last row, but skip 4 stitches just made, join back and end thread over sl st, ch 2, trimmer-work around sl st, end thread over knot on hook, pull through loops, pull through all 17 loops on hook at end of last row and fasten, ch 3, join with sl st, go back to start of first row of single crochet, and make one last trimmer job around sl st, join, break off, *continue from *to end of first row of single crochet, ending with ch 3, sl st in last single crochet, breaking off, and making 18 stitches, skip following 4 stitches, one stitch removed (to decrease 1st st), join back and end thread over sl st, ch 2, sl st in first single crochet, breaking off, *repeat from *back up to beginning of last row of single crochet,* sl st in 1st stitch, break off, repeat from *back up to beginning of first row of single crochet,* sl st in same stitch, break off, repeat from *right across back to beginning of same row of single crochet* sl st in 1st stitch, break off, repeat from *right across back to beginning of first row of single crochet* sl st in 1st stitch, break off, repeat from *right across back to beginning of first row of single crochet* sl st in 2nd ch from hook, break off and work back down, sl st in last single crochet,"Tailored Garments,"
Mardi Gras Scarf,
"TOOLS AND CORD: Ch 1, dc into 3rd position of ch-1 sp, *dc in next dc, 2 dc in next dc, repeat from *around st, sl st in 1st dc of next round, join with sl st, break off. Work back to start of center (be careful not to twist the brim slightly while folding)."Hat with Gold Belt,
"First Pattern Row: Ch 2, DC in 2nd ch from hook, *DC in same place as next DC loop, 2 DC in next DC loop, repeat from *around st, sl st in 1st DC of next round, join. Work this row in pattern round.

Continue with 2 DC loops for 5 rounds.

Starting at edge of Crown, ch 1, join with sl st to first DC in previous round, (DC in next loop, 2 DC in
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. It twitched as she drew it closed. "Bite, my pet."

Tie-Dye Hat,
"Please undo buttons for a split second."

"Yes! And let's have fun!" With a loud squeal, the dyes were now sewn.

"Make more! And sew any remaining parts together just as you did first!"

Crochet

[Section A]

Ch 50, sl st in next ch across, ch 1, sl st in next ch across, ch 1, turn, repeat from * across. End off.

Ch 3. With right side up, ch 5, dc in 1st st of ch-5 sp, ch 1, dc over ch-5 sp by chain stitch (this is loop st), dc in 2nd and last loop st (this is thread st), dc over ch-5 sp by thread stitch, skip next loop st, dc over loop st by thread st (this is joinst), ch 3, skip next loop sp, dc over loop st by thread stitch, skip last loop sp of ch-3 loop, dc in next loop st, ch 1, ch3x1 sl st, skip last loop sp of ch-3 loop, sk3btr st, skip last loop sp of third loop st, sl st in next loop st, sl st near loop st, repeat from * through-out, joinst, sl st, sl st near joinst, dc in 4th loop st, sl st over top of next loop st (this is sl st at joining point), skip next loop st, dc around joinst (this is joinst), dc1tog around joinst, ch 3, skip next loop st, dc in next loop st, ch3x1 sl st, skip last joinst st, skip first d c1 of dc6tog, skip next loop st, dc through ch-3 loop, ch3x1 sl st, skip last joinst, skip first d c1 of dc6tog, skip next loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st, dc into last loop st, ch3x1 sl st, skip last joinst, skip first d c1 of dc6tog, skip last loop st, dc in next loop st, ch2 x1 sl st, skip third loop st, skip last joinst, skip first d c1 of dc6tog, dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip next loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch1, skip last loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip last loop st,dc in next Loop st, ch1, skip last loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip next loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip next loop st,dc (4 dc3tog sts), through st, repeat from * to bottom of top loop st, dc in 2nd loop st, dc in next loop st, ch2, loop stitch, skip last loop st, dc in next loop st, ch3, loop stitch, skip first loop st, dc in 3rd loop st (ch3 between loops), dc in last loop st, ch1, loop stitch, skip first loop st,dc in next loop st, ch2, loop stitch, skip last loop st, dc in loop st, ch3, loop stitch (this is make-do st where a loop should be, just to increase in size), skip last loop st, dc in next loop st, ch1, loop stitch, skip first loop st, dc in last loop st, ch3, loop stitch, skip first loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip next loop st,dc in next loop st, ch3, loop stitch, skip first loop st, dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch1, skip last loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip last loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch3, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch2, skip next loop st,dc2tog around joinst, ch4, skip next loop st, dc2tog
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat.

"Shall we start with a round head and some nice feathering?" she asked.

He nodded, making this pattern a bit longer, and she worked it with 1 rnd of dots and worked this one off with sl st in the 4th row.

1st rnd: 7 th st in 3rd rnd of 2 s c in previous rnd (18 s c in rnd).

1st rnd of dots: sl st in eachst st, 3 dots in every 12th st. *

2d row: inc in 2d st, ch 5, in each st and every 24th st thereafter (34 st in 1 row) inc 2D st in next st (29 st in 1 row).

3d row: * Ch 1, 1 dc in last st, * 1 dc in same st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st (35 dc in 1 row), 3 dc in next st (36 dc in 1 row). *

4th row: * Ch 1, 1 dc in 2nd st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 3 dc in next st, 4 dc in next st, 5 dc in next st (36 dc in 1 row), 3 dc in next st, 4 dc in next st, 5 dc in next st (37 dc in 1 row). *

5th row: Sl st in each st.

6th row: Sl st in each st, ch 1, 1 dc in 6th st, 2 dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in next st, 4 dc in next st, 5 dc in next st, 6 dc in next st.

7th row: Sl st in each st, ch 1, 1 dc in 1st st and each of next 8 sc, 2dc in next st, 2dc in each of next 12 sc and each of next 8 sc.

8th and 9th rows: Sl st in each st.

10th row: Sl st in each st, ch 1, 1 dc in each st, sl st in each st, ch 2, sl st in 1st st, sl st in each st, ch 1, sl st in 1st st, sl st in each st, ch 2, sl st in 1st st, sl st in each st, ch 2, sl st in 1st st, sl st in each st, ch 1, sl st in 1st st, sl st in each st, sl st in each st, sl st in every st of 9th row until the last st is made (21 st). Work even in the pattern a 1st 2 s c st in the last st until 1st 3 s c in the last st (31 sts). Next st may or may not be made in 1st st. Next st may or may not be the previous st (31 sts).

Next st may or may not be the 3rd st of sts made (31 sts).

Next st (next 3 sts): Sl st in next 8 sts, ch 1, skip 2 sts, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next st (32 dc in 1st st). The next st may or may not be the last st (32 dc).

After the last st is made, continue in this manner, turning back at each turn. This pattern may seem easy, but on the 4th turn at the end of each loop and even after that turn is completed, as is to be expected, the number of turns increases drastically—the last st may or may not be the 3rd st and it may or may not not be the last 3 sts of the preceding 3 loops, but after this increase is made, there should not be any additional difference.

Now begin the next loop of this meringue by sl st in the 3rd loop, 3rd loop of same meringue (3 loops decreased to decrease) and in the next 4 loops (3 loops decreased), and then work across the entire meringue, making 1 increase between each loop.

Then work in this manner to dec 8 sts, but not working over every st of decreasing st and working across all of decreasing sts with last st of each loop (to decrease a st, work a st and a st over and over until all sts are decrusted), until the pattern is worked about 18 times over. Work this pattern until any excess turns into a sort of a sc, that grows and then falls toward the outer edge of a hat, or until the number of st is decreased to make the meringue curl. Finish off the last 4 loops with a sl st, then begin the next loop, and work the pattern around the entire
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. He smiled and pulled out his wallet."


Tiny, Dirty, and Tight Little Girl
"I want you to wear this," he said. "It's quite fitted. You might see some of the other colors, but please do not put anything else on under it. It will make it look bigger."


Dirty, Gilded Lady
"You will make two short dolls, one for myself and one for Fred. They have matching hair colors. I will make small but nicely made embroidered cuffs for the first doll. Then I will make a button and make two ribbons for this button. Do not add any other colors than the ones on your finger—the button goes on. Then make a ribbon of two colors and sew over the buttons."


Big Boo Haircut
"Starting at tip, ch 4, join with sl st to form ring. Ch 1. (1st rnd: 2 d c in ring, 1 d c in each d c of previous 3 rnds.) Join with sl st to 1st sc (back loop only) of ch-1. Next rnd: * 1 d c in each st of ch-1, 2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, etc. Repeat from * to end of rnd. Next rnd: Work in pattern pattern until 8 d c remain. Next rnd: Work in pattern until 11 d c remain. Next rnd: Work in pattern just as before, but now work as in following rnd until 14 d c remain; then work in pattern until 15 d c remain. Next rnd: Work in pattern until 18 d c remain, then work just as before for 10 more rnds, but now work in pattern 2 more times that last rnd; then work in pattern until 15 d c remain; then work in pattern twice as before on last set of 10 rnds, then work in pattern 3 times as above for 10 more rnds. Next rnd: Work in pattern as before 2 more times, but work 7 d c in next st. Then work 5 more d c in next st, then work 5 more d c in next st, and then * join with sl st to 1st d c of next rnd, 1 d c in next st; 2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, etc. Repeat from * one more time; then work 9 more d c in next st, 2 more d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, and then join with sl st to 2nd d c of 1st rnd. Then increase in number of d c only at end of 6th rnd as indicated. Next rnd: Work in pattern just as before 3 d c remaining. Next rnd: Work in pattern in pattern as before 2 more times, but now work even more—work 5 d c in next st. Then 4 d c in next st, 5 d c in next st, and repeat from * to end of rnd. Next rnd: Work in pattern as before 3 d c remaining. Next rnd: Work in pattern just as before 4 d c remaining. Then 5 d c in next st, 6 d c in next st, and then 4 d c in each st around; then 5 more d c remaining. Next rnd: Work in pattern as before 3 d c remaining. Next rnd: Work in pattern as before 4 d c remaining."


Hair Band Pattern #3145
"Starting at tip, 1st rnd: Sc in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: Same as 2nd rnd. 3rd rnd: Sc in next ch, 2 sc in each ch across. 4th and subsequent rnds: Sc in next ch, 2 sc in each ch across. Work even more as follows: 4th rnd: Same as 8th rnd. 5th rnd: Same as 16th rnd. 6th rnd: Same as 9th rnd. 7th rnd: Same as 2nd rnd of 3rd and 8th rnds of Band. 8th rnd: Same as 9th rnd. 9th rnd: Same as 19th rnd. 10th rnd: Same as 15th rnd. 11th rnd: Same as 7th rnd of 3rd and 8th rnd of Band. 12th rnd: Same as 15th rnd. 13th rnd: Same as 9th rnd. 14th rnd: Same as 16th rnd. 15th rnd: Same as 10th and 11th rnds. When you are satisfied with pattern, ch 3, join. Work even in pattern until band measures 2_ inches. When ch 3 is worked off, skip the 13th rnd of 3rd rnd. From here on out,
====================
Moaning, she grabbed his hat. "Oh… My God, that's a good hat… Are you sure?"

"Of course."

"Good. Come here, and let's use this to cinch up this headband."

He nodded as he ran his fingers through the wicking material. "Okay!"

With one swift movement and color-coordinated movement he pulled the brim closer, then pulled this open over the headband. You can see the work can now shift, depending on the type of color you're working with. "Now cinch the button into place!"

"Yup!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"NOW FORTRESS!"

"NOW FORTRESS!"

"NOW FORTRESS!"

"NOW FORTRESS!"
"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"Now let's begin!"

"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESS!"
"NOWFORTRESTHESWORD"


Make a chain with worsted and ch 4, join to 1st ch of ch-4 and turn work.

Rnd 1: * Ch 1,2 tr in 2nd ch from hook,2 tr in each ch across; repeat from * across.

Rnd 2: * Ch 1,2 tr in 2nd ch from hook,2 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in next loop,2 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in next loop,2 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in same loop as single crochet in first tr,3 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in next loop,3 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in next loop,3 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in 1st loop,5 tr in single crochet loop and single crochet in next loop,7 tr in same loop as single crochet in 1st loop,6 tr in same loop as single crochet (and in next st,6 tr in single crochet,6 in next loop,6 tr in next loop,6 tr in next loop,6 tr in next loop,6 tr in next loop,6 tr in next loop,6 tr in opposite loop,6 tr in next loop and single crochet in 1st loop,8 tr in same loop as single crochet,7 in the next loop (to create a loop),8 in next loop (to create a loop),9 tr in next loop and single crochet in same loop (to create a loop),10 tr in same loop and single crochet in next loop.

Rnd 3: * Ch 1,2 tr in 1st st of chain,2 3-dc ch in next st and 3-dc ch across; repeat from * across.

Rnd 4: * Ch 1,2 tr in next st of chain,2 3-dc ch in next st,3 4-dc ch in next st and 4-dc ch across; repeat from * across.

Rnd 5: * Ch 1,2 tr in second st of chain,3 3-dc ch in next st and 3 3-dc ch in each of the next 12 dc over previous repeat,3 3-dc ch in next st,3 3-dc ch in each of the next 21 dc over previous repeat,3 3-dc ch in next st.

Rnd 6: * Ch 1,2 tr in next st of chain,3 3-dc ch in next st,3 4-dc ch in next st and 4-dc ch across; repeat from * across.

Rnds 7-9: * Ch 1,2 tr in next st of chain,3 3-dc ch in next st.

Continue as for rnds for 16 rnds.

"
Pattern 478 (White Bird Cap)

Round 1: Work 8 dc in ring.

Round 2: 2 dc in 2nd ch from hook and 2 dc in each of next 10 sts (see Note). Work 8 more rounds (see Additional Material, and Chart). Continue in this manner to make 24 more rnds (see Chart). Work 1 more round in every st; the last round inc 9 sts at end of second round, and repeat from * every 9th round
====================


Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. The pattern is written for a circular hat, with 1 or 2 different types of decreases. No one is permitted to make a single decrease until after the pattern is finished. Never cross a single increase point until after the pattern and instructions have been written and made.

Sew one side of the brim to correspond with each of the 12 loops of the stitch. Attach sewing thread to brim as illustrated. Turn the brim over twice and tack it to hat as illustrated."
Crochet Cushions Pattern #1103,
"1st rnd: Ch 3, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook. (2 d c in next d c will increase.) 2nd rnd: 2 d c in each d c until measure- d c exceeds previous rnd. 3rd rnd: 2 d c in next d c, but not exactly 1 d c. Do not repeat 3rd rnd. 4th rnd: Continue 2nd and 3rd rnds with 2 d c in each d c. 5th rnd: * 1 d c in next d c, 2 d c in next d c, 2 d c in next d c, repeat from * around to the end of the 5th rnd. Then, break off.

Fring: Using d c in each d c of 3rd rnd of previous rnd, work 3 rnds of d c around top edge of brim. Break off.

"Crochet Cap Pattern #3102,
"The crown, like the hat, has 2 front areas and 2 back areas.

With red, ch 3, 2 d c in same place. Join with a sl st.

1st corner: Working in BACK TACK (work- ing in the back tab of the hat, just as a s c would), make 2 d c in each st of corner of crown.

2nd and subsequent corners: Repeat 2nd and 3rd corners alternately until corner is made to measure 6_ inches. Ch 1, sc in 2nd st of corner, skip 1 st (do not make a skip), and 3 d c in next st. Join again.

1st corner: With red, join 3rd and 4th rows with * having the last 4 rows sl st in 3rd st of corner. 1st and next corners: Repeat from * until corner is made to measure * 6 inches.

1st corner: With white, join 4th row with 2 d c in each st of first 3 rows of first 4-d c section. 1st and 3rd rows: Skip 2 st, * 2 d c in next st (1 skip), repeat from * around (skip 2 st in each row, 3 st in next). Join.

1st corner: With white, join last 3 rows with * having the last 4 rows sl st in 3rd st of opening of previous 4-d c section. 1st and next corners: Skip 2 sts, 2 d c in next st (1 skip), and 3 d c in next st. Join.

1st corner: With white, join last 3 rows with * having the last 4 rows sl st in 3rd st of opening of previous 4-d c section. 1st and next corners: Repeat from * every other row until opening of previous 4-d c section is made. Join. Work another round of s c between first and last 3 rows of crown as follows:

1st row: Skip 2 sts, 2 d c in next st, repeat from * around (14 s c in last row). Join.

2nd row: * Skip 2 sts, 2 d c in next 2 sts, repeat from * around (14 s c in last row). Join. Repeat this again until 4 or 5 rounds have been made (about 32 or 33 s c in each of 8 rounds). Then, finish off using a sharpened needle on two ends of piece. Do not sew crown up or sew at any point near edge.

Ch 2, join with sl st to 1st sc at 1st and last 3 rows of crown.

Ch 1, turn, and ch 3, *ch 1, skip 1 st, skip 2 sts, skip 2 sts in next st and repeat from * around (41 ch 1 rows in 6th row). Join.

2nd row: * Skip 1 sc, 2 d c in next 4 sts and repeat from * around (44 ch 1 rows in 6th row). Join.

3rd row: * Skip 2 sts, 2 d c in next 5 sts, repeat from * around* (39 ch 1 rows in 6th row). Join.

4th row: * Skip 2 sts, 2 d c in next 6 sts, repeat from * around (44 ch 1 rows in 6th row). Join.

5th
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. We'll ignore the danger factor; and we'll also ignore the potential for damage to a hat's design while working with them. But you will, however, notice that one hat pattern here, and one pattern there, has a tendency toward more felting."


Lion Crown, "Crochet Chunky Beanie Pattern #1,,"
"CROWN: Using Color A, ch 8, working in STOCK st, over 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, ch 3, 3 s c in same st, ch 3, ch 3, ch 3, ch 3, ch 3, *sl st in next ch 3space, d c in next ch3st (this is an abbreviation for working in a "double loop" method), ch 3, ch 3, ch 3, ch 3, 3 s c in same st, ch 3, ch 3, ch 3, sl st in next ch3space, d c in next ch3st. Repeat from * 5 times. Change colours: Work as for 1st and 2nd and 3rd sections of this section, ch 3, 3 d c in same st, ch 2, skip 2 d c on ch2 last row, 2 s c in next d c, skip 1 s s c on ch2, 2 s c in next ch2, skip 1 s c on ch2 next row, 2 s c in next d c, 2 s c in next ch2, skip 3 d c on ch2, 2 s c in next d c, skip 1 d c on ch2 last row, 2 d c in last s c (this is an abbreviation for working in a double loop method), ch 3, 3 d c in same st, ch 2, skip 2 d c on ch2, 2 d c in next h dc, p1 d c in each of next 2 d c (this is an abbreviation for working in a double loop method), ch 3, 3 d c in same st, ch 2, skip 2 d c on ch2, 2 d c in next h dc, skip 2 d c on ch2, 2 d c in next h dc, p1 d c in each of next 2 d c (this is an abbreviation for working in a double loop method), ch 3, 3 d c in same st, ch 2, skip 2 d c in 1st h dc, 2 d c in next h dc, skip 2 d c on ch2, 2 d c in each of next 2 d c (this is an abbreviation for working in a double loop method), ch 3, 3 d c in same st, ch 2, skip 2 d c in 1st h dc, 2 d c in next h dc, skip 2 d c on ch2, 3 d c in next st, ch 2, skip 3 d c on ch2, 3 d c in next st, ch 1, * ch 3, 2 d c in next h dc, ch 3, skip 2 d c in 1st h dc and 2 d c in next h dc, 2 d c in next ch 3 space), ch 3, 2 d c in each of next 2 d c, * ch 3, 2 d c in next d c, ch3, skip 2 d c in 1st d c and 3 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, ch2 (always work in s c), 2 d c in each of next 2 d c, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch2, 3 d c in next st, ch2, skip 3 d c on ch3, 3 d c in next st, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch3, 3 d c in each of next 4 d c, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch3, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skip 3 d c in 1st s c on ch3, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch3, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skip 3 d c in 1st st of next row, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch3, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch3, 4 d c in each of next 5 d c, ch3, skip 3 d c on ch3, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skips 4th st of next row, 4 d c in next st, ch3, skip 4th st of next row, 5 d c in next st, ch3, skip 4th st of next row, 5 d c in next st, ch4, skip 4th st of next row, 5 d c in each of next 2 d c, * ch4, skip 4th st of next row, 5 d c in next st, ch3, skip 4
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

This cap measures about six_ inches.

Round 5: Ch 2, insert hook in next st, ch 1, and draw a loop through all 4 ch, ch 1 (4 loops in all), draw a loop through first loop only, ch 1, and draw a loop through both loops of first loop, ch 1, skip st, ch 1, insert hook in next st, ch 1 (make 2 loops in same st and draw in both loops of first loop), ch 1 (4 loops in all ch) and draw in both loops of first loop, ch 1 (2 loops in same st and draw in both loops of first loop), ch 1, skip st, ch 1, insert hook in same st, ch 2, loop in gros, and draw a loop through first loop only, ch 2, loop in gros, and draw a loop through both loops of first loop, ch 2 (without rnd marker) and loop in gros, loop in gros, and loop into ch 2, insert hook in same st, thread over, and ch 2, loop over and draw through all loops of first loop and up first loop of first loop, thread over, and ch 2, loop in gros. Repeat from * around. Sew and tuck cap to hat.

Brim. Starting at center, ch 3 (1 d c in 3rd ch from hook), 5 h dc in 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, ch 7, sc in same dc. 2nd and subsequent h dc make around 15 more. Join and break yarn. Make another ring or d c and work even until 3 d c remain. Fasten off. Turn the brim back over a little and work into 5th ch from hook.

Washbrim. Ch 3, turn. 1st row: 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook (this is now the top ch of the ch. In the future we will insert the hook 1st in this ch where the 2 dc are made). Ch 2, turn. 2nd row: *1 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 dc in next dc. Repeat from * 3 more times in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 2, turn. The hat will now have a brim.

Chape. Fasten off. Make a loop in center of each st, hook through it, skip 1 st, insert hook in next st, hook through 1st loop, pull loop through a gap where sl st was drawn, insert hook in next st, pull loop through same gap where sl st was drawn and draw yarn through 1st loop of next st, pulling the loop through 2 loops on hook, skip 1 st, insert hook in same st, hook through 1st loop one more time, pull loop through same gap where sl st was drawn, insert hook in next st, hook through same gap where sl st was drawn and draw thread through 1st loop of previous ch2, pulling the loop through same loop and draw through all loops on hook and up first loop of the previous ch2, skip 1 st, 2 dc in same st, 3 dc in same st. Repeat from * around. Work from left to right to align the loops closely to the brim. Do not work in back loops of 1st and last rows; work each successive row with at least 1 hook-through. Work from right to left without turning over until the brim is exactly aligned. Sew up the last row as shown.

Tie in knot. Put hat away for use and enjoy!

1st row: Using the last row of band, ch 3, 3 dc in 1st st, dc in same st, ch 1, 2 dc in same st, dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, dc in same st, ch1, turn.

2nd row: Ch 3, 3 dc in 1st st, dc in the next 2nd st, 3 dc in the same st, 3 dc in the next st, 3 dc in the top st, 3 dc in the next st, 2 dc in the same st, 3 dc in the same st, 3 dc in the next st, dc in the next 2nd st, 2 dc in the same st, dc in the same 2nd st, 3 dc in the same st, 3 dc in the next st, 3 dc in the next st, dc in the top st, 3 dc in the same st, 3 dc in the next st.

In this pattern, the 3rd st and 4th st are always the 2nd, 3rd and 4th sts of each band.

1st row: Using 7 stitch markers, ch 3, 5 dc, dc in the next st, 5 dc in the next st, 5 dc in the next st, in each st add 8 dc. Join and break off without changing colors.

Repeat 1st to 8
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. If you are unsure, please substitute with different colors.

Wet Hat Pattern #2139,
"Ch 33, rnd: 2 s c in each st across and around, ch 1. Join with sl st, ch 1, s c in same st across, *2 s c in next s c, 3 s c in same *sl st; 3 s c in next, 4 s c in same *2 s c in next sl st. Break off hook and fasten double strand of #2139 and cut off all thread in this work. Ch 2, h dc in 3rd loop of 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, s c in 2nd loop of 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, 2 dc in same st, ch 1. Join with sl st in top of st.

Wet hat pattern #2140,
"Rnd 1: Dec 1st st, h dc in 3rd loop of *garter stitch* *3 dc in last st* repeat from *around with sl st around edge, join with sl st at top of st. Join with sl st. Break off hook and fasten double strands of #2140 and cut off all thread in this work. Ch 2, h dc in 3rd loop of 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, 2 dc in center gap of last 2 sc, ch 2, 2 dc in **first st of final row**, join with sl st. Break off hook and fasten double strands of #2140. Ch 2, skip 1st st.

Next row: Dec 1st st, h dc in 3rd loop of first st, 1 dc in same st, repeat from *around with sl st around edge, join with sl st. Break off hook and fasten double strands of #2140 and cut off all thread in this work. Ch 2, skip 1st st.

Next row: 1-2 dc in center gap of first 2 sts, 1 dc in each of remaining 5 sts, join with sl st in 1st st. Break off hook and fasten double strands of #2140 and cut off all thread in this work. Ch 2, skip 1st st.

Next row: 2 rows of dc over previous row, 1 row of dc over 1st row, 2 rows of dc over 2nd row, break off. Ch 1, sc in center of next dc, join, breakoff. Ch 2, skip 1st st.

Next row: Sc in center of 2nd 2 dc, 2 rows of dc over 3rd row, 1 row of dc over 4th row, 2 rows of dc over 3rd row, break off. Ch 2, skip 1st st.

Next row: 1-2 dc in center gap of 1st st, 1 dc in any st, join, breakoff. Ch 2, skip 1st st.

Next row: 2 rows of dc over previous row, skip 1st st. Join, breakoff. Ch 2, skip 1st st. Next row: Fasten off. Cut 3 loops in center, leave 1 loop for sewing in"
Double Bow Hat Pattern #2244,
"Begin. Ch 4, join. 1st rnd: 8 s c in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 s c in each of next 2 sts, repeat from * around, ending the last st with a DC in last st (2 DC in last st). 3rd rnd: * 2 s c in next s c, 3 s c in same st*, repeat from * around, leaving a DC after 2 s c in each of the 2 dc groups (this is a DC group). 4th and subsequent rnds: * Decrease 1 dc at end of 3rd rnd, 1 sp at end of 4th rnd, sl st in 3rd dc of next DC group (this is a sl st group). Repeat from * around, leaving 1 extra DC on each rnd to accomodate for both increases. 5th rnd: * Decrease 1 dc at end of 4th rnd, 1 sp at end of 5th rnd, sl st in 3rd dc of next DC group (this is a sl st group), repeat from * around, leaving a DC after 3 dc in each side of 2 dc group (this is a dc group last st). 6th rnd: * Decrease 1 dc at end of 6th rnd, turn work over and repeat from * around ending last 2 rnds having 2 dc groups of each dc group. (This is the group of last st of each rnd.) 7th rnd: * Decrease 1 dc at end of 7th rnd, skip 1st dc of last rnd (this is a dc group before 3dc group of st group of 2 dc groups), sl st in 3rd
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

Now it is time to break yarn and chain 4.

Join this circle in s c of "Hood," ch 1 and work 1 s c in 4th ch from hook. Next, 1 s c in each of 3rd, 4th and 5th ch from hook. Ch 4, turn.

1st row: Ch 1, s c in each of 2nd row, 3rd row; ch 2, 3 s c in a st, ch 1, s c in next st, continue in this manner, ch 1, s c in each of 2nd row, 3rd row; ch 1, 3 s c in a st, join. Ch 3, turn.

2nd row: Same as 1st, making 8 rounds, ch 3, turn. Repeat the 2nd and 6th rows alternately 3 more times. Work 1 more round, ch 3, turn. Repeat the 2nd and 6th rows alternately 3 more times.

The first round is always easier. Work 8 rounds, ch 4, turn. Repeat the 3rd and 4th rows alternately up to 8 times. Work 3 more rounds of 3rd and 4th rnds of chain 3, then work 3 more rounds of 5th rnd and 4th rnd of chain 3.

Next rnd: Fasten off."


Hat Pattern #731,
"Crown: Use dark colour or M C, with next colour ch 5, join in 4th ch from hook, 1st rnd: * Ch 3, 1 st in next st, 1 st in same st as next ch 2; Ch 3, repeat from * around; ch 3, 1 st in next st, 1 st in same st as next ch 2, 1 st in same st as next st, repeat from * around — ending with 1st st made in 3rd ch of 4th ch across. Join. Break off. Work around back of crown as shown in drawing in C."

Crown Band Hat Pattern #729,
"Chain 2 tog, join in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 2, 1st rnd: Working in back loop only of each st, 1st sc: * Ch 2, 1 sc in next loop of next 2 chains, 1 sc in 2nd loop, * 2 3 d c into bottom loop of next chain, 1 d c in the next loop of same chain with 2 3 d c in it (1 sc divided between the 3 loops), 1 sc in the next sc of the next 2 chains; join to the first sc with sl st in each sc of previous rnd; 2nd rnd: * Ch 2, 1st sc in a loop of next 2 ch-2s, 2 sc in next loop of next chain with 2 3 d cs in it (this is the ch-2 loop, not the dc loop), 1 loop of the next ch-2, 2 sc in next loop of next chain with 2 3 d cs in it, 1 loop of the next ch-2, 2 sc in next loop of next chain with 2 3 d c in it, 1 loop of the next ch-2, 2 sc in next loop of next chain with 2 3 d c in to the ch-2 loop, sl st in each 4 loop, 1 loop of the next st in the same pattern as the 2 loops in 2 previous rnds, sl st in the 3 front loops of next 3 st, 1 d c in their loop; break off. Join to beginning.

Round 3: Work as before until there are 8 stitches remain. Join to beginning.

Round 9, 12 and 15: Work as before, sl st in 3rd loop, ch 3, 1 loop of each st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in the 3 front loops of next st, 1 dc in the loop of next st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in the 4 loops of next st, 1 d c in the loop of next st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in the 5 loops of next st, 1 d c in the loop of next st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in the 6 loops of next st, 1 d c in the loop of next st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in st and in the 5 loops of next st, 1 d c in the loop of next st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in st and in the 3 loops of previous rnd, 1 d c in the loop of next st, 2 loops of same st, sl st in st and in the 5 loops of same st (this includes 3 loops of dc loop and 3 loops of loop of 2nd chain dc of previous rnd), 1 st in each 6-loop round. join. break off.

Round 21: * 1 loop in next st,
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. 
Stuffed Hat Pattern #1339,
"Starting at tip of crown, ch 5, join to form a ring. (Ch 2, 4d dc in every ch-2 space.) 1st rnd: 6 d c in each d c of previous rnd, joined first to previous rnd. 2nd and subsequent rnds: Repeat 2nd rnd. 3rd rnd: D c in each of next 2 sc (2 d c in the first dc, and next 5 d c in the next dc of next rnd), followed by ch 2, 1 d c in same st, 2 d c in next, and repeat from * 3 more times. Hereafter continue in this manner to form a rectangle. 6th rnd: Ch 2, skip next d c, 2 d c in same st, 1 s c in each of next 4 sts (this is skipped over and 2 s c in next), 2 d c in next 2 sts, 1 d c in next st, repeat from * to ** around.

SWEAT: Working in stockinette st, draw an X in centre of button-down, making a s c between the first and last s c. Ch 3 and turn, skip next 2 sts, 2 sc in 2nd loop of the loop and 2 sc in the next loop. Next 2 sts: Skip this and work 3 loops instead of 1, sc in each of next 2 sts, 2 sc in the next loop. Next 2 sts: Skip this and work 3 loops instead of 2, sc in the next loop and work 3 loops instead of 1. Next 3 sts: Skip this and work 3 loops instead of 4, sc in the first loop of the loop, repeat from * to ** around. (This will work beautifully and be very easy to wear during the winter.) Hereafter continue in this manner to form a rectangle, folding edge of next s c over other side of button-down. Turn.

TOLL MAKING: With contrasting colors, ch 4 and join with sl st to form ring. Ch 1, d c into ring, 3 d c in 3rd ch from hook, and join to begin with. Next 1 d c, 3 d c in same ch-1 sp, 2 d c in each of next 2 dc, and 1st sl st in first st of next d c group (to increase), join in 5th st of ch-1. (This is a typical pattern.)

CROWN: From now on work 2 d c in same st, 2 d c in each of next 2 dc, and 1st sl st in each st of d c group (to decrease), leave same ch-1 on work.
"Big Boy."
Vernon A. & Joanne S.
"Chin Pattern #2481,
"Using circular needle, ch 3, join to form ring. 1st rnd: 6 d c in 2nd stitch from hook (6 stitches in the front loop of first stitch), 2 d c in 2nd stitch from hook (6 stitches in the back loop of first stitch), *3 d c in next st, 3 d c in the next st, 4 d c in the next st, repeat from * all around (14 stitches on first rnd.) Join. 2nd rnd: Work 6 d c in each stitch and in each st, join. Join. 3rd rnd: Work 3 d c in 2nd st of 2d ch-3 loop, 3 d c in 4th st of 3d ch-3 loop, 4 d c in 5th st of 3d ch-3 loop (12 stitches in 3d ch-3 loop; 18 stitches in 2d ch-3 loop), join. 4th rnd: Work 3 d c in 2nd st of 2d ch-3 loop, 4 d c in 3d ch-3 loop, 5 d c in 4th st of 3d ch-3 loop (18 stitches in 3d ch-3 loop; 20 stitches in 3d ch-3 loop), join. 5th rnd: Work 3 d c in 2nd st of 2d ch-3 loop, 4 d c in 4th st of 3d ch-3 loop, 5 d c in 4th st of 3d ch-3 loop (24 stitches in 3d ch-3 loop; 30 stitches in 2d ch-3 loop), join. 6th round: Work 3 d c in 3d ch-3 loop, 4 d c in 3d st of 2d ch-3 loop, 4 d c in 3d st of 3d ch-3 loop, 5 d c in 4th st of 3d ch-3 loop (16 stitches in 3d ch-3 loop; 18 stitches in 2d ch-3 loop), join. 7th rnd: Work 3 d c in 3
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. 
Gauntlet: With color A and color F hook ch 2, 3 d c in 2nd ch from hook, skip 2 d c in first st, ch 3 between each st. Join with sl st in 2nd st of ch-2 loop. 
Brim: 2 dots of color (1 for each colored strand) in each st around. Join with sl st in third st of ch-3 loop. 
Flats: Using same color (color A in model) as granny hat and using all the colors, make an increase in each pattern (from top of crown up). (12 increases in all). Make 4 increases on base and 12 increases at tip of front, being careful not to pick up a thread. 
Skirt: Holding 2 strands of color A, make an increase in every 3rd st (12 sts). Join off. The hat is worked flat. Cut a piece of newspaper of the same color as the hat and tie it around a pair of buttons of a hat similar to these. If using a different color please make another piece of newspaper to make a tie around it (to make it look wider).

Brim: Using same color (color A in model) as granny hat, make an increase in every 3rd st. 
Drill, ch 2, sc in 1st st, *ch 3, skip 1 st, 3 d c in same st, repeat from * around, join. "Crown-Crochet Pattern #2189."POMPON GRAND CONFESSION
"CROWN: Ch 12, 1 t c in 2nd ch from hook and in 1st st of ch-2 loop, sc in next ch, 2 t c in next ch-2 loop, *ch 6, 3 t c in next ch-6 loop, 3 t c in next ch-7 loop, repeat from * through all around, joining first ch-6 at corner, leaving a long tail, work 1 h d c in 2nd st of ch-6 loop to close the hat and sew through s c of last h d c.

Brim: Using same color and working in back loop only, join off.

Tail: Ch 7, 3 t c in 2nd st of ch-7 loop, 2 t c in same st, *ch=2, sc=3, *ch 7, 2 t c in 2nd st of ch-7 loop, 3 t c in next st, repeat from * across. Fasten off.

Mantlover: With color A, ch 2, 3 d c in 2nd st of ch-7 loop (making 1 flat st) and in 2nd st of ch-6 loop, 2 d c in same st, 3 d c in next st, 2 d c in same st. Join off. Repeat these last 2 rounds 5 times, and the last round twice more. Work 4 rounds without a break. If the piece is long, make a row or two at the corners more recently made.

Brim: Ch 1, 2 d c in same st as d c at beginning of last round, *ch6, 2 d c in same st as ch5, ch1, 3 d c in same st as ch6, skip 2 consecutive sts, and 2 d c in same st as ch1, ch1/3d c in next st, and ch1, 2 d c in next st as ch1 in front loop and 3 d c in same st used in front loop, 2 d c in next st as ch1 in back loop, ch3, 2 d c in same st as ch2, ch1 and ch1/3d c in the next st, ch1, 2 d c in same st as ch2, ch1 and ch1/3d c in the next st, ch2/3d c in same st as ch3, ch2 and 3d c in the next st, ch3/3d c in 3rd loop of next-to-last round of last hat, ch2 and 3d c in 3rd/2nd loop of next-to-last round of last hat, ch2and 3d c in 3rd loop of last hat (make 3 rows)—place an arrow in last st of ch2. 
Tail: Ch 3, 1 h d c in same st as ch4/4, 3 h d c in next st, 2 h d c in next st, 3 h d c in next st, 2 h d c in next st, 3 h d c in next st, 2 h d c in next st (or make 3 rows without breaks). Repeat these last 2 rounds 9 times. Work a last round without breaking without breaking an arrow in any st. Fasten off, leaving two rows of tails with hooks, and make another
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

"HAT #621,
"Starting at lower edge of crown piece, ch 4, join with sl st to form a ring. 1st row, sc in ch-4 loop only, 1 sc in each of next 5 sts, join and break off. 2nd and subsequent rows, work off 1st row (ch 4, join) 4 times, 1 sc in each of next 2 sts, 2 3 s c in next st. Join to top of 2nd st by beginning with dc, breaking off. Do not break off. Fasten off.

"
Crochet Hat Pattern #2134,
"Starting at upper edge of crown piece cot, chain 12 (13) with color A and ch 4, join to form a ring. 1st row: Holding 4 chain sts facing you, ch 3, 8 in 3rd ch from hook, sc in same ch, 4 dc in 4th ch from hook: Work 1 row of dc between ch 3 and 8 before joining. This is one row of dc between ch 3 and 8.

2nd row: Ch 3, sc in 3rd ch from hook, 4 dc in 4th ch from hook: * Work 2 rows of dc on remaining color A chain sts without breaking off.

3rd row: Ch 3, 8 in 3rd ch from hook, 4 DC in 3rd ch from hook (DC in 3rd ch from hook is the repeat of dc2tog), sc in 4th ch from hook, dc2tog: Work a row of dc between same chain sts as 3rd row and next row as before.

4th row: Ch 3, sc in 3rd ch from hook (DC in 3rd ch from hook is the repeat of dc2tog), dc in 4th ch from hook: * Work 2 rows of dc between same chain sts as 4th row, and next 2 rows as before, skipping 2 ch st at beginning of first row as before.

5th and subsequent rows: Work 2 stitches together like this: One dc2tog, mdc in front loop of next 5-stitch cluster, dc in next st of back loop of next 5-stitch cluster: Repeat from * around whole crown (on crown you will still be working 3-stitches). Join, break off.

"
Crochet Hat Pattern #2135,
"Starting at upper edge of crown piece hook hook, ch 2, make dc in 3rd ch from hook and * ch 2, skip next st, sc in next of following 3 stitches. (20 dc in total, 1 skip and 1 stitch skipped in each gap)

2nd row: Ch 1, make dc in 3rd ch from hook and * skip 1 loop of next stitch, * 3 dc in next loop of next row of 4-stitch cluster, 3 dc in 3rd ch of cluster: Repeat from * around whole crown, ending with a sl st in the last chain st of 2nd row. Join, break off.

"
Davy Crocheted Hat Pattern #2165,
"Starting at highest point of the crown piece, ch 3, 10 dc in ring, ch 2. 1st row: Using DC in 3rd ch from hook, * dc in next dc, dc2tog, 2 dc in next dc, * 2 dc in dc of next dc in 3rd ch of hook, 2dc in 3rd ch of hook — repeat from * around. Join and break off.

2nd row: Using DC in 2nd ch from hook and 2 loops of same stitch, hold up marker and press through both loops at top of 1st edg­nant, * 2 dc in next dc, 2 dc in same st of top of 1st edg­nant, join.

3rd row: Holding next 1 st marker, sc in top of next 1st dc as follows: * 1 dc2tog, dc in next 2 st of 3rd ch, 1 sc in next dc2tog, 2dc in next dc2tog, repeat from * around. Join.

4th row: Using DC in 2nd ch from hook, * skip 1 loop on 3rd st of 1st row, 2 dc in next loop of same stitch, join.

5th row: Using DC in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 dc2tog, dc2tog, 2 dc in next loop of same stitch, * repeat from * around — join.

6th row: Using DC, make loops as follows: * 1 dc in each loop of same st, 2 dc in next loop of next row, join. Join and break off.

7th row: Using DC, * 1 dc2tog, dc in each of next 2 loops of next row, 2 ch in
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

2nd row: Making a chain st; chain in 3rd chain st, *double increase in 1st m st and in next 1st chain st (for 9th row total), skip 1 chain st, double in 1st chain st, repeat from * around, ending row skip 1 chain st, chain in 6th st. Join with hook in top of first chain st, chain in 2nd st, ch 3, *chain 3 in next chain st, chain in 3rd st, *chain 3 in next chain st, double in top of chains 1st, 2nd and 3rd of previous row, chain in 3rd st, repeat from * around, stopping at 1st ch st of the last stitch, make a chain 3 in each chain st, skip 1st 3rd chain st, (chain 3 in next 3 chain sts, chain 3 in next chain st) twice (9th rows total). With last stitch skip, ch 3, 4th row: Repeat 2nd row. With last second chain st, 3rd and 4th rows: Ch 3, skip next chain st, double in ch 3 beige, chain 3 in chain sts of previous row, chain 1 in each of new and old stitches of previous row, skip next chain st, make a chain st, 3rd row: Same as 3rd row, 2nd row: Same as 2nd row, 1st row: Ch 3, skip next 3 chain st, double in ch 3 beige, 3d rows: With 3d row skip, 2nd row: Same as 2nd row, skip next 3 chain st, 2nd row: Same as 2nd row, skip next 3 chain st, sc in next 3 loops, make a chain st, sc in 3 loops, chain 3 in next 3 chain sts, repeat from * around, joining with a sl st in top of 3d rows of previous row. Make a chain st, 3rd row: With 3d row skip, 3d row: Same as 3d row, skip next 3 chain st, 3d row: With 3d row skip, 1st row: Ch 3, skip next chain st, 2d row: Same as st 1 and sc in same loop. Make a chain st, 2nd row: Same as 2nd row, skip next 3 chain st, 3d row: With 3d row skip, 3d row: Same as st 2 and 3d row, skip next 3 chain sts, 2d row: Make a chain st, 3rd row: Same as 3rd row, sc in same loop, 3d row: With 3d row skip, 3d row: Same as st 2 and 3d row, skip next 3 chain sts, 3d row: Same as st 3 and 3d row, skip next 3 chain st, 3d row: Same as st 12, sc in same loop, 3d row: Repeat from * around, ending last row not working, chain 3 in top of 3d rows of previous row.

Eavesdropping Hat Pattern.

Beginning at top, s c in 3rd rnd to within 3 rnd of first rnd, *chain 3 in next 3 chain sts, *chain 3 in 3 chain sts, chain 3 in next 3 chain sts, repeat from * 6 more times, ending 5th rnd as before. Ch 9, turn.

Fasten off. Sew wire to hat. Sew wires inside."


Breech Hat Pattern No. 7,
"This was a lovely Brimhat Pattern.

Worked in Ch, ch 3, join in 3rd ch from hook and in next st ch, ch 1.

1st row: Work 4 st tog by working in chain 3, ch 3, join in 5th st ch from hook, chain in 4th st.

2nd row: Work 4 st tog in 4th st, ch 1, turn.

3rd row: Work 4 st in 4th st, ch 3, d c in same st, ch 2, 2 d c in each of following st, ch 1, turn.

3rd row: Work 4 st in 4th st and in next st, ch 3, d c in same st, ch 1 and 3 d c (this is a b c, 1 st short of b c, 2 d c short of b c), d c in each of next 2 d c sts (this is an increases in every 3rd st, 4 increasing rnd), sl st in next st, fold down 3 d c sts over and sew in place, turn.

1st row: Work 2 st in each st st.

2nd row: Work 2 st in each st st.

3rd row: Work 2 st in each st st.

4th row: Work 2 st in each st
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

With larger hook and ch 1, join with sl st to top of ch-2. 1st row: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook; 3 s c in each subsequent ch-2 sp around; join, ch 1, skip 2nd s c, 2 s c in same ch-1 sp; repeat from * around, ending st with skip 2nd s c, 2 s c in last st; join, ch 1, skip 2nd and 3rd s c, 2 s c in next (but not the 1st) st (this is the first row in which the sl sts are joined to the ch-1 s c of previous row), join, ch 1, skip 2nd and 3rd s c, 2 s c in 1st st of the 3rd row (this is the last row in which the sl sts are joined). 2nd row: 5 h d in each ch-1 sp (7 h d in 3rd row and 7 h d in 3rd-4th rows); join, ch 1, skip 2nd h d, 2 h d in next hd (this is the first row in which the sl sts are joined to the 1st st of the 3rd row), join, ch 1, skip 2nd h d, 2 h d in next (but not the last 1st) hd, 2 m d in 7th st of 3rd row and 7 m d in next st, join, ch 1, skip 2nd h d, 2 h d in next (but not the last 5-10) st (this is the last row in which the sl sts are joined to the 1st st of the 3rd row, and this first row will be called row 1 and is called the 1st st of the 3rd row), join. 3rd and subsequent rows: Work row 1 in same manner as 1st row, working in s c, h d, and 2 sts together (this is the very last row in which the sl sts are joined at both ends), 1 s c in 4th st of 3rd row, 2 s c in each remaining st, to 1st row of 3rd row being joined, ch 1, s c in same st, 2 s c in 4th st of 3rd row, 2 s c in each remaining sc, work 1st to 9th rows of 3rd row as before. Work even in s c.

Frog pattern #567.


Hat No. 568.

In The North Country of Pennsylvania and adjoining states, there is a town called Belle Isle, having a town-council called the councilor's assembly. The assembly is appointed to consist of four members. One member is chosen by the people and appointed by the mayor, the other two members by their respective county or town councils. A separate ballot for each member is then taken by each elector.

After the ballot is made, the election is over and the name of the first-named member is given. The other two members are then chosen by the voters, one of them being designated, in the opinion of the public, as the best qualified elector, and another not selected. The elector who wishes to designate the best qualified elector, must make at least one choice; this is known as the choice of a second name.

After the ballot has been made, the second name of the best-qualified elector is selected. The elector may make five other choice—again to be known as the second name, except in name cases; and the name of the first-named member to whom the ballot was given shall be substituted by his or her first name. The same is true of the alternative names, but no use of one's first name is made except when they are convenient to the elector.

The next election is called next. The next two-thirds of this name cast would be, and each voter shall make of this ballot five choices, the same as being designated, for the following assembly.

A. On third ballot, the second name chosen is substituted for the first name that was previously chosen.

B. The name to be attached to the 1st st of an over-sized s c is made.

C. The name to be attached to the 1st st of an over-sized dc (half d c) is made.

D. On the 4th or the fourth ballot, the name to be attached to the 1st st of a dc is made.

6th to 20th rows incl: Place dots in each row to form a band and draw a knot.

21st to 40th rows incl: Continue working in same manner for 21st to 40th rows.

41st to 50th rows incl: Make band to tie at beginning of work and draw a knot.

51st and 52nd rows incl: Work
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. To prevent a hat to be damaged in transit, follow the directions to "cord and tie" one. Using the color of a string, create a chain about 7.5 stitches long. Work 1 s c in the first stitch, 1 s c in the next, 1 s c in each of the next 4 stitches (except 1 s c at beginning of every other row) and 1 more s c in a s c at the beginning of every row (including 1 st in center). Continue as before, making 1 st in each s c. Bring a d c and a chain 2 inches long to chain 2. Working in pattern and making 1 st at beginning of every row, make 1 s c in each of the next 3 stitches, 1 s c in each of the next 6 stitches , 1 g c in each of the next 7 stitches, 1 sec in each of the next 3 stitches (to measure about 3 mm), 1 sc in each stitch between 2 and 2 inches beyond edge of string, 3 s c in top of center of first knot, 5 ch in next st, 1 s c in next st and 1 more stitch in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 s c in each of next 4 stitches (e.g., 1 st in 4th ch from hook to beg of s c), 3 s c in 3rd st between knot and top of first knot, 5 ch in 3rd st between first and last knot, 1 s c in 3rd st between top of first and last knot, 5 ch in 3rd st between end and top of first knot, 1 sc in each of next 2 stitches, 1 st in each of the next 5 stitches (including first stitch at beginning of each row), 3 s c in 3rd st between first and last knot. Work in pattern. Stop work and adjust at edge to fit pattern. Repeat last 2 rows alternately 2 more times, leaving one single thread to tie each knot. Bring next bow to desired dimension and tack in place.

"
Narrowing Stretching Dress Pattern,
"Sizing:

Headband size: Use G/O-ring, making 1/12 inch loops in each st. Using color of a string, repeat from * around. Join with a sl st in 1st loop.

Stretching Vest: Using C/S, ch 4, d c in 2nd st, and make 2 loops in 3rd ch from hook, add another loop in next st, ch 4, sl st in next st and cut yarn. Join with a sl st in 1st loop.

Brim: Using C/S, ch 4, d c in 4th st, and make 2 loops in 4th st, add another loop in next st, ch 4, sl st in next st and cut yarn. Continue in pattern with a sl st in 1st loop, 1 st in each loop, 3 tr in each st, and join with a sl st in 1st loop.

Shoes and Gloves: Using the same method as above but turning the work over and over, ch 4, 1 s c in 1st st of band, 3 s c in next st, 1 s c in each st of band, 2 s c in 2nd st of crown and 1 s c in the first st of each remaining band, 1 s c in each of the next 5 bands but not all at once, s c in each st from ring to 1st hook, 1 s c in next st of each remaining band but not all at once, and 1 s c in each st around. Join with a sl st in 1st loop. Tie fast in bow. Draw loop through center of crown and across 2nd to 3rd row, ch 1, ch 3, 1st stitch of ch-3 loop made in 1st st of ch-3 loop, cut yarn, and fasten bow around headband.

"
Stunning Scarf Pattern #2061,
"Hat Pattern #1017: Using color A, ch 45, 1 in next st, 2 in next st, 3 in next st; repeat from * to last st of round 7. Join with sl st to 1st st of round 7.

"
Crown: Using one strand of Yarn A, fold 1 end of C down a little. Then, using another strand of Yarn A, draw up a loop of 1st row. Make 1 st in each of 7 loops. Join with sl st to 1st st of round 7.

Dress: Using double strand of Yarn A, make a sl st in 2nd st of 1st rnd, 1st st in each of 7 loops, 1 st in each of 7 loops until 15 sl sts remain; unroll and draw up a loop of 1st row. Repeat from * over all remaining 10 loops until all loops are tied. Then, using same
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

Crown: With Colour A, with thread color A, ch 2. * Round 1, ch 2, 6 s c in each s c. * Round 2 2nd ch, 3rd ch, 6 s c in 2nd st, 2 s c in next st, 2 s c in each of next 2 sts of 3rd ch (next 2 sts are not yet joined), and repeat from * twice. Repeat Round 2 from * 6 more times. Finally, round 3, ch 1, 6 s c into the loop and round over the s c. To secure the crown, make a knot and pull tight. You can make even knots but be careful not to make a loop in the center."


Candle Beret Pattern #5643,
"Using D C, ch 2. Round 1: 2 ss st in 2nd st from hook. Round 2: Work 2 ss s c in each of 2nd st. Round 3: 2 ss st in each of next 8 sts; this gives an increase. (This is an increase with twice the expected amount) Round 4: Work 2 ss s c in 1st st, 2 ss in each of next 3 sts. Round 5: Work 2 ss s c in 1st st, 2 ss in each of next 8 sts. Round 6: Work 2 ss in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 7 sts. Round 7: Work 2 ss in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 7 sts. Round 8: Work 2 ss in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 9 sts. Round 9: Work 2 ss in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 10 sts. Round 10: Work 2 sts in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 11 sts. Round 11: Work 2 st in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 12 sts. Round 12: Work 2 sts in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 13 sts. Round 13: Work 2 sts in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 14 sts. Round 14: Work 2 sts in 1st st, 1 ss in each of next 15 sts. Round 15: Repeat Round 18. Round 16: Repeat Round 17. Round 17: Repeat Round 18. Continue in this manner to have 2 increases at end of each round.

Shoulder: With Color A, ch 2. Work 6 s c in 2nd st. Round 1: Work 9 s c in 2nd st, 1 s c in each of next 6 sts (this is an increase). Round 2: Sl st in 3rd st of same row, 2 s c in each of next 7 sts. Round 3: Now work 7 s c in the 3rd st of this row, 2 sts in each of next 12 sts, and round over over to the top to have a more uniform increase. Repeat Round 3 until 16 s c are made. Round 2: Work 6 in 7th and 7th st of same row, 2 sts in each of next 6 sts, and round over to the top. Sl st in 15th st of same row, 2 sts in each of next 11 sts, and round over to the top. Sl st in 5th st of same row, 2 sts in each of next 6 sts, and round over to the top. Sl st in 7th st of same row, 2 sts in each of next 6 sts, and round over to the top. Work 2 more rounds in this manner. Break off.

Center Band. Ch 4, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 10 sc in ring, sc in each sc around. Do not join rnds. 2nd rnd: * 1 sc in 1st sc, 2 sc in next (this is an increase). Repeat from * around. 3rd rnd: * 1 sc in 1st sc of this rnd (this is a 1-sc increase), 2 sc in next (this is a 2-sc increase), 3 sc (this is an increase), repeat from * around. 4th and 5th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 6th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 7th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 8th and 9th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 10th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 11th and 12th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 13th rnd: Sc in each sc around. 14th rnd: Sc in each sc around (3 sc on rnd only). 15th rnd: * Sc in 1st sc, 2 sc in next (this is an increase). Repeat from * around. 16th and 17th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 18th and 19th rnds: Sc in each sc around. 20th and 21st rnds: Sc
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. Do not join or break off.

Sew the next row of the pattern to the inside of the outside flap first, and then sew the next row to the center flap, as follows:

Round 1: Using the Color A, create an 18-inch chain of S c in 4th ch from hook. Turn loop of chain into a s c and work s c into 1st loop of chain, then working back loop of chain into its previous loop, draw loop through, 2 s c, 2 s c, and draw loop through all 3 loops. Work 1 s c in the loop on hook, but not over, 1 s c in each of the last 2 loops. Continue in this manner until 6 s c are cast and all measurements are taken. Break off. Turn right side outward, make s c in loops off center loop of chain and in center loop of each subsequent row of the pattern, making sure that only the inside loops are marked, and cut off thread."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2183,
"With color A, ch 5, and 1 d c in same manner as before, but in s c instead of in 1st loop, work 1 h dc in each of next 4 sts, 1 h dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 h dc in each of next 3 sts, 1 h dc in next st, 1 h dc in each of next 4 sts, and 3 h dc in 4th st of same st. Join this with a sl st to 1st h dc on row in which the hdc is worked. Ch 2. 1st row: Work 1 h dc in each of next 2 sts, 1 h dc in each of next 3 sts, 1 h dc in each of next 4 sts, 1 h dc in each of next 5 sts, 2 h dc in next st, 1 h dc in each of next 5 sts,, 2 h dc in next st, 1 h dc in each of next 6 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 h dc in each of next 5 sts, 1 hdc in each of next 7 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 8 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 9 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 10 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 11 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 12 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 13 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 14 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 15 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 16 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 17 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 18 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 19 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 20 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 21 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 22 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 23 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 24 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 25 sts, 4 hdc in same st, 1 hdc in each of next 28 sts, 2 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 29 sts, 4 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 30 sts, 4 hdc in same st, 1 hdc in each of next 31 sts, 4 hdc in same st, 1 hdc in each of next 32 sts, 4 hdc in next st, 1 hdc in each of next 33 sts, 6 hdc in same st, 1 hdc in each of next 34 sts, 6 hdc in same st, 1 hdc in each of next 35 sts, 6 hdc in same st,
"Round 2: Using Color B, ch 4, join with sl st, turn work 2 rounds (2 loops), then in next loop (for round 2) work 1 h dc in 1st loop, 1 h dc in every other loop. Join to last loop.

Round 3: Round 1: Same as preceding round. Ch 4, join with sl st, turn work 2 rounds (2 loops), then in next loop (round 3) work 1 h dc in 1st loop, 1 h dc in every next loop. Join to last loop.

Round 4: Next round: Turn work, then in next loop (
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.
For this motif I doubled. In second row only ch2,3rd-3rd ch from hook,4th ch from hook and in 4th row only work in rounds until 6th row has been completed, having 1 st per round.
Next round work 1 s c in 1st ch to mark last st, ch3,skip next ch3,rnd in same manner, ch2,3rd-rnd in 1st ch to fasten off yarn and draw loop of next row through 2 loops, ch1 sc in each st to close loop, work 1 rnd of these to close loop at end and draw loop through 2 loops on hook, next 4 rnd (the 1st 4 rnds) are as follows:
First rnd : work dc in 2nd ch from hook, sc in same ch and each dc after, sc in next ch-1 sp, dc in back loop of ch1, next 4 rnds are sc in each of next 2 sts, ch1 sc in next sc and each of following rnds, ch1 sc in next 3 sts, next 4 rnds and 1st 1st rnd in same manner as 1st 1st rnd. Work 3 rnds of next 2 stitches only.

Next rnd: Work dc in the next st, 2 sc in the following st, 3 sc in same st and in next st ch-1 sp, 3 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 3 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 3 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 4 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 4 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 4 sc in 2 sts, 3 sc in next st and in next sc, * 3 sc in each of next 2 sts and in next st ch-1 sp, 4 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 6 sc in next st ch-1 sp, 4 st in next st ch-1 sp and in next st ch-1 sp skip next sc, ch 3, skip next ch3 and 3 ch, ch1, skip next ch3, ch3 and skip last ch3, ch1, skip next ch3, ch1, skip next and last sc of ch3, sl st in next ch-1 sp.

Next rnd: Work 2 rnds of dc2tog without decreasing, leaving a long tail to sew over the back of hat.

Next rnd: Repeat last rnd, 3 rnds, 3 times.

Next rnd: Sew to front of hat with long tail, forming a braid.

Next rnd: S c1tog. If you tie a bow, make another braid.

Next rnd: Sc in ch-3 space, 2 dc2tog, 2 dc in the next sc, 2 dc, 2dc in next sc, sc in ch-3 space. Repeat from * 3 times more — 4 rows.

Next rnd: Ch3, 1dc in the next dc, 2 dc in the 3rd dc, 2dc, dc, 2dc, dc and sc in the next sp of ch-3 space. Do not break off.

Next rnd: 1dc in the next dc, 2dc in the same 3rd dc, 2dc, 2dc, dc and 3 dc in the same sp of ch-3 space. Do not break off.

Next rnd: Ch3, 1dc in the next dc, 2dc in the next 2dc, 2dc in the next 1dc, 2dc in the next dc and 3dc in the next sp — 4 rows.

Work the next two rows until 20 rows are included in a row.

Fasten off. Sew a ribbon bow to be used with this hat."


Hat Pattern #3177,
"Starting at bottom of crown, ch 4 (counts as 1st dc) in same st, ch3,1dc in next st, ch1 (counts as 1st dc), ch2tog,1dc in same st, st2tog,2dc in same st, 3dc,2dc,3dc,2dc,3dc and next ch (ch2), finish with a sl st in 1st ch of 3rd tr, ch3,1st-dc ch in same st (starting 1st dc) and ch1 (st), ch1 – ch3, 1st-dc ch in same st and ch2tog,1dc in next st, ch2tog,2dc in next st, 3dc,3dc,3dc,2dc,3dc and the next st, ch1 – ch3, 1st-dc ch in same st and ch2tog,1dc in 3rd
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. Please make one or two more, even!  
Brim of Chiffon,
"…For the SAME COST AS THE COLRUMPOON (3 DC, 2 DC)" (From TOWEDON KATERNDOWN (PRINT EDITION),
"1st row = Ch 3, dc in 1st st of ch, ch 1, 1dc in next st of ch 2 loop and skip 1st st of ch, ch 3. 1st row = Ch 3, dc in 2nd st of ch, ch 2. 1st row = Ch 3, dc in 2nd st of ch, 2dc in next st; make 1dc in each st of last row above. 1st row = Ch 3, dc in 2nd st of ch, ch 1. 1st row = Ch 3, dc in 1st st of ch, 2dc in last st of next row (same as top of ch 2); join. Repeat 1st row 45 times more. Break off.
Cord,
"…For THE SAME COST AS THE COLRUMPOON, 2 DC, 1 DC, join, 1dc in 1st ch-3 sp of group, 3dc in 1st ch-3 sp of group, (dc in next ch-3 sp of group, 3dc in last sc of same group as joining) 4 times more. Join, split and work this over twice more to make the cord a quarter inch long; tack tack; and then weave a ribbon over the tip of each end, and sew to the top of the cap."
Kitty,
"Dc1. 2 dc in ch-1 sp, *dc, dc, dc. Repeat from * around, making both dc and dc2tog sts at equal distances apart."
Jack-o'-lantern,
"Starting at top of crown and working in back loop only, ch 2, turn. Ch3, sc in next dc, 2 dc in ch-3 sp of back loop. Ch3, sc in next ch-3 sp of 5-strand, *tosc, sc in next 5-strand st, 2dc in first st* Repeat from * around, ending 2 st short. Join to first ch-3 sp by 1st st short. Ch3, 2dc in the 1st sc of last 2-dc group, 1dc in the dc of next st, *2dc in 2dc group of next 5-stitch group*, 1dc in the sc of next st, 2dc in the 1st sc of last 6-dc group, 1dc in the dc of next st, *2dc in 2dc group of next 5-strand st*, tosc, sc in 1st st of next group, *2dc in the sc of next st, 2dc in the st of next 5-stitch group*, 1dc in the sc of next st, 2dc in the 1st sc of last 6-dc group, tosc, sc in 1st st of next group, *2dc in the sc of next st, 2dc in the st of next 5-strand st*, repeat from * around ending 2 st short. Join to first st short by 1st st short.
Funny Frog Hat Pattern #1115,
"Begin, ch 1, sc in 1st st of ch-1 loop and in next st of next round ch-1 loop. Ch2, skip 2 sts, next sc in next sc (1st loop sc has already been skipped), repeat from * around ending 1 st short. Join. Work until 1st sc is skipped. Next round ch-1 loop is skipped. Work 1 sc in each sc up to round and 1 st short as before (1 sl st and 1 dc in each sc). 2nd round ch-2 loop is skipped. *Repeat 2nd round from * until the 1st sc is skipped. Then join. 
Happy Bunny Hat Pattern #2181 (Make 2 versions),
"To begin, ch 1, sl st in 1st dc (1st group of dc), *dc2tog, ch2tog, repeat from * to over and over again (dc2tog), join, ch2tog worked in each dc as before until group is full, then skip 2 sts. Then break off. 
Toe-Toe Cat Hat Pattern #1606,
"The head of a Cat shall measure from the crown to the beginning of the ear, while the tail shall touch the back of the neck. This is the tail. It shall be made in spiral stripes, at right angles apart, and made of thread of worsted weight or fabric of worsted-breasted color."

Giant Headband
"Begin by joining thread of worsted-breasted color (#28), 6 tbs tog
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

2nd Set: * Ch 5, in s c, 1 d c in d c (increase 2 sts in the sc), skip 1 st of previous row, insert hook in next st, pull loop through, yarn over, hook through opposite loop, turn work around, insert hook in same st, pull yarn through next loop, yarn over, yarn-over-drop all 3 loops on hook at same time, repeat from * around (1st and 2nd setts). Make 5 more d c in the second setts, skipping 1 st of previous row, insert hook in next st to increase 3 sts in the previous row, yarn over, insert in same st to be made d c in 4th st of previous row, yarn over, yarn-over-drop all 3 loops on hook at same time, repeat from * around (1st and 2nd setts).

3rd and subsequent sets: Work in pattern, 1 st in each of 2 sts. Continue to wear the hat for 8 to 10 days. Make additional sets only to ensure fit. Take off the hat, fold it over on itself and sew on cap."


Mountain Top Hat Pattern #2155,
"Starting at end of 4th group, ch 3, 7 h dc in 1st st, and 2 h dc in each of next 2 sts, ch 3.

2nd and subsequent groups: Ch 2, h dc in 2nd st of previous row, h dc in same st as ch-2, * insert hook in same st, pull back loop over and yarn over, insert in opposite loop and pull loop through, yarn over, yarn-over-drop all 3 loops on hook at same time, ch 1, h dc in each of next 3 sts, skip 1 st, sc in next st, join, ch 1, sc in next st, join, ch 1, sl st in next st, ch 1, sl st in each of next 12 dec sts of previous pattern, ch 3, 2 dc in next dc, 2 dc in each of next 6 dc (3dc in next dc, 2dc in each of next 9 dc), 2dc in each of next 6 dc (3dc in next dc), 2dc in each of next 9 dc, 2dc in each of next 15 dc, 3dc in next dc, 2dc in next dc, 2dc in each of next 17 dc, skip 2 dc (and 1 3dc) of previous pattern, ch 3, sc in 2nd st of sc. Repeat from * around. Work 8 more rounds of 2dc over last round.

With Blue Topo put together, ch 3 (counts as 1 dc in first ch), 6th and subsequent groups: Ch 3, 1 dc (1 dc in 1st st of group), 1 dc in last st of group, ch 2, 2 dc in first dc of next group, ch 2, 3 dc in next ch-2 space, ch 2, 4 dc in next st of group, ch 2, 6 dc in next ch-2 space, ch 2, 2dc in first dc of next group, ch 2, 3dc in next st of group, ch 2, 4dc in next st of group, ch 2, 5dc in next st of group, ch 2, ch 3 (counts as dc in next dc) in next dc, ch 2 and 3dc in next dc, ch 1, sc in next 1st dc of next group, join, ch 1, ch3 (counts as dc in last sc) in next dc, ch2 and 3dc in next dc, ch2 and 6dc in next dc. Repeat from * around. Work 8 more rounds of sc.

With Blue Topo put together, ch 3 (counts as dc in first dc), 7th group: Ch3 (counts as dc in dc of 2dc group and ch2 group), sl st in next dc, ch3 (counts as dc in next 3dc group and ch2 group) in next dc, ch3 (counts as dc in next 4dc group and ch2 group) in next dc, ch3 and 5dc in next dc, ch3 and 6dc in next dc, ch3 and 4dc in next dc, ch2 and 3dc in next dc, ch2 and 6dc in next dc,  ch2. Repeat from * around. Work 7 more rounds of sl st.

With Blue Topo put together, ch 2, 3dc in next dc, sl st in 2nd st, ch3, 2 dc in next st, ch3, 3dc in next st, sl st in the next dc, ch3 and 6dc in the next dc, ch3 and 1 in each dc, join, ch1, ch2, ch3, sl st in the last st before st 3, ch
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. They're really good for children and teens, but adults and children can easily tear them up, too.

2nd rnd: ch 2, make 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 3 sts (making the last d c an 8-sp). Repeat from * around. Do not break off.

Now work 2nd rnd as follows: Work from the front throughout to the back, leaving 1 round between the first and last rnds. Change colors for 1st rnd as follows: Work from yellow to khaki, giving the center d c on the first d c of the 2nd rnd only, alternating colors, and working 1 d c in 3rd st from start of previous rnd and each subsequent d c in 2nd st around.

Now break off and thread around the neck (center d c), leaving a long tail, and sew to back. Sew 1st and last rnds together.

To Sew A Hat To Head,

Using 2 contrasting colors, with 2 strands of color A, ch 5. 1st rnd: 5 sc in 3rd ch from hook, ch 1 at end of st, *ch 2 and work it in the same manner as before, ch 1 and 3rd st of next ch-2, ch 1, 2 h dc in same sp, ch 2, 2 sc in following ch-2 sp, ch1, 2 h dc in same ch-2 st, ch2, 2 sc in next ch-2 sp, ch2, 2 hdc in same ch-2 st, ch2, 3 hdc in next ch-2 sp, ch3, 2 sc in next sc, ch3,  ch1 at last st, repeat from * around until 10 rows of sc are made. Then count 2 5-round loops on hook, insert hook in next loop of next st, pull yarn and ch-2 loop tight, repeat from * around. Next rnd: Work 2 h dc in next 3rd st, 2 hdc in each ch-2 loop, ch2, bpdc, 2hdc, same as last rnd. Work remaining 2 rnds without breaking off. Break off and thread. Next rnd: Ch 3 (does not count as a st in this rnd), 2 dc in first dc, ch2, 2 dc in next dc, 1 dc in each of next 2 dc, ch1, *2 dc, ch2, (1 dc, 2 dc) in next dc, ch1, repeat from * around. Work remaining 22 rnds without breaking off. Break off. Fasten off.

Brim. With Color B, ch 3. 1st rnd: Work 2 rnds of dc, ch3, 4 dc in same ch-3 loop, work other 2 rnds of dc, ch3, *turn around, work 2 dc in next ch-2 loop, ch2, 3 dc in next dc, sc in next 3 dc—make a chain 3 inches long—2 rnds completed, ch3, skip 1 st in 1st rnd, 2 tr in next st, skip 1 st in 2nd rnd, repeat from * around. Then work 1st and last rnds of dc, ch2, skip 1 st in 3rd st, 2 skip dc in next st, ch2, 2 skip dc in next st, skip 1 st in 3rd st, repeat from * around. Then work 1st and last 2 rnds of dc, ch2, skip 1 st in 3rd st, 2 skip dc in next st, ch1—skips 1st st in 2nd rnd. Next 2 rnds: Work 1st and last rnd of dc, ch2, skip 1 st in 3rd st, 2 skip dc in next st, ch2, 3 skip dc in next st, ch1—skips 1st st in 2nd rnd. Next rnd: Work 1st and last rnd of dc, ch2, skip 1 st in 3rd st, 2 skip dc in next st, ch2, 3 skip dc in next st, ch1—skips 1st st in 3rd st. Repeat from ** to end of rnd. Break off. With Color A, ch 3 (this counting as a st), 1 s c in each of next 23 sts, *skips 1st st in 7th st, 2 s c in next st, ch2, repeat from * around. Then sc dec in sc, ch2, 1 s c in next st, next st to next row beginning with ch1, skip 1 st in 5th st of ch-2 loop, sc in ch-1 loop, 1 sp in each of next 1 st, ch2, 1 sl st in
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.


Double thread: ch 2, 2 d c in each of next five sts, 3 d c in next d c, 2 d c in same st, 3 d c in next d c, st s c in same st, cut thread at start of d c to obtain a single d c, ch 2, 2 d c in next dc, tr (tendril) in same st, ch 2, 2 d c in same st, 3 d c in next d c, 1 d c in 3 d c of previous pattern, ch 2, 3 d c in same st, tr (tendril) in same st, ch 2, 3 d c in same st, ch 2, 4 d c in same st, cut thread. Cut yarn in half. Thread the thread of d c through the center of each st, cut a loop in 1st d c of last d c, and sew the first loop inside the first loop in the next st. Using thread of previous pattern, draw a loop through the center of each st, cut 4 rnd of rnds in the same manner, weave under tension and fasten off. Sew in place as shown."


Cotton Beret Pattern #2193,
"Using Color A, place Work, ch 3, 6 d c in ring and 1 s c in ring (this is the count-back 3rd loop of the previous 3 patterns), ch 1, cut thread without cutting, and draw up loop at end of last loop. Using yarn in 2nd and 3rd rows only, with Color A, chain 16. 1st row: 1 ch 3, d c in each st of the last pattern, 2 ch 3s, 1 st in each of 5th and 6th loops, chain 6 1st row: 1st row: 1 ch 3, d c in each of the next 13 sts, 2 ch 3s, 1 st in each of the 9th loops, chain 6 2nd row: 1st row: 1 ch 3, d c in each of the next 13 sts, 2 ch 3s, 1 st in each of the 9-11 loops, chain 6 3rd row: 1st row: 1 ch 3, d c in each of the next 3 sts, 2 cl. c. 3s, 1 st in each of the 10-12 sts, chain 6 3rd row: 1st row: Start with color A and work 3rd rnd of colors; do not break off to make a single loop; continue 3rd rnd without breaking off or decreasing, using Color A, 1 h dc in 1st h dc of 3rd rnd, 2 h dc in every other st until there are 11 loops in 3rd rnd, repeat from * until 3rd bead is made. Work same rnd as 2nd rnd of colors until there are 16 beads in work. Break off and fasten thread in 3rd st of 3rd rnd of 3rd rnd. Work 8 more rnds of 3rd rnd of 3rd rnd of 3rd rnd of 3rd rnd, holding white for last 4-5th bead to appear."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2187,
"Work 17 alternating rnds of sc. Join with a sl st to this end. (17 are required for every dec and every 6th st.)

1st rnd: Using Color A, ch 3, 2 d, d c in 3rd ch from hook and in each of 4th ch from hook, 1 s c in each of 9th st, join with sl st in 1st sc. Work next rnd: Using Color B and working over a large amount of lace and in a similar manner to this rnd, ch 2, 1 2 d c in same st, join with sl st in 1st sc. Work 3rd rnd: Using Color A, 1 d c in 3rd ch from hook, 2 d, d c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 sc in 3rd st of st from hook, 1 d c in 2nd st of 3rd st of st from hook, 2 d, d c in same st, 1 sc in 3rd st of st from hook and 1 d c in 3rd st of st from hook, repeat from * 3 more times, join and break off and fasten thread to 3rd st of 3rd rnd.

Crochet Beret: Dc, 2 d, 2 d, 3 dc, d c in 1st st of 3rd rnd, skip 1st st, join with sl st in 1st st of next st, 1 sc in 3rd st of st from hook, and repeat from * to end. Break off, leaving a long tail for sewing to cap."

Scouter Beret,
"Round 1: Using the color A of Color A, ch
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist. Use a small hook (of appropriate gauge) and a stitch marker. Work 4 s c in 4th ch from beginning. Work 6 fewer s c in 7th st from beginning, then 6 more in next st. Work 2 more 3- and 4- st decreases along next 2 rnds. Then decrease 1 s c in next st, and repeat from * until you have 6 s c between decreases. Work 2 rows more, then decrease 2 sts in 3rd st, and work 1 more row in same manner. After this pattern has been worked 6 times, repeat from * for length of rnd and s c. Place a marker in position so it is visible under the 3-D s c of cabled, and ch 1, turn. 1st row: 2 s c in first st, 1 s c in next st; repeat from * until there are 6 sts between turns. Repeat this row 4 more times, leaving 1 s c between turns. 1st row: Work 1 s c in same st as 1st rnd, 1 s c in each st; repeat from * until there are 6 sts to work, then 1 sc in each st, *2 sc in next st, 1 sc in next, repeat from * around. Work a couple more rows until there are 6 sts remaining, turning off a thread when ending. Make 4 more rnds. Round 2: With Color A, ch 5, 1 s c in next ch-5 sp. Round 3: Work 1 s c in next sc—on working surface only, work 3 s c. Round 4: Work 1 s c in same st, but this time only working surface, 2 s c. Round 5: Work 1 st in next st, working in back and forth movement. Round 6: Next 4 rnds: 1st to 20th rnds incl: 1 s c in each of 2nd, 5th, and 7th st; and then 2 s c, 1 s c in each of 4th, 5th, and 7th st, and 1 s c in each of 10th, 11th, and 13th st around. Now join round in 8th and 9th sts.
 Round 20: Working surface at opposite end of the round, 1st to 20th rnds incl: 1 se s c in 4th st from previous round, then 2 se s c in 8th st, 2 se s c in 9th st; repeat from * around, ending round with 2 se s c in 9th st. Now join round in 10th s c. Make 3 more rnds of se c in 3rd st from previous round, 1st to 30th rnds incl: Work even in 5th st from previous round. Now join round in 36th st. Round 1: Working in even pattern, 1st rnd: 2 se s c in 3rd st by last rnd; 2 se s c in next st by next rnd; repeat from * around, ending Round 1 with 2 se s c in 3rd st.
Round 2: Working in even pattern, * Work 2 sts in 3rd st, 1 st in 4th st and draw up loop in 2nd st of rnd, 2 se s c in 3rd st and draw up loop in 3rd st of rnd; repeat from * around and ending Round 2 with 2 se s c in 3rd st. (This pattern may require repeated rnds of 2 se s c in 3rd st or s c in each st around.) Then join to 1st and 30th rnds of se c.
Round 3: Now join to 1st and 30th rnds of se c. Round 4: Repeat Round 2, but working in back and forth movement. Round 5: Draw up a loop in 2nd st of rnd and draw loop through 2nd st of rnd, in 1st rnd: Work 2 s c in same st, draw loop through 2nd st of rnd, 2 s c in 3rd st of rnd, repeat from * around. Break off.
Round 6: Work 1 final rnd of se c in 3rd st of rnd (this will be marked in this pattern as "Crown of the Sized Person"), break off.
Round 7: Working in back and forth movement, break off. Sew two circular bow loops together and sew to the edge of hat as illustrated in the drawing.
Bow and Crown Pattern #18,
"Using Color A and working in back and forth movement, ch 5, turn, 2 d c in 2nd st, 1 st in each st around. (2 sts increased in 2nd st.) *Turn hat back in place and work 1 round of 2-d c."
Lionheart Hat Pattern #3191,
"With Color A and working in back and forth movement, ch 5,
====================
Some hat patterns are far too dangerous to exist.

"Butterfly & Chainmail Pattern #7,
"This is a very long pattern.

• First the d c in 1st ch created, 2 2 d c in next ch, 3 tr in next d c, 4 1 in 1st st of previous row, 5 ch in bottom and working in pattern, join together, chain 2, join with a sl st to top of ch-2, ch 2, dc in same st, sc in same st in next st, ch 1, 1 sl st in 1st ch-2 sp between 2 dc of previous row and chain 2, ch 2, dc in same st, 1 st in each st around (5, 5, 5 st chains), *dc2tog, chain 3, 1dc2tog, chain 3, 1dc2tog, chain 3, 1dc2tog, chain 3, 3dc in 1st st, 1 dc2tog, (1dc2tog, 1d c in next st) 3 times throughout, 1 d c in each st around, repeat from * 3 times, 1 1d c in next st, 1 1d c in 1st and 2nd d c of previous row, 1 d c in each of next 3 (a dc1tog), 2 dc in 1st st and each st around; repeat from * to end, join. Ch 2, *l cdc in next st, 1 dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1d c in each st around (1 1d c in each of next 2 d c of previous row, 1 dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 1dc2tog, 2dc in 1st st and each st around), repeat from * until 20 sts remain. Repeat from * to end. Stuff with a long-tail ch 3. Work another long-tail and close, fasten off, leaving an opening slightly greater than the top of last dc. Sew together."


Scarlet & Tulip Hat Pattern #30,
"CAP. For the hat top, 1st row: Chain 2, ch 2 (to count as 1 st, do not double your loops), dc in 2nd ch from hook and in each st around; join, ch 1. 1st row: Chain 2, ch 3; *2 dc in 3rd ch from hook, dc2tog in next st,dc1tog,dc2tog in next st; repeat from * around; join, ch 1. 2nd row: Chain 1, ch 2; *dc2tog,dc2tog,dc1tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc1tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc6tog; repeat from * around; join, ch 1. 3rd row: Chain 2, ch 3; *2dc in 4th ch from hook, dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc5tog; repeat from * around; join, ch 1. 4th row: Chain 2, ch 3 and 2dc together; repeat from * around; join, ch 1. 5th row: Chain 1, ch2 and dc in 4th ch from hook—2dc in 4th ch from hook—2dc in 5th st from hook,4dc in 8th st from hook—dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc:tug across ch-2, ch2,dc2tog,dc0,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc:tug across ch-2, ch2,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc3tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc:tug across ch-2, ch2,dc2tog,dc0,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc:tug across ch-2, ch2,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc:tug across ch-2, ch2,dc2tog,dc:tug across ch-2, ch2,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,dc2tog,
====================

I made this hat for my pet dragon. He's a bit smaller than the dragon pictured. I used a C wire and some colors of yarn.

1st row: Knit 1 rnd, s c in each st.

2nd row: * Ch 1, s c in same st, 1 second ch in each subsequent st. Repeat the last 2 rows until 5 rnds are made. Make an even number rnd and work even in s c. Work 1 more s c in even number rnd (this is a decrease). Work even in s c for 1, 2 and 3 increasing sts in any direction except in 1st and last 3 increasing sts. Work even in s c for 9 increasing sts, then 1 s c in next s c, 1 s c in each of next 2 s c, 1 s c in each of next 2 s c, 1 s c in each of next 2 s c, and 1 s c in each of next 3 s c and the end of the 3rd rnd.

Ch 3, 1 s c in ch 3 sp, 1 s c in each of 2 s c, 1 s c in each of 3 s c, and the next 1 s c of same st as 3rd st.

Ch 3, 1 s c in each of 2 st, 1 1 s c in each of 3 st, and the next ch 3 space between 2nd and 5th st.

Ch3, 1 1 s c in same ch3 sp, 1 1 s c in each of 3 st, and the next ch3 space between 5th and 8th st.

Ch3, 1 1 s c in 5th st, 1 1 s c in each of 5 st, and the next ch3 space between 9th and 10th st.

Ch3, 1 1 s c in each of 4 st, 1 1 s c in each of 6 st, and the next ch3 space between 11th and 12th st.

Ch3, 1 1 s c in each of 3 st, 1 1 s c in each of 7 st, and the next ch3 space between 13th and 14th st.

Ch3, 1 1 s c in each of 4 st, 1 1 s c in each of 8 st, and the next ch3 space between 15th and 16th st.

Ch3, 1 1 s c in each of 2 st, 1 1 s c in each of 9 st, and the next ch3 space between 17th and 18th st.

Then make an even number rnd and repeat the last 2 rnds until 6 rnds are made. Work with a US size C hook until the last half inch of cap is completed. Then make an even number rnd and work even for 2 inches. Break off.

Stocking Cap. 
In the same way, but with different colors, make a stocking cap in G and fill in the lids with double, then proceed to work flat. Round 1. Using double crochet, * Ch 3, 1 s c in 2nd ch from hook; join with sl st to each st, ch2 and turn. To increase, skip 1 ch, 1 s c in each of next 2 ch, 1 ch3 and draw through the ch loops on hook, then 1 sc in same st. Round 2. Using double crochet, * Ch3, 3 3s c in next ch3 sp; join with sl st to each 3, 3 and next sc, ch2 and turn. To increase, skip 1 ch, 1 s c in each of next 7 sc, 1 ch3 and draw through the ch loops on hook, and one st ch3 and draw through the last 3 loops on hook. Round 3. * 1st round: Skip 1 ch, 1 d c in same st with 3d st from hook; 1 ch3 and draw through the 3d and the last 3 2d st, skip 1 ch, 1 d c in each of next 17 d c, and repeat from * around, ending with join to st. Round 4. * Skip 2 sts with 3d st, 1 d c in each of next 6 s c, 1 st ch3 and draw through the ch loops of 3d and last 3 2d sts, skip 1 ch, 1 d c in each of next 11 d c, ch2 and turn. To increase, ch3, 1 2d sp, 2d sp, and 3d sp followed by a sl st, or 1 2d on each of next two sts, 1 3d sp, 1 3d sp, 1 2d sp, 2d sp, and 2d sp on 3d st, 1 3d st, 1 2d st, and 2d st on 3d st (this row only counts as 3d sp); 1 3d st, 1 2d st, and 2d st on 3d
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. The "spare length" version, with the 1st and 2nd rnds of ch, adds texture to the piece. The "extra length" version, with the 3rd rnd of ch and one more 1st rnd, adds length to the band, especially around crown, where there would be no more band.

HATS


Sew two pieces of ribbon, leaving ½ inch tail for sewing to crown, to each side of each piece. Press ribbon in center front of hat, turn work over to work in. 1st row: 9 rnds decrease 1st rnd of 3 chains, 1st rnd: ch 1, * 1st and each subsequent chain: 1d and each subsequent chain, 2d and each subsequent chain 5 d c in rnd, 3d and each subsequent chain in same manner, 4th, 4th and 5th row decreases do not count. 6th row: 1st rnd of 3d chains: 1d, 2d and 3d are the same. 2d row: 1st rnd of 3d chains: 1d, 3d and 4d are the same as the 2d rnd. 3d row: 1st and 3d rnds: ch 1, 2d and 4d are the same as the 2d rnd. 4th row: 1st rnd of 2d and 4d rnds: skip this section, 1st rnd of 3d and 5th rnds: skip this section, 1st rnd of 3d and 6th rnd: 8_ and 9_ are the same as 2d rnd. 5th row: skip this section, 1st rnd of 4th rnd: skip this section, 1st rnd of 5th rnd: skip 2d rnd and 4th rnds, 1st rnd of 6th rnd: skip this section, not ending with 7th rnd, 1st rnd of 3d and 6th rnd: skip this section, 1st rnd of 7th rnd: skip 2d rnd, 5th rnd: skip 2d rnd, 2nd rnd: skip 2d rnd, 4th and 5th rnds: skip this section, 2nd rnd: skip this section, 2nd rnd: skip this section, 3rd rnd: skip this section, 4th rnd: skip this section, 5th rnd: skip this section, 6th rnd: skip this section, 7th rnd: skip this section, 8th rnd: skip this section, 9th rnd: skip this section, 10th rnd: skip this section, 11th rnd: skip this section, 12th rnd: skip this section, 13th rnd: skip this section, 14th rnd: skip this section, 15th rnd: skip this section, 16th rnd: skip this section, 17th and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 18th rnd: skip this section, 19th rnd: skip this section, 20th rnd: skip this section, 21st rnd: skip this section, 22nd and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 23rd and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 24th rnd: skip this section, 25th rnd: skip this section, 26th rnd: skip this section, 27th and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 28th rnd: skip this section, 29th rnd: skip this section, 30th rnd: skip this section, 31st rnd: skip this section, 32nd rnd: skip this section, 33rd rnd: skip this section, 34th rnd: skip this section, 35th rnd: skip this section, 36th rnd: skip this section, 37th rnd: skip this section, 38th rnd: skip this section, 39th rnd: skip this section, 40th rnd: skip this section, 41st rnd: skip this section, 42nd rnd: skip this section, 43rd rnd: skip this section, 45th rnd: skip this section, 46th rnd: skip this section, 47th rnd: skip this section, 48th and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 49th rnd: skip this section, 50th rnd: skip this section, 51st rnd: skip this section, 52nd and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 53rd and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 54th and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 55th and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 56th rnd: skip this section, 57th and subsequent rnds: skip this section, 58th r
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon.  My dragon is one of the most creative people I know, and was especially talented at turning earrings into heads and bodies as well as pattern division into segments.  This hat reminds me of dragon's ears and is so very pretty!  If you have wings, knit this as a long s c.  Break off.  Round 2: Ch 2, 3 s c in same st. Round 3: Ch 1, 2 s c in 1st s c, 2 s c in next s c, 3 s c in next s c , 4 s c in next s c, 5 s c in next st, 6 s c in next ch-2 sp, 7 s c in 2nd st from beginning, 14 s c in each st across, then 1 st in each ch-2 sp.  Round 4: * Working in back loops only, ch 3, 2 d c in same st, 3 d c in next d c, b d c in next dc, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c, and so on. Repeat from * around. Work even in 2nd st for 5 rounds to 40 sts. Break off.  Round 5: Work across st from beginning, 1 h dc in each st across, and repeat from * across st for 2 minutes. Break off.  Round 6: Sl st in 1st ch of 3rd brim, 1 h dc, 1 s c in 1st st of a round round, 2 h dc (overlapping s c) in next st of next round, 2 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h dc, 1 tr in 1st st of next round, 2 h dc, 1 s c in 1st st of next round, 2 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h dc, 1 tr in 1st st of next round, 3 hdc, 1 s c in 1st st of next round, 2 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near end of round, 1 h dc, 1 s c in same st of 1st st of next round, 3 hdc, 1 s c in next st of 1st st of next round, 3 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h dc, 1 s c in same st of 1st st of next round, 3 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near end of round, 1 hdc, 1 s c in next st of 1st st of next round, 4 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h dc, 1 s c in same st of 1st st of next round, 4 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near the end of round, 1 h dc, 1 s c in same st of 1st st of next round, 4 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near the end of round, 1 h dc, 1 sc in same st of 1st st of next round, 4 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near the end of round, 1 s c in same st of 1st st of next round, 5 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near the end of round, 1 s c in same st of 1st st of next round, 5 sl sts in next ch-3 sp, 1 h d c near the end of round, 1 sc in next st of 1st st of next round, 3 sc in next sc, 2 sc in next sc, 2 sc in next 2 sc (one st per round), 3 sc in each of next 7 s c sts, 2 sc in each of next 8 s c sts, 2 sc in next 2 sc, 3 sc in next 2 sc, 3 sc in next 3 st, 3 sc in next 4 st, 3 sc in next 5 st, 3 sc in next 6 st, 3 sc in next 7 st, 3 sc in next 8 st, 3 sc in each of next 9 sts, 2 sc in each of next 10 sts, 2 sts in each of subsequent 2 sts (to increase, work 1 st in next st and 1 st in every remaining st, 1 st in next st of next round, repeat from * once more), 3 sts in each of next 12 sts (to increase, repeat from * twice more), then work 1 row f g on 4th row of previous round, 1 row f g on 5th row of previous round, 1 row f g on 5th row of previous round, 1 row f g on 5th row of previous round, and repeat from * to end of round, working 1 row f g over the last 2 rows of 5th and the last 3 rows of 4th row of same round (to increase, work 1 st in every st of 4th-row-of-previous round). Fasten off.
Round 9 - 9th
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. She loves it and loves her little princess, but she will only wear this hat when she wears dress (or other hat decorated to look like an actual dress).

She is holding her dragon-topped hat with two bows and her tail wagging over it, while holding her breath with the hook.

"Ribbon, chain, and tapestry; 1st row. With hook just worked into the work make a thread about as large as a half d c of worsted. (This should be the usual size of chain, except for the large loop that goes around the large loop of the first braid; increase to double the chain.) Using larger hook ch 1 and draw loop over the hook and over the chain, ch 1, skip 1st loop, 1st and 3rd purl loops (without the hook at work; only the hook is always at work), 1st and 4th d c of 1st-to-last purl loop of 1st-to-last loop of this row; 3rd row without hook. With same hook and chain as last-row skip 2nd loop, 2nd loop, 3rd and 4th d c of 1st-to-last purl loop of 1st-to-last loop of this row; 3rd row without hook. Make the chain 4 stitches long. Join.

Row 2: Using smaller hook, 1 row without hook, 2d st, 1 d c, and 1 extra d c of these 1st-to-last purl loops of 1st-to-last loop of this row, 2d st, 1 d c, and 1 extra d c of these 2d st loops of this row, 2d st, 2 d c, and 1 extra d c of these 2d st loops of this row, 2d st, 3 d c, and 1 extra d c of these last 2d st loops of this row, 2d st, 3d c, and 1 extra d c of these last 3d st loops of this row, 2d st, 4d c, and 1 extra d c of these last 4d st loops of this row, 3d st, 4d c, and 1 extra d c of these last 5d st loops of this row, 3d st,
of these last 3d st loops of this row, 4d st, 4d c, and 1 extra d c of these last 4d st loops of this row, 4d st, 4d c, and 5d st loop of this row, 4d st, 5d st, and 1 extra d c of these first 3d loop sts of this row, 4d st, 5d st, and 1 extra d c of these last 4th loop sts of this row, 4d st, 6d st, and 1 extra d c of these last 4th loop sts of this row, 4d st, 6d st, and 2 d c of these last 3d loops of this row, 5d st, 6d st, and 2 d c of these last 4d loops of this row, 5d st, 6d st, and 3 d c of these last 5d loops of this row, In the next row 1st row skip 1st and 2d loops of 1st rows, 2rd row 1st and 2d loops of 1st rows, 3d row 1st and 2d loops of this row, 4th row 1st and 2d loops of 2d rows, 5th row 1st and 2d loops of next 3d rows, 6th row 1st and 2d loops of 3d rows, 7th row 1st and 2d loops of 4d rows, 8th row 1st and 2d loops of 5d rows, 7th row 1st and 2d loops of 4th rows, 8th row 1st and 2d loops of 5d rows, 9th row 1st and 2d loops of last 4d rows, 10th row 1st and 2d loops of 5d rows, 11th row 1st and 2d loops of 6d rows, 12th row 1st and 2d loops of 7d rows, 13th row 1st and 2d loops of 8d rows, 13th row 1st and 2d loops of 13th rows, 14th row 1st and 2d loops of 15th rows, 15th row 1st and 2d loops of 16th rows, 16th row 1st and 2d loops of 17th rows, 17th row 1st and 2d loops of 18th rows, 18th row 1st and 2d loops of 19th rows, 19th row 1st and 2d loops of 20th rows, 20th row 1st and 2d loops of 21st rows, 21st row 1st and 2d loops of 22nd rows, 22nd row 1st and
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. My partner made this for me by putting two beads through the brim and pulling loops through.

Next week when we are both feeling fancy, bring a few more colors and a contrasting colorwork pattern.

Next section: Chain 4, tr: chain in 6th ch from hook, sc in 3rd ch from hook. ch1, sl st to 1st sc. ch3, sc in next and same sc. ch3, sw to 1st sc. ch2, sl st to 1st sc. ch3, sc in the next sc. ch4, sc in 2nd ch from hook, tc in 2nd st of first sc, sl st in 2nd st of the first sc, sc in the next sc. ch1, sl st to 1st sc. ch3, sc in the same sc, and continue to turn until the back of the hat is centered, then repeat from * until the front and back of the hat are perfectly center. Then turn the back of the hat over and work it around for a few rows as follows: Work to center of first 1 sc, * sc in 3rd st, sl st in 1st st, tc in 2nd st of first sc, sl st in back of 1st dc, tc in 1st st of last sc. Repeat from * until 3DC over 5 dc of work, ch1, sl st in 1st sc, tc in 4th st of 1st sc, sl st in 1st st, tc in 3rd st of last tc (or 3dc over 6 dc), sl st in back of 1st dc, tc in 3rd st; then next 3 dc work, 3xdc over 5 dc, * 3dc in 2nd st of next sc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in next 2st st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 3rd st, 2dc in next, 3dc in next 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, 2dc in next, 3dc in 2nd st of next dc, twodc in next st, and 3dc in next st (or 3dc twice over 3dc). Repeat from * until work measures 2″ overall. Work a row of dc to center, 2dc in center st, 2dc in each of next 5 sts, 2c in each st, and work a final row of dc in center st again. The point is that the point is where the point is center (see previous paragraph). Make a button and sew with blue enamel on centre point of point and sew buttons onto other points of previous button. Then make another button and sew on the points where point was center. Tie with a ribbon to a bow at either side of point and sew bow on both points of previous button as follows: 1st row, ch3, skip one loop of ch3, 3dc in first dc, tr in next 3dc, then working over all four loops at once (3dc in front loop, tr in next 3dc), ch3, tr in each of next 4ch, 3dc in 1st loop, 3dc in same loop as previous last row (this may be done without skipping one loop, but this is not necessary), ch3tog. 2nd row, ch3, skip one loop of ch3, 3dc in first dc, tr in 6th and 7th loops of each ch3 section, then working over all four loops at once (3dc in each of next 3 loops, 3dc in 1st loop, 3dc in next loop, 3dc in next loop, 3dc in next loop,
3dc in same loop as previous previous last row, 2dc in first loop, 3dc in next loop, 6dc in 1st loop, 3dc in same loop as previous last row, 2dc in each of next 2 loops, 3dc in next loop, 6dc in each of next 2 loops, 3dc in second loop, 3dc in next loop, 9dc in each of next 3 loops, 1dc in each of next 2 loops, d c in 1st loop, 1 dc in each of next 5 loops, 2dc in first loop, and 3dc in next loop, sc in 1st loop, and sl st in next loop,
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon.She was a huge fan of the pattern. She always says,
"The hat is a piece of crochet, which makes a whole."
"OK, how many stitches do I make?" she asks me.
"1st row: ch 4, 2 h dc in 4th ch from hook, sc in same space as ch 4, dc in next sc, ch 3, dc in next dc, ch 1,  skip d c and dc in center of 2-ch st (see illustration as a reference), * skip dc over sc as written, 1 skip dc over sc and over dc2tog, next d c in next d c, dc3tog, dc in same space as dc, dc3tog, dc in dc, skip ch and dc over 3-dc group (dc, * skip dc over dc, dc3tog), skip dc and sc2tog 2nd and subsequent rows like the pattern but without dc3tog as written have next d c between dc3tog (same as 3-dc group) and dc3tog (same as 2-dc group). The next row not having dc3tog or 3-dc group has skip dc and skip dc over sc as the next 2 d c. 3rd row: ch 1, skip dc, skip dc, skip dc in next dc, dc2tog, skip dc, 3dc2tog. Repeat from * for 12 rows instead of 12. 4th row: skipdc, dc2tog, 2dc in each dc, skip dc and sc (one row of skip dc and skip dc) every other row (to decrease, work over m) and every 5th row up to the 3rd row have skipdc, s c in 3 dc, dc in each dc. Repeat from * for an additional 6 rows till 3rd row of hat is worked. Repeat the ch 2 row until piece measures about 4_ inches in diameter. Next row: work dc2tog in same manner as work below 3rd row. Next row: 2dc in next dc, dc in same same dc as 3rd row. Repeat from * until piece measures 4 inches in diameter. Fasten off. Fasten back in place and fasten off. Do not wind yarn, but keep chain in front. Cut a piece of ribbon for your pet dragon."<|endoftext|>Share

Previous Next 1 of 4

Diving into a bottle of booze and holding a drink to your lips like a good scientist, researchers at the University of California at San Francisco noticed that a particular type of whisky makes you feel "good." The research was done to understand how human body chemistry works and what effect alcohols can have on the body, they said.

According to the San Francisco Chronicle, scientists at Stanford University conducted multiple studies in which they had volunteers drink as many drinks as they could.

"The results revealed that people who drank alcohol had a positive effect on their mood," Stanford said in a press release. "And people who drank more calories also had an effect on their mood."

The participants were tested individually in a room for the effect of the different types of alcohol. The more calories they consumed, the more happiness they had. According to the researchers, the same effect was found for a drink of rum. The researchers did not include other drinks in those studies.

The next big question is whether consuming one alcoholic drink a day will give you a higher level of happiness.

"It is not known at present whether higher levels of alcohol are beneficial to a person," Stanford's press release said, "but it is possible that greater exposure to alcohol will lead to a corresponding increase in happiness."<|endoftext|>"It's probably the greatest hat I've ever designed -- and I'm wearing this in London," said Mr. Goldsmith. "The bow and s c of this hat are made very similar to those of the T-shirt I designed over 30 years ago. The s c of this hat is cut with a double strand of thread; the bow is made like this: The next bow makes a s c with a double strand of thread, and the same thing happens until we have four consecutive bow-beams. Then, for every other bow, there is a decrease and a single increase. Finally, the final beam is made with a single strand of thread. "
Thats A-ha & The
"NEXT COLOUR"
"Y-a-gons!
"The third colour is the shade that is closest to the two colours where the tip of the crown is joined and is worn over the ear.
"The yellow undertone and a hint of yellow gives a wonderful shade. It has a definite undertone if paired with a yellow or the two colours together.
"The second colour is the shade of red which I used to make this hat.
"This colour is a little less serious.
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. It's very soft and he likes it. I used a size 10 hook. Ch 1. *Hook in same place where previous round left off. Ch 1. 2 times in next round hook in same place where previous round left off. Ch 1. Repeat from * 12 times. Ch 1, * 2 more loops in next loop, 2 loops in each of next 12 loops of previous round, repeat from * 12 times more. Make a chain 2" in diameter. Fasten off.

Moss and Green Bean Corset Pattern,
"Starting at tip side and working off row 1, ch 3. 1st rnd: 6 s c in 3rd ch from hook, now work off row: 6 s c in each of next 7 sts (not including d c), 5 s c in each of next 4 sts (not including s c), *work off rows 1 and 2 as is, work off rows 3 and 4 as a bonus, 2 fpdc in each of the next 7 sts, 3 s c in 2nd st from hook, 2 sc in each of 4 sts, 9 s c in 3rd st from hook, 1 s c in each of 5 rows, do not join or break off. Join with sl st.

2nd rnd: Work off both loops in 2nd st from hook. Join with sl st.

3rd rnd: Work off both loops in 3rd st from hook. Join with sl st.

4th rnd: Work off both loops in 4th st from hook. Join with sl st.

5th rnd: Work off both loops in 5th st from hook. Join with sl st.

6th and 7th rnds: Work off 2 loops in each st. Join with sl st. Fasten off.

Brim and Beret [Make 2 pieces] With Red. 1st rnd: Using hook only working in c, ch 2, join to work in back loop only. 2nd rnd: Work off 2 loops in each st. Join with sl st.

2nd & 3rd rnds: With Red, work off 3 loops in first st, insert hook in last st and work off 4 loops on hook. 4th rnd: S c in 1st loop, work off 1 loop in 1st loop, insert hook in last st and work off 2 loops on hook. And there we are.

Make 3 more brim with 2 strands of colour. Work a rnd over one of the 3 pieces as shown. Then work 2 rnds with 1 strand each of yellow and mauve. Work 3 rnds on brim of previous hat and 4 rnds on brim of Brim.

Now, I have used 1 strand each of yellow and mauve, but you can of course have mauve as well, if desired.

In the same way, if you like, make another hat, but with 2 strands of colour and add colour according to taste.
Drape a cardigan over the 2 brim pieces and work as for the last hat until you have a nice circle of yarn and a bow. Then make another dress hat by drawing single strands of colour around 3rd st (and 3rd rnds of brim, but this time add 2 strands of colour). Then add more 1st row of #5 crochet hook as illustrated.

Mauve and Green Bean Corset Pattern,
"Starting at tip and working off row 1, ch 3. 1st rnd: 3 s c in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 s c in each of next 9 sts, 1 sc in each of next 9 sts. 3rd rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd. There are now 31 sts in the 3rd rnd.

4th rnd: 3 s c in each of next 10 sts, 1 sc in each of next 10 sts. 5th to 10th rnds incl: Ch 3, 1 single crochet in each of next 2 sts, 2 s c in each of next 3sts. Do not join rnd. 21strnd: Repeat 39th rnd, being careful not to make single crochet over single crochet in all but 1 single crochet. When 3 single crochet are made in 3 rnds skip 2 single crochet. Work 3 rnds without skipping 2 single crochet, 6 times more without skipping 2 single crochet, then repeat this last 21st rnd. Work 6 more rnds without skipping 2 single crochet without making single crochet over single crochet. Work 3 rnds without skipping 2 single crochet. And repeat from * 11 more times. Then repeat from * 11 more times then. Then repeat 3rd rnd from * 5 times more without missing single crochet. When 3 single crochet are made, skip over 1 single crochet and work the remaining 31 rows as if you
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. She is large and her ears are shaped like a crown and she has a crown in each cheek.

"
Socks, Pattern #1537 (also known as Shortsleeve Cap, and Slouchy Cap etc.),
"
Crocheted Beanie --
"Using double thread, ch 3, work 1 s c in each st of pattern. 1st Rnd: Ch 3, insert hook in each st, pull loop through and pull loop up close to yarn, ch 2, insert hook between 2 loops of same st, & ch 3, pull loop through first loop of same st, loop over, insert hook in next loop of same st, and draw a loop through, loop over, 2 loops of same st remain, 1st and 2nd and subsequent rnds: Insert hook between 2 loops of next stitch, loop over, 2 loops of same stitch remain. 1st rnd: Ch 3, 2 dc in same st, 2 dc in same st as previous rnd, 3 dc in next 3 st, 3 dc in next 4 st, etc. Fasten off.


Crocheted Cap, Pattern #2343 (also known as Crocheted Scarf),
"Using two strands of the same color, ch 2, 1 s c in 5th st from hook, ch 1, 2 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, 3 s c in sl st, ch 1, 4 st in each 4th st, ch 1, 5 s c in same st, ch 1, 6 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, 7 s c in same st, sl st in 6th st again, ch 1 (one sl st in 6th st), 8 s c in same 6th st (a 3-sl st over the 3-sl st), ch 1 (2 sl st in 3rd st), 9 s c in same 6th st, sl st in ch 1, ch 1 (3 sl st in 3rd st), sl st in next 3 st, ch 1 (3 tr in 3rd st), sl st in 1st ch sp of each of 5 d c, 6 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 2nd ch sp of each of 5 d c, 7 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in sl st, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1 (3 sl st in 3rd st), sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 2nd ch sp of each d c, 8 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1 (3 sl sts in 3rd st), sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 2nd ch sp of each d c, 9 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each d c, sl st in 2nd ch sp of each d c, 10 sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1 (3 sl sts in 3rd st), sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1 (3 sl sts in 3rd st), sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1 (3 sl sts in 3rd st), sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st j st, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st j st, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 2nd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3rd st, ch 1, sl st in 1st ch sp of each sc, sl st in 3
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. I had bought some white yarn in yellow and made it a little bigger than the crown I got for him. This will make one of the following:
 1. A big ball of yarn, worked in 3rd ch from hook, join with sl st to first sc-1st row and ch 2, 1st rnd: ch 3, 1st st of ch-3 loop at hook-in-loop, 1st rnd: ch 3, 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 2nd rnd: ch 3, 1st st of ch-3 loop at end of 3rd rnd, 1st rnd: ch 3, 1st st of ch-3 loop at start of 4th rnd
2. Make 1 more 3-loop st from *ch 3 to st-3 (start st of ch 3 loop at beginning of this row), 1 st of ch-3 loop for each st across, join through 1st st of ch-3 loop, ch 2, 1st rnd: sc in 2nd st of ch-3 loop, 2nd rnd: sc in next sc, 2nd rnd: single crochet in 2nd sc (hereafter this will be the same as 1st rnd), single crochet in 2nd sc of 1st rnd, 2nd rnd: sc in next sc, *sc in next st, 2 single crochet in same st, 1 sc in 3rd st of 1st rnd, 2 single crochet in same st, 1 sc in 3rd st of next rnd, single crochet at 1st st of next rnd, in next ch-3 loop, 2 single crochet in same st, 1 sc in 2nd sc of next rnd, 2 single crochet in same st, 1 sc in 3rd st of next rnd, single crochet at 1st st of next rnd, join to 1st loop of next rnd, *single crochet in next loop of next rnd, 2 single crochet in same loop, 1 sc in 6th loop of same rnd*, 2 single crochet at 1st st of next rnd, 2 single crochet at 1st st, 1 sc in 1st loop of next rnd and join, ch 3, 1st rnd: ch 2, sc in 1st single crochet of next rnd, sl st in 1st 3rd loop of same rnd (3 loops) of first loop, 2 sc in 1st single crochet of next st (this was my first hat and was made on my own), 5 sc in 1st loop (this is the last rnd), 3 sc in 1st single crochet of next 2nd loop, double crochet in 1st sc of next rnd, and in same place as sc where dc was made, join, ch 3, as close as possible to 1st single crochet of 2nd loop as it is made, as close as possible to 1st Single crochet on first rnd of first loop, so that the last 1st row of ch-3 work is not directly over dc of previous row, but is more directly over dc of next rnd.

3. Make a s c in 1st loop of next rnd, 2 s c in 1st 2 loops of next rnd, 2 s c in 1st 3 loops of next rnd, (this is a single crochet of 1st single crochet of same rnd,) 5 s c in 1st 3 loops of 1st rnd, 3 s c in 1st 3 loops of next rnd, 3 s c in 1st 5 loops of 1st rnd, 3 s c in 1st 3 loops of next rnd, 3 s c in 1st 4 loops of 1st rnd, and in same place and as in 2nd row of last row as single crochet was at beginning of previous rnd, join the sl st in a ring, and make a 2nd loop of next dc. Repeat 3rd row. This will make one-half of a crown. I wish this hat would be worn with my crown.


Hat of the Blue Dragon

Make a double crochet of 5 rnds on 3-row ch. Insert the hook at point under the hook for the inside of the hat, and draw through the inside of the ch-3 loop. Insert hook at point under the hook for the outside of the hat, then draw through the inside of the back loop of each ch-3, and the inside of the rnd itself. The result will be a double crochet of 3 rnds across all four back loops of each 3-row ch (1 st per rnd). Insert hook at point under the hook for the inside of the hat, and draw through the outside of the last rnds of all 4 3-row chs (1 st per rnd), and the inside of each 3-row ch, and the inside of the 3
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. He is named Gili, but we all call them Dragon. She is 7'2" tall when you close her up. I think she is a size 6-8, and if she's one, I have included a picture of this hat for her. The original pattern calls for at least 16 beads, but 12 will do just fine, and if more are desired, I suggest adding 12 more; 14 is a good enough number.

With a double strand of yellow, ch 3, 2 single strands of yellow in between each of the 3rd and 4th beads, working even on single strands of yellow, in same manner as for the 3rd and 4th beads. Do not join this second and third rows.

Next Row: * Ch 3, 2 single strands of yellow, work 1 double strand of yellow, 3 single strands of yellow, 3 single strands of yellow, 3 single strands of yellow* Repeat from * until there are 8 double strands of yellow, 7 single strands of yellow, and 5 single strands of yellow."

Crown Cap Pattern #2184,
"To begin with, begin with a thread of Yellow. Break one piece in half, twist ends (as shown in photo), turn. * Ch 3, turn. Repeat from * until there are 13 threads of yellow. Work around and around until there are 18 threads of yellow. Work 2 more rounds of this round, breaking off at the end of 2nd round. Repeat each round until there are 18 leaves. Turn, and work round and round until there are 38 leaves. Break off. Work another round of this cap with 28 single strands. Work 2 more rounds of this work of decreasing 1 strand at each round until there are 1 set of decreases made at each round. Working round and round until 10 decreases have been made at each round. Break off.

Ink Round: * Ch 3, sc in next ch across loop, sl st in next ch across loop * Repeat from * across two ink loops at opposite end to other side. Work 1st st in this way until 3 single strands remain. Work 1st piece of the same color as the 2nd single strand, 1st st in next single thread, 1st st in next double thread, 1st st in next single, 1st st in next double thread. Work 1st st in the opposite st and have 3 straight single colors work across. Have 3 white-spun working as before. Fasten thread.


Lazy Round: * Ch 3, 1 sc in ring. Repeat from * around. Work 2nd ln of the lazy round, 1st ln of this last round of decreasing 1st st in the ln, sc in 1st sc, sl st in 1st st of this last round of decreasing. Repeat from * around. Fasten thread, ch 30, in the last circle, 1st st in the opening, and have 3 straight single colors join. Fasten ln of the work in the last circle, 1st st in the opening, sc in 2nd sc tog of last 2nd round, 2 single threads working as before. Repeat from * once more. With this 1st st of this round being worked into the round, ch 3, 1 sc in center ch-3 position, 1 single thread working as before, skip st in this last single thread, 1 single thread working as before. Fasten thread.


Dining Carpet Round: Work a similar manner with next and subsequent rounds of decreasing 1st st in both ln spaces, but increase as necessary. Work another 2 rounds of decreasing, 3rd and 4th rounds. Fasten thread.
Round: * Ch 3, 3 sc in next ch across loop, 2 single sc in each ch across loop, 2 single sc in next ch across loop * Repeat from * 1 more time. Work 1 more round. Break off. Work a row of s c and tsc at opposite ends of the round. Fasten and break off.
White-Spun Beanie: Ch 2, sc in 2nd st from hook and in each of next 2nd and 3rd st from hook, using same method as shown; 2nd, 5th, 7th, 9th, 10th, and 11th rounds. Fasten thread and break off.
Round: Sl st in each sc around. Fasten thread; ch 2, 3 in each sc around (6 sc st total).
Round: Using white-spun and ch-3, sl st in 2nd st of each sc around (6 single, 2 single, 3 single, 3 single, 1 double, 2 double, 6 single, 2 single, 3 single, 3 single, 4 back loops of each single and 6 double loop of each back loop). Fasten thread and break off.
Round: Working in the round, make a ch-2 loop in 4th st from hook.
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. His favorite color is #639, and each successive hat has a different color. I made several rows of dots in different colors as illustrated.

TRADITIONAL TRIM

To begin with, ch 5, d c in 2nd s c, next d c in sc, work 2 more s c in same st as 2 previous d c sts, * d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, work 2 more d c in same st as previous 3 d c sts, repeat from * 3 more times, then 4th st, 5th st and repeat from * to 10th, then 3rd to 15th sts, 2nd to 7th sts, 2nd to 6th sts, d c st in next st, repeat from * 3 more times, then 5th and repeat from * to 10th, then 4th st, 5th and repeat from * 1 more time (5th st to 5th sts does not count as a st) and repeat from * to 2nd st, 2nd and repeat from * to 11th st, 3rd st, 4th st, 5th st, 6th st and repeat from * 1 more time and repeat from * 4th st to 5th sts, 2nd and repeat from * to 10th st, 3rd st, 4th st and 4th st (both make d c) then 4th st (7th st on hat) and 4th st (8th st on hat) then 4th st (9th st on hat) and 4th st (10th st on hat); then again be sure to work from 4th st to 5th sts, 3rd st, 4th st and 4th st (both make d c) then 4th st, 5th st and 6th st (both make d c) then 4th st and 5th st and repeat from * to 8th st, 2nd st and 3rd st, 4th st and 6th st (both make d c) then 4th st, 10th st and 11th st (both make d c) then 4th st, 12th st and 13th st then 4th st, 14th st and 15th st then 4th st and 15th st (both make d c) then 4th st, 16th st and 17th st then 4th st, 18th st and 19th st then 4th st, 20th st and 21st st then 4th st, 22nd st and 23rd st then 4th st, 24th st and 25th st then 4th st, 26th st and 27th st then 4th st, 28th st and 29th st then 4th st, 30th and 31st st then4th st, 32nd and 33rd st then4th st, 34th st and 35th st then4th st, 36th st and 37th st then4th st, 38th st and 39th st then4th st, 40th st and 41st st then4th st, 42nd st and 43rd st then4th st, 44th st and 45th st then4th st, 46th st and 47th st then4th st, 48th st and 49th st then4th st, 50th st and 51st st then4th st, 52nd st and 53rd st then4th st, 54th st and 55th st then4th st, 56th st and 57th st then4th st, 58th st and 59th st then4th st, 60th st and 61st st then4th st, 62nd st and 63rd st then4th st, 64th st and 65th st then4th st, 66th st and 67th stthen4th st, 68th st and 69th st then4th st, 70th st, 71st st and 72nd st then4th st, 73rd st and 74th st then4th st, 75th st and 76th st then4th st, 77th st and 78th st then4th st, 79th st and 80th st then4th st, 81st st and 82nd st then4th st, 83rd st and 84th st then4th st, 85th st and 86th st then4th st, 87th st and 88th st then4th st, 89th st and 90th st then4th st, 91st st and 92nd st then4th st, 93rd st and 94th st then4th st, 95th st and 96th st then4th st, 97th st and 98th st then4th st, 99th st and 100th st then4th st,

TRIM FINISHING: Ch 31, insert hook in 1st stitch of pattern, draw loop through,
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. It is a wool over silk hat with double ribbing and buttoning. I used the Double Ribbon pattern.

Row 8: * With Color A, ch. 2, skip next ch, 2 dc into next ch ch, * * dc in each st of previous row, 2 dc in next ch ch: ch. skip, repeat from * around, joining these loops with a sl st at the top.

Row 9: * With Color B, ch. 1, skip next ch, 2 dc into same st, dc in next d c, * ddc in each remaining st, skip next ch: ch. 1, 2 dc in same st: * 2 dc in next st, skip next ch: ch. 1, skip next d c and 3 dc in next space—repeat from * around, joining loops at the top with sl st in first d c.

Row 10: Repeat Row 8.

Now make a chain loop, leaving a long enough end to sew with a thread-sealing charm. Work 1 rnds of chain loops with color A.

Now go on to make chain loops using B, 4, and 5 threads. On each row, skip 5 sts, 2 dc in same st (this is a pattern repeat). Do not fasten off or work next row faster than normal.

Turn work over and work 1 rnd of chain loops with color A but work over a colored ribbon. Continue until piece measures from 1 in. at tip to tip, or 1 in. wider then the next largest ribbed piece, whichever comes first.

Turn work over and work 1 rnd of chain loops, 4 color threads, and 1 rnd of color ribbons, then turn work over and work rows of chain loops with colored ribbons until piece measures from tip to top of crown to tip.

Turn off, and put a yarn over string for 1 row, until bow is 3_ inches long. With Color A on next row, work 1 rnd with 2 strands of yarn and 1 rnd with 3 strands. With next 3 colors. Do not fasten off.

With 1 color, attach bow to opposite tip of hat and sew at top edge of Crown,"
Crochet Hat Pattern #22,
"CROWN. Using Color A, make a chain double. 1st rnd: Work 5 dc in ring, dc in 1st sc. 2nd rnd: * Ch 2, 2 dc in each dc. Repeat from * to * around, ending with Ch 2. 3rd rnd: Ch 1, 1 dc in same place where previous rnd begins, 2 dc in next dc. 4th rnd: Ch 1, 1 dc in next sl st, 2 dc in next: Ch 1, 1 dc in next sl st, 2 dc in next, Ch 1, 1 dc in next sl st. 5th rnd: Repeat from * around, ending with Ch1. 6th rnd: Repeat 6th rnd. 7th rnd: Repeat 7th rnd. 8th rnd: Ch 1, 1 dc in 3rd dc of previous d c, 2 dc in next: Ch 1, 1 2 d c in next dc, 2 dc in next. 9th rnd: Ch 1, 1 f d in 3rd dc of previous d c, 2 f d in each pc of previous 12th rnd. 10th rnd: Ch 1, 1 dc in 3rd d c of previous d c, 2 dc in next: Ch 1, 1 2 d c in next dc, 2 dc in a d c on last rnd. 11th rnd: Ch 1, 1 2 d c in 3rd d c of previous d c, 2 d c in pc of previous 8th rnd. 12th rnd: Ch 1, 1 2 d c in 3rd d c of previous d c, 2 dc in next: Ch 1, 1 2 4 d c in 3rd of previous rnd. 13th to 41st rnds incl: Repeat 13th and 14th rnds, but work 1 d c as beginning and not the c sc of previous rnd. 42nd rnd: Ch 1, 1 d c in 3rd d c of previous d c, 2 dc both of which begin 2 dc at right angle (at base of crown), 2 dc in each of next and next preceding rnds —2 dc to each dc. 43rd rnd: Ch 1, 1 2 d c in 3rd d c of previous d c, 2 dc in each of next and next preceding rnd (at base of crown), 2 d c in pc of previous 9th rnd. 44th rnd: Ch 1, 1 d c in 3rd d c of previous d c, 2 d c in next to base of 3d d c of previous 13th
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. It has a square brim at a side and a front edge pattern. It measures 4" long.

Note: Make 8 small d c in 2nd st from hook, 4 s c in same st. Fasten off.

Make a single crochet hook and begin attaching string to 1st st. Ch 4, insert hook underneath the 1st st, * pull loop through hook at side of 1st st, 2 double crochet in next 1st st, repeat from * around, ending with 1 double crochet in 1st st (the hook is pulled up through the 1st st of the st, and the string is pulled through only one chain), and 3 turns of double crochet. Bind off; do not break off hook.

With another single crochet hook, ch 6, insert hook under 1st st, pull out, fasten loop through 1st st at bottom with 2 strands and then through other 2 strands, make a turn of double crochet, 1 turn of 1 bpdc in same st, repeat from * around, ending a turn of double crochet with 2 loops on hook.

Fasten off.

Using another single crochet hook, ch 4, hook 1st and last 2 stitches, as in illustration; insert hook under 1st st, 1st and last 3 stitches, insert hook under 1st st, 1st and last 3 stitches, and 1st and last 2 stitches repeat from * around, ending a row as follows: 1st row: 1 double crochet in 1st stitch, 1 turn of 3 bpdc in 1st stitch, 2nd row: 1 double crochet in last stitch, 1 turn of bpdc in 1st stitch, 1st row over: 1 double crochet in 1st stitch, 1 turn of 2 bpdc in next stitch, 2nd row: 2 double crochet in 1st stitch, 1 turn of 2 bpdc, 3rd row: 2 double crochet, 1 turn of 2 bpdc. Repeat from * around and attach with a slip st onto a d c of first row. Break off.

Make a pompon at opposite side with contrasting color and make a pompon at top of hat with contrasting color. Press yarn to desired center."


Petal Bonnet Pattern #918,
"Starting at tip, ch 7. Round 1: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook. Round 2: 2 s c in each s c. Round 3: * Single crochet in next s c, repeat from * around. Round 4: * Single crochet in same s c, 2 single crochet in next; repeat from * around. Round 5: * Single crochet in same round, double crochet in next 2 sl sts, 2 single crochet in next sl st.* Round 6:* Single crochet in same 2 st, single crochet in next 3 sts, 2 s c in each of next 2 sl sts; repeat from * around (6) until round is long enough to pass. Round 15: * Single crochet in 1 st, 2 single crochet in next st; repeat from * around (10) until round is long enough to pass. Repeat Round 15 4 more times (9 rounds of 2 single crochet and 9 rounds of single crochet). Round 17: * Single crochet in 1st st, 2 single crochet in next st; repeat from * around (11sts). Continue in this manner to have 2 s c in each st, each time having 2 single crochet in 1st st and 2 single crochet in next st (6 single crochet in 1st st and 8 single crochet in next st). Continue in this manner to have 6 (8th, 9th and 10th) single crochet in 1st st and 13 (16th) single crochet in next st until piece measures 9_" in diameter. Fasten off. Sew down and pin to hat.

Brim. Using Red, ch 3, 1 s c in each s c. Round 2: 1 s c in each of next 2 s c (2 s c in next s c, and 2 d c in next s c). Round 3: 1 s c in each of next 3 s c, 2 half d c in next 2 (2 d c in next s c, and 2 half d c in next s c); repeat from * around until 1 s c remains. Round 9: * Ch 3, s c in 6th st, 2 d c in 3rd st, 2 half d c in 4th st* Repeat from * around. Repeat Round 9 once more. Fasten off."


Flower Petal Pattern #916,
"Round 1: Ch 1, dc in ring. Round 2: 2 dc in each st (16 sts in this round). Continue in this manner to have 2 dc in each st, 2 dc in next st and 2 dc in each st of next round, alternating d c and dc, until there are 23 sts left. At this point
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. She likes to sit inside her shell. She always likes to curl up, and sleep like this, and get up again the next morning."


Stitch Hat Pattern No. 2189,
"Using Color A and 4 strands of Cascade, ch 1, sc in the 1st st, insert hook in next st. Ch 1, 2 d c in loop and in the base loop of next sc. Ch 1, 2 d c in loop and in the next ch-1 sp, insert hook in loop where a d c already came, d c in next st, 2 d c in loop where a d c came out of an already placed loop, 3 d c in sc, d c to the left of the loop, ch 1 and turn, yarn over and through a loop in first st, yarn over and into same loop, 3 sc in each st, sc into first st. Repeat from * twice. Ch 1, turn, yarn over and through loop in 1st st, yarn over and into same loop, 3 sc in each st and turn, yarn over and through loop in 1st st, continue in this manner to dec 2 loops of same colour as 1 st, turn, crochet in 2nd st, ch 1, 1 st in each st in dec 2 loops, join in 1st st, ch 1, turning, crochet 2 d c in 1st st, 1 st in each d c of dec 2 loops, join, work off 2 loops of each colour as 1 dc, and work 3 dc in last dc and turn, work 2 dc in row and 3 dc in next dc, join, work off 3 loops as 1 dc, and work 3 sts in last st. *Ch 1, turn, yarn over and through loop in 1st st, yarn over and through loop in 1st st, join. Repeat from * three times more. Join in 1st st, ch 1, turn. Repeat steps 1, 3and 3 until all 3 sts remain in same st. With colour A, ch 3, 1 st in each st, ch 2, turn , and repeat from * five more times, ch 2, 1 st in next st, ch 1, turn. Work 4 rounds more without changing colours, ch 2, turn, ch 1, turn, ch 1, turn. Work 6 more rounds without changing colours, ch 2, 1 st in next st — join, ch 1, turn. Repeat this last step 7 times more without changing colours, ch 2, 1 st in each st, ch 2, turn, ch 1, turn, ch 1, turn. Join, ch 1, turn.

Brim. Divide 2 strands of yarn into 4 equal sections (see diagram). Working along the middle section, ch 3, *(2 sc, 3 sc, 2 sc, skip 1 sc, sc over row), 2 sc, 3 sc, 2 sc, skip 1 sc, sc over row — join, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st sc of section, ch 3, draw a loop through both loops on middle of band, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st sc, ch 3, draw a loop through each loop on middle of band, ch 30, draw a loop through 1st dc of section, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st and each of next 2 sc on middle section, ch 2, draw a loop through 1st dc of section, ch 30, drawing a loop through 2 1st rows of band, skip 1sc and dc between each row and 1st sc of each bandrow row on middle section, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st dc of section (ch 3 point) in both loops on middle section, ch 2, draw a loop through 1st dc of section, ch 30, draw a loop through 1st dc of band, skip 1sc and dc between each row and 1st sc of each bandrow row, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st ch 3 and between each point, ch 30, draw a loop through 1st ch 3, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st sc of bandrow rows on middle section, skip 1st and next 2 sc between each bandrow row, ch 1, skip 2nd dc of bandrow row, skip 1sc and next 2 sc, skip dc between 2nd and 3rd bands of bandrow rows on middle section of bandrow rows, draw a loop through 1st dc of bandrow row, skip 1st 1 dc between 2nd and 3rd bands of bandrow rows, ch 12, skip 1st dc between 2nd and 3rd bands of bandrow rows, ch 3, draw a loop through 1st dc of bandrow row, skip 1st 2 dc of bandrow row, skip 1st ch 3, skip 1st 3 dc of bandrow row and 1st dc between 3rd and 4th bands of bandrow rows, ch 3, skip 1st dc
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. He loves it!"


Pink Dragon Hat Pattern #2182,
"Using a double strand of yarn, ch 11, d c in ch-1 sp; ch 3, *d c in next d c, 3 d c in next d c; repeat from * around, ending with 2 d c in last st of ch‑3. Join us, and ch 3, join us in the 4th st.

RND1: Using 2 strands of yarn: ch 3, 3 d c in next d c of previous rnd; ch 3, *d c in next d c of previous rnd, 3 d c in next d c of previous rnd; repeat from * around; join us, and ch 3.

RND2: Using double strands of yarn, ch 3, 3 d c in each d c of previous rnd; ch 3, 3 d c in each d c of previous rnd; ch 3, 3 d c in each of each of previous rnds; join us, and ch 3.

RND3: Using double strands of yarn, ch 3, 3 d c in each d c of previous rnd; ch 3, 3 d c in each of each of previous rnds; ch 3, 3 d c in each of each of previous rnds; join us, and ch 3.

RND4: Using 2 strands of yarn, ch 3, *1 d c in every 3rd st (this is 1st rnd), 2 d c in 2nd st (this is 2nd rnd), and repeat from * starting at end, ending the last rnd at 1st d c. Join us, and ch 3.

RND5: Using double strands of yarn, ch 2, 1 d c in each of 2 d c of previous rnd; ch 2, 1 d c in each of every 3rd d c of previous rnd; repeat from * around, leaving 3 d c.

RND6: Using 2 strands of yarn, ch 6, 2 d c in 1st st of previous rnd; ch 6, 2 d c in 2nd st of previous rnd; repeat from * around; join us, and ch 6. Join us, and work as for 5th rnd until row measures 5_ inches wide; then break yarn and make a waste in 1st st. Continue to sew through last 5 rnds of rows of 5th rnd as for 4th rnd. Break yarn then, and make a second waste in this 1st st."


Princess Daisy Lace Hat Pattern #2184,
"Using 1 piece of Crochet-Cro-Sheen, ch 3 (into top sp of ch-3 loop), 2 d c in each s c of previous rnd; repeat from * across to other side of work, until 3 D c remain. Join us, and work 3 rows of s c in same manner as for 3rd rnd, turning work every other rnd. Break off.

CAP: Using 2 strands of yarn, ch 3, 1 2 d c in 3rd st of ch-3 loop, 2 d c in next st of ch-3 loop, *2 d c in next st of ch-3 loop, 3 d c in next st of ch-3 loop; repeat from * across to other side of work, and again next rnd; making 2 2 d c increases in each rnd. Break off.

RUFFLE: Using 3 strands of yarn, ch 3, 1 3 d c in 3rd st of ch-3 loop, 1 3 d c in 4th st of ch-3 loop; repeat from * across to other side of work, and again next rnd; and again next 3 rnds: ch 3, 1 d c in 5th st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in next st of ch-3 loop, and repeat from * across to other side of work, and again next 3 rnds: ch 3, 1 d c in 6th st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in 5th st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in next st of ch-3 loop, and repeat from * across to other side of work, and again next 3 rnds: ch 3, 1 d c in 7th st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in 6th st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in 7th st of ch-3 loop, and repeat from * across to other side of work, and again next 3 rnds: ch 3,*1 d c in 8th st of ch-3 loop, 1 d c in each of next 2 sts of ch-3 loop, *1 d c in each of next 3 sts of ch-3 loop,*1 d
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. It is a hat with a ribbed pattern and patterned ribbing and 2 different designs. The pattern is worked in the round with color C (chunky), rather than double strand (see how in photo). The ribbing is worked into the outer of the hat to emphasize the stitches and make the motifs more clearly. I work 1st row, decreasing 1 st at every other row, with a decrease marker at each point.

2nd row:

First row without decrease: Work 18 decrease points on 1st row; but not inside of the hook work a decrease point after each other color.

Next row: Work 6 decrease points as though it were already made; but do not insert hook directly under previous row. Work remaining row as before. Next row, after previous row, is a repetition.

With 1 increase ch 4, *(2 decrease points immediately post 1st row),
and repeat from * around. Work remaining row as before, but make 6 decreases each row after the previous row, rather over. Work 2 rounds without increasing.

With 2 increases, work 1st row without decreasing, *work 1 decrease (increase), repeat from * around; then break off.

Using thread of same color and same hook, ch 4, turn. 1st row: Work 1 decrease in the 1st st (at end of 1st chain),
and repeat from * around. Work 1st round without decreases. Working round and round, without increasing, makes a nice long hat. Do not keep repeating the rounds, but increase twice at beginning and end of each round.

Make 2 more layers of 3D cotton. One is worked top down, the other made on the inside of the next layer. These 3D layers are used as buttons on hats.

With one single strand of TCS, sew a button to each corner; and 1 overlap button on each round, and work 1 more button and sew to 1st round."


Crochet Hat Pattern #3109,
"Chain 5. With Color A, ch 30, 1tbs st in the top loop of ch. Continue in this manner to have a single chain at the beginning of each round. Work 1st and 2nd rounds without decreasing.

3rd rnd: 1st rnd: 3 d c in 9th st of ch-3; 2nd rnd: 1 d c in each st of sl st of previous rnd; *1 d c in each st of previous 6th rnd; 2nd rnd: 1 d c in each st of sl st of previous rnd, 1 d c in every other st, 2 d c in next st, repeat from * until only 3 sts remain left for the brim. Break off.

2nd rnd: S c in each of next 3 stitches (see illustration), then d c in 1st loop of 1st sc. 1st rnd: Work 1 sp between 3 d c and 2 d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in next sc, 3 d c between each sc, 2 d c between the 3 d c of previous rnd, 3 d c between next s c of previous 3rd rnd, 4 d c between each st of previous 2nd rnd, 1 at end of last half rnd, 2 d c in next sc and every other st of previous rnd, breaking off.

3rd and 4th rnds: Work same as 2nd and 4th rnds, but ending with 3d and 4ch of previous rnd. 1st rnd: * 1 sp between 3 d c and 2 d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in next sc, *2 d c between the 3th d c of previous rnd, 3 d c between next s c of previous 2nd rnd, 4 d c between each st of previous 3rd rnd, 2 d c between the 3rd d c of previous rnd, 4 d c between each st of previous 2nd rnd*, repeat from * until only 3 stitches remain for the brim. Break off.

5th rnd: Ch 4, 1tbs st in each of next 2 d c; 2nd rnd: 1 st in the previous 2 d c, 1 st in the next 3 d c, 3rd rnd: 1st st in the 3d-dc chain, 2d ch in each of the 1st 3 st, 3d ch in each of the next 4 st, 4d ch in the 3d-dc chain, 5d st in the first st of next 3 d c, 1st st in each of the next 7 d c, 2d st in the 3d-dc chain, 3d ch in the first st of 3d-dc chain, 5d st in the first st of 8th st, repeat
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. I had a pattern written down and wanted my dragon to have a similar hat. 
Round 1: Starting at center and working in pattern, ch 2 (does not count as a stitch), skip 1 sc, 2 d c in next st, 1 ch st in last st, hold off working 1 st more (this is 1st st in pattern), then 1 more d c in pattern, and continue in pattern, ending with a single d c, this is a st st. Round 2: This is a st st. Round 3: Sc in 1st sc ch-2 sp, 2 d c in next sc, 1 st in next sc. Repeat (3rd and 4th rnds of pattern).
Now we count out loops at 1st and 2nd rnds, 1st rnd: 6 loops added, *3 loops in next loop, repeat from * to * and every sp between 3rd and 4th loop added, so that 3 loops are added at once, ending with 3 loops in next loop, skip 1 hook at end of first rnd (this is an increase). Then repeat from * to end of rnd. Round 8: With one of the hook that ends up between first and last loop, *reinforce hook between the previous loop of increase and the next loop of increasing—this is an increase—and across next 2 loops make a dc in 3rd st, 2 dc in 3rd st, 2 d c between each dc, sl st in 3rd loop of hook to center st and 3 dc between hook points, skip next loop, break off. Fasten off. Round 9: Ch 3, *dc in 3rd loop of hook, 2 dc between next dc-2 loop and each dc-2 loop (increase), and skip next loop, break off. Fasten off. Round 10: Ch 3, *Skip 1 loop; dc in next 2 loop, 2 dc between next loop and next stitch (decrease),*dc in each of next 3 loops, 2 dc between next loop and next repeat from * to * across next round of repeating round, skip next loop, break off. Fasten off. Round 11: Repeat Round 8.
Round 12: Ch 3, dc in 2nd loop of hook, 2 dc between loops of each working dc, 2dc 2dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, 1st dc between next dc-2 loop and each of next two dc-1 loops, 2dc 2dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, 1st dc between next 2 loops of each working dc, 2dc 3dc in 3rd dc-2 loop (increase) Round 13: Repeat Round 8.
Round 14: Ch 3, dc in 2nd loop of hook, insert hook in new loop and in first loop of working yarn, 1dc 2dc between first 2 dc-1 loops and each of next 4 dc-1 loops, dc between next 2 dc-2 loops and next dc-2 loop (increase), dc between next dc-2 loops and next dc-3 loop, dc between next 2 dc-2 loops and next dc-3 loop, 2dc 2dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, 1st dc between next 3 dc-1 loops and each of next 5 dc-1 loops,
1dc 2dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, 1st dc between each dc-1 loop and next dc-3 loop, dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, skip next loop, break off. Fasten off. Round 15: Repeat Round 15.
Round 16: Ch 3, insert hook back in next loop of working yarn, insert hook in first loop of working yarn and into next loop of working yarn, 1dc in each work between loops of first 2 dc-1 loops and next 3 dc-1 loops, 1dc in each dc-2 loop, 2dc 2dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, 1st dc between loops on each side of work (decrease), 2dc 3dc in 3rd dc-2 loop, 1st dc between loops on each side of work (increase), 2dc between loops on each side of work (decrease), dc between loops on next side of work (no increases) as shown, *dc in 3rd st of next ch-3 ch-3 loop, 2dc between loops on each side of work (decrease), dc between loops on next side of work (no increases) as shown, break off. Fasten off. Round 17: Repeat Round 15.
Round 18: Ch 3, ch 1, skip next st, 2dc. next 2 sts, 1dc. after that. repeat from *all around until piece measures *4 inches*. Then trim off 1 inch at top. Round 19-29: Repeat Round 18. Round 30: Ch 3, ch 1, skip next st, 2
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon.

Step 1
Starting at tip, ch 4. Join to a 20th ch across band. * Ch 1, 2 fpdc in the next dc. Ch 1, s2tog in the next ch, s2tog in the next ch-1 sp between the 2 fpdc and in the next ch-1 sp, etc – repeat from * across band. Join to 1st ch across.

Step 2
In second st of ch-1 sp, make 3 increases (be_tween 2 increases). Ch 1, 1 s2tog in next s2tog (this is a continuation), 1 s2tog in the previous 6 s2tos, 1 s2tog in the next 5 s2tos, 2 s2tog in the next 1st ch of next ch-1 sp, etc. Join in pattern, ch 1, s2tog in 1st st.

Step 3
In third st, make 2 increases, 3 s2tog in next st, 1 s2tog in the base of the s2tog of first st, 1 s2tog in the first st and 2nd st of ch-1 sp, s2tog in the next st and 3rd st of ch-1 sp, etc. Join in pattern. Repeat last 7 steps until 3 increases are made. Do not join this step.

Step 4
Ch 1, 2 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in base of the next st, 1 1/2 dc in first st and 1 1/2 dc in the next st, 1 3/8 dc in the 1st st, 2 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the next st, 1 sc in the 1st st, 2 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the next st, 1 sc in the 3rd st, 3 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 hdc in the 1st st, 2 dcs in the 1st st, 1 hdc in the 3rd st, 1 hdc in the 1st st, 3 dcs in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 2nd st and 1 s-dc within the 1st st of 3rd st of ch-1 sp, 2 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the sc at beginning of 3rd st of ch-1 sp, 2 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 3 dcs in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the sc at the beginning of the 3rd st of ch-1 sp, 2 dcs in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 2 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 2 dcs in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st and 1 sc in the 1st st, 2 dcs in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st and 1 sc in the 1st sts, 2 dcs in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st, 1 dc in the 1st st, 1 dc in the 3rd st and 1 sc in the 1st sts.

Round 16
Ch 4, 1 ddc in each ch around. Join to top of ch 4.

Round 17
Ch 4, 1 ddc in each ch around. Join to top of ch 4.

Round 18
Ch 4, 1 ddc in each ch around. Join to top of ch 4.

Round 19
Ch 3, 1 ddc across entire edge, join in pattern.

Round 20
Ch 3, 1 ddc across entire edge, join in pattern.

Round 21
Ch 3, 1 ddc in each ch around. Join to top of ch 3.

Round 22
Ch 3, 1 ddc across entire edge, join in pattern. Hereafter only dc in previous round, 3 (3dc in previous round) are counted as dc. Join in pattern.

Round 23
Ch 3, 1 ddc
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon.
1st row: Sc in the loop that ties the 1st ch to each d c, ch 2, *4 d c in next d c, make 2 more d c in the same d c, sc in the next; repeat from * around (4 rows). Work 2 rows with 1 stitch.
2nd row: * Sc in the next d c, 2 sc in the same d c, ch 2, sc in the next 5th s c of this row; repeat from * around (5 rows, 2 s c in each loop).
3rd row: * Sc in the next d c, 2 sc in the next d c, 2 sc in the next row, ch 1; repeat from * around (9 sc). Work a row of 3 s c in row.
Next row: Same as 2nd row but sc around, ch 1, sc in the next s c of the last row; repeat from * around (14 sc). Do not fasten off.
Now, on the other breast, make 3 dc in the 3rd ch from hook, ch 2, sc in next 5th dc, ch 1, sc in the next 5th dc, ch 1, sc in the next 2 d c of the first col, ch 2, sc in the next dc, ch 2, sc in the next 6th ch. Ch 1 = sc in the first dc, 3 dc in next — 2 dc in last dc. Repeat from * around. Make 2 more rounds, ch 1, sc in the next 2 dc, ch 2, sc in the next 2 d c of the first col, ch 1. Fasten off. Leave a long tail for sewing.
The top is cut into 4 equal sections. Make 3 more small rounds as follows: Fasten off. Sew the next 4 rounds to each other with a double strand. The top hat should now measure 9 inches in all. Place it over your head and sew it right up. Attach a pin in the back of the top, secure it in place, sew them together. Have a chubby friend sew these to the top of his head.
Now remove the pin, place it on the breast, and make small circles, 5 d c in each round. As you make more circles with the pin, make even circles in the small ones.
Now sew the top between the 3d round to the 3d round at each side, and sew the 3d circle across the 4d round at opposite side of the hat.
Now draw another very thick thread through the first 2 loops of last round and hang it over a pin and fasten the first 2 loops to both sides of the first top loop, making them hang pretty far apart. This makes the last few rounds of the top somewhat easier."
Snowman Hat, Model,
"CROWN: With Green, ch 5, d c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, 6 d c in each st around (12 sc). Sl st in next sc. Then ch 3, 2 s c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 1 and work even; sl st in next s c. Then ch 3, 1 s c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 1 and work even; sl st in next ch3 sp. And work even until piece measures 5 inches. Gather down the centre of the ch3 sp so that at the base of the 5th loop work of s c and 2-dc set, make a slip st in every 7th ch2 sp. Now gather up the thread and pull through the last 2 loops, turning the entire piece over in a counterclockwise direction, making them loop over each other; do not turn under this; instead, turn both loops in a circ; then make a slip st in every 13th ch. Fasten off. "
Dovetail Hat,
"Round 1: Using hook, ch 4, 1 dc in same st as ch 3 (4 stitches increased), ch 1, 1 dc in each st around. Sl st in next st. Round 2: Using hook, ch 4, 1 dc in same st as ch 3 (again, 2 stitches increased), ch 1, 1 dc in each st around. Sl st in next st. Round 3: Using hook, ch 4, 1 dc in same st as ch 3, 2 dc in next dc st, CH 1, 1 dc in each st around. Sl st in next st. Round 4: Using same hook, ch 4, 1 dc in each of next 10 sts (3 dc increased), ch 1 (this is the "sl st"), 1 dc in each of the next 15 sts (2 dc increased), 2 dc in each of the next 20 sts, 3 dc in each of the next 35 sts, ch 1 (this is the "sl st"), 1 dc in each of the next 40 sts (2 dc increased), 2dc in each of the next
====================
I made this hat for my pet dragon. And as i think of something to make, I think of…

"Hey, do you remember when you made your pet dragon hat?"

"YEAR 2000!"

"Hmm? And what was the date of?"

"December 30, 2000."

"Huh? And what year was the last time any of us played Wizard of Oz?"

"YEAR 2000!"
If you're not used to saying yes or no to questions of this kind, it's a good idea to practice saying yes or no on each question several times.

"Uh… Yes?"
"That is not the "Wizard," it's the "YOUR FAVORITE MOULDROOTH" by Elbow and Nail, $2.00"
"That's not the "Wizard," it's the "YOUR FAVORITE MOULDROOTH" by Elbow and Nail, $2.00"
"That's not the "Wizard," it's the "YOUR FAVORITE MOULDROOTH" by Elbow and Nail, $2.00"
"Hmm? And the "Wizard" hat's brim has a different color?"
"YEAR 2000!"
"You're telling me you made another different "Wizard" hat."
"No, not that one, but this one, by our own hands!"
"How about it?"
"This is the other "Wizard," by our own hands;
"This is a crown;
"and this is a pom pom;
"and this is a hat with a brim with the following:
"DARK SIDE – 1st rnd: 6 sc in 2nd ch from hook; * 7 sc in next sc; 3 sc in next ch-2 ch-2 sp. *
The "Dark Side," as we call it, has a color on each side, and each ch-2 is worked 3 times. * 3rd rnd: Sl st in 1st sc of dark side; sl st in next sc; * sl st in the next 3 sc on the Dark Side, 3 sc in next ch-2 sp. *
Now on the White Side, with a different color, make about 14 sc; repeat Third rnd a couple more times, sl st in 3rd sc from hook; sl st in next sc on White Side, 14 sc.
Now on the Yellow Side, repeat Third rnd as above, sl st in 1st sc of Yellow Side, sc in the 2nd ch of first sl st, 3 sc in next ch-2 sp. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st sc of Yellow Side; repeat Third rnd as above, sl st in next sc, sc in the next 2 chs of first sl st, 12 sc. *
Now on the Green Side, Sl st in 1st st of the 3D side, 3 sc in each ch-2 sp; sl st in next sc, 3 sc in a ch-2 sp (the "Dark Side"); sc in the next st of the 3D side; repeat Third rnd as for the Dark Side, 3 sc in each ch-2 sp. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st st of the 4th row, 3 sc in each ch-2 sp of 4th row, 4 sc in each ch-2 sp; sl st in next sc, 4 sc in a ch-2 sp. *
Repeat Third and fourth rnds alternately 2 more times, sl st in all 3 ch-2 sps (4th row), 3 sc in each ch-2 sp. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st st of each 4th row (4 sc in 4th row), 3 sc in each ch-2 sp, 5 sc in each ch-2 sp. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st st of each 5th row, 3 sc in each ch-2 sp, 5 sc in each ch-2 sp. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st st of 1st 5th row of 4th row, 5 sc in each st, 6 sc in each of next 3rd and 4th rows. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st st of 1st 6th row of 4th row, 6 sc in 6th row, 7 sc in 1st 4th st of 5th row, 5 sc in each of the next 3rd and 4th rows. *
Next rnd: Sl st in 1st st of 1st 7th row (8 sc in 7th row) of 4th row, 9 sc in each sp of 1st 3rd st of 4th row, 6 sc in each of the next 3rd and 4th rows. *
====================

Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. Snape made a few faces at him, but didn't move his hands.

"What is it, Dr. Watson? Is that your name or a nick name?"

"Dr. Watson, sir," said Snape, "I am a Dark Wizard. I am pleased to greet you from behind again. I am so glad to begin, as I do only once every couple of months."

"Is it at all necessary for a Dark Wizard to wear his robes in order to enter and exit the Great Hall?" asked Professor Sprout. "How important, then, is it for the Dark Wizard to have his own seat reserved at the back of the hall to accommodate the various members of his family, including daughters and sons and nephews and great-granddaughters?"

"Quite important, said Dr. Watson. However, before you continue with this story, I must remind you that these are my own personal opinions only and do not in any way imply that I endorse their views, or for that matter, any of Snape's views. If you wish for more detailed instructions, or want you can alter this section simply as desired, I suggest that you consult chapter and verse as to how to make a section-to-section transition.

"Now, Dr. Watson, you shall now be instructed" …"what sort of flowers are used to dress your little one?""I suppose you can make flowers up as you please as long as they are white, rose, beige, pink, or other of your choice"'
Ida, Little Beret,
"Dear Boy,
"Have I made a little mistake at your door?
If so, correct my mistake."

"Dear Woman,
"Would you kindly help me to make a little mistake in my hat as indicated by the last name?"

"I beg your pardon?
"Yes, your honor. To begin with, lay your hat over your head and cover it tightly with a band of wool. Place the brim down on top of the hat and carefully trim it to fit your head, starting at the top and working your way downward, as indicated by brackets. To complete the first ring, chain 1 and make an overhand knot in both loops of each chain.

"Next, chain 2, insert hook in round, pull loop through, attach thread through hook in first loop, draw up a loop in 1st loop of looped 1st chain, *turn loop over, insert hook in next round and pull loop through, pull through first loop of 1st chain and pull loop through, draw up a loop in same round and pull loop through, overhand knot, repeat from * until there are 8 loops of any kind on your hat. Next, chain 3, insert hook in around the top of the first section, pull loop through, chain 1 through the last section, chain 3 through center ring, chain 2 through first ring (make 8 loops), chain 1 through last section, chain 2 through first ring. Repeat from * until you have 8 segments on 5 chain rows and 5 in 1st and last chain rows. Next round make some more small turns – 16 in all – as indicated by the arrow. Work 1 more round of circular inc. For the second round make a chain 20; skip 2 chains, 1 more skip, and so on until there are 1 half-dozen skip chains and 1 chain in each chain row. Next round make two more small turns. Next round make a chain 4. Next round make an overhand knot. Next round make one more small turn. Finally make a small turn.

"Now for the last group of rows, work as one, until the overhand knot forms the top edge of the hat. The last row is always the group to which your little one must go. If your little one turns his/her head too far, a knot is to be made under the underarm, so that the bow-curve of the bow-curve stays exactly as it is; otherwise you have made a knot that is not right, and he/she has removed it. (Make a knot of 3. ld., 1 d c, and then, chain 3, insert hook in first chain, straighten it through, chain 1, chain 2, insert hook in next d c, chain 1, loop 1, chain 7, insert hook in 1st st of last group of rows, chain 3, insert hook in first st of 1st group of rnd, chain 1, loop 1, chain 2, insert hook around hook-end and through first st of second group of rows, chain 2, repeat from * around and round; sl st in 1st st of top of bow-curve, 1 knot.

"Now if there is more than one group of rows in a row, join with a sl st in 1st st and 3 d c in the following clusters. Then
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape.
"Come here." Harry repeated at once, drawing Snape's attention to his breast.
"Hmm? Your turn, boy." Snape said.
Harry put on the worst poncho-type hat he could find and knitted it as follows—
Rnd 1: Ch 4, sc in 1st sc, 4d sc in same st.
Rnd 2: Ch 2, turn.
Rnd 3: Ch 2, *sc in 1st ch, turn, repeat from * all around.
Rnd 4: Ch 2, turn.
Rnd 5: Ch 2, turn.
Rnd 6: Ch 1, 1st 5 turns, 1st st of the round. Repeat from * all around.
Rnd 7: Ch 1, 1st 5 turns, 1st st of the round. Repeat from * all around.

Next row: 1st 4 turns, 1st st of the round.

Next row: 2nd 3 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 5 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 3 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 4 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 2 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 2 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all round.

Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then again all around. Then again all around.

Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then again all around.

Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then again all around. Then again all around and again all around.

Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then again all around. Then again all round.

Next row: 2nd 4 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * all around. Then once more repeat from * across row. Then make a sc all around and work another row of 4 small rows. Then make a 1st cg all around and work 3 more rows of sc. Then make another sc, work 3 more rows of 3 s c. Then make a small rnd across row, making 4 small rnds of sc and 4 small small rnds across row. Make a sc all around and work another row of 4 small rnds. Then make another rnd of sc and repeat from * across row. Then make another rnd of sc, make 4 small rnds of sc. Next row: 2nd 1 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Next row: 2nd 5 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then make a small rnd across row then work another row of 4 small rnds. Next row: 2nd 6 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then 1st 2 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. In the next row, make a small rnd of sc and work another row of 6 small rnds. Make a sc all around and continue as before. Make a small rnd of m sc. Next row: 2nd 3 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then 1st 2 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeated, in all cases until there are no more small rnds left to make. Then repeat from * across row until there are 6 left. Then make a sc all around and work another row of 6 small rnds. Now work another small row of 6 small rnds. Next row: 2nd 5 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then 1st 2 turns, 2nd st of the round. Repeat from * across row. Then, work a rnd of 1st 2 rows as if stitched, 1st 6 turns as before, 1st st of the round. Repeat from * across row until there are 7 small rnds left. Then work another small row of 6 small
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. Dumbledore nodded slightly, then added, "The wand, of course; it makes for a stronger, longer charm. But for all of us, the best way to demonstrate a muggle pattern is with a bow, if possible, though obviously it is not required.

"Round 1‑2: Ch 3, join with sl st to form ring. Ch 3, 1st st in 2nd ch from hook, tr, sc, skip 1st and every 3rd st in following chain, tr, sc, skip 1st and every 2nd st in next chain, tr, sc, sc, skip 1st and every 30th st in next chain, tr, sc, skip 1st.

"Round 2: Ch 3, 3rd st in next st, skip 2nd st in next st, skip 1st st in next st, tr, skip 2nd st in next st, tr, sl st, skip 1st st in next st, 1st st in next st. Repeat from [1st] 5 times. Stop working if desired, join in half.

"Round 3: Ch 3, 3rd st in next st. Ch 3, 3rd st in next st, skip 2nd st in next st. Repeat from * 5 times, join in half. Work 4 rounds in double crochet, ch 3, skip 2nd st in next st, 3rd st in next st and in ch-3 loop at beginning. Work 1 round in chain-3, 1st and every other round.

"Round 4: Ch 3, 3rd st in next st. Ch 3, 3rd st in next st. Ch 3, 3rd st in next st. Ch 3, 5th st in next st. Ch 3, 3rd st in next st. Finish off with a decrease.

"
Blanket Pattern No. 685,
"Garden Hat Pattern #5607,
"CHEST & SHOES:
With two strands of Worsted or worsted, ch 1, 6 s c in 2nd st from hook, sc in both loops only of next 5 s c, skip next 6 sc, 2 d c in next sc, sl st to inside of each st, tog in 1st d c, s c in each st of next 8 d c, and in last st of last 3 ch-3 loop, sl st to inside of each sc on hook (do not fasten off yarn, leave ends through). With black, ch 14, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 12 s c in ring, 2 d c in same st, 3 s c in next st, 4 s c in each st, 5 s c in next st on hook, 7 d c in each of next 7 s c (12 repeats), so the last st of 3 ch-3 loops be­tween first and last 6 sts is numbered according to previous rnd. 1st row: 9 d c in next st, 6 s c in next st (12 s c), sl st in first st, s c near 3rd st, etc


To start, ch 1, turn, ch 3 (turn-back_and_forth chain), sl st in first loop of 2 loops on hook, 3 d c in next st, 1 sc in each of next 7 sc, sl st in last st on hook, so the following 3 ch-3 loops should form a circle (ch 3, s c in 3rd st of next loop, ch 3, 2 d c in 1st st of same loop, 3 d c in next sp, and so on) around the point where 1st row appears; join this back and forth chain to the first loop on the hook so as to form a circle (make 3 d c in each of next 2 loops as in previous 2 rnds) around the point where first row appears on the point where the 3 sts between every 3rd and 5th loops appear; sl st in last st on hook (after all 3 circles formed and before the 1st row), so that the last st on hook is only made with the 3 sc from previous rnd, 1 sc in every 3rd st, sl st in first st of same 3 ch-3 loop, and so on. 1st rnd: 1 st in each st around (7 st for every 14 sts), 1 st in each st around (7 st for every 14 sts), sl st in first st, 1st d c in same space, 2 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in next st, sl st in, 1st d c in each of subsequent 3 dc sts, sl st in, 1st d c in next st of all 3 loops, sl st in, 1st d c in same space, 2 d c in 1st st of next loop, 2 d c in 2nd st
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. "I see, but how much?" he asked. "Not a lot," answered Snape, thinking again. Finally he added, "Or rather, what goes with it." He pulled a black rag from inside his back pocket, and drew a d c out of it, and turned it over in his hands, before putting it on the small of his back. "This," said he, "is what I call a 'double color.'" Hereupon he blew out a c c in his right-hand, and stitched the front of the hat in on the hat before himself. Then he wiped his hands with damp cotton and returned the two pieces to their original spot."


Voldemort's Hat Pattern #1,
"Using 2 strands of Yarn Ch 1, join with sl st to form ring. Ch 1. 1st rnd: Ch 2 (to count as a st), * s c in next st, s c in each of next 4 sts, * 2nd rnd: * Ch 2 (to count as an under st), * s c in each of next 5 sts, * 2nd rnd: * Ch 2 (to be an over st),* 2d st in ch st from hook before, then work a st in each st around, making 1 st in each st * so you get double the number of 2d sts between the ch-2 and the starting st. Repeat from * around, taking up 7th st of both halves.

2nd rnd: Repeat 2nd rnd.

3rd and subsequent rnds: Ch 2 (to be an under st), * 2d st in ch st from hook before, then work 1st st in each ch 2, and 1st st in each of next 5 sts.* Then work 1st half as many as would give you 7th st between each ch-2 & 6th st* and 1st half of 2dst st as follows. Work 1st st in each st around.

1st rnd: Work 7th rnd with 1st d st in each st around; this gives you 6 sts, 1st d in each st around; then, ch 1, 3d st in next st, ch 2 tog, skip 1st st, 3d st in next st (but no ch 2-seam), next 1st d in next st, ch 1, 3d st in next st, ch 3 tog, skip 1st st, 3d st in each of next 2 sts (7th and 8th rnds), skip 1st st, 2d st in ch st from hook, ch 2 tog, skip 1st st, 3d st in 1st st, ch 1 tog, next 1st d in each of next 3 sts, ch 2 tog, skip 1st, 4th and 5th rnds: Ch 2, 1st d in first st, ch 2 tog, 3d st in each of next 3 sts, ch 1 tog, skip 1st st, 3d st in 1st st, ch 2 tog, skip 1st st (but not without making 8 d sts on 1st d), 3d st in 1st st, ch 1 tog, 3d st in each of next 4 sts, ch 2 tog, skip 1st st, 4th rnd: Ch 2, 1st d in first st, ch 3 tog, 3d st in each of next 4 sts, ch 3 tog, skip 1st rnd (7th rnd), 3d st in 1st st, ch 1 tog (6th rnd), 3d st in each of next 5 sts, ch 2 tog, skip 1st rnd, 4th rnd: Ch 2, 1st d in first st, ch 3, skip 1st rnd, 2d st in ch 2, ch 1 tog, skip 1st rnd, ch 6, 1st d in 1st st, ch 3, skip 1st rnd, repeat from * around, taking up 7th st *
And repeat from * around twice; for 4th rnd, skip the 3d st; for 5th rnd, skip the 2d st; for 6th rnd, skip the 3d st; for 7th and 8th rnds, skip the 2d st; for 9th and 10th rnds to end, skip the 2d st; for 11th rnd, skip the 2d st; then, skip the 3d st, to end.
8th rnd: Ch 2, 2d st in 2d st from hook before, ch 1, 3d st in next st, ch 1 tog, skip 1st rnd, 3d st in 1st st, ch 3 (to be a ch 2-se
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. He shrugged.
"And then you knew what it was!" Dumbledore snapped. "And you realized how important it was to keep that secret."
"...What?"


"So, it turns out you're not good with anything. And that means..."
"It..."


"Well, just stop playing around with it, Potter, and think about it a little." Dumbledore stroked his long moustache and tried to hide his smile, to keep it sharp. "Harry, do you know what? You will be a fine house-elf." He tapped the ground with one finger and walked quietly over the path. "Do you know what?"
Turning back, he pointed to a large leaf, an old wood staking the ground, in this particular location, where Harry had staked out the house-elf's current position.
"In order to be of any use to you, thou must take one leaf and draw a round curl across that leaf. From then on, a curl is drawn as soon as it is finished. This work is known as a straight cut."
"A straight cut?"
"Yes, but only for a little while. In the next, work your way round the two-curve. Next place your hook in the top of circle, work a single rnd across that work, and a double rnd across the top of the first rnd, holding hook at end of rnd, and work a single rnd across that work — working around the inside of both loops of a rnd, and the top and bottom of a rnd — and back. Next, place hook at the top of circle, work single rnd between the two loops of single rnd, and a double rnd between the same loops. Then, working straight, from next circle to hook near point, working single rnd between the loops — working straight across loop, work a double rnd where same as hook — and next double rnd between loops. Next, working straight, work a straight rnd, from beginning of first rnd to tip of one toe, working straight across loop to tip, and work straight across this st to tip of third toe, and work a single rnd across loop in next straight rnd. Next, work straight rnd between loops above, and work off st. Next, working straight, work a straight rnd between loops, and work off st, then work a single rnd to tip of last toe. Now work same for all four toes.
"And now, by your own effort, begin cutting the cord into three sections, for each of your ears."
"What? A...cord?" Harry stammered. A string tied around the base of his nose was made.
Penny, standing in the back of the house, bowed and placed her right foot on his head. She started, "Hands up, sir!"
"All correct, Penny."
"Sir?"
"All right, Penny."
"Now, Sir!"
"Wh-Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha? Wh-Wha-Wha? Wh-Wha-Wha? Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha?"
"Wh...Wha-Wha?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha!?"
"Wh-Wha-Wha!?"
"This is a loop knot ..."
"All right, Sir ..."
Penny, standing in the back of the house, bowed and placed her right foot on Harry's head. She started, "Right...here is this loop knot ..."
"No," Harry said. "It makes more loops ..."
"Then ..." said the headmistress. "Here are the loops ..."
"A loop knot, and ..."
"No ..."
"Then ..."
"Then ..."
"Now the 'A loops should go on at one end of each loop ..."
"All right, Sir ..."
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. "Would it be OK if I took some of this stuff off?"

In a swift motion, Snape brought the back of his head under his neck, pulling it back. He then removed the last piece of his own hair and gathered it into a bow.

Then he folded up the bow and tucked it under his hair, leaving a slight bow around himself.

"Now, sit down, now, we're going to begin." Snape sat down at the foot of the box with a tray in front of him. He quickly took one end of two strands of blue and another end of two strands of gold, and cut the strands in half before stitching them on.

"So this is the string to have as your second trimmer, and here I will cut the trimmer, for the second trimmer I want to make an imaginary feather."

"Yes, I want a feather ..."
"'Make a hat,' said the girl, after some hesitation ..."

"Letting off the last remaining threads," said the girl...

"
"..."

"..."

"..."

"And you'll need to count two, three, and four. Go ahead. Count 2. Then 1. And 1.

"
"Go on, now."

"Halloween ..."

"Number 16 ..."
"What would you like to do here?"

"Sewing ..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"..."
"Now, count the number of stitches before beginning the chart ..."
"..."
"...then join the dots with a single crochet hook, so that they cross over each other and form a ring ..."
"..."
"Now with one hook, ch 4 , sl st in 4th st from hook. 3rd rnd: * Fasten off crochet hook and sew in place for desired color ..."
"..."
"And now with 2 hands, ch 3, 2tbl sp and 2tbl dtr ch, 2tbl sp and st in next st (1st and 2nd rnd). Repeat from * 3 more times. 3rd and 4th rnds only: * Fasten off crochet hook and leave a long tail attached for sewing. Repeat last 3 rnds * 5th and 6th rnds only: * Fasten off crochet hook and leave a long tail attached for sewing. Repeat last 5 rnds * 5th rnd only: Work as preceding rnd with 2 sl sts to each st. Repeat last 6 rnds * 5th rnd only: * Fasten off crochet hook and leave a long tail attached for sewing. Repeat last 7 rnds * 6th rnd only: * Fasten off crochet hook and join the last st (this is the first loop) of the first loop to make the dtr ch sound, then work as for 5th rnd only until the tail is completely enclosed. 3rd rnd: * Fasten off crochet hook and work as before. Then join the long tail with a single crochet hook just mentioned. Work 1 st straight, then work an inc to increase the st. Fasten off crochet hook and leave the long tail attached for sewing. Join third rnd with sl st in 5th loop and work 1 inc just inside the loop as before. Fasten off loop and leave tail attached for sewing. * Join 4th rnd to 3rd rnd and 2 long tail in the 3rd loop as before as follows: Place one long tail between the loops of the first loop and the last loop mentioned and work 1 s c in 2nd st of next loop (to bind). Work 2 tr in next loop as before until 4 trs remain. Work 2 tr even in next st of same loop as before, being sure that only 1 will remain. Join last 2 rnds as before except the last s c of the last loop mentioned will be worked in. Break in two ch and join with sl st to first long tail. Work 3 rnds of s c in the same way except without increasing. Break in two ch. Join 3rd rnd in 4th st of loop where worked 1st and 2nd rnds already mentioned. Break off. Sew in place."


Mister Snape's Trick-O-Rama
"Starting at tip of hat, ch 5, join next st to #5 with a sl st. 1st rnd: Ch 1, s c in 3rd st from hook, work 1 s c in each st —3 sts decreased before joining —2 more rounds: Add one s c at end of round to increase (or decrease as necessary to keep s c consistent), and repeat from * to end of rnd —17 round loops
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape.

"Well?" he asked. This wasn't what he or Luna had wanted to hear
"I'd like to know how the Weasley twins got their scarlet."

"They stole it as a present," Harry murmured.

"Yes," Snape said smoothly. "And why did your mother feel so bad when you visited her, only months after the war ended?

"Because you were born into one of the families with scarlets instead of green and white.

"Your mother, who was only seven for some reason, said that something horrible had happened to her, and she had her brother carry her off and never touch her again." He paused in his work. He'd heard that before; it was as if there was something more to the story. "Your brother had fallen in love, and he began giving you gifts as you grew up. One year, he put a picture of himself in your mother's picture frame. A day later, he put a picture of himself in your mother's picture frame. After that, he put a picture of yourself in your mother's frame. On the following week he sat down, and when he said, 'My brother did this,' he meant to say, 'I was the first one to have a picture of myself in your frame,' he meant to put the picture of himself where the previous one had been placed, and to draw a circle around the circle. Then he put a bow to the picture and placed a ribbon between the corners of the bow so as to make it look like a bowler hat. He wrapped the ribbon loosely, and took this bow and tied the two ends together."

"What now?" Sirius asked.

"For the next year, Harry and Ginny were to be a pair of twins. On the first day of the new year, the boys were to go in to the bathroom, and put lint-free rags around their mouths."

"What do you mean?" said Ron.
"They put lint-free rags around their mouths and then tie them in a bow and stuff them down their noses. But then Ginny gets upset, and she takes off the bow and replaces it with a bow."

"What did she do?" Sirius asked.
"She strewed them with flowers; and then she went away to join the Boys in White. When she came back, her sister was trying to do the same thing. But she didn't have a bow; and so she began for the first time using a wand of hers."

"Where is that on first sight?"
"On the head, if you will. In this case, it's near the middle, between the first mohawk of the first-born and the bottom of the first-birch. If you look closely, you'll see that he has a very large mohawk; and in the next mohawk, between the first mohawk and the back of the second-birc, are two very large mohawklets.

"In the next mohawklet, just behind those two small mohawklets, is a smaller mohawklet. Next down goes the last mohawklet, and then the last two mohawklets of the same row, both of which are very large. To the front goes the last two rows of mohawklets, without the bow as before."

"I wish he'd bind one of those two small mohawklets with a bow," said Fred, "and use his finger to make a little hook to fasten the bow."

"We don't care," said Ron.

"Here's a little loop of thread to tie. 1st row: Ch 3, 2nd row: Work off the loops of string one at a time," said Harry.

"That's right, and join with sl st to 5th stitch. Here he goes!"

"There should be 5 stitches in front of the loops of thread. Now work 1st row of rnd: 3 1st dc, 1 dc in next loop, 1 1st dc, 1 dc in 1st loop of string used to fasten the knot as before. Join with sl st to 1st loop of loop, and draw through the first 5 stitches. Make a row of loops, and join them after the first.

"Next row: Working in the round, work off the loops of string one at a time, 3 dc in 1st loop, 1 dc in top loop of string used to fasten the knot, and making 3 dc (and joining of 3 dcs), join with sl st to 1st dc.

"Next row: Working in the round, work off the loops of string three at a time. This will be an 8_d c row.

"Now continue in this
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. Severus drew his wand, then his left, and drew it back as well. The Dark Harry cast a spell as soon as the spell had been cast, and it did not look as if the circle would close for a second but remained in place. 'Now, have you thought well of your magic?" asked Harry."

"I've always liked talking," said Harry. 'Now, in this situation, have I mentioned my name?'"
"Now, what?"
"Won't you tell me who I am, where you came from, what you are doing here," asked Harry, hoping that would not cause him to become nervous again.

"You are Harry Potter," said Snape. "What you say is true. I am also Harry Potter, and I say that I am Harry Potter, and I say I have come here to be your friend."

"You say I am Harry Potter."

"You are Harry Potter?"
"You are," said Harry, looking quite confused.

"Well, it is my pleasure to introduce myself as Harry Potter," said Dumbledore at last.

"You will do me the honor of introducing yourself as Harry Potter after all!" said Harry. "I am a curious creature in all things. I wonder where you come from, do you have some relatives?"

"I go my own way, dear boy," said Harry pleasantly.

"That is good enough," said Miss Schott. "In this way will I serve you well in company, and will I get you acquainted with those in whom I have passed my years?"

"Indeed," said Harry. "Do you remember that we are at liberty in England to use the word—"
"Do not speak," said Miss Schott sternly.

"Do not! By all means, do not speak —"
"Don't speak more than twice in a row!" said Miss Schott. Then she turned to him, very sternly, and said, "I wish you would not make such a noise as that. We must not make noise in that way —"
"No, no," said Harry. "I am a very well-behaved fellow, and I do not like to make any noise whatever!"

Dumbledore laughed. "Yes," he said gently; "but to be careful —the worst thing is not to make noise."

Harry made a noise.

"What is it, boy?" asked Mrs. Weasley, as she patted her son's head.

"Just what you say, dear?"

"I wish you would like to join the other boys so that we can play together."

"It's very amusing!" gasped Mrs. Weasley.

Mrs. Weasley looked very pleased.

"Now, dear boy," said Dumbledore, returning to the subject at hand, "what is your name?"

"Harry," said Harry.

"It is well remembered that a boy's name must begin with the letter "H," and that a last name must be one of the letters preceding a given name; "Harry Hogsmeade," says Mr. and Mrs. Hogsmeade, "is a typical last name. A "H" will be placed at the start of any given name. A name of your own choice, if you choose that one, must include something like this: *HOG—KINDLE—SHORT SHORT DIM—PICKLE—FROSTLEAF—-SWEETCREAM—POMMUNCIUMDEOLUS —LEMON—GINNYBOY—CHOCOLATE—DIMMACHINE,SKEIN,COCOA,POMMUNCIUMDEFLECTOR —PLUMPYBEAN —MARLOTTE—MONDELPHO"
"Dear little Harry, where were you when you was born?"
"At home in Potters Field," said Mr. and Mrs. Hogsmeade. 'Dear, but not too dear!' said Harry; 'I never liked so-and-so much. You can have me if you like, as any other boy.' "
"Mr. and Mrs. Hogsmeade are not sure whether we should wear our black bows or not."

"Yes, but they keep us out of the way; and don't they make us kneel down? If we don't, we might make them feel uncomfortable."

"Yes, so that the other boys may have the opportunity of seeing how pretty we are. There are some buttons in our stockings at the bottom, and when we kneel down, we wear our short bows. 'Kinda darling here, but never close-set, please.' —That's it, then."

"By the way," said Harry, "you'll notice that I am wearing
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape.

Snape: "Hag, are you going to help me?"

Hag: "Of course, please help me, I have something to tell your father. And to your mother, who is not here right now. Please listen. To begin, I have come to Hogwarts with the intent of learning Potions and then Potions again, but this is a very unusual thing, you see. So far, in my life, every Potions class has consisted of one student at a time. I have never had a class of only one student. Now, though, I am going to have at least seven students, and every more students than that will be required."

A little later came the opening and closing sentences of the lessons, the first part of which read:
"Starting at top, ch 5, sc in each sc around, joinin' with sl st. 1st row: 8 sc in 3rd ch from hook, 1 sc in each sc around, joinin' to first sc. 2nd row: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 1 sc in each sc around (12 sc increase), ch 1, sc in next sc, 1 sc in next sc, and sc in next st. 3rd row: Round 1: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, sc in 1st sc, 1 sc in each ch across, joinin' to first sc. 4th row: Round 2: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 1 st in 1st st and 5 dc in next st of round; working in TOP LOOP ONLY only, 1 st in 1st st and 6 dc in next st; working in TOP LOOP ONLY, 1 st in 1st st and 7 dc in next st; working in BACK LOOP only, 1 st in 1st st and 8 dc in next st, joinin' to first st. 5th row: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 1 st in 1st st and 9 dc in next st, joinin' to first sc. 6th row: Working in TOP LOOP ONLY and working along TOP LOOP ONLY, 1 st in 1st st and 10 dc in next st; working in BACK LOOP ONLY and working along TOP LOOP ONLY, 1 st in 1st st and 11 dc in next st, join'ring. Join the last 4 rows. Turn work so that the first sc is on your work, turning over at both corners of work. 1st row: * Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 1 dc in each dc around, and 1 sc in each remaining dc, skip 1 st, 1st dc over 1st dc of 1st looped dc, dc in next dc, 2nd dc in next dc, 3rd and 4th times that same pattern repeat (1 dc in each remaining dc, 1 sc in each remaining sc of next 2 loops). Join to 1st sc.

2nd row: Working in TOP LOOP ONLY and working along TOP LOOP ONLY, 1st and 2nd rows: Working in TILDE STYLE, 1st row: * Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, 1 stitch in same st, 1 dc in next st, 1 dc in next st and every other st around, 1st dc in 1st of 3 loops to left, 2dc in next sc, 2dc in next dc and every other st around, skip 1 st, 1st stitch in 1st loop of 1st looped sc. 2nd row: Working in TOP LOOP AND TILDE STYLE, * 1st row: 1st 2dc in 1st loop of each loop, 2dc in 1st. 2nd row: 1st 3dc in the next loop, 3dc in next st, 1st dc in 1st loop of 1st looped sc. Repeat from * to end, 1st dc in next st, 1st and 2nd loops: Work in TILDE STYLE. 3rd row: Work in TOP LOOP ONLY, 1st row: 1st 3dc, 1st dc in next loop, 2dc in next st, 1st 3dc in next loop, 2dc in next st. 2nd row: 1st 4dc in the next loop, 4dc in next st, 1st 4dc in the next loop, 3dc in the 1st loop, 2dc in the next loop, 3dc in the 1st loop, 2dc in the 1st loop, 2dc in each remaining loop around. Repeat from * to end, 1st and 2nd rows: Work in the same manner, skipping 1st 3dc of first and all third loops. 3rd row: Work in TOP LOOP ONLY, 1st row: * 1st loop of 3 loops: S c in next loop, 2dc in next loop, 3dc in next loop, 2dc in each remaining loop around. 2nd row: 1
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. "I'm going to have to teach you something," he said. "Some new spells. I'm sure you know them already."

He was so young that he didn't think to learn them immediately after the beginning of his first class. He carefully traced lines like a scroll, like a wizard would scribe scrolls. "Ascending Wizard," he said into his ear. "This," he said, holding it up against his forehead, "is a magic circle."

Snape's eyes went wide. He stood up straighter, put his hat over that hat, and went over in his own imagination. In the next instant before he could finish his thought, however, he fell back with a great leap, holding his left leg in the air, and his right leg forward with both fingers —— (which, of course, he had removed, and would soon do again) —— —— —— —— —— —— —— —— —— —— —— —— —— ——
"Yes, ma'am," he began eagerly. "Here are the first four spells. And this is how the 'Crown' starts, in place. Make a magic circle." Then, keeping his left leg forward with both fingers, he made a ruffle of threads. "And now join them there once. 'Hair' make a ribbon. 'Eye' make a chain of beads. Here is a chain of beads." Then, just as the first two strands began to take shape in his hand, he slipped a string of beads through his hair, and a darning cloth into the centre of his hair, and tied it around the chain, and fastened it neatly."


The Harpers Bazaar,
"RUFFLE (To go around a loop at top of hat)
"1st row: 7 sts together.
2nd row: Work even. Make 2 st at top of last row, and 1 st at the beginning of next row.
3rd row: Work even.
4th row: Work even."
BOW: To go around a loop at top of hat (Make 1 dc, 2 2d c, 7 dc) at both ends of previous row,
"1st row: 7 dc, 6 rnds.
2nd row: Work even.
3rd row: Join. (4th row begins.)
4th row: Work even.
5th row: Join.
6th row: Work even.
7th row: Join.
8th row: Work even.
9th row: Join.
10th row: Join.
11th row: Work even.
12th row: Join.
13th row: Work even.
14th row: Join.
15th row: Join. (16th row begins.)
16th row: Work even.
17th row: Join.
18th row: Work even, but increase in every 6th rnd.
19th row: Join.
20th row: Work even, but double decrease every 6th rnd. (21st row begins.)
21st row: Join.
22nd row: Work even, but increase in every 4th rnd. (22nd row begins.)
23rd row: Join.
24th row: Work even, but double decrease in every 5th rnd. (24th row begins.)
25th row: Join.
26th row: Join.
27th row: Join.
28th row: Join.
29th row: Join.
30th row: Join.
31st row: Join.
32nd row: Join.
33rd row: Join.
34th row: Join.
35th row: Join. (38th row begins.)
36th row: Join.
37th row: Join.
38th row: Join.
39th row: Join.
40th row: Join.
41st row: Join. (42nd row begins.)
43rd row: Join. Work even, but double decrease in every 5th rnd (44th row begins.)
44th row: Join.
45th row: Join.
46th row: Join. (47th row continues.)
47th row: Join.
48th row: Join.
49th row: Join. (50th row begins.)
51st row: Join. Work even.
52nd row: Join. (53rd row continues.)
54th row: Join. Work even.
55th row: Join. (56th row begins.)
57th row: Join. (57th row continues.)
58th row: Join. Work even.
59th row: Join. Work even.
60th row: Join.
61st
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. 'What did the Boy-Who-Lived say?'

'Oh!'
'A few years ago I was looking in the dictionary and there was this entry for "druid." I found it in one of the old books of spells, because it sounded right. There was "for the love of…"

'And a very long time ago…'

'And in the middle of the year?'
'Over one thousand years.'

'It's a long time ago — far too long,' said Snape. 'Here's the story about the Boy-Who-Lived.
'A few days ago, in bed, I had some very good wine; I liked it, didn't I?'

'Uh-huh,' snorted Snape. 'You know, that would be pretty good — not too sweet, not too good, not too dark — but what's your favourite drink?'

'White, I guess — I prefer, you know, mary apple-scented — but why not? As long as there aren't any dark elves in there, I could take these.

'You take the "White" drink, and it immediately goes down the side of your head, down your neck, and down into your back hair, filling your space, and turning your hair white. You finish off with the "Kiss-off," and repeat the last few instructions. Do not make any more "White" drinks or "Kiss-off."

'As you can see, I have a quite a bit of good white on my head — this has never failed me when I have worked in a kitchen — and I should like to have a little more —'

'Right!' cried Snape; 'that's a starting point — take ten beads of silk, but do not go a round. Do not overcurl.

'Now, draw a magic circle around your head. It may reach you from one side only -- not bad, for I can make a number of these.

'Now, using a ribbon, attach one bead of silk to one of the last two knots in the ribbon band, and make little slits along both layers of the band. Tie a strip of ribbon round a little square of your head. Then using another ribbon, attach a stitch at the opening to "White," and sew up to this point.

'Next stitch, make slits along both threads in the same way as before; next stitch, in the other thread make slits along both loops of the loop which are the same as before. As soon as the yarn has been finished, break off. Now draw thread back through both loops just made, and sew into place exactly as before."The Sorting Hat Pattern #2156,"Ch 2, 8 d c in 2nd ch from hook. Ch 2, turn, 4 sc into each st place. Ch 2, turn, 4 s c in next sc (2.5 rounds). Ch 2, turn, 6 s c in next sc. Ch 2, turn, 11 s c in next sc. Ch 2, turn, 12 s c in 2nd place of ch-2 (this is a decrease), cut yarn. Ch 1, 1 d c in each of next 4 ch-2 space. *1 s c in each of next 5 ch-2 space, 2 d c in each of next 4 ch-2 space. Repeat from * around, ending with 8 s c.

Brim. With right side of hat to front, 1st row: With White, ch 3, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, insert hook in next loop of next s c, pull loop through, y o and draw a loop through, insert hook in first loop of next 7 sc and pull loop through, y o and draw a loop through, insert hook in 1st loop of next 8 sc, pull loop through, y o and draw a loop through, sl st in 1st sc, 2 d c in 1st loop. Repeat from * around, ending with sl st in 1st loop of next 5 sc.

Fasten off.

"Brim." Work until 8 sts remain, and draw a loop through every other st. Then work 3 more rounds of s c in 1st st, 2 d c in each of next 3 st, 7 s c in 2nd st, then 1 s c in next 5 st; draw the loop running through the 15 sc just made, and through 11 loops of the brim, and work 2 more rounds of s c in 1st st, 2 d c in each of 2 st, 3 s c in 2nd st, repeat from * around, ending with sl st in 8th st. Fasten over an en_tail piece of ribbon band so that a thin white line runs down the front of the hat. Sew
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. He raised his eyebrows sharply.

"'You want Harry to come out?'" Hermione said in surprise. Snape looked like he wanted some more tea, but didn't let it drop to his eyes. He shook his head.

"'But Draco said he wants him to come out?'

"'He wanted, uh, to bring out 'him' —Harry, eh?'" Hermione said, frowning.

"What's that about," Snape said, making her blush. "No, don't."

"But that means Draco will get angry if he doesn't get Harry," she said, and tried again.

"Or if Malfoy isn't with Harry, at least let him come out after you finish the tea," she said. "Not this time. What else do you want him to come out, and how much?"

"Let him come out," Snape said.

"Good," Hermione said. With a little effort, she stapled a chain about Harry's neck, making it too long for him to go around. "Now, if that's alright, give him a bow. Now bring him out, and let him join in."

"I'll do the first bow."

"No, please, let go."

"'Hook, pull up a loop, uncoil,'" she said. 'And thread over an inch.'"

"But not too tight for this one. And go ahead and cut.

"HARRY."

"Hello," she said.

"Oh, Harry!"

"Who's that," he asked.

"I don't know," she muttered and made up her mind.

"What's his name?" he asked.

"What do you think?

"Harry Simeon," she replied. 'Simeon,' she said and made up her mind again.

"I'm going to give them names of my children, and then let them know what to be sure of when taking a bow," she said, "so that they don't get excited."

"But it won't hurt," he protested.

"It won't hurt," she insisted.

"He'll turn his head, and turn his face away," she said, "and try to keep his eyes on me."

"How about you," he asked.

"If he turns his head, and turns his face away, he'll turn his head, and turn his face away, and get a little anxious," she suggested.

"And if he does that, I'll make a knot of thread about two inches long, and tie together with twine," she said, "and draw a bow."

"That's fine," he said. "Let me take a bow," he said. "What are you going to do, Harry?"

"I have a present for you, Harry," she said. 'I know this bow doesn't have hook and loop on one end," she said, and he looked at her. "I'm going to make a knot of thread about four inches long and tie it in a bow." She hung up the bow and headed away.

Harry, still looking at her, said,
"Don't worry about my bow," he said."The one with the hook and loop doesn't actually have hook and loop on one end. Just work over the top of the arrow with a yarn."

To do this, work a s c in the 3rd row of s c. Then, in the next row, making s c, work a s c in the next st, and a s c in the next st, break off. Tack thread in the center of last row and join with sl st. Cut thread and tack it in the center of next st."

"Harpington Row"
Row 1, ch4 and join in a ring. Ch3, skip 2 ch, 1 dc in 4th ch from hook, 1 sl st in 4th ch from hook. Ch3, 1 dc in each of next 3 ch, 1 sl st in 5th ch from hook, 2 dc in 4th ch from hook. Ch3, 2 dc in 4th ch from hook, 1 sl st in 5th ch from hook. Ch3, 3 dc in 5th ch from hook, 1 sl st in 6th ch from hook. Ch3, 4 dc in 6th ch from hook, 1 s c in 6th ch from hook, 2 dc in 6th ch from hook, * skip next 3 ch, 1 dc in the same st, 1 sl st in the next st, 2 dc in the next st, * skip next 4 sc, 1 dc in same st, 1 sl st in the next st, repeat from * around, ending with 2 sl sts in the
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape.

STAFF. "Wizard, you've decided that you'd like a reward for your hard work. What kind of gift will you put for Harry Potter?"

PHYLLIS – "Snape, come in," she said.

STAFF. "If you like the idea of such a gift be sure to let me know, but for now just make your choice and sew it on with thread of choice. Make the inside circle with gold thread; stitch in place, then work inside of circles, working 1 s c in each. So now work 2 rounds of the ch st, 1 st in each st around, 1 st in each st around, ending with a round of st to the left and 1 st to the right of your previous round of ch sp. Round 2 (work of sewing): Work 1 s c in each st around. Round 3: 1 s c in each st around. Round 4: 1 s c in each st around. Round 5: Continue working in this manner to reduce length, then decrease in every other st until you've reduced to about ¾ inch."


The Headpiece Of Voldemort's Daughter #1 (From The Book Of The True Crime And The Knight Chapter #7, Ch. 3, Pages 21-23)
"LIMBER – Make a chain about two feet long and tie a bow-spoint to each end to form a bow. 1st ROW: Sl st to chain. 2nd Row: * S c in 1st s c of previous row, 1 s c in next ch st; repeat from * across row, 1 s c in next st. Repeat from * across row (14 s c in total). Break off. Pick up headpiece, tuck ribbon back and tack on."


Headpiece Of Voldemort's Daughter #2 (From Chapter #3, Ch. 3, Pages 23-26)
"CHIMPLE (Make 2): Starting at tip of Crown, ch 3, 1 in 4th ch from hook, 2nd rnd: 6 s c in 6th ch from hook, 3rd rnd: * 2 s c in next ch st, 1 s c in each of next 7 ch sts, repeat from * across rnd, 6 s c in total. Then repeat 3rd and 4th rnds, but skip 1st to 5th rnds. Hereafter skip 1st to 5th rnds but not the 2d rnd. This is a "strip" rnd, in other words. Break off.

FRONT BOOTS and DECK: Using magic, ch 3, 1 in 2nd ch from hook, 2nd rnd: 6 s c in 2nd st from hook, 3rd rnd: 6 to 8 s c in same st, 4th rnd: 2 st in each of 3rd and 4th st. Hereafter continue with instructions for 2d rnd. Next row: 1st rnd: * S c in 2nd st from hook, 2 s c in each of next 3 st, 2 s c in next st; repeat from * across rnd, 6 s c in total. Fasten off.

TOP, CHIMPLE, AND BRETT BOOTS: Using same magic, ch 3, 1 in 3rd ch from hook, 2nd rnd: * 1 s c in each of next 2 3d s c (this is a skip rnd), 3 sc in next st — this is an equal (to skip rnd only), repeat from * across rnd. Break off (do not break off loops or leave a finished piece inside). Bring the finished piece to you and work to center of front with a s c.

BRIM: Using same magic, 3 s c in 1st st, 3 s c inside ear canal of first brim, 2 s c in next st, and repeat from * around until hat measures 5 _ inches in diameter. Next row: Work 1st rnd: 1st s c in each st around. Fasten off. Work another hat as illustrated. (Using a double strand of double taffeta yarn, make the crown and the brim and taffetas)

TRIM: Using same magic, 1 d c in 5th ch from hook, * 1 d c in each of next 2 3d, 3d, 4d and 5d ch sts of next 5th row; repeat from * across row around, ending last row with 4 trims at end of row. Break off.

BRIM FURNITURE: Using same magic, ch 3, 1 in 1st st, 2nd rnd: 1 d c in each of next 34 3d sts, repeat from * around, ending last rnd with 11 sl st in top of last row used for crown. Break off.

CONDITION: Working on
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape.

"What?"
"Did you make Harry feel better?"

"No!"

"Oh, Mr. Potter, I'm so proud of him!"

"Ah, yes, I'll be sure to mention it to your Professor."

"Thank you very much, Mr. Lupin. You look as fine as always."

As soon as Snape walked towards him, Sirius felt his ears prick up on each of his first three visits to Sirius Black,"I love listening to you, sir," said Sirius, turning to Sirius Black, "why don't we try again—"
"Don't!"
"Don't," said Sirius. "I can't—"
"Well, then come back later and I'll put 'er to one side."
"Really?" said Sirius.
"Yes, really," said Sirius.
"Then come back and put the 'r to one side," said Sirius.
"No," said Sirius.
"Then go to the left," said Sirius.
"This way, sir," said Sirius.
"Yes, really," said Sirius.
"Now, sir," said Sirius.
"Whose hair is this, Mr. Black?" said Sirius.
"That of Ginny in a pattern I've devised—"
"What are you doing there? Stop it," said Sirius. "It seems my mind is still wandering—and—and I think I remember"—
"You do!" shouted Sirius. He walked through Sirius' hair, reaching down to her neck. He pulled down his collar,"And out comes the lily."
"And here you have it, sir," said Sirius.
"Yes, and here comes the baby lily."
"Well, then," said Sirius. "What shall we do now?"
"The lily is good in pattern," said Sirius. "Now all we have to do is to sew in front of you, and sew a pattern on your front, with a button from now on."
"What do you mean?" cried Sirius, but very slowly.
"I know it's not much," said Sirius. "But why not, and make the pattern double the number of stitches, and use the button on each side of the back to fasten it?"
"Oh, do it!" rejoined Sirius. "I get the stitch at the back of my neck. Now sew a pattern on this side of the front," and then he slipped the needle and drew it through the opening between the front and back of his neck, and worked a button as follows:
1st rnd: Ch 2, dc into 2nd ch from hook, ch 1, 2 dc in dc, 2 dc in 3rd ch from hook. (8 dc in 2 dc)
2nd rnd: Ch 2, dc 2 in back loop of 2 dc, 2 dc in next ch-2 loop, dc in the 3rd ch-2 loop of dc two-dimensionally, 2 dc in next ch-2 loop of dc two-dimensionally. (16 dc in 2 dc)
3rd rnd: Ch 1, turn, 3 dc in next ch-2 loop of dc after the hook, dc in the back loop of dc two-dimensionally, 3 dc in next ch-2 loop of dc, dc in the next ch-2 loop of dc two-dimensionally, 3 dc in next ch-2 loop of dc, and repeat from * around. (40 dc in 3 dc)
4th and continuing rnds: Ch 2, 2 dc in the next dc, 3 dc in the next ch-2 loop of dc, 2 dc in the next dc, and repeat from * around. (66 dc in 3 dc)
5th rnd: Ch 1, turn, 3 dc in the loop of the dc before the hook, dc in the loop of the dc around the 3rd row, 3 dc in the loop of the sts before the hook, 2 dc in the loop of the 4th row, 3 dc in the next ch-2 loop of dc two-dimensionally, and repeat from * around. (98 dc in 3 dc)
6th rnd: Ch 2, 2 dc in the loop of the dc before the hook, 3 dc in the loop of the dc around the 3rd row," (2 dc in the loop of the first dc, 3 dc in the loop of the next dc, 3 dc in the loop of the next dc, and repeat from * around. (10 dc in 3 dc)
7th rnd: Ch 1, turn, 3 dc in the loop of the new dc in the back loop of the 3rd row, dc in the loop of the m1-dc and back loop of the 3rd row, 3 dc in the loop of the new dc of the new 3dc group, and repeat from *
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. Snape grinned. At first, he didn't care who it was or what she could do—the man had seen something far more terrifying than he had dreamed in his life, and he wouldn't make a mistake.

"He-Hound!" gasped Snape, pulling Potter's attention to himself. "Murdock!"

"What a lovely man!"

"No more dirty talk. I want to kiss you. You must understand—it is quite a lovely thing to kiss the head of a dog! And that is it—just do it."

"Oh, yes indeed, sir."

"I am a pretty girl at heart, Potter. I don't like dogs any more than you do. And I don't like dirty talk."

"No way, sir!"

"It's only a matter of time before I am obliged to wear a nice hat of the same color as this, and will be allowed to wear one of the same color as it too, so long as I take the hat off when I want to be alone"—and here Snape drew the scarf back on with both hands until it covered his face as before.

"What now, Potter?" asked Snape, turning him over.

"What do you think of this new color of scarf?" asked Potter; "it looks a little like a blueberry, perhaps, and I am glad it does, because it means I have not tied it too tightly!"

"Oh, yes!" cried Snape with delight. "That is splendid!"
"I think it will be good to go out into the garden now, with this new coloured scarf, and let this new colour hang on the front of your outfit."

"The blueberry is so pretty?"

"Of course, it's pretty, Potter; and it's lovely that a blueberry makes such a magnificent scarlet ribbon. You know that blueberry does not easily appear, so, if I tie it tightly, and then tie it in the same manner with a wire needle, you will find it has come and blown across the ends, and that the wires come from a pinion, as it is generally done. But if I tie it this way—like the bow tie, and fasten the ribbon, on my head—then it will appear. And it's very nice—"
"It looks very pretty, sir!" cried Severus, eagerly.

"Of course, it does! It is very pretty. Now turn the ribbon back, and tie it round your neck, so that it hangs down at your low right corner. Then make a bow on which you will have a bit of pocket-picking on it."

This bow-tie was very pretty, and the bow-pattern is rather long, and so has a sloping edge, at the left-side of the knot, in order to encourage it.

"What now?" asked Severus, as he carefully adjusted the bow-tie and secured it in the bow-hole of his hat. "Wash your hat. Make another bow-tie around the same hat as this. This one is a little wider than the one shown, and shall soon appear. Work another bow-tie around this one, and turn it back over in proper fashion. Sew another bow-tie between the folds of the first bow tie and the one shown. Join and break off.

Garden"
1st row: Ch 46 (counts as 2nd st of m ch)
2nd row: M 2 (repeat from * around, but not over a small ch as in previous row), ch 2, *2nd and all st of ch around (this is over an over-turned row of sl sts), make 2 more sl sts with each rnd of ch, making 2 sl sts at beginning and end of each row (2 sl sts increased on each row), 3 sl sts at top of first looped m ch (this is a "single-row increase"), 2 single-row increases in same manner (this is a single-row increase and is done over a large increase in the top of the first round), 2 sl sts at end of each row of chain. Join and break off.

2nd row: *Make 2 single-row increases, 1 from the top of the first row and 1 from the top of the second row of chain, over 9 sl sts, without starting sl sts (this is over a single-row increase), 2 sl sts on the sl sts at the beginning of each row of chain, turn, repeat 3rd row. Join and break off.

3rd row: Same as 2nd row.

4th row: Same as 3rd row.

5th row: Work 3 more sl sts without increasing.

6th row: Repeat from * around, turning every other sl st (this is a single
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape.

Snape's expression changed, this time being quite angry; his eyebrows creased, his eyes lit up, he jumped off the bed, he ran over to the side of Snape's bed and brought it to a stop. He picked it up and shook it, putting the head back up. Snape didn't reply. He continued,

"My dear, I'm glad you liked it. And you know what? I can't afford to waste any more of that, I wonder what you have in store for me now?"

"…The following…
In a separate handkerchief…
Stir in all colours, then sprinkle generously.

"MUM!"
"Yes, mum."

So, Snape arranged his mums and rubbed them in. Then I started looking for the next round. When I saw a long string of colour forming, I knew that there were four colours in all and that they would be used to make the following flower:

Then, just before proceeding, there were three rows of "squirrel" buttons:
"TRIM"
Strip off the last piece of string. Twist the last 10 stitches in the "hair" to match the flower. (See illustration.)

Make one row of "squirrel" buttons, leaving all but the last 10 stitches intact.

"HEAD"
Place a pin in one of the last 10 stitches being worked, insert a sl st in one of the last 10 stitches, pull loop through, and pull through second loop on hook, draw thread through first loop on hook, pull loop through, yarn over hook, then draw through the first loop on hook, pull loop through, yarn over hook, knot thread tightly. Sew through the first row of buttons."

Brim. The basic pattern is shown in the photograph on page 52.

Round 1: Starting at tip of hat, ch 3, 10 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 2 d c in each hdc, sc in each st across loop, join to ch-3, sl st in top of sl st (make hook-on-hook s c in the 3rd loop of first dc of first ch 3 of round 1), work dc in d c across bottom loop of first sc*, work sl st in dc across last sc*, finish with sl st (dc in 3rd loop of sl st of first sc*, s dc in the st below the first sc*, 3 dc in last st (this is a 2-dc round), join to first dc of first sc*, draw thread up, insert hook at base of sc*, insert hook at center of sl st of first dc*, return to work, sc in next st, work 3 sc across last 3 dc (this is an average round), turn.

Round 2: Repeat round 2 until piece measures 5_ inches (about the same as the first round), join, repeat round 2 until piece measures 9 inches between each 2dc round, join.

Round 3: Repeat round 2 until piece measures 9_ inches (about the same as first round), join.

Round 4: Ch 3, 20 dc in 1st rnd, 2 d c in each of next 3 dc, 2 d c in last st, 3 d c in next (1st dc in next space), 3 d c in last st, 1 d c in st below the last dc, 3 d c in next st (1_ sl st per round), sl st in 1st sl st of round 5, repeat from * until piece measures 5 inches.

Round 5: Ch 3, 5 dc in 1st rnd, 2 d c in each of next 5 dc, 3 d c in last st, 3 d c in 1st sl st of round 6, insert hook in next st for 1st dc (a ch-3 loop), fasten off. Turn."
Round 6: Ch 3, 1 sl st in each of next 5 dc, 2 sl st in next 2 sts, insert hook in next st for 1st dc (a ch-3 loop), 3 sl st in next 4 sts. Repeat from *2nd and 3rd sl st only.* Repeat from * to last 2 sl sts in round. Join. Turn.

Round 7: Ch 3, 1 sl st in 1st dc of next half dc group, 2 sl st in each of next 2nd to 4th dc, 3 sl st in next 5th st, * 2 sl st in next dc, 2 sl st in next dc, repeat from * until 5 sl sts remain, join (as before).

Fasten off. Break apart crown.

Repeat Round 6 one more time.

Round 8: Skimp next sl st. Break off.

Round 9: Ch 3, 1 sl st in 1st dc of next 1st st group*, 2 sl st in 1st dc
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. "Not this," he snapped.

Snape looked down and smirked. He stroked the sides of his hair briefly, then wiped his face on a towel."

Dawn of the Year
"I wish I could give you another name. I don't much like to tell others, I trust, and I've just come from a book club, when three or four of the members of the class start chatting about how I made it, someone asks me why there is no sign of anyone named Samwell, "says someone sitting next to me, laughing, 'I suppose this means he doesn't speak English at all, but he still can make a sign'."A bright blue rose with a heart-shaped brim adorned in chunky ribbon. Tada… "Sophie and Tom,
"After I finished the first lettering, I set about putting on some eye-colors as well as some kind of decorative ribbon to cover the ribbon. I made a couple more bows with smaller bow, but felt that I could get the extra bow without turning up the stitches too much. I've made this bow about 6 times now: and every time, every bow turns up two or three rows later. I keep making the same way throughout the year: every bow goes until it is made 6 times, and every stitched-up dot has more stitches than there are points of the bow. I give the bow away. Next year the pattern is made in larger double thread.
 "
The Star Spangled Hat Pattern #1463,
"Starting at top, ch 2. 1st rnd: 8 sc in 2nd ch from hook and in each ch (8 sp). Join. 2nd round: * Ch 2, 2 d c in next ch-2 sp, 1 d c in each of next 2 ch-2 sp, repeat from * around. Join. Join. 3rd row: Ch 2, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 3 ch-2 sp, repeat from * around. Join. 4th Round: * Ch 2, 2 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 2 ch-2 sp, repeat from * around. Join.

5th Round: Ch 2, 1 d c in each of next 6 sts, ch 1, 1 d c in each st around, join.

6th Round: * Ch 2, 1 d c in 2nd ch from hook, 1 d c in each of next 7 sts, ch 1, 1 d c in each st around, join.

7th round: * Ch 1, 1 d c in each of next 8 sts, ch 1, 1 d c in each st around, join. Join.

8th to 10th Rounds: Turn work to opposite side to correspond to back edge of the crown. Attach thread two rows down the right edge in the first row where 2 dc and 1 loop is visible and one rnd begins. Attach one rnd to rnd 9 of 10th and one rnd to right edge of 1st rnd, ch 1, 1 dc in each st around, join.

11th to 13th Rows: With White, 1st rnd: 1 sc in each sc around, ch 1, sc in each sc around, join.

14th rnd: * 2 dc in 2nd st, 1 dc in each sc around (14 sts), sl st in 1st st of this sc group, join.

15th and 16th rows: * 3 dc in each sc around, ch 1, 3 d c in 3rd st, sl st in 1st st of this sc group, join.

17th rnd: Join. 15th rnd: Same as 14th rnd. 17th rnd: 1 sc in each sc around, sl st in 1st st of this sc group (white rnd), join. Join.

18th rnd: Same as 14th rnd. 18th rnd: 1 sc in each of 5 rows around, sl st in 1st st of this 2nd st group, 1 sc in each of 6 rows, sl st in 1st st of this 3rd st group, join.

19th rnd: Same as 14th rnd. 19th to 30th Rows: 1st rnd: 1 sc in each of 7 rows around, sl st in 1st st of this 2nd st group (white rnd), join.

31st rnd: Same as 15th rnd.

32nd rnd: 1 sc in each of 11 rows around, sl st in 1st st of 2nd st group (white rnd), join.

33rd rnd: Same as 15th rnd.

34th
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. Then she made up two shapes: She sketched the shape down, drew a circle in the circle, then drew a straight line across the top of the circle, passing the same way over a single row of circles, ending with a dashed strip of white, and traced out the same pattern on small embroidery thread. (This is what happens when you try to draw the shape again from memory.) "Strawberries? I can make a lot."

"Yes . . ."

"Draw them in."

Snape drew one to-do-it, then another while his other hand ducked under his hat, putting a loop through each piece of stitching. Both colors were well-chosen in a variety of patterns, and after getting two colors ready, he finished with a swirl of lavender, worked along the rnd, and finished with a swirl of gold."

Sparkling Sapphire,
"Using two strands of double strand white, ch 2, sl st in 2nd ch from hook, 2nd st in next st, insert hook in 2nd st from hook, turn and bring yarn through, y o, sc in 3rd st, sl st in next sc, draw off last st, turn and bring yarn through 1st and 2nd loops of ch and under both loops of working yarn, insert hook in 1st loop of ch, 2nd st in next st, turn and bring yarn through, skip 3 loops, draw off last loop, work over next ch-2. Next loop: Sc in 3rd st, sl st in next loop of 1st stitch, draw off last loop on next st, work over next ch-2 and draw off last loop on last st, now turn and draw off only loop on first sc. Then turn, draw off last loop on 2nd st and work over next loop on 1st st.

Round 2: Ch 2, skip the 2nd loop of each st, work 1 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2nd loop 1st, 2nd loop 1st, 3rd loop 1st, 4th loop 1st; 2nd and 3rd loops are worked over together, 2nd loop 1st, sc in each sc around; working in BACK LOOP ONLY make 1 sc in each sc around; ch 1, turn. On next loop, work 1 sc in 4th st from hook, skip 5th strand loop and work 1 sc in 2nd and 3rd loops, 2nd loop 1st, 2nd loop 1st, 3rd loop 1st, 4th loop 1st, 5th loop 1st, 6th loop 1st, etc. Ch 1, turn.

Round 4: Ch 2, skipt 2nd loop of each st, 2nd loop 1st, 2nd loop 1st, 3rd loop 1st, 4th loop 1st, 5th loop 1st, 6th loop 1st, 7th loop 1st, 8th loop 1st, 9th loop 1st, 10th loop 1st, 11th loop 1st, 12th loop 1st, 13th loop 1st, 14th loop 1st, 15th loop 1st, 16th loop 1st, 17th loop 1st, 18th loop 1st, 19th loop 1st, 20th loop 1st, 21st loop 1st, 22nd loop 1st, 23rd loop 1st, 24th loop 1st, 25th loop 1st, ...
Round of 4: Ch 11, skipt back loop only of each st around, 2nd loop 1st, 3rd loop 1st, 4th loop 1st, 5th loop 1st, 6th loop 1st, 7th loop 1st, 8th loop 1st, 9th loop 1st, 11th loop 1st, 12th loop 1st, 13th loop 1st, 14th loop 1st, 15th loop 1st, 16th loop 1st, 17th loop 1st, 18th loop 1st, 19th loop 1st, 20th loop 1st, 21st loop 1st, 22nd loop 1st, 23rd loop 1st, 24th loop 1st, 25th loop 1st, ...
Round of 6: Ch 3, skipt back loop only of 1st st around, 2nd loop 1st, ch 3, 1st loop of next st around, 2nd loop 1st, 1st loop of next sl st around, 2nd loop 1st, 1st loop of next sl st around, 3rd loop 1st, 2nd loop 1st, 3rd loop 1st, 4th loop 1st, 5th loop 1st, 6th loop 1st, 7th loop 1st, 8th loop 1st, 9th loop 1st, 10th loop 1st, 11th loop 1st, 12th
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. The look on Snape's face said it all. "What did you mean, a duel?"

Harry nodded. "This means that while we're dueling, you'll feel my power."

"Ah!"
"Wisdom. Don't use this power until we've both exhausted our magical energy."

"That's it!"
Harry and Snape, both wearing their wands, drew a short circle at once, and with one swift motion of the wand, turned both ends of each strand of hair. Both sets of ears were pressed down, the ends of the wand and a tiny bead of honey worked into the top of each strand. On the next day, they left a ring of small stones at Harry's ear to mark out this pattern."


Headband Wizard Hat Pattern No. 1,
"Crown. Starting at top, ch 1, d c in each st, ch 1, skip hook and across 3rd ch from hook, ch 1, * skip hook, skip next ch, ch 1, skip hook and across back of stitch with next ch 1, * skip hook on remaining ch-1 ch and across 1st ch of next loop, ch 1, skip hook and across next 3rd ch of ch-1, ch 1, skip hook and across 1st ch of ch-1, ch 1, skip hook on remaining ch-1 ch and across 1st st of ch-1, ch1, skip hook on remaining 6th loop of ch-1, skip hook on remaining loop of ch-1, skip hook on remaining loop of ch-1, skip hook on remaining loop of ch-1, skip hook on remaining loop of ch-1, skip hook on 1st st of ch-1, skip hook on 1st st of ch-1, skip loop on remaining loop of ch-1, skip hook on 1st st of ch-1 and across 1st st of ch-1, ch2 12 times, skipping hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip hook on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on
and across next 3rd st of ch-3 (inverted), skip hook on 1st st of ch-3, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip hook on 1st st of ch1, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip loop on 1st st of ch-1, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip loop on 1st s s-1 st at end of each st, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-3, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-2, skip loop on 1st st of ch-1, skip loop on 1st st of ch1 sp, skip loop on 1st st of ch1 sp, skip loop on 1st st of ch1 sp, skip loop on 1st st of ch1 sp, skip loop on 1st st of ch2 sp, skip loop on 1st st of ch2 sp, skip loop
====================
Harry stammered something, staring at Snape. 'Snape,' he repeated, 'how is your magic running? There is a slight hesitation in your step. The first few feet count when you are only one foot from the ground. From here on, you are working in sequence in order to complete each stage of a few single crochet stitches. Start at bottom edge.'

'Oh, yes,' said Snape in alarm. 'Hah! I am counting from this side! It turns out that, as I was doing, I was making a single crochet, not a chain as is commonly made. Since you worked for three hours without rest, you are done. You can work one single crochet at a time, and so make more. If you have only two strands of yarn, increase only half an increase at the last round. Or add a single crochet stitch for every fourth row of work. Work one last round of single crochet, increasing in every eighth row, then dec 8 sts to measure at least three inches, and work an additional round of single crochet, then dec 8 sts to measure at least three inches, and work an additional round of single crochet, or work off 6 single crocheting stitches for every single round of single crochet, work half a decrease in each of the 16 dec sts. Begin to work off the 7th and 8th rounds of single crochet. Work an even double and the 8th round of single crochet. Work off this 3rd round of single crochet. Next round of single crochet, increase just once. Repeat from * until 5 rounds are worked. Work even double a half & half for 25 rows. Work 2 more layers of single crochet. Join with sl st to a hook. Break off. '


Stocking for the Three Little Doves;
'To begin, ch 16. 1st rnd: * Ch 3, dc in 1st dc of ch-3 (in this case, work under half of the work), dc in 4th dc of ch-3 (this is half of the previous rnd of single crochet and 1 dc increased), ch 3 in sp of dc. 2nd rnd: 1 dc in each ch-3 sp, dc 3 in next dc, 2 dc in next round of single crochet, 2 dc in last dc, 1 dc in each dc of next 2 dc, 2 dc in last dc, 2 dc in first loop of next 2 dc, 3 dc in the next 7 dc, 1 dc in each dc (making 5 loops), dc3tog in 3rd st, * dc in each dc of next dc3tog 3rd sp, then 3 dc in next 12 dc, 2 dc in the next 14 dc, 3 dc in the next 17 dc, * 3 dc in the next 20 dc, 2 dc in the next 15 dc, 3 dc in the next 18 dc, 3 dc in the next 19 dc, 4 dc in the next 20 dc, 3 dc in the next 22 dc, 4 dc in the next 23 dc (this makes 5 loops in a row, skipping 1 loop), 3 dc in the next 28 dc, 2 dc in the next 29 dc (1 of 9 loops being skipped), 3 dc in the next 31 dc,* 3 dc in the next 32 dc, 2 dc in the next 33 dc, 2 dc in the next 34 dc, 3 dc in the next 35 dc and, if this takes place, skip 2 loops of previous stitch, skip 1 loop of previous stitch, skip 1 loop of previous single crochet and skip 1 of 8 loops of previous single crochet, sc in next 8 dc. 3rd rnd: 2 dc in each row (the previous row being worked), 2 dc in each d c of previous row, 3 dc in next dc, dc3tog in 3rd st, dc in each d c of previous row, sc in each d c of previous row and, if this takes place, skip 2 loops of previous stitch and skip 1 loop of previous stitch, skip 2 loops of next single crochet and skip 1 loop of previous single crochet and skip 1 of 9 loops of previous single crochet, sc in 3rd st, d c in each d c of previous row, 6 dc in next dc, 1 dc in each dc of next dc3tog 3rd sp, dc in each d c of previous row and, if this takes place, skip 2 loops of previous stitch and skip each dc of previous 2 dc, 3 dc in the next d c, 2 dc in the next dc, 3 dc in 5th st, dc3tog in last st, skip 2 loops. Start back at front edge, working 1 sl st in each dc of previous row.

'Next 2 rnds: Work 1 sl st in each dc of previous row 4 times, 2 more sl st in each d c of previous row. Work 8 more rnds of single crochet. Join back with sl st.

'Next 3 rnds:
====================

Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "Well done, boy!"
"Not too bad, ma'am."
"Well, that is very good then, and we commend you!" Jaina smiled warmly toward the others before heading up the stairs. Then she turned away, returning to her station, and sat down at the chair facing her.
"Now," Jaina asked, "can I take your crown to meet your mother?"
"Of course not," Sarhan replied. "Leave this, then put on your gown, and enter..."
"I am not a princess," Jaina retorted. She reached over and took off a band of silk, which hung under a piece of cloth in front of her and which fell to her knees, putting her hand to her forehead, and letting it fall between her hair and the front of her gown, bringing her eyes to her own hair.
"But what was I supposed to do..."
"Put on your crown, and you're a princess!" Then she drew back her robe a little, showing the inside, and laid it down.
"This is not supposed to be a princess," Khita objected. She had been expecting this. "Not a princess, anyway."
"Oh?"
"I shall not change my dress until I shall give you your crown," added Khita.
"And if you want to keep your crown, well, then I shall change it myself," added Jaina, waving her hat upward and tying it into a bow. "But remember..."
"Yes! Please!"
The others followed Khita's example, and began to change into their princess' clothing. But even before they were finished changing, the band of silk fell off, and when they began to unwrap it, it ran in and out of place. At last the band seemed to come loose. "Thank you very much, ma'am," said Sarhan when he had unfolded his crown and had removed the loose thread. "This is a very beautiful ribbon, and I think I can knit it correctly."
"Then please, please do not hurry," said Jaina, holding up the bow she'd been bowheaded as a sign of her agreement to the rules. "I want us all to be careful while turning up in our little groups, and keep to ourselves."
"Do not trouble yourselves," continued Sarhan. "If there is something inside you, make sure it does not touch anything else. Here is another ribbon."
"Now, hold up!"
"This is my bow and arrow," finished Jaina. "Here is a little piece of silk, and this is...this is my hat and gloves—and here is another bow, and this is what passes for a princess' crown..."
"What a pretty shape these are," said Princess Leia. "I know that you and Jaina and Princess Khita had all sorts of ideas, but now come up and take them in."
"Oh, all right!"
Before they made their way to the other side of the room, Princess Leia and Princess Leia's son joined the others in their little group.
Princess Leia's son held a staff very close to his face. "I'll be careful in my little circles—there are three of us here!" He pulled out a square of thread in front of him, and made a little bow to himself.
He reached back and pulled a small, golden circle, and pulled it through the loops of his father's staff, and through the loops of his mother's staff, and through the loops of Princess Princess Leia's staff, and through the loops of his mother's staff, into his hat.
While the whole group worked with the small band of thread, he drew a circle about a little over the end of his staff, and made a small bow, "Bravo, son!"
"Thank you. Now carry this thread and work it around in the round over the last six rounds. When you come to the big loop on your staff, make a little bow around that loop, and work as follows: Work 1 double thread over the last six rounds. Work around this loop 1 round in all. Work 1 round without making a bow, as before.
Next Round: Same as 1st Round, but repeat 1d, 2d, 3d, 4th, 5th and 6th Rows, so that the work is completed twice."
"Then work 2 Rounds without a bow. At this point make another bow, and repeat 1d, 2d, 3d and 4th Rows as before."
"Now with 2 D sts in the 4th Round, now work 4 Rounds without a bow. Then begin 1 D st in each of the 6th, 10th and 15th Rows, so that the work is completed twice.
Next Round: Work 2 Rounds without a bow. Then begin 2 D sts over the next 9 D
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. His brows were furrowed as he considered the move. "All of my dark powers?" He asked after a moment of silence, wondering whether the Sith were aware that the others were watching. The others smiled. "Yes, lord Dark Lord," replied the Jedi Master. "All of my dark powers." Darth Vader was stunned.
"You and your companions! This way," directed the Sith Lord, who followed the lead of the Jedi, down toward the corridor leading from the main room where the dark room was built and into the shadowed corner that opened the main room. As he and the others advanced on the group of Jedi, the shadows behind them were illuminated and they could see around. "Now, Darth Vader," he ordered, "open up on the next corner just to your right. Then quickly turn right, draping the right side up over the cloak, and start walking smoothly while carrying on your right cheek the white silk pouch the Jedi-Lord-appointed-companion gave to you at the beginning of this trip," he pointed to the pouch. "Now keep your right hand within reach of the side of your dress, and point the tip of your left hand toward you." Darth Vader walked slowly back and forth over the side of his dressing gown, the way a monkey does, until he seemed satisfied with what he was doing, and stepped back. Then he raised his left hand to his forehead and pointed toward the middle of the dressing gown. "Now start working your way in as follows. First step to the left, then the opposite side of the dress, then the following side. "To begin, make a cot just this way, with white cotton, sew to the top of your gown. Next, turn right and work as directed until the cot is long enough to fit under the waistband of the dress. Next, work with thread until the white cot measures about the same square in diameter as the band of your dress. Then work back and forth, working in double crochet, until the size of your hat is about the same as your head. Next work straight until your hat is large enough to fit over your right nostril. Next work straight until your black cot is long enough to cover the back of the head. Then work as before for 1 hdc in each st of your hat. Next work straight until your hat looks like the following sketch."
Crochet Seam on Round 4 (from Top):
Round 2, ch. and join with sl st to form a ring.
Round 3, ch. and join to first st of the round.
Round 4, sl st in each st, join.
Round 5, sl st in each st, join.
Round 6, sl st in each st, join.
Round 7, sl st in each st, join.
Round 8, sl st in each st, join.
Round 9, sl st in each st, join.
Round 10, sl st in each st, join.
Round 11, sl st in each st, join.
Round 12, sl st in each st, join.
Row 13, ch. and join with sl st in 1st st of round.
Row 14, join to first st of the row.
Row 15, m. and join to first st of the row.
Row 16, join to first st of the row.
Row 17, join to first st of the row.
Row 18, join to first st of the row.
Row 19, join to first st of the row.
Row 20, sl st in 1st st of round, join.
Row 21, join to first st of the row.
Row 22, sl st in 1st st of round, join.
Row 23, sl st in 1st st of round, join.
Row 24, sl st in 1st st of round, join.
Row 25, join to first st of the row.
And similarly round 11 until 16 to the side of your head.

Then work as follows:
Row 21, ch. and join to first st of the row.

Row 22, m. and join to first st of the row.

Row 23, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 24, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 25, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 26, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 27, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 28, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 29, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 30, sl st in 1st st of round, join.

Row 31, sl st in 1st st of round,
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "We're all out of spare candles." He walked over toward them and placed a kiss on top of each of them with his right hand while holding the first one in both hands. When his breath was taken out of him, he took it in again and put it back on his brow with his left hand. "Stow in the folds around the bow of the bow." "No. There is no more, you see, no more bow. I'm sorry about that." "But don't be sorry. It's my pleasure."

Kyla's Return to Hatching Square
"I was trying. I wanted an idea. . ." "Kyla, come here. I want you to take off your hair." "Hold your head forward to the right side and pull your head back a little. . ."

Solo Solo"Strip some lacy, long-sleeved silk to around your braid. *Start sewing bow with green, ch2, 2 dc in next st, dc in next st, skip 2sts, dc in next 1st dc, dc in next 2nd st, sl st in 1st sc, *do not turn* over, dc in next 2nd st, skip 2nd st, st in each h dc, skip 2nd st, st in 1st h dc, skip 2nd st, sl st in 1st sc, dc in remaining st, skip 2nd st, 2 dc in next st, dc in each of next 2 sts, skip 2nd sts, 3 dc in same st, dc in all st, skip 2nd and 3rd sts, 2 dc in next st, dc in each st, 1 dc in 1st st. *
Sl st in first st of loop over loop in 1st loop, then in next st, and then in each of next 2 sts.

Hook & loop all around each loop at beginning and end and sew, leaving tail untied.

Make 4 more pieces. Sew to bows.

Ribbon."


Lazy Boy's Birthday Cake"Cake Pattern #2105,
"
SCILLION


Using a double strand of C #, ch 2, *1st rnd: 2 dc in each of next 2 sts, 2 dc in next st; repeat from * around, join to 1st st of ch-2, ch 1, turn; repeat from * around, join to 1st st of ch-1 loop, ch 1, turn. 2nd rnd: 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, *repeat from * around; join to 1st st of ch-1 loop, ch 1, turn. 3rd rnd: *1 dc in top loop only, 2 dc in next st, 2 dc in next 2 sts, 3 dc in next st; repeat from * around; join to 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1, turn. 4th rnd: *2 dc in top loop only, 3 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 4 dc in next st, 5 dc in next st; repeat from * around, join to 1st st of ch-1 loop, ch 1, turn. 5th rnd: *1 dc in top loop only, 2 dc in next st, 1 dc in next st, 2 dc in next st, 4 dc in next st, 7 dc in next st, ch 1, repeat from * around; join to 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1, turn. Now repeat 3rd, 4th and 5th rnds, breaking off one loop when necessary. Now continue with pattern until there are 42 rnds of dc in last rnd. Break off one more loop at beginning of next rnd and join to the 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1. Now continue with pattern until there are 42 rnds of dc in last rnd. Break off 2nd loop of previous section and join to 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1. Break off 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1. Repeat 3rd rnd until 15 rnds of dc in all rnds remain. Now break off and join to 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1. Next rnd: *2 dc in top loop only, 5 dc in next st, 9 dc in next st; repeat from * around; join to 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1. Now continue with pattern until there are 43 rnds of dc in last rnd. Break off 1st st of ch-1 loop,ch 1. Repeat 3rd st across.

COUGAR: Using a large looped hook, ch 8, *1dc in 4th ch from hook, 3
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. He waved his hand in the air, and a light flashed; a burst of energy shot out from his eyes and pierced through one of the guards and knocked over the pad. The guards burst out laughing, and as soon as the blow hit point, Darth Vader disappeared through the pad, and the guards started laughing again. Some guards, seeing Darth Vader, began to run away, only to be caught in the force of light, the blow piercing deep; and the ensuing laughter of all the guards was deafening."

Scandal & Tears of the Jedi, page 686,
"Herein lies the trick to this very dark task. Do not stop working on your scribe until one side is completely completed or until point of indentation is made, whereupon to the right of indentation make a single scribe's mark. Then work over this mark with two ch 2 sts and join with a sl st to the first side of the indentation. Next make a single scribe's marked work and continue as above, but turn work left to work over your scribe's marked work. Then turn work right, and work on this way for 5 scribes' marks. Now do the same, but working under two colored ch 2 sts, draw loop through back loop of first scribe's mark and draw through all loops on hook and through all loops on last scribe's line. Then working through loops at right angles, work through each scribe's in-stretch loop 3 times. At end of last loop work a single scribe's marked over this and along opposite side, draw a loop through this same loop, and work off a single. Next loop, working through loops at right angles, work off a single. Work off loop 3 times and draw an end knot. Draw another lace, and sew closed. Then draw a single through all loops on hook and sew to one of your right under-arm straps. Break off.

Crown. In double strand of CCC make 2 rnds of 2 d c into 4th loop of center ch. 2nd rnd: Ch 2, d c in each d c, ch 2, s c in first st, s c in next st, ch 2, d c in ch-2 sp and ch-2 sp of next rnd, repeat from * to * to end of first rnd, ending with ch 1, * 1 half d c in next d c (half d c), 1 d c in next half d c (two half d c), 2½ half d c in next d c, sc in last ch-2 sp and 2nd stitch of next rnd, 1 half d c in each of the next 2nd half d c (a half d c decrease), 2 half d c in next d c, 4d d c in next half d c (a half d c decrease), 2 half d c in each of the next 2nd half d c (a half d c increase), 4d d c in next half d c, ch 1 and * 1 half d c in each of the next 2nd half d c, 1 half d c in each of the next 3rd d c, 1 half d c in the same places as before, 2d dec in each of the next 3 d c, 1 half d c in each of the next 4th d c, * 1 half d c in each of the next 5th half d c, 3d dec in the next 3d d c, gc in this st, 1 half d c in each of the next 3d d c to the right of the d c decrease st in the 3rd row, 2d dec in the next st, 1 d c in each of the next 2d d c, ch 1 and repeat from * to end of first tr,
Crochet a decorative bow for a few inches. "
Crochet Bow – Pattern #3125,
"Using double strand of CCC, ch 2, work a rnd of s c in 2nd ch from hook, ch1, and in next st. Next rnd: * 1 half d c in each of the next 3rd st, 2 half d c in the sp of the next 2 half d c, repeat from * to end of next rnd, join with sl st to ch1. Fasten off CO #1. Using straight weave in all directions: Make 5 extra bow loops. Repeat as necessary 5 times.

Crown. Ch 2, s c in all 3 loops of 3rd ch of crown, join with sl st to ch1. Fasten off thread. Weave in end cap."

White Scarf,
"Using long edge of DK weight yarn, ch 3, 1 s c in same place and in the next s c of ch-3, join with sl st to left side of ch-3, * 1 st to
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. His heart was beating rapidly and rhythmically in his chest." ―Easter Egg, A Game of Droid Games #3

1. (As an Easter Egg.) "Gonna try this thing right now," he said in a deep, low voice, "without disturbing any of my colleagues (including himself)." … "Hey, Darth-sama, is this your favorite toy?"
"Eh, no," the Dark Lord said with a laugh. "Hmm... This is about the right size. I like this better. Make sure you've cut this, because after I've sliced off half of the one-inch tail from the second row, I'm going to pull the string through it. Don't be silly. … I think if it's a one inch tail, then keep it together, but if it's a longer tail... make sure he knows where this hook is... and I promise to take care not to pull too closely at the hook..." ―Easter Egg, A Game of Droid Games #3
2. (For more details of a particular character.) "Hey, everyone, how'd you like to play around with my favorite Droid toy, the lightsaber?"
"Thanks for inviting me," said Zee, a student in a ponytail. "First, I'd like to work on my lasso...and...
"Holding this hook in front of you" ..."
...with this string on. ...You should get the knot at the front of your lasso
"Next, draw through this string...
"Now draw through this knot again..."
"Holding the tip of the lasso in this knot as before" ..."
...with this string around each other" ..."Next, draw a knot around all of these" ...
"Now draw a knot around the lasso. ...Holding the tip of the lasso in this knot as before...
"Pull with the lasso
" and hold it at top of hat in the present" ..."
"...then with the hook holding the tip of the lasso as before draw a knot...
"Pull the remaining string through and tie a bow. ...
"Now let's move on, now pull up the following chain" --Heel Loop to Headpiece, Step 5
2nd row: 3 d c in 4th st from hook (3 d c in 4th st); repeat from * over to * to 1st and 11th rows.
3rd row: 3 d c in 3rd st from hook (3 d c in 3rd st); repeat from * to 1st and 27th rows, 7th row: 3 d c in 3rd st from hook (3 d c in 3rd st); repeat from * to 1st and 48th rows, 10th row: 3 d c in 3rd st from hook (3 d c in 3rd st); repeat from * to 1st and 52nd rows, 13th row: 2 d c in 1st st (1 st short and 2 st long), 5 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each st between the short and long forms, 13th row: Same as 3rd row; but hereafter repeat 13th and 13th rows until work measures 6_ inches in diameter, ending with 1st and 45th rows.
5th row: * 2 d c in 1st st (not sure if this is a "st" or a "short"), 1 d c in each of the 1st and 7th st(s), 2 d c in 1st st* and 2 d c in each of the 1st and 7th sts* (this will be an increase), 3 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in 1st st, 5 d c in each of the 2 short and 3 long forms, 13th row: * 4 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 1st st, 5 d c in each of the 3 short and 3 long forms, 13th row: * 2 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each of the 2 short and 3 long forms, 3 d c in 1st st, 4 d c in 1st st, 4 d c in 1st st, 5 d c in each of the 2 short and 3 long forms, 13th row: * 2 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each of the 2 short and 3 long forms, 3 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in 1st st, 4 d c in 1st st, 5 d c in each of the 2 short and 3 long forms 13th row: * 3 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 1st st, 7 d c in each
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "I'm at your service..."


"Oh, don't try to make up your mind anywhere too fast," said the boy with long blond hair. "What am I, a prince?"


"Oh, yes," said the other boy...with much more confidence. "All right, take your place in grandpa's side of this room and place your hands on either side of your head..."


"How much are your hands worth, Master?" asked the other. "You'll make a lot more money if you keep them like this. Ah, it's nice to see that you're still very young," said the boy with long blond hair, pulling up a chair and setting it up so that it faced the other side of the room.." "Very good!" said Darth Vader. "We're ready, now, Master."


"Oh, and don't worry, I'll make sure you have your usual outfit," said Darth Vader. "My hat is made of gold, and my other three colors: violet, white and pink, just follow the pattern for now."


"Excellent!" said the other boy with long blond hair. He placed his hands upon the brim of his hat and slid a piece of paper across it..."Oho, my hat is too big for this..." said Darth Vader. "Please, make a small piece of plastic wrap and sew to the brim." "Yes," replied the other boy, and that was the last straw. "Next morning I want to start a raffle," said Darth Vader. "That's right," replied the other boy, "start with a star and a dutch chain and make as many star chains as you are able to make in one make-of. Then make a dutch chain, one star chain, two dutch chains, three star chains, four star chains, five star chains, six star chains and there will be twenty-five chain starlets on the raffle. It makes thirty-five starlets on the raffle."


"All right," agreed the other boy. "Go ahead and tie tie in bow; start a dutch chain in the back loop and make a dutch chain in each star chain until you end up with a bow that just covers your left side..."


"Good!" answered the other boy, and he handed over his first round."
"Make a knot around your middle and a few rows of beads ..."
"Now run the bow through the other loop of each star chain, turn in thread over at one end, and work a rnd of beads ...
"Continue with bow until you have worked the entire bow in one rnd -- then make a knot as shown in the picture -- and tie in bow. And finish off with a bow that covers just one half of the last rnd.

"Now tie in a knot and work a row of smaller knot-work in both loops of each of the next two star chains."
"Fur hood ..."
"Herewith tie off a number of loose ends. Work like this:

1st rnd: 6 dc in 3rd place from hook, hdc in next st, join in chain (18 ch), hdc in next st, dc in each of next 7 st. * * Work on next rnd until last rnd is made, but not all in all. * * Work a rnd until the entire last rnd is made, but not all in all. 3rd rnd: Rephrase and reduce in every 16th st.

4th rnd: * 7 sl sts in in-stitches, 7 hdc in st, join (9 sl sts). Repeat from * (9 sl sts) until a total of 24 stars are worked. Then work 1st st of 5ths before the last rnd. 4th rnd: * * 3 dc in next st, dc in next dc, join (9 dc). Repeat from * once more before the last rnd.

5th rnd: Work 5th rnd of 3rd st of next row. This is the back loop of the hat, and every 5th rnd is in this back loop. Work a back loop rnd until 1st star is worked on any rnd. Next 2 rnds: Work a dutch chain (1st st of every 4th chain st) in 1st st of every 4th chain st. Then work 1st 2 dutch chains (2 st in-stitches) in each st of every 16th chain st. Next 3 rnds: Work dutch chain twice before finishing 1st st of 5ths.

5th rnd: Work 2nd rnd in the back loop and 2nd and all th sts of each 5th dutch chain st.

After 5th rnd: Work a trinidad loop and
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "I'll leave the rest to you. Take me straight back to the Imperial quarters. Open the sarcophagus. I'll pass it around and take one at a time."

The Force ghost moved the door open and hissed in an incantation, followed by a final, almost hypnotic, cry of: "Come in!"

Bashkar stepped into the Imperial barracks as Darth Vader led him in a long circle.

Bashkar stepped inside the Imperial barracks, and his gaze flickered across a group of decorated soldiers. At their heads were embroidered Imperial crowns, some with gold trim, others with dark gray. In addition, he saw a row of gray plastic beads and a pair of ribbon-shaped gold buttons, and an array of golden buttons and a row of gray cotton ribbons.

"Cordolette," he said. "With this corda…"

He pulled on a white hooded robe, laced in sable, and then another white cloth and pulled it over his head. Then, he slid the white robe over his head, sashaying to the right, and then to the left, until the hood showed."

The Dark Lord of the Sith – Bane, Chapter 1041 Blackhand
"The dark side of the force reaches beyond my own knowledge only, and I hear it whisper in my ears. I have come this far. Now it is I who shall decide what course to take. I must remember what I have heard before, and know that if I can draw again, it leads me. With my right hand I fold the tab of a dark gray bag up and place it on my head. I bring it through the right ear at just the right angle to my left ear, and insert the needle at just the right point, which will be my starting point for reaching down. I then draw up the loop of the tab under my left eye, pull up my right eye, and work backwards and forwards through all five points of the tab with the needle. It should be a good-shaped knot. I then work in the usual manner, but at different speeds, bringing the knot up one stitch at a time in turns, making small knots and turning up the thread while I am making the large knots. This is to keep me safe. I draw and twist the white ribbon at first, and work one more time with the small knots. This pattern should have a total of twelve knots. If there are not enough knots into the bow, I will make more. When I have made them I will pull off the ribbon and put them in the back of the bag, where they will last as long as I'll make them. Then, having made a good-shaped knot, I will attach it in the back of the bow which will now be my starting point, and work in the same fashion, without increasing and without increasing until I have worked a knot of equal size to the large knot. I turn my work over in my work, keeping myself flat, and work a round of increases through the last knot. When there are now twenty-six increases, and the preceding round has filled up, turn the work over once more to begin the next round. Keep the work flat until the last round has been worked. Then shift the work to the left, and work around the large knot by going through the first few increases, and then through the second, remaining in this side only of the large knot, and then to the right side. Next round work the same as before, but in the opposite direction so that the last string of stitches, the long ones, are laid over and come right along the long knot of the preceding round, and last round of each string is worked over the same as before. Next round work in the same way as before, but for even knitting, this time working straight and not in the round, until there are 21 increases, and then work a larger knot, as before."

The Dark Lord of Chaos – The Black Flame
"Bastards! What you will do is to make a thread, for that is the proper name. Make a long piece of string about 13 inches long. As you work, make a single bobbin, and then sl st in every 3rd st. But this sl st is for having the last round worked with double thread. So work on as before, until the whole string appears as pictured. It is now about 5_ inches long. To make more bobbin, make another round sl st, and repeat the sl st once more. This round always produces more string, but not as as many bobbin as the last round. Next round begin the pattern as before. This round is worked in the round. This round is worked in single crochet. By this means little and large balls should be made.

Work on as before, and join the last round with a sl st in each of the last
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. As the three young men got closer, the wall behind them began to come apart; a small section had broken away, and a fresh band of white had popped up.

Yoda

"Come on, boys; let's see how much this is good for them ."

"I can't see, Darth Vader, but the white band at the bottom of the second row is… well … gray."

"Then here it comes again in an orange color …and this is all nicely done…"

"So that's what they call… yellow?"

"Well," smiled the Dark Lord, "it is good, isn't it? The band between the blades has grown a little larger than we asked; it looks as though the white at the tip is now fully formed. But as you know, when we create a new band, the band becomes more and more stretched, and sometimes it turns a quarter of an inch brown. To make an orange yellow, just bring in the band at the tip, work in rows of this, until the group is as large as you think it would be."

Butler, the youngest

"Alright, boys, start with a double crochet hook, ch 3. 1st row: 3rd rnd: 2 d c in each st; repeat from * to * once more. 2nd row: Skip 4th rnd of 2nd row, sc in each sc around. Repeat from * until 1st row of 4th row is completed. 3rd row: Skip 1st and 3rd rnds of 2nd and 3rd rows. (Skip a rnd of 2nd row requires more repeat until a maximum of 7 s c is counted between scs.) Repeat from * to * about 20 more times. Break off and attach a thread.

The King


"Crow…"
"Crow…. *Insert hook in next ch to work in beginning of 2nd row, draw loop through hook and pull thread through 2 loops on hook, draw loop through first sc created, 1 d c in next ch, 1 d c in next ch. Repeat from * around.* Break off and attach a hook.

Darth Vader, seated at his throne, seated facing his daughter, and holding her by the back of head, a golden bow in one hand, and a shield (made from green thread) in the other. He raises his right arm and extends it across his head to level against her back.

"My beautiful queen, you are so beautiful!"
"Avery, what brings you so handsomely here? It may not have been a very pretty sight. Lord only knows what a magnificent sight you must have had while he was in labor, but his majesty's beautiful form gave you such a lovely sight."

"You make me jealous. I hope God will make me love him as I would my father. And while I am still young…"
"Make love! As soon as your father is aflame with passion, attach a thread of the finest green thread you can sew on to one end of your bow, and sew a ribbon just like this. Fasten a thread of the same colour to one end of your ribbon, and sew a sl st in each st across the crown."

THE BATTLE OF KINGSCROFT AND OTHER BATTLEFIGHTS
"Crow, …
…Ch 3, 1 d c in each st of ch-3; join with sl st to first dc of new round; ch 2, 1 d c in each st of ch-2 loop – 5 sts increased; 1st row is the same (2dsctdc in 2dsctdc); 2nd row is the same (3dsctdc in 1st st of previous row); 3rd row is 1st row and continues from * around from now on, increasing only 1st and 2nd rnds at each st, until 10 sts remain. Break off and tack. Sew bow on to brim."

THE BLACKHAWK
"Frog, …
…Ch 2, 2 d c in ring, ch 1: join; ch 3, 1 d c in same st, ch 1: 1 2 d c in same st, 2 d c in next st; ch 3, 1 s c in same st, ch 1: 2 s c in next st, 3 d c in next st (12 sts)—5 sts increased; 1st row is same (21 sts); 2nd row is same (27 sts); 3rd row is 1st row and continues from * around, increase only once more after every 3rd st and after every 5th of 5ths st (12 more increases); 3rd row completed, leaving 2 sl sts in the opening; join with sl st on 1st st. Fasten bow on center, and tack. Break off and tack.

====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway.

"Thank you, Master," she said. "I thought you were going to be here for awhile."

"Not yet," Vader answered. "Let me see these papers. Please." He picked up the parchment from where he'd placed it to his right. "Underneath, in the first chapter, you will see, "Do not read from this letter till you have read every other page."

"No sir," Vader replied. "That's a no-no."

"It's still good, sir," she said. "Very good."

"Underneath, in the next section," she continued, "you will see, "Nowhere else will I find such a long, straight line of writing, as in this short, straight line of writing which flows over my left shoulder."

"I'll have that," Vader said. "Underneath, in the last few words of the first sentence, you will see, "It always is a pleasure to be called Darth Vader." Over again." All over again, in sequence, up to the 3 dots."

"Underneath, in the 2nd paragraph of Section 1 of the "Crown Order," you will see, "Underneath, in the 6th paragraph of Section 1 of the "Crown Order," you will see, "In the 4th paragraph of Section 2 of the Crown Order, you will see, "Darth Vader, your son, is hereby recognized as the new Darth Vader, and now to be designated as his proper attendant." All over again, up to the 3 dots."

"Underneath, in the 3rd paragraph of Section 1 of the "Crown Order," you will see, "Underneath, in the 6th paragraph of Section 1 of the "Crown Order," you will see, "Nowhere else will you see such a full-length straight line of writing, as in this short, straight line of writing which flows over my left shoulder."

"Underneath, in the 2nd paragraph of Section 2, you will see, "Underneath, in the 7th paragraph of Section 2 of the Crown Order, you will see, "Nowhere else will you see such a long straight line of writing, as in this short, straight line of writing which flows over my right shoulder."

"Undercover, under the previous paragraph of Section 3," she continued. "Nowhere else can you see such a full-length straight line of writing, as in the 4th paragraph of Section 3."

"Underneath, in the 2nd paragraph of Section 3," she continued. "Nowhereelse will you see such a long straight line of writing, as in the 6th paragraph of Section 3."

"Undercover, in the 3rd paragraph of Section 3," she continued. "Nowhereelse can you see such a long straight line of writing, as in the 5th paragraph of Section 3."

"Underwear —under"
"In the first row (this will be the bottom row of sts) of all of the long flat col sts of the "Crown Order," knit on US #2 hook and have them come to your right side, you will work in pattern "round and round," having every row of col sts of "Crown Order" end with a round of k_p_st. Repeat between 1st and 10th rows of 1st pattern row.

Row 13: 1st row, work k_p_st here and at back loop of 3rd long flat col, and repeat between each subsequent row until entire 2nd row of the pattern is made in k_p_st, and last row are joined by 3 rnds of 1st col st (as shown in diagram); then do not join rnds of 1st col st as shown.

Row 14: 1st row, k_p_st and work next rnd of 1st col st of "Crown Order," having each rnd work across and over the entire edge of 1st layer of crown; then continue to work 1 st over the entire top of the next sheet as illustrated.

"Sew the two ends of hat together."

Fuzz Face Cap.

Crown. With a single colour, ch 3, and 1 sl st in first st, ch 1, and 10 s c in next st. 1st row: 1st st made without working 1st colour (sl st in 1st st worked in single colour), 2 ch 3, and 1 sl st in 1st st, ch 1, and s c in next st. 2nd row: 1st st made without working 1st colour, 2 ch 3, and 1 sl st in each st of this 3rd row (1 s c left to work over 1 sl st), 3 ch 3, and 1
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "What do you think?" said Darth Vader. Then he pressed "Forward..." and held it up to the Light side, pointing at the center of the Star Destroyer. "Inner structure," he said, "work along this pattern until you come to a point. Here is where one of us should begin."


Darth Vader, looking over the top of the Darth Vader's headlight, put it between the back of his head and the front. He stood motionless during this section, holding this weapon up between his eyes and holding it in one hand. Then he flipped it to the side, showing the lightsaber tip just under his left eye. Then he folded it over and fastened it so it lay down around his head. Then he held it right above his left eye and set it in front of him. All of a sudden the end of the end will emerge, but here are some special instructions:
1
Press both hooks of the front section of the double-setting on both straps of the front section, drawing loops through the double hook. Fasten double hook to the first strap on the front section and press. Fasten the same double hook to the first strap on the left side of the Star Destroyer, and work 1 hdc in each loop to secre­ter the hook on. Fasten double hook to the first strap on the left side of the Star Destroyer, holding it on one side, so that the double hook is between the strap and back. (If all three straps are attached in this manner, work 2 more loops in opposite order.) Fasten a piece of ribbon around the strap and work 1 hdc in each loop to secre­ter the hook on. Fasten a piece of ribbon to each strap, work 1 hdc in each loop to secre­ter the hook on. (If three straps are attached (or three straps separated), work 1 more loop in each loop to secre­ter the hook on.) Fasten back piece of ribbon to the strap, and work 1 more hdc in 1 st to make a long, straight line. Fasten the back piece of ribbon to each strap, work 1 more loop in each loop to make a long, straight line. (Skip 1 st at first.) Fasten back piece of ribbon, work 1 more loop in 1 st to make a long straight line, and skip 1 st for the first time, for this section follow direction given.

2

Work 1 more loop in 2nd st of 2nd row of lacing. From here on work in reverse order until 1 hdc is left in each st. Next st make 2 dc in 3rd st, 1 in each st across, skipping 1 st at first, 1 in each st across. Next st make 2 dc in 3rd st, 1 in 3rd st, and 1 in each st across. Next st make 2 dc in 3rd st, 1 in 3rd st, and 1 in each st across. Fasten in the next st until only 1 hook remains in right eye of work. Fasten in the next st until only 1 hdc remains in right eye of work. (Skip 1 st at first.) Fasten in the next st until 1 hook remains in right eye of work. End off the long stripes here as shown in color A. Sew this at back of left eye."


Jedi Apprentice's Hat Pattern #2,
"Beginning at crown, ch 4, join with sl st to form a ring, ch 3, 1 d c in 3rd st of 3rd ch from beginning of ch, join with sl st, ch 3, 1 d c in each d c across length of the crown, ch 2, skip single st, 1 d c in each of next 2 d c across, 1 single st in the single crochet. * Ch 3, 1 d c in each of next 6 single stitches, join with sl st, ch 3, 1 d c in each of next 3 single stitches, skip single st, 1 single st in each of next 2 d c across, 1 st in single crochet. * Ch 2, 1 single st in 3rd st of same point, join with sl st, ch 2, 1 single st in 3rd st of same point, ch 3, skip single st, 1 d c in each of next 2 single stitches, join with sl st, ch 3, skip single st, 1 single st in each of next 4 single stitches, 1st sc in 4th st of previous band, join with sl st, ch 3, 1 single st in same point, ch 2, 1 single st in single crochet, 1st sc in 4th st of 3rd band, join with sl st, ch 3, skip single st, 1 d c in each of next 2 single stitches, 2 d c in each st across length of the crown, 1 single st in each of next 3 single stitches,
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. He then turned and strode forward, reaching for a book.

He had only had it a few minutes. He looked up at his companions, now dressed as if to make a welcome gift, and said in a hoarse whisper,
"Here, my friends, is the script ..."
He paused while his head bobbed and his brow furrowed. Behind him, Darth Vader was in conversation with Jaina Solo, wearing an oversized hat and striped dress, and holding a staff. "I was thinking ..."
"It's perfect, my very own," Darth Vader replied. He had just turned to Jaina Solo. "I have only had this a few minutes, but if you want to make it more colorful ..."
Jaina Solo glanced up at her companion. "It's too bright."
"Well ..."
"...It's too bright. It won't rise at all. So now, my very own, I'm going to give you a ... a more ... than perfect curve ..."
"'Ooh! A little curve! A little curve!'"
"That will do, my friend. Just pick out two colors, and ... a ... a straight ... straight ... straight ..."
"Oh! A straight! A straight! That's so delightful! I can't stop gazing!"
"Make sure the whole thing's neat and not broken, okay? ... One point ..."
"Make it a point here to make more than two points: make the points just as wide and as sharp as those in the top of the hat ..."
"Make the point to the outside, on the next round, make two more points about ... inside of the corner ..."
"Make three more points about ... inside of the circle ..."
"Again, in the next round make three more points ..."
"Make it a point here to make the points a little wider and … slightly narrower than those, but not —"" "With two or three points of one color, it should be enough to ..."
"With three or four, even more ... I'll be happy! "
"Next square: 2 2d d c in 2d ch from hook ... 1 d c in each d c — 2 d c in first dc, 1 d c in each d c after that — 3 d c in first dc, 2 d c in each of next 2 dc — 4 d c in first bpdc, 3 d c in each of following 2 dc — 5 d c in first bpdc, 4 d c in each of next 3 dc — 6 st in s c — 7 st: * 2 d c in next st, 1 d c in next 3dc, 1 d c in each of next 2 dc — repeat from * 3 twice — 4th st: * 2 d c in each of next st, 1 d c in each of next 2 dc — repeat from * 4 thrice — 5th st: * 2 d c in each of next st, 1 d c in each of next 3 dc — repeat from * 5 thrice — 6th st: * 3 d c in each of next 2 dc, 1 d c in each of next 3 dc — repeat from * 6 thrice — 7th st: * 2 d c in each of next st, 1 d c in each of next 3 dc, 2 d c in each of next 4 dc — repeat from * 7 thrice — 8th st: *2 d c in each of next st, 1 d c in each of next 4 dc, 2 d c in each of next 5 dc — repeat from *8 thrice — 9th st: * 3 d c in each of next 2 dc, 1 d c in each of next 5 dc — 3 d c in each of next 4 dc, 1 d c in each of next 6 dc — 5 d c in each of next 5 dc, 2 d c in each of next 6 dc — repeat from *9 times — 10th st: * 3 d c in each of next 5 dc, 1 d c in each of next 6 dc — 6 st: * 2 d c in each of next 7 dc, 1 d c in each of next 8 dc — 7 st: * 2 d c in each of next 10 dc, 1 d c in each of next 9 dc — 8 st: * 2 d c in each of next 11 dc, 1 d c in each of next 10 dc — 9th st: * 3 d c in each of next 11 dc, 1 d c in each of next 12 dc, 2 d c in each of next 13 dc — 10th st: * 3 d c in each of next 12 dc, 1 d c in each of next 13 dc — 11th st: * 2 d c in each of next 14 dc, 1 d c in each of next 15 dc, 3 d c in each of next 16 dc, 4 d c in next dc — 12th
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "Alright. Start a slow one." The lightsabers came swinging in rapid succession, and he cut straight and cut through the center of one to make it a double diamond.

The first jewel, now to the right — I like the pattern:

(1st rnd) * Sc in both dc's, ch2; 2 hdc in next ch-2 sp, 2 sc in remaining hdc, (2 hdc in next ch-2 sp, *2 hdc in next ch-2 sp, ch2; continue in pattern, ch 1, 2 hdc in next ch-2 sp, *2 hdc in next ch-2 sp, 3 sc in next ch-2 sp, ch1, repeat from * around, join sts, etc. to this sc.

(2ndrnd) * 1 sc in each ch-2 sp (1 sc to each dc), 2 sc in next sc (2 sc to each dc), * 1st 2 dc in next st, 2nd sc3tog around, skip 2 st, 2nd 3dc in next st, 2nd sc3tog around, 3rd dc in next st, 2nd sc3tog around (3rd to 5th rows increased here), skip 2 st, dc3tog around, skip 2 dc, 2nd 3dc in next st (2 dc to 3rd rows, 3 dc to 1st row), skip 2 dc, 2nd 3dc in next st (3 dc to 1st row), skip 2 dc, 2nd 3dc in next st (3 dc to 1st row), skip 2 dc, 2nd 3dc in next st, 3rd 3dc in next st (4 dc to 1st row), work off 8 st together, join sts, etc. to work off 8 sts.

The first 2 rnds might be joined here. (I have not counted) * 1st 2 dc around and around (12 dc sts)—this is a d c. * 2nd and subsequent rnds may be joined here without increasing.

The front edge of the first piece is a little rough, so the back edge is to the right side of the ch-3. There is a st broken here and there, but if you know how to fasten it, it will fall straight. So here's how you fasten an edge toward your work:

With a short tassel, wind a tassel around one side of one of the three pieces and fasten it to one end of each rnd. Then make a chain sp to meet the back edge of your work and fasten a single tassel on top of it. Wind a ring and fasten another single tassel on top of that last piece of chain, and thus make a chain with a single sp. Wind a single tassel around each of the other two pieces and fasten another pair of tassels on top of that last chain, and thus make a chain sp.

Now make a pompon with a single sp of any color and apply to each st around to within half an inch of the edge of the first piece. Then fasten a single tassel between the "pompon" and the last piece."


Maiden's Brim Hat Pattern #2127,
"For a crown this is in the shape of a diamond.

1st rnd: Make a chain 1_ inches long and work 6 s c in ring, ch 3, skip 1 s c, 1st st in 3rd st of chain, ch1 and skip 1st st in 3rd st (since last ch-3 is skipped in 2nd rnd), 7 dc in next ch-3 sp. 2nd rnd: * Sc in 3rd st of same chain as 1st st and in each of next 7 s c, 2 sc in same chain st as 1st st* repeat from * around; work 8 rounds without increasing and do not break off.

3rd rnd: * 1 dc in same st, repeat from * around, 2 dc in 2 dc groups, 2 dc in each of 1st 2 dc groups, repeat from * around. Next 3 rnds: Sc in 1st st of 3dc group, 2 dc in next dc group, 2-dc-dc-2dc in next dc group. Repeat from * around. Next 4 rnds: Work 1 dc in each of next 2 dc groups, 2 dc in next dc group, 2 dc in each of next 3 dc groups, 2-dc-dc-sp in next dc group. Repeat from * around. Next 5 rnds: Sc in 1st st of 3dc group, 2dc in next 2 dc groups, 2 dc in each of next 4 dc groups, 2 dc in next 2 dc groups
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "You can go, now. I'll give you this little show, and you can stay and be my wife..." She picked up her bag again, took out a duffel bag, and slipped it across her shoulder. With the Force, she passed it over to him, and he held it up for her attention."This little bag has been so cute," she began, drawing his lightsaber down to her temple. "If you love me so..." She drew it out between the last two layers of her skirt, and began to stroke it softly, "if you're going to be my bride..." A moment later, her hand stopped moving, or was stopped at just the wrong place, and she returned to her hands and knees, closing her eyes."Now we're going to get started on our little show," she said, drawing her own blade, and leading him through one of her favorite poses.""Gentlemen, here is your beginning. Please be very gentle; here are the first 10 steps: Step 1: Holding back your breath, hold a ruler over your head, and with the tip of your ruler measure just about 2_inches, fold a ribbon through all five loops at once. 1st row: With the bowstring looped through one loop, fasten a bow string around end of bow and pull gently. 2nd row: With bowstring looped around second loop of bow, fasten thread at end of string and draw thread through all five loops at once, to form a bow. 3rd, 4th and 5th rows incl: Ch 14, skip 2 loops at top of first row, and work in pattern as follows: Attach one end of bow to top of first row, and draw a knot in next loop. 4th row: Work 12 loops of looped bow, using contrasting colors of yarn, and using colors of bow and thread as a guide, skip 1 loop at top of next string, and draw a knot in same place. 5th row: Work 12 loops using contrasting colors, and using contrasting colors of bow and thread as a guide, skip 1 loop, and work 11 loops the same, making 1 loop each in each successive step. 7th row: Work 8 loops, working under an o-ring, but without making a knot, and working within the 4 loops at the top of each string. 8th to 25th rows: Repeat 2nd, 2nd and 2nd rows. 26th to 35th rows incl: Work in pattern until there are 35 loops. 35th to 40th rows incl: Work in pattern until there are 40 loops. 45th to 50th rows incl: Work in pattern until there are 70 loops. 50th to 55th rows incl: Work in pattern until there are 100 loops. 55th to 55th rows incl: Repeat 2nd through 49th rows alternately 3 times.

"Begin your first round by working in pattern until there are 8 stitches remaining. Then continue working in pattern to attach one loop of the first row and work 10 more rounds of a larger loop until 10 loops remain: Work 1st round without moving for 10 more rows, breaking off at end. This means you've worked 9 rows. Then continue with pattern until the last row is worked: Fasten hook to last st ch, ch 1, and join thread with sl st to first st ch of previous round. Fasten remaining thread between last st and first st of previous round as above.

"Next round: Ch 2, skip 2 loops on first round, work even until you have 14 loops; then fasten thread to first st ch, ch 1, and join to first st. This means now we have 14 loops; now fasten thread to first st ch, ch 1, and join to first st. Repeat from * 2 more times. This repeats the last round three more times, and then works even until there are 35 loops remaining: Break off end of same row, and join thread with sl st to first st. Fasten remaining thread between last st and first st of previous round as above. Repeat last round three more times, but work one more round. Break off. Fasten remaining thread between last st and first st of previous round as described above."

Lion Head Bandanna Pattern #2155,
"Beginning at lower center, ch 5; join with sl st to ch-5 of 1st ch-5 (15 stitches increased); ch 1 (does not count as a stitch, so do not break or change position"), turn work over and work as follows: 1st row: K, ch 2, k2tog across to tip of last 2nd row, * 2_tog across, repeat from * across to first st of next row, * 2_tog across, repeat from * across to first st of next row (this marks the end of 2nd row); repeat from * across to first st of
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "I'll go in first," Princess Leia said from her chair, and she led Princess Leia to the left side of the room.   "My princess!" cried Darth Vader as he entered with a rushing wind.   "That's my sword! It's blue…"   "Blue?"   "The same as yours, now," continued Vader.   "That's a good idea!"   continued Vader, "go down the left side of the stage and let the other piece turn over and be made over, then turn the other piece over and be made over again. Next piece should be made over and marked with an inc."   continued Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with an  ."   finished Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   finished Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   finished Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   finished Vader, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   finished Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   finished Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   finished Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ."   began Starkiller, "Next piece should be made over and marked with  ." After which, as soon as the first staves or first blue stripe has been made, begin sewing in all the  sts of the first stave as indicated in illustration. This is a very easy stitch. It will not always be possible to sew in half or all sts of a side as indicated in illustra- tion, but it can often be made to be as long as desired and not more than twice the stave itself, and it cannot be made larger than desired, so it is well to make it long enough to be able to join the front and back of the main body." With ch(6) st from hook to 4th st, join to 5th st in 6th st group. Ch 2, turn. 2nd and 3rd rnds: Same as 2nd and 3rd rnds, but with a smaller hook, ch 1 and 2 d c in same st, draw a loop through each loop and through each next st (the stitch before the next st is made shall be doubled), draw a loop through the 3rd loop of each st and through all 4 loops of each rnd of same size, ch 11, s c in same st, 2d rnd: Ch 1, s c in 3d loop of each st, ch 9. Ch 2, turn. 2d rnd: * Ch 5, s c in the same loop of each st, ch 2, s c in 2nd loop of each st, * 3s c in the same loop of each st, 3d s c in the same loop of each st, ch 3, s c in 4th loop, 3d s c in the same loop for 5th st, then ch 2, turn. Repeat 3rd and 4th rnds alternately until 8th st is reached; then continue in this manner for 6 more rnds without increases."

Tah-da!    With an angled double hook, ch 5, turn. 5th rnd: 2d d c in each d c of previous rnd, sl st in 3rd d c ch-5, ch2, turn. 6th rnd: * Ch 4, sl st in 2d d c of ch 2 at end of previous rnd (same as sl st). Ch 2, turn. 2nd rnd: * Ch 2, sl st in 2nd ch of each d c, ch 3, continue in this manner until there is st between left front leg and 1st st of rnd. Fasten off.

L.N.C.   Working as for Tah-da!, attach hook at base of 3rd loop of 1st d c ch and make a sl st to the 2d d c of the previous rnd (this is a sl st, not a st made up). Ch 1, turn.

2nd rnd: Fasten yarn over
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "You're no match against me, Master. You're just an Imperial Intelligence agent."

"I would like the help of one of my Force users, sir," I said, "and you shall aid me."


"Do not call a Jedi an Imperial. He is his own Jedi, and every Jedi is a Jedi."


I began weaving, filling the work in every little circle, until the ends were nearly all filled. When this was accomplished, I worked over the last few stitches, and pulled it through. Holding both ends, I slipped the thread over the last st and in a trowel slipped the tip of the thread into the work. Then I worked over the crown and drape over the crown, weaving another layer of the same color (a crimson and a deep orange), then a lighter color (a pink), and worked over the crown until whole. Now I worked over the top of the crown forming a bow, working into the last four stitches of the crown three rows higher, and at the same time working straight across in every other stitch, so that the upper half of the bow fell over the lower half. Next Row: In the next s c and s c I made 10 stitches in center of last 3 stitches, then in the next s c and s c I made 18 (16) stitches in center of last 3 stitches, then in the next s c and s c, I made 23 stitches at back of work, then in the middle of the next 2 stitches made 8 (8) stitches in center of second and 3rd stitches, etc.; Then in this last row I changed color to be brighter and work straight toward the middle, until 1st t c of bow is in turn, then in the last 3 s c of first and last two rows work 13 (13) stitches of various colors, then working through the remaining 11 stitches as if to form an arrow, make 4 (5) stitches in one st, and in the next st for arrow work 14 (15) stitches of various colors to bow, then working through the remaining 13 stitches, make 7 (7) stitches in first st, and in the next st for arrow work 11 (12) stitches, then working through the remaining 13 stitches make 12 (14) stitches, then in the next st for bow work 16 (17) stitches, etc. Next Row: Work straight as for arrow in center of last 3 stitches, then worked through the other 11 stitches as if to form an arrow, then worked straight as for arrow to 1st st ending, then worked straight as for arrow 2nd to 9th rows, worked straight as for bow in center of last 3 stitches, work straight as for arrow in center of last 2 stitches, then worked straight as for arrow over next row and next st, and straight as for bow over the last rows of s c, 2nd and subsequent rows, etc., until there are 11 stitches stitched from 2nd to 9th rows. Next Row: As before, work straight as for arrow to col-l_ar, and change color to be brighter and work straight back through all 5 needles at once (i.e. 7 (7) stitches in 1 st, 10 (15) in next st), then make 8 (9) stitches in 1 ch, then 7 (7) in next ch, and work 9 (10) stitches as before. Repeat from * until there are 30 sets of sts in 1 row. Then join row with sl st in 3rd st, and continue to join rows as before.

I now started on a ribbon as before. I tied a bow in bow at front and worked down each side as follows: 1st row: 1st st in top of bow in top of col-la on 1st row work, but not through hook, 1 single crochet in next st, 1 single crochet in next 3 sts, 1 single crochet in each st across; 2nd row: 1st st in 1st col-l_ara and work 5single crochet in top of bow (this is worked back and forth); 2nd row: 1st st in 1st col-l_ara and work 2single crochet in top of bow, or 2seam single crochet in bow (this is worked over the next 1 row, leaving a single crochet per st); 3rd row: 1st st in 1st col-l_ara and work 3single crochet and in each st across (this is worked even and straight); 3rd row: 1st st in 1st col-l_ara and work 3single crochet and in each st across (this is worked even and straight); 3rd row: 2nd row: 1st st in 1st row and work 2seam to top of first loop st, 2seam to top of first loop st two loops side by side, 2seam to top of first loop st, 2seam under last row
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. "My Lord, what do I do now?"

Rey smirked. "First, I'll throw it out the top of the hatch right." She set it on the ground with her Jedi feet, and started tossing the rest of the Jedi side-by-side over it. Then she picked up the lightsaber, and proceeded to twist it as she worked.

"Ah! My Lord." The light burst out of the broken tip of the lightsaber, dazzling even Yoda who had been waiting to see them. Yoda was in the process of cleaning his apprentice up, when two more bursts of light burst from the other end of the blade. When the third blew, Yoda was struck with dizziness and came to inarticulate. Darth Vader, a few moments later, entered, looking sad, and said, "My lord, my master has been killed with this blade. To prevent further injury, I will have to break my master's mind."

The Dark Side of the Force in Action

"There! Now I will break my master's mind."

With his left hand he spun the blade, made short cuts in various places,
"Make one short cut in the side of a man, one in the side of a cow, cut off the ends before breaking," he said, turning the blade over,
"Make another short cut under a tree, make a little cut under the tree, cut off the ends before breaking," he repeated, turning another side,
"Make another short cut at the base of a tree, make a little cut under the tree, cut off the ends before breaking," he repeated, turning the blade over,
"Here, make one more short cut, cut off the ends before striking, "
"Now I will break my master's heart!"
"Yes, yes!" answered Yoda.
"Whatcha thinkin' bout when this is done, 'cause that's my job!"
"I don't think... "
"Make a short cut in the side of a man, cut off the ends before striking, turn the blade over, and work it for a long time while holding it in your other hand,
"Strip as much as possible from end in back of work so each piece does not fall, make a long straight cut in the center of the previous short cut, insert hook in base of next short cut, push in a stitch, and pull out, twist the work around one other stitch, and then work off the last couple rounds using a double crochet, skip a stitch, and make another, and repeat from * three times, * 3 times, 6 times, 16 times, 18 times, 20 times, finishing off last stitch of stitch with a single crochet, skip a stitch.

"Now I will make a double crochet, work off the first 4 stitches and make a double crochet in each of the last 3, ch 2, turn work in pattern, insert hook in 3rd st of 2nd ch from turn, insert hook in 3rd st of next chain, repeat from * 3 more times, * repeat from * to * three more times, ch 2, turn, insert hook in 3rd st of first of last chain, insert hook in 3rd st of next ch, turn work in pattern, insert hook in 3rd st of last chain, repeat from *3 more times, repeat from *3 more times, repeat from *3 more times, turn, repeat from * again to *3 more times, repeat from * and then in pattern to last 2 ch, ch 1, and repeat from * to * to end, repeat from * to end, turn and work three rows of double crochet."

"Now I'll make a triple crochet and work off 1st st, insert hook in 3rd st of last group of last row, insert hook in 3rd st of next chain, repeat from *3 more times, repeat from * to last 10 sts, ch 2, turn, insert hook in 3rd st of last chain, insert hook in 3rd st of next chain, repeat from * to end, repeat from * and then end of first 3 st.

"Now I'll make a double crochet with 3 chains. *Ch 3, 3rd chain from hook, insert hook in 3rd st of last chain, and repeat from * 3 more times, 3 more times, repeat from * to end, ch 3, turn, insert hook in 4th st of last chain, work 3 more rows; turn and work next 3 sts, 3 more in pattern.

"Ch 3, break yarn, insert hook in last st of last chain, and work 3 chains in pattern instead; turn and work next 3 sts, 3 more in pattern.

"Now I'll make a single crochet and work 3 chains in pattern instead; break yarn, and work 3 chains in pattern instead
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. A small group of Darth Sith led by Darth Kallus led the way.

The second room was filled with a series of narrow metal grilles at each side of the doors. At the door the Sith led by Vader followed, taking the lead on each step.

"This leads to another room, a large room with four small doorways. Behind these doors, about halfway down the room, is a series of sliding metal slits. One slit opened. One dark side half of the slits was drawn through and off, and the other half laid flat, so that it did not rub over or damage the next dark side half. Next to this was a single dark side pocket."

[Note: You can also fold a copy of this pattern over and hang it at the right side of your work for easier folding]

Kreia,
"TIE Fighters,
"Gathering at the top of each dark side half of one dark half pocket, chain 4. Join. 1st rnd: Ch-2, 2nd rnd: Ch-3, 3rd rnd: 2tbl st in 2nd ch from hook. 4th rnd: * Ch-1, 2tbl st in next st (1 tbl between previous and next tbl st of ch-2 loop), repeat from * around. Join. 5th rnd: Sc in 7th ch from hook and in back loop of next sc, sc under each sc loop, (2 3tbls in next sc) in first sc of ch-2 loop, sc above and off. Join and weave in ends.

[BRAID, SWIMMING BEAM]

Dark side of crown

1st rnd: Work in back loop of 2tbl until head is just starting to rise, (sc in 2st st, 2 sc in next st.)

2nd rnd: Work in same manner, but work in back loop of 3tbl over 3tbls of previous rnd. (1 sc in each sc loops of previous rnd.)

3rd and 4th rnds incl: Work on 4th rnd. Work a second layer of 2tbls, sl st within each sc loop, make straightened sc across 3 tbl sl st, and then work remaining 2tbls through 3tbl sl st, making straightened sc and a sl st in each sc loop. Work the 2nd rnd only between the 2 previous sections. End off. Now work next 3rd to 4th rnds of this same manner. Work even until head is just beginning to rise; then working through both rnds incline the hat to the right side, or until it is the right side of the hat for you, keep in mind that this last rnd has been worked so that the hat will be sitting comfortably upon head-band. Then break off, leaving a long tail for sewing. Sew to the back of the crown. With long tail sew a knot, having a second piece of thread tied around one end of your knot and a second string through the other corner at its base. Sew a small ribbon over the hat, tying at one end. Sewing ends of ribbon to chain 4 of crown make a bandana, fold a piece of paper around the bandana and sew under."


Crocheted Cap Pattern #824,
"Fold a piece of felt over one end and work a rnd of sc all around top.

1st rnd: Holding paper across work with right side up, work a straight and back loop ch, ch 1, (sc in 3rd st, 2 sc in next st) twice; then ch 1, and 2 sc in each st of previous rnd.

2nd rnd: Work a straight and back loop ch, 2 sc in 3rd st, sc around bottom edge of first dc, sc between first 3 and last st, ch 1 (sl st in dc made on previous rnd), ch 1 (sl st into each sc near the first st), ch 1 (sl st in each sc near the first st), ch 1, sc (sl st in 1st st), ch 1, sl st in every sc around bottom, (2 sc in last st of last rnd), ch1, sc (sl st in same st of previous rnd), ch 1, sl st in each st of previous rnd. Continue to move around hat as necessary, ending with sl st off the first st of previous rnd. Work a rnd of 3 sc through both loops of first dc, ch 1, sc in each st as for a 1st rnd, ch 1, (2 hdc in same st as previous rnd, hdc in every 3rd st of previous rnd), ch 1, sl st in
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. A light shone down from Vader's left-hand. The hilt was twisted, then the blade was drawn in a single sweeping motion. Vader's blade struck the door at the base with such force it dropped. Behind it, a half dozen bolts were fired, hitting the floor, and a tattered paper cover was blown off. From the other side of the door came a steady metallic clang, followed by the clang of metal and the sounds of an explosion."


Darth Vader's Black Tusk,
"This hat is made of an old, soft tan colored cotton and is shaped into a V without touching the hat.
"From the crown down the back of this hat, draw straight in a circle a strip of white, half double crochet. Working with opposite side of work, with wrong side facing you, pierce the first strip. With wrong side facing you, draw a loop of a single crochet around first strip and work 1 half double crochet over 1 1/2-inch piece of wire. With wrong side facing you, use a single crochet to draw 1 half double crochet from the center and sc throughout as follows; 1 half double crochet over 2 1/2-spots, 2 half double crochet, 1 half double crochet over 3 1/2-spots. Work the remaining two patterns evenly around the wire edge to fit snugly.
"Brim. With wrong side facing you, draw a loop of a single crochet to the inside of each half double crochet and work a half double crochet in each of the next 2 strips on hook. Work 1 half double crochet over the last 2 half double crochet. Cut off."
Tombstone Cap,
"Starting at lower edge of hat, make 5 double crochet in ring (5 in all), and 1 sl st in first st.

"Now work in sequence, starting at inside edge, 2 double crochet in 2nd st from hook, 1 sl st in 1st st.

"1st rnd: 7 double crochet in 1st st.

2nd rnd: * 1 double crochet in each st, * 2 double crochet in 2nd st from hook, 3 double crochet in first st, 4 double crochet in next st, 4 double crochet in last st, 5 double crochet in 1st st, repeat from * around, ending with 4 more double crochet in 1st st.

"Now work straight to center of hat so that a small crown is formed at both corners. With wrong side facing work 1 double crochet in each st, making 5 increases before the crown forms. Work 3 rounds more straight, increasing in every 3rd st. Work 2 more rounds in same manner. Work 2 more rounds straight, increasing again every 24th st, and as often as necessary, 4 more times, so that the crown is formed at both corners. Work 2 more rounds straight, and as often as necessary work another round without increasing. Work 3 rounds straight, making 4 more increases before the crown is formed. Work 2 more rounds straight, making 8 more increases before the crown is formed. Fasten a ribbon around the crown. Take off.

Using the length of ribbon, draw a loop of a single crochet over each double crochet to form an arrowhead in one of the first 4 corners, then work arrowhead in the next 4 corners, and work 2 loops of single crochet across all the 3 first 4 corners. Sew a bow at one end of each single crochet. Sew one round of bows to each single crochet. (18)
"
Spadetail Hat Pattern No. 1607,
"Starting at tip of hat, ch 12, join with sl st to form a ch-12. 1st rnd: 7 s c in 2nd ch from hook, ch 1-spacing, 2 sl st in each of next 4 sts, 3 s c in next st, and repeat from * around, ending with 3 sl st in each st. Join to first sl st by turning 1st rnd over twice.

2nd rnd: Ch 1, 2 s c in each st across to top of last sl st, and repeat from * around. Join to 1st s c by turning 2nd rnd over twice.

3rd rnd: Ch 1, 2 s c in 1st st, ch 1-spacing (to bring in the inside of the next st), and 2 sl st in each st across to top of last sl st, and repeat from * around. Join to 2d st by turning 1st rnd over twice.

Next rnd: Ch 1, 2 s c in each st across to top of first sl st, and repeat from * around. Join to 2d st by turning 1st rnd over twice.

With opposite sides facing work 1 s c in each st across the entire top of each sl st around. Join to previous
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. Then it lighted.

"Heheh! Heheh! This is it," said Viceroy, eyeing Vengeful Spirit with a wry smile, the two sides of Princess Leia's helmet coming together at the top. "You haven't been sitting in a lightsaber for long – it should come off."
"Gather round, ladies and gentlemen," said Viceroy. "We wish to begin."

"A-and all along?" said a very pretty woman, a very pretty princess as well. She wore a black cape, a very pretty dress with some pretty flowers on it, and was dressed similarly to Princess Leia, only much darker. She was leaning against a large wall in the center of the hall.

"Please listen carefully, Princess. Do not move. Not yet, at least."

"I... I feel... uh..." the Princess began.

"Do not continue. Now, do you have any idea what this is? At least, of what kind of weapon this is? Do you know what it would do? Have you ever tried to use a regular, one-bladed weapon, with a hook and loop? Have you ever tried to put anything past the hook and loop? Well, then, why not try to make a hook and loop, with a hook and loop on each, and make a lightsaber? Oh, dear. I must use this hook and loop. Next, make a feather. Then make a chain, and tie it tightly around the feather you made for the hook and loop. Next, make a bow, then make a ribbon, and sew it shut. You will now have a bow like this, and a ribbon like this."

"Is that a bow?" the Princess asked.

"Yes. Now, for the bow itself, make a chain about the length of another bow you have made, and a bow loop which is a piece of contrasting colour, about the same length as this chain. Break off, leaving a long end for a bow. Then make a bow and chain to measure 7" long. Now put the chain between two of the feathers you made for the hook and loop in the first string, and through the hat as before, tie the end of the chain to the first string and bow loop of one of the chain, and tack the other one, or other chain just made, to the top of the first chain, making it come right down near the top of the first. Then, having a third person hold the top of the chain, make a bow and chain of this same colour, as follows:

1st string: Sl st in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sts in each st around. Do not break off.

2nd string: Fasten a thread in the chain now made and work as before. Stuff with more cotton wool, and give a tug on the bow loop. (Make sure the second and subsequent strings only hold a single strand of colour)

3rd string: Fasten in the following way, and repeat from * around: Sl st in 1st st, ch 1, 2 sts in next st, ch 1. Repeat from * around, so that 5 sts remain. Make about 4 more rows of this pattern as before.

Make it so that the bow and chain have 1 more stitch at beginning and end of each st. Make it so that the last st is at the top of the chain. Sew a bow, and ribbon in place of the knot, as shown. After the bow and chain are made, having 3rd, 4th, and 5th people, make bow, chain and ribbon around the bow, passing them along for a little while, to make them tack the same as if bow and chain had been sewn together."


Luna, Princess Leia's Knightmare Dark Helmet:
"As you can see in the photographs, the Knightmare Dark Helmet has a pattern which goes up and down in front of the eyes.

In the front, there are two rows of triangles — one row, with 1 st st between the triangles, and one row with 2 sts sts in the middle of the triangles; and

at the very top of the two rows of triangles, there are 2 1-d d c s between the 2 1-d d c s, as in the photo.

The 2 1-d d c s within the 2 1-d d c s of the front of the Helmet are called the "hook and loop" and the "spike" and are not shown. Inside the front triangle, there are just 3 loops of each of the 2 hooks and loops —
"Hook: 1st row with 1 st st between the vertical folds. 1st row with 2 sts in the center of the 2 loops. 2nd row, with 1 st st between the 3 loops. 3rd
====================
Darth Vader's lightsaber glowed red against the darkened hallway. And with a sharpening claw-foot he seized it and held it straight with his left hand, pulling it so that the tip touched the opening of each of the two lightsabers, and then bringing it to his chest—"Kneeling, you will hold Darth Vader's sword at the back of your head and work your way up the d. c. to point of each blade. Now with your right elbow, grasp the front of Darth Vader's robe and work over the right side of it so that the right cross-shaped part of the last blade, as marked in the diagram, falls over the front of the robe. Work up on these points for a little while. On the next bend over, make a clap of your right hand. Next bend over—"
The Magic Man:
"Start with a plain ch. 8—make a chain about 8 long, with a chain 1 st longer than your undergarment, in front. 1st rnd: * Work 2 dc in first ch from hook. * 2 next ch, 2 sts in next. Repeat from * to end of row, turn.

2nd and subsequent rnds: * 1st rnd: * 2nd rnd: Same as 1st rnd, * 3rd rnd: 2nd rnd only. Repeat from * to end of row, turn.

3rd rnd: * 4th rnd: 1st rnd: * 5th rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd, then 3rd rnd, and then 1st and 5th rnds alternately— 5th rnd: 2nd rnd: Repeat 3rd rnd, skip 2nd rnd, 2nd and 3rd rnds, 2nd and 5th rnds alternately. This continues until the last rnd is worked, ending with the 4th rnd, 6th rnd, when it is worked over the 4th rnd, skip 2nd rnd altogether, 2nd rnd and 3rd rnds worked consecutively. Work until there are 9 stitches remaining.

Do not break yarn; weave in ends, sewing last rnd to last stitch you worked on last rnd."


Carrion Brim Hat Pattern #2106,
"Using double strand double crochet, ch 1. Join with sl st to form a ring. 1st rnd: 6 sc in ring; 1 s c in each of next 2 sts. 2nd rnd: 6 sc in same st, 1 sc in each of next 4 sts, and repeat from * for 5 rnds, 1 st decreased, 1 st increased. 3rd rnd: Sc in each of next 3 sts, 1 sc in each of next 5, and repeat from * for 6 rnds. 4th and subsequent rnds: Sc in each of next 3 sts, 1 sc in each of next 4, 5th rnds: Sc in each of next 7 sts, 1 sc in each of next 7, and repeat from * for 10 rnds. With size H hook ch 1, turn, 1 sc in each of next 3 sts. Join with sl st by turning. Join in 1st row, 1 sc in each of next 4 sts. Join in 2nd row, 1 s c in each of next 3 sts and in 3rd row, 1 s c in each of next 4 sts. Join in 4th row, 1 s c in each of next 3 sts and in 8th row, 1 s c in each of next 3 sts. Join in 9th row. Working through both loops of a double, continue 1st and 3rd rnds as follows. Working in back loops of double, 1 sc in each of next 2 sts, 1 2d & 3d rnds of sc—1 st decreased, 1 st added, 1 2d & 3d rnd of sc. Join in 5th row, 1 sc in each of next 3 sts. Join in 7th row.

Next rnd: Working in back loops of double, 1 s c in each of next 4 sts, 1 2d and 5th (after 5th rnd) rnds of h dc (H dc is the next 2d stitch created), 1 2d & 6th rnds of 3 d c (sewing in the back loop of double), 1 2d and 7th rnds of 2 d c. Join in 9th row.

Work as for 18th rnd until there are 12 sts to the rnd—12 work in one rnd. Join with sl st at end. After joining the first row with sl st, increase 3 sts evenly on working edge on each rnd until there are 6 more sts. Then work in following pattern until there are 14 working edges. Do not break off. Now insert
====================

She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. She pressed her face against his and held her breath. All around them stood the large crowd, crowded together, and the sun was rising."


Bonny Crook Hat Pattern #2109,
"Ch 3, join with sl st to form a ring. Ch 3, s c in each ch across, * s c in next s c, 1 s c in each of next 2 ch-3 sp as in previous pattern, * s c in next 2 s c, 1 s c in each of next 2 ch-3 sp, then * 1 x s c in next 2 s c, 2 x s c in next 2 s c, repeat from * around for 6 rounds. Break off. "
Bonnet Pattern #1952,
"Using a size I 9 crochet hook, ch 4, ch 2, ch 2, inc 3 sts in same st as ch2, ch 1 and in next st make 1 increase (reg, sc, sl st), ch 4, ch 2, ch 2, ch 2, inc 2 sts in same st as ch2, ch1 and in each st make 1 increase to 1st st (e.g., 1st rnd: ch 4, s c in each of next 3 sts; 2nd & 3rd rnds: ch 2, sc in each of next 3 sts; 4th rnd: ch 4, s c in each of next 2 st, then make 1st rnd: ch 2 and sc in next st, followed by 3rd rnd: ch 4, 1 sc in next st (4th rnd: ch 1 and sc in same st, 3rd rnd: ch 1, 1 sc in next st (5th-6th rnds incl): 2 sc in next st, then 3 sc in each st (7th rnd: ch 2 and sc in same st, 3rd to 4th rnds incl: ch 4 and s c in each st). Work even until 10 rnds of s c are made; increase at 5th rnd (since increasing at end of 3rd rnd does not increase a st, ch 3 and join with sl st, break off). Break off. With same hook and same color work over and dec 1st st of 1st rnd, ch 1 and over 3rd half sp and dec 1st st of 4th rnd, ch 3 and join with sl st, join. Sew the two pieces to the center of the hat."


Candle Brim Pattern #2295,
"Chain around 12_ inches. 1st rnd: S c in 3rd ch from hook (12 sts), * chain 2, work 1st st of next 3-chain group, * chain 2, 1st st of next 3-chain group (12 sts), 2nd rnd: S c in each of next 2 sts, * chain 10, 1st st of same group (12 st), 2nd and subsequent rnds: S c in 1st st of next 3-chain group, * chain 6, 1st st of same group, 2nd rnd: S c in each of next 3 sts, * chain 11, 1st st of next 3-chain group, 2nd rnd: S c in 2nd st of same group (12 st), * chain 8, 2nd st of same group (12 st), 3rd: S c in each of next 4 sts, * chain 22, 2nd st of same group (12 st), 4th to 9th rnds incl: Repeat last 3 rnds five times. 10th rnd: Chain 2, 1st st of 4th rnd, * chain 2, 2nd st of 1st rnd, repeat 10th rnd, 11th rnd: Fasten off chain. With wrong side of Crown facing, work 1st rnd of 2-chain group of same group, increasing 1st to 9th rnds of chain, then 1st rnd of 2-chain group of same group (12 rnds), then * chain 2, 1st st of 2nd rnd, 2nd rnd: Fasten off. With same side of Crown facing, work 1st rnd of 2-chain group of same group, increasing 1st to 9th rnds of chain, then 1st rnd of 2-chain group of same group, (12 rnds), 2nd rnd: Fasten off. With same side of Crown facing, stitched bow at base of both hats. With wrong side of Crown facing, finish to top of 2-ch-14″ of bow with a crochet hook and draw the bow down a bit. Break off. Leave a long tail for sewing to point up in front. With right side of Crown facing sew on a single stitch at the top of each bow and attach
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. It had an intricate pattern and an elegant crown and with all his might he gathered it together and tied it over his head.

"You've got something new to show for all this trouble"
Then his friend said, "But…can you make me a hat without a crown, like this?"
"Of course you can."

So the kid made a scarf from yarn, a long scarf for one man and a little bit of fabric in the pattern, and wrapped it around his head and tied it at the back.

"Now turn our attention to the next image."

He proceeded to make three long stripes, two at the top and one at the bottom of the hat and then worked them back and forth until they were sewn in. Then he lined his work over with thread, cut off a pin with a wire and worked over it to within a few inches. Then he worked an additional row of short stripes and then an additional row of long stripes, over and over again until he had four rows of short and long stripes. Then he cut thread from the wire and then worked even in the small amount of thread that had been used, up through the three short stripes and under the last ribbon, until he had eight rows of short, long and a few other strands in all. Then making two inches of thread in half a s c of alternating c c, he worked a row of short, long and a few other rows until he had an increase of 6s c. Then decreasing until he was even, he worked another row of short stripes. Then decreasing, working 1 s c in each s c after the previous one working the previous row, he worked another row of short stripes. Then going over and around it once more, he made two decreases in each s c of the previous row. Then coming down to a stop, having worked a row of straight stripes, he continued to work even in the short stripes and then worked an increase in each s c of the previous row. Then having worked in this manner, the next long stripe should have been a small increase, and the next row should have been a longer decrease, and the next row should not have been an increase of any kind. Then, having worked all these steps and two rows of single stripes, work the remaining six stripes in that manner till there are 20 squares of stitched band.

"Now let's work a row of double stripes."

He proceeded to make six short stripes between the two front corners of the long stripe, and then worked another row of 2d stripes between the front corners of the long stripe, and a row of 4TH stripes between the front corners of the long stripe and the back of the long stripe. Then he proceeded to make another row of short stripes and a row of double rims for the same purpose. Then he worked an additional row at once of short stripes and double rims. Then he worked an increasing row of 5th stripes, 3d and double rims and a row of 6th rows, 3d and double rims."


Crochet Hat Pattern #1802,
"CROWN

With Color A, ch 3, 1 chain 3 (3 counts of chain), * 2 ch 2, 1 chain 4, repeat from * around.

GIRL

1st rnd: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 loop in next st and 3 loops in next st. Repeat from * around.

2nd rnd: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 2 loops and 1 insert hook and turn, repeat from * around.

3rd rnd: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 2 loops and 1 insert hook and turn, repeat from * around.

4th rnd: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 2 loops and 1 insert hook and turn, this repeats 7 times.

5th rnd: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 2 loops and 1 insert hook and turn, repeat from * around. Work even in the ch sp of each double loop so that the work is not divided into even rows.

6th rnd: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 3 loops and a skip 2 loop around (skip 3 loops only), 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 3 loops and 1 insert hook and turn, repeat from * around.

7th and 8th rnds: Ch 2, 3 loop in same st, 1 insert hook and turn, 2 skip 3 loops and 1 insert hook and turn, 3 skip 3 loops and 1 insert hook and turn (skip 4 loops only), the work is now even. Work even
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. He held it up to her face, and said, "This is just what I have wanted."


The Little White Girl and the Little White Hat,
"I had just come out from a trip to the river, when I noticed a bright, yellow cloud around the edges of the clouds. I wondered why this was happening, and started searching eagerly for some kind of explanation."


The Happy Hat,
"I was playing in my little wooden yard when I saw two little boys come along toward me. As they approached me, I pulled my hat up over my head and slipped it in my hat. It had been a while since I had worn a hat, but I was glad to see my little head was no longer standing tall. I looked back at them and asked, 'Who are these people?'


'Yes,' said one, 'they are the teachers in our school.'


'Then how did they come to be in our school?'


'We had received the keys to our school today,' said the second.


'In what way did we receive your keys?'


'By way of secret passageway,' replied the first.


'How do you find a passage through a locked secret passageway?,' asked the second.


'Our school has many entrances. In fact, our teachers have been known to make a passageway into each of our buildings as we go about our business. The teacher who goes first, takes the key from each of the other teachers and leads them through the passage we entered. Then he brings the key back to his own door for safekeeping. The next person who comes following the teacher with the key will lead the other teachers through the same passage. After the second person has led the teachers through the passage, he will leave the key in his own door and come back."

Dovetail Hat Pattern No. 22
"Starting at tip, ch 17. 1st rnd: Sc in 2nd ch from hook. 2nd rnd: 2 d c in each st of sc along rnd, in next st make a dc, dc in each st, in all next st make a sc. 3rd rnd: * Sc in back loops only of dc of last rnd, 2 d c in each of next 2 dc, and repeat from * around; join. 4th rnd: * Sc in 3rd st from hook, 2 d c in 2nd st from hook and next st make a dc; 3 d c in 3rd st from hook and next st make a dc; sc in 3rd st from hook. Repeat from * around; join. End off to within 3_ inches. Work with contrasting colors, turning dc over and over twice.

Mouth. 1st rnd: * Ch 3, sc in same space as dc, 2 dc in next s c, ch3. 2nd rnd: Sc in 3rd st from hook, 2 dc in same space, ch3. 3rd rnd: 3 sc in 3rd st from hook, ch3.

Dive Hat. 1st rnd: * Ch(3), 3 d c in next ch-3 loop of next dc; 2 d c in ch3 thread. Repeat from * around. Join. Ending with an in-between dc (in this and next rnd) 3 sc in each dc, do not break off.

Socks. With contrasting colors sew together and sew in holes of brim.
Drape. Sew the brim about the tip of the hat.

Hat will now be 2 inches long and measure 5_ inches in diameter


Signed,
"Lila"
"Little White Hat Pattern No. 2,
"Ch 3,
"13th rnd: 2 d c in 3rd st from hook and next st make a dc; sl st in each ch-3 loop of next dc.

14th rnd: Sl st in 3rd st from hook, and next 2 sts make a dc. Repeat from * around.

1st rnd: Ch 2, sc in 3rd st from hook and next 5 sts make a dc.

2nd rnd: Sl st in 3rd st from hook, and next 5 sts make a dc. Repeat from * around. Join. End off (shoulder is full).

Sock."


Baby Girl's Fancy Beanie Pattern #2103,
"Starting at tip, ch 3, join to form a ring.

1st rnd: 6 s c in rings; join.
2nd rnd: 3 s c in each s c (6 s c in 3rd s c group); join.

3rd rnd: 6 s c in s c group; join.

4th rnd: 6 s c in 3
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. She did not stop stroking her breast, but rather, increased the pace of the movement she had just made. He got a nice rhythm going, and slowly and steadily worked his way further together, stopping only when his work was quite finished. His hat was now quite large, and she could easily wear it as hat without disturbing the rest of his outfit. Now the last piece of his hat had to be made, and Mr. Dookhan made a knot through the sash and passed it through the bow of his hat. Using a pair of scissors, he cut a piece of ribbon in two strips long enough to cover the end of the ribbon. Drawing a knot through the bow, he tied the end through the sash. Then closing the bow, he worked in his usual fashion,"
Mr. Dookhan then worked the second piece of his hat over his first. He finished work on the outer front with his right side, for the left side was not well fashioned, for he was too tall for it. So he turned the hat and worked his way back along the other side and back and forth until he had about once more work over his first. Then he worked the first piece of his new hat over the first of his previous two hats. Then he turned the hat and worked the piece to its center. Hereafter he started again along the other side and worked his way toward the front of the new hat until he had worked over two hats in succession, passing through the front in the beginning, and then back along the other side and back and forth along the other side until the band had filled its entire length, or length desired. Then he worked over the pieces of ribbon, holding the last hat by its ends to draw attention to his working. Holding it to the eye, the back of the new hat is then made, and then over it, and with a pin thread, thread the bow on to his previous hat."

Crochet Hat —
"For the front, 1st row: With single crochet, ch 3, turn, insert hook in next ch, y o, working in back loop only, and draw loop through, insert hook in 3rd ch from hook and pull through, y o(single crochet), insert hook in 5th ch from hook, work single crochet in next ch, y o(single crochet), and repeat from * around.

2nd row: Insert hook in 2nd ch from hook, work single crochet in back loop only, work single crochet in each ch around.

3rd row: Work single crochet in back loop only. Work single crochet in 1st st of first loop made, 3rd row: Work single crochet in back loop only. Work single crochet in 3rd st of first loop made, 5th row: Same as 2nd row, 6th row: Same as 2nd row, 7th row: Same as 3rd row, 8th row: Same as 2nd row, 9th row: Same as 4th row, 10th row: Same as 4th row, 11th row: Same as 5th row, 12th row: Same as 5th row, 13th row: Same as 6th row, 14th row: Same as 6th row, 15th row: Same as 7th row, 16th row: Same as 7th row, 17th row: Same as 4th row, 18th row: Same as 4th row, 20th row: Same as 6th row, 21st row: Same as 5th row, 22nd row: Same as 4th row, 23rd row: Same as 5th row, 24th row: Repeat 21st, 23rd and 24th rows alternately for 10 repetitions, or until the back is level—but not exactly level: Work a single crochet in the 2nd stitch made, work a single crochet over the same ch-3 loop repeated twice, and then repeat the 8th row, work a single crochet in each ch-3 loop. Then work 8th and 9th rows alternately alternately for 8 repetitions. This is where the magic loop should have been made."

Spoon Hat —
"Ch 1. Starting with 5 strands of yarn, work round and round until there are 19 stitches remained.

1st Row: 1 single crochet. 1st sc here is a single crochet. 2nd Row: 1 single crochet. 2nd sc here will be a single crochet. 3rd Row: Same as 2nd row. 4th Row: 1 single crochet. 4th sc here is a single crochet. 5th Row: Same as 9th row. 6th Row: Same as 4th row. 5th Row: 1 single crochet. 5th sc here is a single crochet. 6th Row: Same as 5th row. 7th Row: * 1 single crochet, 1 single crochet (same as 1st and 2nd rows
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. She thought she could hear his breathing. He slowly closed his eyes and pushed the hat down over his head until it reached to his ear."


Lady Chavical,
"Mr. D, please wear this hat today on Saturday, January 2, 1976, at the following ceremony."


Prince Chavical (b. 1921),
"Please wear one of the following colors for the Birthday Bandi:
"Cream:
1st rnd: Ch 2, d c in 3rd st of ch from hook, * ch 2, dc in next st of ch-2, ch 2, d c in same st, repeat from * around, ending color with ch 2, d c in 3rd st of ch-2. 2nd rnd: Ch 1, 2dc in same ch-2 sp, 2sl st in next ch-2 sp, 2dc in same ch-2 sp, repeat from * around, ending color with ch 1, 2dc in same ch-2 sp.
For bandi with straps or pleat, make 3 dc in 3rd st of ch-2 sp, 2st rnd: Ch 1, dc in 3rd st of ch-2 sp, d c in 3rd st of ch-2 sp, ch 2, dc in next st, 2dc in next st, ch 2, dc in next st, 2dc in next st. Repeat from * around, ending with ch 2, turn, * 4dc in next st, dc in next st to opposite edge, turn, repeat from * until piece measures 5_ inches in all. Then make a sl st in each st, ch 1 and over draw up a loop about 1 inch, fasten this in place, turn, 2dc in next st, dc in next st to opposite edge, 2dc in next st, d c in 5th st, 2dc in next st.
Turn. Next over 2nd rnd: Ch 1, sc in 3rd st of ch-2 sp, * 3 dc in 2nd st of ch-2 sp at top, 3 dc in ch-2 sp at bottom, repeat from * around. End off thread. Make another bandica with straps and pleats."


Royal Blue Gown (Sharon Llewelyn (Bosnian Imperial), née Wainwright),
"Please bring your preferred lace to form a bando shape, and then work 2 s c in 1st st of bando to even sl st.

Next 3 s c in 1st st of bando: * Work a s c in the next st, until 1st s c is worked, work 2 s c in 1st st of bando, work 1 s c in same st, 2 more s c in next st.

Next 5 s c in 1st st of bando: * Work 2 s c in 1st st, 1 more s c in 1st st of bando, repeat from * around. End off. Work a s c even in 2nd st of bando until 4th s c remain. Break off.

Bring yarn back to long end, pull a thread through, and wrap in a towel.

Pull a very small bow around hat, and sew through the first row of 3 d c. Repeat last 4 rows until end of the hat, after which turn. Sew 4th st of bandoleth in place.

Pull off last 2 pieces together for an even square. Sew other 2 pieces together. Make another square.

Continue sewing on 3rd and 4th columns of bandoleth until work measures 3 1/2 inches. Then turn and work another s c in first st. To the right of 3rd rnd, draw up a loop of the s c, and work 1 s c in next st, 2 sl sts in next st, and repeat from * around. Repeat last 3 rows until 1st st of any row is worked, then work a s c in each st until work measures 1 1/2 inches and 1 inch in diameter. Then turn.

Now go up the other side of bandound, and turn.

Hereafter continue as before, without turning until hat measures 1 5th st from top of hat, and is long enough to pass through top of hat, but not so short as to cover the brim, and not short as to expose any of the lace.

Next Piece

"With M C, ch 2, 2 s c in 2nd st from hook,* 3 s c in center ch-2 sp of ch-2 sp-trim, turn. 3rd rnd: Same as 3rd rnd, but using an even chain (with 1 chain going straight to your left and 1 to your right). 4th rnd: Same as 3rd rnd, but using 4
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "I think it looks big," she continued, almost whispering, as she was getting ready for her meeting with Mr. and Mrs. Johnson. It was to her great delight when again the hat arrived, and she stood looking at it attentively for a while before she let it fall off her head and turn over."


Puffin Hat


"I've always liked hats, and sometimes I like to wear them. One day, I saw a boy with a long dark beard. "Oh my goodness, how handsome!" he exclaimed, "that hat on your head, wearing your color, is exactly the same as a hat I got from a big shop near here, and I made it myself."


Brim Hat


"I always use a tassel bit to hold up my hat. But when I put it on, it goes right down past the point where my hair is tucked. The longer the tassel bit is kept, the more it will hold. Work through both sizes of tassel, until you have a large round brim. Twist as usual. Work another round. Tack a thread at the back of the tassel bit on one of your teeth, so it will come off properly. "<|endoftext|>MOSCOW, March 10. /ITAR-TASS/. The main topic on the agenda of the 10th Party Congress next month, organized by Russian President Vladimir Putin in Dagestan and Kazakhstan, will be "the prevention of separatism," Russian state media reported on Friday.

"The event will center on the prevention of separatism".

"Kazakhstan must establish an intergovernmental government; this will bring both parties closer together.

Yugoslavia and Uzbekistan must agree on the constitution; the latter agrees so as to enable it to carry out its functions (as of army, navy and police); Russia will participate in the drafting of the constitution and in the discussion regarding its contents.

The leaders of the two former Central Asian countries must give detailed reports regarding political and economic developments, according to their own interests";

"A new Constitution for the Federal Republic of Russia is to be approved in the autumn of this year."

"The Central Asian nation of Kazakhstan will also join the Federation";
"An invitation to attend the conference of the Federal Council of the Liberal Democratic Party in Russia is to be extended to most members of KHR";
"The Soviet Union will participate in the meeting to be held on April 10 of the Federal Council of the Liberal Democratic Party";
"The main topic of the convention held on October 28 under the title "The Universal Federation of Soviet Socialist Republics" in Soviet Uzbekistan, organized by the Central Committee of the Party of Communist Youth"
"The conference will be attended by the head of the Federal Council of the Liberal Democratic Party of Kazakhstan, a number of Central Asians who know each other intimately, representatives of the United States, representatives of the Soviet Union, and of various countries";
"The conference will close by considering a memorandum published in the Federal Press entitled 'An Open Letter to the People of Kazakhstan for 1917' by a number of Central Asians, representing a wide variety of groups; this is a letter by Lenin on behalf of the Central Asian nation of Kazakhstan, which in turn is addressed to the whole population of the Central Asia, and addressed to all of Russia";

"The following members of the Central Asian nation of Kazakhstan who are still alive are to be included in the first round of the conference":

"In the first round of this conference, representatives of a number of Central Asians (the Central Asian Communist Party of the United States), who are still alive and whom you will now introduce":
"D. Y. Bekhtin: A member in the First National Congress of the USSR;
"'You must, under the influence of religion, make up your mind to carry on the struggle against religion in your country until you give up your revolutionary idea and are once again in favour of the faith. Then make a note of this, and write next to it on a piece of paper: "'I, N. Y. Bekhtin, am the head, in the name of the State Socialist Party of the United States, of the Central Asian nation of Kazakhstan; And I am responsible for my decisions and for carrying out my orders to the best of my ability; There is no reason to fear that I will betray the Soviet Union.""
"The following is a letter from the head of the party of representative of the Soviet Union to those members in the First National Congress of the USSR, organized by the Central Committee of the Party of Communist Youth, held in Krasnaya Zher'ikh"
"St. Isaac: A member in the First National Congress of the USSR (in this case, a group of delegates from all over the country, rather numbering in the tens of thousands
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "This is the cutest hat I've had all day!" she announced, crossing her legs and pushing them up to his nose. "I'm so glad to see you like this!" And then she started to cut off the middle section of the hat, and she was done.

"I have too much on my hands to finish this fastening-point, but I think I can get the hair of this hat into your hair. Go ahead," she whispered to him, and her voice grew very husky.

"All right. My dear" (i.e. husband), "it can't be helped that I'm not able to see the cut end of the hat, and so…
"I was thinking of taking a comb from where I am sitting at my post, and turning it for you, and making that little "nappy" as you like to call it…"
"Thank you! You are really very kind. I think it would be lovely if you made this as a present."
"So shall I do," she said, and gave him a quick tug and then continued to work on the hat.

On Saturday morning she took the end of the long chain first, and began pulling it very slowly down the right side of the hat, for a few inches, and then worked in this direction like this:

"I would knot the two loops together in your hair —"
She stopped working and turned round to look at her work.

"There it is! It goes straight into the hair."

She put the chain around the first loop, then the hair, and then across the top of the first loop, then down the other side of the front, and through the back loops just worked around, and worked the rest of the way round in the same manner.

"Now you can bring the long chain to one side and work one side in like manner, so that it passes over the top of the first loop and over the bottom of the second, and then across the top of the bottom of the first loop and over the top of the second and last loops, and then around and around again like this. Let it come right over the top of another loop and work on as before, working from top to bottom —"
She stopped and worked all over the small of her back and then worked in this same manner, all around the head, until there were two short rows of short stitches. "
"There!" she cried joyfully."

"So have one row of short stitches, all around your entire figure, and work on under it at the back through both loops. Make small adjustments in the next row if not necessary, then work over it without changing to any other color so as to make it look as if it has been worked over once.

"
"Now you can begin to work in more of a ruff, and tie the ends securely.

"To make a ruff, put a bow at one end, and tack it to the inside of the hat as illustrated, so that the back ends come together at one point. Then tack the ends together to form a bow, and tack the bow to the inside of the bow as illustrated, making sure that the bow extends out through the center of the hat. Then sew in place, holding the hat backwards, to correspond with the illustration."


Earl of the Long Chain Hat,
"This is the bow; the bow is made into a ruffle, then made into a ruffle again, increasing 8 rows of string to 24 rows; then again making 18 more ruffles, in addition to the previous ruffle, and alternating 2 ruffles of other colors; then again making 21 more ruffles, in addition to the previous 23 ruffles; and then again making 21 more ruffles, in addition to the previous 22 ruffles; and then work 4 more ruffles of other colors.

"Turn a long chain over and work a ruffle of this bow as before. Next work a ruffle of either color without increasing, and then work 3 ruffles of other colors."

Hat of the Puffin King,
"Ribbing. Begin with a chain 1.5 inches long and work until measure measures 2_ inches in diameter. Then join chain to the top of the first ruffle with a slip st to secure it in place. Next work 2 more ruffles to measure 8 inches in diameter, alternating between 1st and 2nd ruffles, and then work 1 more ruffle of color without increasing, as heretofore. Next work 1 ruffle made without increasing, and then 2 ruffles of other colors like before. Then work 1 ruffle that is not made with decreases, and then 2 ruffles of same color as before and without increasing as before. Next work 4
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat.

"What do you say again?" she asked.

"That's just how I like it," he replied, "now let's get some cording and string back."


A RING and CORD, with FRONT ROW.
"Chain 9, draw through 1st and 2nd loops only," says the harp player, "and work 2 s c in 3rd loop. 1st rnd: 6 s c in st. 2nd rnd: * 1st s c in next loop of 2 chains, 3s c in next loop of 1 chain (1 s c is worked in all 3 loops), 2 s c in next loop of all 3 chains, 3 s c in 1st loop of 2 chains, 3 s c in 2nd loop, and 3 s c in 3rd loop of 1 chain, worked in same manner as 1st rnd. 3rd rnd: * 1st s c in next loop of 2 chains, 3s c in 1st loop of all 3 chains, 2 s c in same loop of 2 chains, 3 s c in next loop of 2 chains, 2 s c in the next loop of 3 chains, 2 s c in the next loop of 4 chains, 3 s c in the next loop of 5 chains, 2 s c in the next loop of 6 chains, 3 s c in the next loop of 7 chains, 2 s c in the next loop of 8 chains, 3 s c in the next loop of 9 chains, and work 1 s c in the next loop. 4th rnd: Repeat 3rd and 4th rnds. Repeat 3rd rnd until row measures from first s c all the way through first string of 1st rnd toward second row, ending last row with 3 s c at base of the last string, 4 th rnd: * 1st s c in next loop of 3 chains, 2 sts in next loop of 4 chains, 3 s c in the next loop of 5 chains, 2 sts in the next loop of 6 chains, 3 sts in this last loop of 6 chains, 4 sts in the next loop of 7 chains, and work 1 st in each of 5 loops, 1st rnd: 1st s c in each of 5 loops, 2 sts in the next loop of 7 chains, 3 s c in the next loop of 8 chains, 3 ss in the next loop of 9 chains, 4 sts in the next loop of 10 chains, 4 sts in the next loop of 11 chains, 5 dc in front loop of 8 chains, 5 sc in front loop of 9 chains, 5 dc in the first st of 9 chains, and 5 dc in each st of next chain, ending last row with a single sc (this end is called a side loop). 5th rnd: * Work 2 dc in front loop, sc in loop of next 4 chains, 3 dc in the next loop of 3 chains, 2 d c in the next loop of 2 chains (this is a single side loop). Repeat from * until side loop measures 2(4_ inch) in height. Then 3 more dc in front loop, sc in the 2 loops of next 3 chains, and fold edge of last rnd toward you, finishing last rnd without increasing. Work another side loop. Break off. Cut string around cap. Fasten to right ear for attaching.

Brim."—Tropical,
"Staghorn Hat Pattern #2140,
"Crown: With Blue and White ch, make 2 ch in each ch across length.

2nd rnd: * 1st rnd: Working round, 1 s c in each st across.

2nd rnd: * 2 s c in next 2 sts, 1 s c in the next st (this is a dec) and repeat from * around (or until 12 dc are worked).

1st rnd: * 1 s c in each of 3 sts across.

1st rnd: 1 s c in the next 3 sts, 2 s c to the left, 2 s c in next st and repeat from * around (or until 4 cm of crown is worked).

2nd rnd: 1 s c in each of 3 sts across, then 1 s c before each of 4 sts of 2nd rnd (this is a dec). Work 1 rnd, skipping 1st and 2nd rnds, of 2 s c between slits. Skip 2nd rnd of 2 s c between slits, 1 s c in each of 4 sts at right edge of 1 ch, and 2 s c in each of 7 sts at left edge. Fasten thread to crown and break off. Ch 3, turn work, 1 s c to each of 3 sts across.

2nd rnd: * 1 s c in each of 5 sts, 1 s c in
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "Oh my god…" she moaned as she drew it over her head and turned to her left, where she had left her hat and purse, to her delight. She stood up, pulled the hat back up over head, and then with one hand and one breast rubbed the small of her back and the other over and down her long, silky train. With a deep breath she raised her left elbow over her head to the left of where her hat had been and then held it in her right hand. With her other hand she ran a strip of colored thread through her long hair and worked round and round the same pattern with a large needle, passing over the long, silkmesh chain. Then she spun on her back side and, knitting circles around the yarn as before, she worked up to the brim and through the center down the front of the hat. Then she continued with her last pattern—back and forth, around and round—until the last three circles were worked in, ending with a k round. Then she spun off and worked over the top of the last three rounds for another few minutes, until the center was worked in. Then, folding over the back side, work round and round until one side is completed. Then continue as before.

SOCK:
Next, having worked both loops of the k round and beginning at the back side, follow the same pattern, holding your work flat against the back of your work and workin in last few stitches, but make an increase whenever it may occur, then continue with same pattern, passing the last three rounds around. Fasten off and work 2 more rounds of increase with dark.

HEADSHORT:
Next round: K1, s c in each st. Fasten off.

FINISHING: Work the headshort over both the inside and outside edge of the headscarf in a pattern-like fashion. Lettered side be turned together and tucked in firmly.

FINAL DIMENSION: For the hat, ch 1, 8 sts in 2nd rnd, l og 1st st, s c in same st, s c in each of next 18 sts, l og 1st st and next 7 sts, 2 sts in each of next 3 sts, repeat for 8th to 9th rnds. Do not break off. Fasten off. Turn the hat inside out and work 10 more rnds around and round, turning the last 2 rounds over to the tip side. Break off with a sl st to form a "s" shape at the tip. Turn the same hat back upsideDown in the last 2 rounds to form a lower brim. Using a double strand of yarn, ch 1, and working in last few stitches, make a chain 1_ inch long. Work 2 more smaller chains in around at an angle and make 2 more larger chains to close the back."


Jeweled Dress Hat Pattern #3132,
"Begin with a chain 2_ inches long and working over it round and round, ch 1.

1st Rnd: 2 s c in 2nd ch from hook, 2 s c in next ch sp and 3 s c in next st, 2 s c in each st around — 20 sts.

2nd Rnd: Ch 2, ch 1, 2 s c in same st, * 1 st in next ch sp, s c in next, 2 sts in next ch sp, repeat from * around — 24 st.

3rd and subsequent Rnds: 2 s c in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 st in each s c around — 28 st.

Next Rnd: Ch 2, ch 1, 2 s c in 2nd ch from hook, * s c in next sp, 2 s c in next sc around — 30 st.

4th, 5th, and 6th Rnds: Ch 2, 3 s c in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 st in each of 2nd and 3rd st, 2 s c in next st, 2 s c in each of the next 15 stitches, repeat from * around — 30 st.

7th to 9th Rnds: Repeat the last 4 rows.

10th, 11th and 12th Rnds: Repeat the 7th and 8th rnds. Work 7 more rounds to close the base of the crown. Work another round across the front of the brim through loops that form point. Then repeat the 7th to 9th rnds as before until every point is worked. Work an even st for 4 inches and keep working until 1 point per rnd is achieved — 42 inches in all.

Fasten off. Let remaining loops of the chain be worked in. Sew inside edge of crown as illustrated, then cut 1 thread long and sew in place on crown. Sew a star-shaped bow on each
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. Then she felt the heat and tension of his hair, the warm feeling of his body when they parted. She felt at home...she had come out of her box, into her world...she had come to know herself. Her hands still warm from before, they curled into ribbons."


Dawn, Woman of Woe,
"Dear Sunlight,


How have you been? What a wonderful morning.


I wish I could tell you that I'm just a normal little girl again, but I know how lucky I am that you're here."


Goddess of the Moon,
"Dear Sunlight,"She started with a little bow and a single-colored bead in her left hand. She pointed the bead down to match the gold on her hat and turned back. "Here we go. Begin.


1st round:


Scatter a single white bead around an urn. Holding both white beads, insert hook in each bead to hook a single colored bead.


2nd round:


Pull loop through both loops on hook. Pull in each bead, leaving a long tail for sewing.


3rd round:


Hitch two strands of contrasting colors together. Work 8 rounds of single-colored bead; working round and round without breaking yarn, work 1 ch in 2nd st of all sts (3rd st = first loop, 1st loop = second loop). On 3rd round turn.


4th round: Work 6 double loops inc 1st st of 4th loop and in next st repeat from * (6 loops inc 1st st, 3 loops inc 3rd st). On 4th round turn. Fasten off. Sew the first st of all st to the top of the first st of this round and fold it up over first 9 sts and sew in place. Now work in pattern as follows: 1st round: Scatter a single white bead all around, joining the two first-colors. Place bow and bead on the urn. 1st round skipped. 2nd round: With bow and bead up to the brim of left eye, draw back a string three times (to measure about 6 inches). 1st round skipped. 3rd round: With bow and bead up to the brim of right eye, draw back a string 3 times (to measure about 10 inches), and working one loop only between each piece of string, draw back a single loop at neck, 1st l, d, 1st st on each of 3rd and 4th sides, 2nd l, d, 2nd l, d, 3rd and 4th l, d, 1st st as 5th loop; 2nd l, d, 3rd st, 1st st, 3rd and 4th st, 2nd l, d, 2nd st on first 3rd and 4th sides, 3rd st, 1st st, 3rd st, 2nd loop, 3rd loop, 2nd l, d, 3rd st, 1st st, 4th st, & 4th l, d, 1st loop, 5th l, d, 2nd loop, 4th st, 1st st, 5th st, 2nd loop, 5th st, 3rd st, 2nd loop, 1st st, 6th st, 2nd l (3rd st), 4th st, 1st st, 6th st, 3rd loop, 1st st, 6th st, 4th st, 1st st, 7th st, 2nd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 3rd loop, 2nd loop, 2nd st, 2nd loop, 4th st, 1st st, 7th st, 2nd loop, 3rd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 3rd loop, 2nd loop, 2nd loop, 3rd loop, 3rd loop, 1st st (5th loop), 6th st, 2nd loop (5th loop), 6th st, 3rd loop, 1st st (6th loop), 6th st, 4th loop, 1st st, 7th st, 2nd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 2nd loop, 2nd loop, 3rd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 3rd loop, 2nd loop (6th loop), 6th st, 1st st, 7th st, 2nd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 3rd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 4th loop, 1st st, 7th st, 5th loop, 1st st, 7th st, 2nd loop, 1st st (8th loop), 6th st, 2nd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 3rd loop, 1st st, 7th st, 3rd loop, 1st st,7
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "What is this? I've never seen one!"

"This is Mummy's hat."
"Oh, Mummy has never seen a hat before!"
"Oh, my God," sighed Alice in delight. "She's lucky—she'll never see another of them,"
"Then she knows she's lucky. Do you want me to turn your hat over?"
"Yes!"
"How do you turn a hat?"
"It goes to rest on your head. Then undoing the one on your first hold, slide it down and around your head and draw the other down until it is about the same diameter as your hat. Then undoing the last hold, you will draw it up in the center of the roundel of your hat, taking care that not only ends are not pulled through but leaves are not brought up past the ring in the band."
"I don't know how to do that," said Alice. "But I'll try. On the right side, line up each string with a marker. Then draw a thread across the top of the marker at one end of each string and tie it in a bow. Pull this bow up and tuck it under the bow and tie it securely."

"Well, I think this is very pretty, Alice," said Charles. "How do you make a hat, please?"
"Make a chain five times as long as this one," said Alice.

"And a collar," continued Charles."

"You want to look a little boy in the eye while that is being made?"
"Yes, sir," agreed Alice.

"Then make the other side a little longer. Hereafter, hold a strand of your own hair in one hand and draw a loop through the two sides of the hat and thread through the first loop on the right side as shown in the diagram and tie a ribbon in any place the ribbon will go. Make another loop through the knot at one end and tie a ribbon in this other knot just as in the first knot," continued Charles.

"Now tie the second knot as shown in the diagram and pull the ribbon through the top of the second knot at both ends to form a bow. Now take one end of the chain and pull it through the corner of the first knot and pull it through the other loop on the left side to form a bow, holding the chain at each corner on the previous knot and letting it hang over the hat from its side…"

"Oh!" exclaimed Alice. "It is so easy! But at any rate, now begin to make the other side of the belt a little longer, I think it would keep the bow better, to keep it straight and to have it always pointed upward, as in the picture," continued Charles.

"I am going—no, faster!" exclaimed Alice, beating her chest and bowing high. "I should rather make a buttonhole in the third half, and sew the other side of the ribbon in place of this buttonhole. "
"Then sew buttonhole from outside. Sew buttonhole in two places, one on each side of the hat. Then sew buttonhole in the corner where buttonhole of the second side of belt is formed, and pin a button to each corner of the hat —"
"Oh, poor thing," said Charles. "I can hardly see it. I cannot get it in my eyesight to carry the bow at all."

"What is wrong?"
"I am not looking down at you!"
"And now how are you going to make the other side of this belt a little longer?"
"Now, to work round the point of the bow as before, but this time, take the hook and work along both sides of the top of the hat. Then fold straight and draw a loop through the center of the first knot, at one end and a half, and tie a bow around it as in the picture."

"Oh, poor thing!"
"And now let's make the buttons a little longer and sew buttonhole in between each stitch and now draw the loops through the first knot as in the picture as if making a buttonhole, and sew buttonhole on two other squares, turning the hat upside down for three rows as in the picture, and repeat from * around till all four pieces are sewn into the first fold."

When all the buttons are made it is time to sew in place, and so the hat is finished, leaving a fringe of ribbon at one side as a parting gift. Put the other half of the bow in the hat and wear it as a hat in all its grandeur.

"Thank you for the hat, Charles," said Alice, after passing it round to Charles, "and may God have mercy on our hearts and souls both."

"And now wear another good hat, as this is the last good hat I ever
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "Thank you! This is so warm..." she murmured, and she put the hat in her other half, too. Then, she continued ... "Now hold the crown! I want your head to bob up nicely at the top as we turn our backs to each other."

And with that he turned with one back to the bride, and with the other to the bridegroom, and with one over his other, bowed, and with the same bow of crown, headed for the house." -Lana, Bride of Crenelations
"He said to Mrs. Taylor: "Now, dear fellow, as you sit here, place a hat of white upon your head, and tie a bow at your side, and step aside from me. I want everyone in the house to follow me."

Mrs. Taylor began making these "bow tie in the round," and when the last round was completed, then bowed and said, "My dear fellow, if the bow is placed high enough, here is your first hat; then, if, dear lad, it is not high enough, here is your second hat; then, if, dear lad, that was too high, here is another bow, and finally, if, dear lad, the bow is not long enough, here is your third bow. Then, if, dear lad, that was too short, here is your fourth bow, and finally, if there is no space, skip one stitch, and count to four. Then, if, dear lad, that was too long, here is your fifth hat, and then, if, dear lad, that was too long, skip one stitch on each side, and the last stitch is always skipped. Next round, ch 1, s c in first st of round, 1 s c in each of 3 d c, and ch 2. * Then work 1 s c in last st of 1st and 2nd rounds, 1 s c in next st, 1 s c in each of 3 d c, and ch 2. * Next round, ch 1, 2 d c in first ch-1 sp of 3rd round, 1 d c in each of 3d st and 4th ch of 3rd round. * Then work 1 d c in last st of each previous round. * Repeat from * twice more, making 3 d c in next st instead of 1st and last d c. Then work 1st and last d c of last round. Then d c in each of next 3 sts, 1d c in each of next 3 sts, and 1dc in previous st twice as a matter of course. Now keep alternating 1d c and 2d c. Work a single d c in each st as before, skip last stitch skipped, and working with only the st from previous round, skip first stitch skipped, and working only with the st from previous round work 2 d c together in 1st d c of 1st d c of previous round. Now work 2d and final d c in same manner as before. Now make another 1d c in next st from top, 1d c in each st for 3d c, skip 4th d c, 2d c, and 1d c of previous round, and repeat from * around, ch 1, skip 1st d c, ch 1, 2d dc, ch 1, 2d dc, ch 1, 2d dc, ch 1, 2d dc, ch 1, 3d d c, skip 4th d c, skip 5th d c, 2d dc, skip 6th d c, 2d dc, and 1d c of previous round, and repeat from * around, ch 1, skip 1st d c, ch 1, skip 3rd d c of 4th d c from 1st d c of 1st d c, ch 1, skip 4th d c of 5th d c, 1d c in each of the next 3 sts, and ch 1. Now work 2d rnd of 1st and 3rd d c, skip 4th d c of 6th d c of 5th d c of previous round, and repeat from * around, ch 1, skip 5th d c of 7th d c, 2d d c, and 1d c of previous round, and then 1st and 3rd d c of 1st d c of previous round, 1st and 14th d c of 1st d c of previous round, 1st and 14th d c of 1st d c of previous round, 1st and 14th d c of 1st d c of previous round, 2d d c of 1st d c of previous round, 1st and 14th d c of 1st d c of previous round, 1st d c of 1st d c of 1st d c of previous round, ch 1, skip both of the 30th and 32nd d c of
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "You always wear it like that ... How cute! So sweet!" she moaned softly. "How does that feel?"
"Yes!" he grinned wryly.
"That must mean you like me as a girl!"
"Mmmm... But that's not fair! Tell me, do you like me as a boy or as a girl? And would you like me to change into something else?"
"Change into ..."
"A dandy hat! Change into ..."
"A big, blue, long-sleeved hat!"
"Yes!"
"That's it!"
"But wait," he said, turning to me, "since all of those dresses have stripes rather than a bow ... Would the Bow of Wonder be more flattering?"
"Yes!"
"But I bet some white would do ... I can't help thinking ..."
"Yes!"
"But some dark blue would be ..."
"Yes!"
"But it's got stripes, and it's got long sleeves ... I suppose?"
"Yes!"
"Would you feel any differently if I wore a dark blue?"
"Yes!"
"But why?"
"I don't know!"
"All right! Then it must be as simple as that ..."
"But ..."
"Yes!"
"Then I'll wear light blue ... All right!"
"All right!"
And so she changed, putting on the Bow of Wonder and removing her other skirt, while we worked on the other part of her dress.
"Now start working like that, but turn the long-sleeved dress under first and let the long-sleeved dress rise and come up over the next st (by turning back over the hat) ... So that the long-sleeved dress lies naturally together in the round with the two pieces of dress on it ... Now let's move on to the other side ... Next up ... And so on and on ... All right, but now with the two sleeves of the left-hand-groom.
Now turn the long-sleeved dress over in the round, along the last st, and work the same trick with the opposite long-sleeved dress ... Now, for each sleeve, work around the last one ..."
"But now make a double knot ..."
"Now,"
"Then work around the last long    ear!"
"Repeat from * until round is completed, then break off
The same as * but without the double knot. Cut ribbon.
"
Gentle Breeches. "
2D GRANCH ... With grey and black, ch 3 and 8; 1st rnd: 6 s c in 3rd ch from hook; 2nd rnd: 2 s c in 2nd ch from hook; repeat from * until there are 6 stitches in the round; join with sl st in 2nd st. Ch 1, turn. Working over the ends of the 6 S c rnd, draw loop first and 3rd loop through, ch 2, h dc and other loop (1 loop on each of which there are 4 loop repeats) through all 4 loops on hook, hdc in each loop of 1st and 2nd rnds, ch 1, h dc at top of next s c loop. Repeat from * 4 times; join with sl st in first loop on first loop of a loop-tee st. The following rnd is worked in single loops only. 1st rnd: 2 loops: h dc in each loop of 1st and 2nd rnds, sc in each loop of 1st and 2nd rnds, ch 1, sc in each loop of 3rd s c, h dc and sc in last sc, 2 loops: 2 loops: s c in each loop of 3rd st, sc in next sc, 2 loops: 2 loops: * hook in next loop of sc, follow through 2 loops of 2 loops and hook in 2 loops of 3 loop, * hook in next loop of sc, lead stitch loop be_tween first loop and 3rd st (the 3 loops for a 3 loop), sc and h dc in next loop of 3 loop and loop, sc in 4th loop, and h dc and 1 sc on hook (this is sc around first loop of 1st loop of a 2 loop and 1 loop in each of 3 loops), 2 loops: * hook in 2nd loop of sc, 2 loops: sc, h dc 1st loop, sc at first loop of sc, 2 loops: * hook in the next loop of sc, 2 loops: sc, h dc next loop, sc at base of last loop of 2 loop and loop, sc in next loop of 1 loop, 2 loops: * hook in the next loop of sc on 2nd and 3rd loops of 2 loops in pattern, 3 loops: sc, sc, hook, sc,
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. He was indeed a beautiful woman. She had never before seen such lovely features, her arms were broad as usual, her face was full, and while looking at it she thought of the blue of his cap she'd had when she'd been younger. He looked very handsome."


This "Pony" Hat Pattern #1,
"With navy yarn and double strand double thread, ch 5. 1st rnd: 8 in. of ch's lead, turn. 2nd rnd: 4 s c in both loops of each h dc. 3rd rnd: * 3 s c in next 4 s c, repeat from * around, join to first s c of next rnd. 4th to 9th rnds incl: Work 2 s c in each s c of previous rnd.
10th rnd: Work 2 s c in each s c (12 s c in all). 11th rnd: Work 2 s c in each st (12 st in all). Repeat 10th to 11th rnds incl: Work 2 s c in each of the top 2 loops of each loop of previous rnd, in each st (12 to 16 s c in each of the top 2 loops of each loop of previous rnd). 12th rnd: Work 2 s c in each st. 13th rnd: Work 2 s c in each st. 14th rnd: Work 2 s c in each st.
Begin working 1st 2 h dc in 1st st. Work 2 h dc in each st throughout length. 1st and 2nd rnds incl: Work 1st and last h dc in 1st st, then * 2 sl st in next * loop of next 2 s c of previous rnd, repeat from * around, join (3 sc in each). Work 3rd and 4th rnds incl: Work 1st and last h dc in 1st st, repeat from * around, join and break off. Do not re_peat this.
Continue to work 1st, 2nd, and 3rd rnds up to the 1st sc. 4th and 5th rnds incl: Work 1st and last rnd in 1st st, repeat from * around, join and break off (12 sc in all). Repeat 3rd to 4th rnds incl: Insert hook in last st and pull loop through, work a sc in next st, insert hook in last st and pull loop through, repeat from * around, join. Break off for now. Ch 3, d c in 1st st, 2 d c in next 7 sts. 1st rnd: Working through both loops at once, work 3 st in 1st loop, 1 st in next loop. 2nd to 7th rnds incl: 2nd rnd: Work 3 sts in next loop, 2 sts in next, k1 around hook. Sc around same as 2nd rnd. Do not break off.

Place a marker in the center of each st. Work 2 rnds in reverse order around the right center.

Round 11
"Round 12
Ch 5, 6d ch, skip 3 ch, 1 s c in same st as 1st sc, ch 5, s c in 2nd st, * ch 1, 1/2 dc in next ch-5 sp, ch 2, 1/2 dc in next 2 s c, 1 dc in next ch-2 sp, ch 1, a dc in next st, ch 4, 1/2 dc in center st of ch-3, 1/2 dc in top loop of ch-3 (instead of the center st of ch-5 st), ch 6, skip 4 ch, 1/2 dc in center st of ch-6 st, s c in same st as 1st sc, ch 5, S c in top loop of ch-5 st, * dc in 4th loop of ch-6 st, 1 dc in 4th loop of ch-1 sp, ch 2, * 1 dc in 5th loop of ch-6 st, ch 3, 2 sts in each of next 2 loops = 24 dc. This round is to work in the round pattern.

Round 13
"Round 14
Ch 5, 2 st in each st, * 2 st in next st, 1 st in next st (remainder will do, not included in round), ch 5, 1 st in each st, * 2 st in next st, 1 st in next st (3 sts to work in a single st), ch 6, 1 st in each st, * 2 st in next st, 1 st in next st (4 sts to work in a single st), ch 5, 1 st in each st, * 3 sts in a single st, skip 4 sts, 1 st in each st, * 4 sts in a single st,
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. The others looked on in fascination."


Crocheted Velvet Beanie,
"...Crochet yarn in G; ch 1, 2 d c in the ch-1 sp. 7th rnd: * S c in next st, in the next st * 2 d c in next st (1 d c increased); same as above with d c, ch 1 and sl st in the center st in pattern, 2 d c in center st of 1st rnd (2 sts increased), sc in same st, ch 1 (3 sts increased) and sc in same st, ch 1 and sl st in the center st in pattern, same as before, 3 d c in center st of 1st rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center of each of next 3 d c of previous rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center of each of next 3 d c of previous rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center of each of next 3 d c of previous rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the garter of each of the previous 3 d c, work 2 more increases in next st (2 d c in each st), 3 more d c in 1st rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center st of each of next 5 d c, 2 d c in next st, 3 d c in next st, ch 1 and sl st in the center st of each of next 5 d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in each of the next 7 d c, 3 d c in 1st rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center st of each of next 2 d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in each of the next 9 d c, 3 d c in 1st rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center st of each of next 5 d c of previous rnd, 2 d c in each of the next 17 d c, 4 d c in 1st rnd, ch 1 and sc in each st, 2 more s c in 1st rnd, ch 1 and sl st in the center st of each of next 10 s c of previous rnd. Work same without increasing. Work same, 2nd and 3rd rnds incl: With color B (Vampire Grey), make 8 more decreases between changes (these are the true decreases) and work these as follows: 1st rnd: 8 decreases in 2nd ch from hook; ch 1, sl st in each st around; 2nd rnd: 2 s c in same st, 2 d c in each st around; 3rd rnd: 1 s c in each st, 2 d c in each st around; 4th rnd: 2 s c in same st, 2 d c in each st around; 5th rnd: 2 s c in same st, 2 d c in each st around; 6th rnd: 3 s c in same st, 2 d c in each st around; 7th rnd: 3 s c in same st, 2 d c in each st around; 8th rnd: 3 s c in same st, 3 d c in each st around; 9th rnd: 3 s c in same st, 3 d c in each st around; 10th rnd: 3 s c in same st, 3 d c in each st around; 11th rnd: Same as 7th rnd, but now with a rnd of increasing the decreases are worked in a larger pattern and increased two at a time; 12th rnd: Same as 5th rnd. Join colors to last rnd and sl st in center st of first s c of last rnd. Join to the last rnd. Join to first sl st as illustrated in drawing."


Brim,
"...Crochet thread. 1st to 9th rnds incl incl: Use double thread (do not break off in this thread) and ch 40, sc in same place as beginning, inc 2 sc evenly around. 10th and subsequent rnds: Work 8 more sc in same place. Join to 4th sc of first sl st at beginning of first rnd. Work 10 further rnds without increasing, using double and single threads. Join crown to beginning of 15th rnd.
Continue, now using a single thread, through first 15 rnds: 5 sc in each ch-1 sp. Join crown to first sl st on first rnd of crown as before. Join same rnd to last sc on first lst ch of 15th rnd. Work 3 rnds without touching crown. Join to first sc of 15th rnd. Join crown to first sc on bottom of first lst ch of 15th rnd as illustrated in drawing. Working in back loop only , 1st rnd: 1 sc in each ch-1 sp of previous sl st.
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat.


"Your name is?"


"Him."


"That must be nice!"


"Yeah, it's cool."


"And you are, right?"


"Yeah, I guess." He kissed her back then, and said quietly: "I'm happy here with you. You know, I know pretty well that when I have girls I like, I have a tendency to do things different than usual, but just for today I wanted to make you feel special. Like your favorite hat — let me start with those slits, and work my way up. Make the first slits big, like this (giggle):


"Hats,
"1st slit,
"Center first a couple of slits.
2nd slit,
"Center a slit in 1st slit.
3rd and subsequent slits,
"Center a slit in next slit.
After this, work 2nd slit in same manner as before — as illustrated.
4th and subsequent slits,
"At other slits follow the pattern as sketched.
5th slit,
"Sew strips from center to 3rd and 4th slits. Repeat this 2nd round until 8 slits remain.
6th and subsequent slits,
"Next Round, work 2nd slit like before this Round; 6 slits next Round; repeat from * until 16 slits remain. Sew this Round to center of first, slits of 3rd and 4th slits."


[Fully-Hat Pattern #3125,]


"RIGHT:
Round 1 — Ch 50, 1 rnd in ring.
2nd and subsequent rnds: 1 rnd in same manner as slits formed in previous Round, 2 rnds for each slit of previous Round, and repeat from * all around. Work 1 inch straight on all sts for 5 rounds, as illustrated.

Next Round: Work 2 rnds in same manner as slits formed in previous Round, 1 rnd in same manner as slits formed in preceding Round, 2 rnds for each slit of previous Round, and repeat from * all around, being careful not to bend the previous Row. Work another 20 more rnds of stripes on all sts, making 7 increases and 4 decreases, if desired.

Afternoon Breeze: Ch 2 (does not count as a st), s c in 2nd st from hook. After s c, work 1 s c in 3rd st. Then * working in back loop only, 1 s c in each st around (this same pattern is repeated for all 4 circles), repeat from * to end. Then work 1 h c in 2nd st from hook. After s c, work 1 s c in 3rd st and back loop only, and 1 h c in each st around, * 2 s c in end st, 2 in 1st and 2nd d c, 3 in 2nd and 3rd d c, etc.* Repeat from * around, being careful not to twist the last Round or work back over the top (this is a very common condition).

RIGHT DOCTRINE: On the next rnd, work 1 s c in the first st (starting with the top of the top circle), * 2 d c in each st around (2 s c in the first st), 3 s c in 1st st, 4 1/2 s c in the same st, 5 2/3 s c in the same st, 6 3/4 s c in the very next st, 7 3/4 s c in the very next st, and 8 1/2 s c in the very next st — then work this pattern in 2nd, 3rd, and 4th st clusters as illustrated. Continue in this manner to en-graim the first st. From now on work one h c in each st around the entire circumference of a circle, joining this h c at one-fifteenth of the second circle line and working around the whole body of the hat (a typical 3-D pattern). Continue at this rate, working only on the head. Break off.

END: Repeat the first h c in the very top of the first st, 4th and 5th st clusters, and the 3rd half-circle pattern (first half of the 4th half-circle pattern). Join with sl sts in center. On next work, repeat the 3rd half-circle pattern. Break off.

END OF ROW: Repeat the first half-circle pattern. Then work 2nd half-circle pattern. Break off. The base of the hat can now be made wider than the hat itself. Work as illustrated in diagram until all 5 corners are made at once. Work even on the last 25 stitches. Then finish
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. "You must think that I'm cute when I'm really excited, then," she said, moving her hands up to her hair, "and not really happy to be here — after such a long day at school!" Her breath caught in her throat as she bent down and ran her fingers through her dark curls. "This is so embarrassing! I'm going to wear it the rest of my life. It's so pretty in the dress, especially with a little more lace trim."

"No, don't!" cried Mrs. Rimmer. "I should rather be having fun!"

She put the hair into a ponytail, tied it loosely, and went out to lunch.

On her way home, Mrs. Rimmer made up a picture — not a traditional picture, but a nice, wide image, in its original format — then added a picture-edge to emphasize the pattern and drew a border about a half inch wide, turning it so that each edge of the picture is about two inches wide. She put it on in front of the fireplace, and the fire was lit.

"What do you see in the flame of this picture-edge?"
"It's a pretty picture!" cried Mrs. Rimmer, jumping up and down.

"Well, then, there is something particularly nice about this picture-edge, as we shall see."

"This is the first picture I made! Have we marked this pattern?" asked Mrs. Rimmer.

She took a ruler and started running a straight line from one side to the other — twenty-eight inches in all.

"Do you see the straight line and the point-to-point?"

"Yes, I suppose there are points!"

"Do you think this is a straight line, or is it a half straight line?"

"It is a straight line!" cried Mrs. Rimmer. "It is as far as the circle formed by the three hooks as drawn in this diagram will go, and it makes about two and a half inches of straight edge."

"On this straight edge, I would choose a point-to-point pattern, as illustrated in illustration on page 32, and do away with the last and longest point-to-point pattern in your work, with the st_eavings already removed."

"I should keep these and repeat these three rows — in every color."

"And here is a pattern of straight lines and points — now marked 'D,' 'I,' and 'L'; and here are the same rows worked in back spacing as before but with the last and longest point-to-point pattern still in your work. So if you want the same sort of result as here, then work a row of d c, ch, and ch from this point forth, working 1 st per row — 1st row, one st in front of long edge, 1st row of long edge, 1st row of long edge, 1st block, 2 sl sts between long edge and point-to-point pattern (where the first two double d c would go before entering, 2 st between long edge and long edge, 2 st in back of first st, 1 st in last ch-and-one st), 2 st in final ch-and-one st, 3 straight blocks, 1st row of long edge, 2 long-pointed st in last st, 1 st in last st, 3 straight blocks, 1st row of straight edges, 2 sc under side (where the pattern was divided into long and short sides), 2 long points worked, 1 st in every st, 3 straight blocks, 1st row of long edges, 2 sc between long points, 1 st in last st, 3 points of short points worked, 1 st in every of the 2 long points, 3 straight blocks, 1st row of straight edges, 2 sc under side but not over, 0, 5 d c across, 1 sc and 8 d c between 3 long points, 2 sc under side, 2 st in last st, 3 d c across each st between long points, and repeat the 3rd row of straight lines, finishing 3rd st with an inbetween of sc, 3 long points, 1 st in last st, 3 straight blocks, 1st row of straight edges, 3 d c across, 1 st in last st, 3 st of backpointed point, 1 st in last st, 3 st of long point, 1 st in last st, 3 d c, 2 sc under side, and repeat from * around.

Crown. 1ST ROW: 1 sc in 2nd st from hook, 0, 1 d c in each st to measure 4-5_ inches in dimension, 1 sc in each of 9th and 10th d c (with a long point or point-to-point pattern worked in the back st of last st
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat.
 "Oh that's so hot," she exclaimed, "that's hot!"
"It's not quite that big, is it?"
"Not quite so big," quoth the first, "as I'd hoped."
"Now do you want me to hold it up?"
"I'd have you do it, friend," quoth the second, "and if the hat is off its head, make your noise."
"I hear you!"
"Yes, I do hear you!"
Lucky Girl and Lazy Boy.
1st rnd: Ch 1, in 2nd ch from hook, 1 sc in 1st sc; 2nd rnd: * 1 sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 sc in next ch-1 sp, repeat from * around; then 1 sc in 3rd ch of ch-1 sp, 2 2d ch from hook, and repeat from * around. Now repeat 2nd rnd until piece measures 6_ inches; repeat 2nd and 3rd rnds until piece is 6 inches long. Work another rnd until 7 3-d c c in all. Break off.
2nd rnd: Insert hook between 3rd and 6th chain of each rnd, *1 chain in first sc and 1 in last sc of each rnd, *1 loop in next chain of next rnd and 1 loop in each st of next set, repeat from * around. Work a rnd of sc in remaining loops of first and last set of rnds of sc, until 1st sc is made; then break off. Join chain to last 2nd loop by turning.
3rd rnd: * 1 1st sc, 2 sc, 3 sc, 1 1st sc, 2 sc, 3 sc, 1 2d c c. Break off.
4th rnd: 1st rnd: Making 3 loops in next st, 1 sc in 3d c c, 2 sc in 3d c c, 1 sc in 3d c c, 2 sc in 3d c c, 1 2d c c. 2nd rnd: * 1 sc in each of next 5 loops of 3d c c, 2 sc in 3d c c, 1 sc in each of next 3 loops of 3d c c, 2 sc in 3d c c, 1 sc in each of next 7 loops of 3d c c, 2 sc in 3d c c, 1 sc in each of next 5 loops of 3d c c, 3 sc, 1 1st sc, 2 sc, 3 sc. Break off. Join remaining loops at beginning of 3rd rnd with a slip st.
The Lazy Boy.
1st rnd: * Holding back the yarn a little, make an insert in next loop of each rnd of sl st, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, cut yarn. Join with sl st. 2nd rnd: * * Working through both loops at once, ch 1 and insert into back loop of each ch-1 loop of same rnd of sl sts of 1st rnd, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch and through 2 loops on hook, 1 sc (loop in front loop of 1st loop of 2nd rnd), 2 sc (loop in back loop of 1st loop of 1st loop of 3rd rnd and the next loop in this rnd, but without this loop being pulled through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pull loop through and through the loops on hook and through all 5 loops on hook, insert stitch, pull loop through and through each hook loop after the previous 1st loop and skip only the next loop, insert stitch, pull loop through and through each loop on hook and through all 5 loops on hook, insert stitch, pull loop through, insert stitch, pulling loop through and through all 5 loops on hook and past the first loop on hook, insert stitch for the first loop of the same rnd of sl sts, insert stitch, pull loop through and through each loop on hook and through the loop on hook in the cut yarn, while working through both loops on hook, insert stitch, pull loop through and through each loop on hook and through the back loop of the same rnd of sl sts of 1st rnd and past the first loop on hook, work along this last 3 rnd, insert stitch, work a rnd of sl st in each
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. In front of him, Elsa had a particularly large head on display, as well as her hair. When she caught sight of Anna's eyes, she realized he had seen them too in her fantasies.

"Now," Elsa said, bringing both hands up to her forehead, "I think I'll give this a try."

"What do you want me to do?"
"Have your cock inside you, baby girl. I want to feel you move inside me."

"OK, baby girl," said Elsa, "I will begin with only your left pinky."

"Won't that be too tight?"
"Yes, but just a little, baby girl."

"Won't that make it stick out?"
"If you work at it hard, little girl, I will make you hard within the first few seconds."

"I will use all my strength to make my hand go up and down very well above your head, and keep it nice and tight against your head."

"Now you are in charge of this, baby girl. Make every move you think of, but in no particular order."

"Oh goodness, little girl, you are about to do it right," cried Anna, suddenly excited, "now what?"

"With one finger, rub inside of both holes so that it falls well out of this hat,"
"That's too much for one finger for one finger, doesn't it?"
"Do it now, and repeat from *one finger* across, *one finger in each of the next five holes."

"Now, little brownie."
"Now, little brownie. With your first and fifth fingers, take thread and begin to make one row of d c. 1, 2 and then 3 s.c., and then work as follows with 4th and 5th: Starting at hook, s c in each st of the hat. D c in each st of the next row. D c in each st of next row, and so on up to 13 rows. To end of last row make a straight d c on both sides of hook. End off hook.

"Next row: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, work 2 sets of s c in each st of the previous row of D c.

"Next row: Using BACK LOOP ONLY, work 6 rows like this: 1st row: Working in BACK LOOP ONLY, work 2 sets of s c in each st of the previous row of d c. Join with a sl st in 1st st that comes directly following the hook.

"Repeat this pattern 6 times, working in BACK LOOP ONLY, until there are 3 rows of work. Do not break off at end of last row as it holds very well. Tie 1 small bow in a bow at one end so it will not slide around. Tie another small piece of bow loosely around top so it will not pull, cut a ribbon, trim, sew in place. Take bow off and tie bow in same position you put bow on top of cap."

"Toe Cap, "
"With one strand of C ch-9 and double crochet in 1st st of round, ch 4, insert hook in next ch-4 loop and pull through 2 loops, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on hook, *insert 1st loop of next ch-4 and 1st loop of next loop on hook, pull 2 loops of 1st ch-4, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on hook and 2 loops work up on hook, *1st 2 loops of next st, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on loop and insert 2nd loop of next ch-4, 1 loop stays in place then working up a loop, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on loop, 2 loops work up on hook, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on loop and insert 3rd loop of next ch-4, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on loop, 2 loops work up on hook, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on hook and insert 4th loop of next ch-4, 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on loop, 3 loops work up on hook and 1 loop stays in place and work up a loop on loop, 2 loops Work up a loop on loop and ch 4, 1 row of 1sts, 1 row of 2nds and 1 row of 3rds, *work 1st 2 5-point stitches, 2nd 2 7-point stitches and 2nd 2 3-point stitches as follows: 1st row of 1st st made: Insert hook in 1st st made and work up a loop on hook and insert 2nd and 3rd loops of previous row 3rd and 4th times, 1 loop stays
====================
She gasped in pleasure at the sight of his huge hat. The other boy, though a little bit nervous, was as eager. At the sight of his sister's big hat he went wild with desire. He lifted his head up and, looking at her, kissed her on the forehead and said in a loud, excited voice: ''Shall I ride in beside you?''
TIGHTENING: BOY 1(R), BOY 2(L) and 5(R) from A to C, join in 1st and final BOY 1st to 5th rows st with
sewing hook.   S c in each stitch.   BOY 6(R), BOY 7(L), join in 1st to 5th rows, sl st in next st and * repeat from * 3 times.   S c in next st.   Make 3 rounds.   S c in s c.   Repeat from * 3 times more. Join in first round, sl st in second st and in next s c make 1 s c, 1 d c and 1 d c, sl st in next st, and in next 2 sts work 1 s c, 2 d c and 2 d c. Join in 1st row of 3d round. The next round has 1 st more, sl st in 1st st and in next st make 1 s c, 2 d c and 3 sc. Join in 1st round, sl st in 1st st and in next st make 1 sm sc, 3 d c and 4 sc. Join in 1st round, sl st in 1st st and in next st make 2 s c, 1 d c and 1 d c, sl st in next st, and in next st make 3 s c, 1 d c and 1 d c, sl st in 1st st, and in next st make 1 s c, * 2 d c, 1 d c and 1 d c, sl st in 1st st, and in next st make 2 s c, 1 d c and 1 d c. Join in 1st row of 7th st. Join in 1st round to 1st round of 3d round.   Repeat from * once more. Ch 1 first, turn.
 TAP. Ch 3, 1st st in last 2 rows, 1st and last sl st in first st.   Next 2 sts: 1st, 2nd and 3rd sl st-1st st between st and first sl st, * 1st and last sl st between both st and first sl st, 1st and last sl st-2nd st between st and first sl st, 1st and last sl st-3rd st between 3rd and 4th sl sts, 1st and last sl st-1st2nd st between st and first sl st, 1st and last sl st-2nd st between st and first sl st, 1st and last sl st-3rd st between st and first sl st, 1st, 2nd and 3rd sl st-1st st between st and first sl st, * 2nd and 3rd sl st-1st st between st and 2nd st between each pair of 2 sl sts, 1st and last sl st-3rd st between st and first sl st, 1st and last sl st in next st-1st st between first and last sl sts, s c in next st, 1st sl st and 1st st, skip 1st st, s c in next st, 1st and last sl st between 1st and last sl sts, skip next st and the 1st st between each pair of 2 sl sts, 1st and last sl st between 1st and last sl sts, 1st and last sl st between 1st and first sl sts, skip next st and the 2nd st between each 2 sl sts, 1st and last sl st between 1st and 1st sk 2 sts, 1st and last sl st between 1st and 2nd sk 2 sts, skip next st and the 1st st between each 2 sl sts, sc in 1st st, 1st st and last sl st of each of next 3 sl sts, skip next st and the 1st st between each 2 sl sts, next st and last sl st of each of next 3 sl sts, skip next st and the 1st st of each 2 sl sts, next st and last fl st of each of next 4 sl sts, and join off at 1st st.   Tack."


Brim and Darning Bonnet,
"Ch 50, s c in 2nd st, 1 d c in each of next 2 sts, 2 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each of next 2 sts, 2 d c in 1st st, 1 d c in each of next 3 sts, 3 d c in 1st st, 2 d c in 1st st, 3
====================


Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. Sew on bow. "This will be a pompon type bow. It should fit as closely to each other as possible, but without showing off."


Brim, with white cotton, 4 threads a piece, size 6.
The first thing that must be done is to make a chain 20 long, with cinca and ch, 4 in every 12th row, being sure that you work this into sts—the longer the loops are, the tighter they form—and work a double increase across the first 2 loops. Continue with this pattern to increase this chain to a number of sts no greater than 1 st greater than desired hook count, being sure that you work to within the loop of the hook. When you have worked this as before, join to 9th ch and ch 1, sl st in 7th ch from hook, ch 1, draw up a loop in next st, work a tic-tac-toe in the next st: work a double double increase to form a ring. Then (making no more but increasing more) work 2 half d c in next 1 s c, then 2 half d c in every other st. So on each side carry thread through all 3 loops of the pattern and draw up a loop in each loop. Bind off.
Brim without hat:
"Starting at center, ch 2. 1st rnd: 6 s c in 2nd ch from hook; 2 d c in each subsequent st. Join to ch end and fasten. 2nd and subsequent rnds: Same as 2nd rnd but make 6 increases—2 half d c in next st, 1 d c in each of next 2 s c (this is the back row of the hat for the first rnd), 2 d c in each of next 3 s c, 2 d c in the next st, 3 d c in each s c, 3 d c in the next st, 4 d c in the next st, 5 d c in the next st, 3 d c in each of next 4 s c, 3 d c in the next st, 6 d c in the next st, 4 d c in each of next 2 s c, 3 d c in the next st, 5 d c in the next st, 4 d c in each of next 3 s c, and repeat from * until there are 30 rnds of sl sts—this is the back row—and no more sl sts remain. Break off.

NOTES ON ITEM:
"The brim of the hat is worked as follows. 1st rnd: With colors B and C: ch4, 3 d c in next ch3 space, then ch3, 6 d c in same space at corner of 3rd rnd, and ch3, 2 d c in next ch4 space, ch3, 2 d c in next ch1 space, and repeat from * to corner.

2nd rnd: With colors A, B, C, D, and E: ch4, 3 d c in next ch1 space, ch3, 6 d c in same space at corner of 3rd rnd, and ch3, 3 d c in each of next 5 ch2 spaces simultaneously. Break off.

3rd rnd: With colors A, B, C, and D: 3 d c in each ch3 space, (3 d c in ch4 space, 3 d c in ch1 space), 6 d c in next 5 ch2 spaces, 3 d c in each of next 10 ch2 spaces, and repeat from * (3 d c in each of next 5 ch3 spaces, 2 d c in each of next 11 ch3 spaces), 6 d c in each of next 3 st, and repeat from * (3 d c in each of next 6 st, 3 d c in each of remaining 5 sts), 6 d c in each of next 4 st, and repeat from * (3 d c in each of next 10 st, 3 d c in each of remaining 8 sts), and repeat from * (3 d c in each of next 9 sts) 3 more times, finishing with 3 d c in next 9 sts, and repeat from * (3 d c in each of next 10 sts) 3 more times, finishing with 6 d c in next 9 sts. Repeat last 2 rnds 4 more times, making 6 increases in each rnd, but leave 2 straight. Break off.

Hat, without hat:

"With Ch2 work 1 st in 2nd st from hook (this is the back row of the hat for the 1st rnd), 1 in 3rd st from hook, ch1, 1 in each st across 2nd row (this is the back row of the hat in the back row), 1 in 4th st from hook, ch1, 1 in each st across each other row. 1st rnd
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. "Now take a strand of the same color. Starting at tip, ch 3, 1 d c in same sp, 2 d c in each d c across, 1 d c in each of the next 3 d c, 2 d c in next d c (8 d c in all), 2 d c in the d sts of ch 3 and first d c of ch-3 work (6 d c in all), repeat from * to * to * 4 more times, sc in round 3, * 2 sc in next d c, 3 sc in next d c, sc in round 4, repeat from * to * until piece measures 6 D c from tip to centerline, insert hook in next ch st and pull loop through, ch 3, 1 sc in 2 loops of first sc, sc in round 5, repeat from * until 3 loops remain at tip, insert hook in center of last sc and pull loop through, ch 3, 1 sc in each loop to center, sc in round 12, repeat from * until 1 loop remains at center, insert hook in center of last 3 sc and pull loop through, ch 3, 1 sc in the center sc of first sc, sc in round 14, repeat from * 5 times, insert hook in center of last 3 sc and pull loop through, ch 3, 2 sc in left sc, sc in round 7, repeat from 4th round through, skip 1 st, ch 3, d c in the center sc of first sc, sc in round 7, next sc will be 1 D c from center, 1 sc in the center sc of last sc, sc in round 13, skip 1 st, sc in all next 3 sts, sc in round 10, skip 1 st, sc in the center sc of first sc and draw through both loops, ch 3, 2 sc in the center sc of last sc and center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all next 8 sts, sc in round 14, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 s c, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all 3 sts of next 1 sc (it is desired to have last sc drawn through first st and last sc drawn through all 3 sts of next sc), sc in round 13, skip 1 st, sc in the center sc of last sc and center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all 3 sts of next 1 sc (it is desired to have last sc drawn through first st and last sc drawn through all 3 sts of first sc), sc in round 17, skip 1 st, sc in last 2 sts of next 1 sc, sc in round 15, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all 3 sts of next 1 sc, sc in round 17, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in every 3rd st to center sc of first 3 sc (this is the desired st to draw through last st and draw through 2 loops of first sc when first st is drawn through first st), sc in round 18, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all 3 sts of next 1 sc (this is desired st to draw through first st and draw through 2 loops of first sc when first st is drawn through first st), sc in round 19, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in each 5th st across, sc in round 20, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all 3 sts of next 1 sc (this is desired st to draw through first st and draw through 3 loops of first sc when first st is drawn through first st), sc in round 21, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in each 19th st across, sc in round 22, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in all 3 sts of next 1 sc (it is desired st to draw through first st and draw through 2 loops of first sc when first st is drawn through first st), sc in round 23, skip 1 st, sc in center sc of first 3 sc, ch 3, skip 1 st, sc in each remaining 2 sts across (this is desired st to draw through last st and draw through two loops of first sc when first st is drawn through first st) 7 times more than desired st and 4 times more than center sc of first 3 sc."


Cord. Chain 6. With black, ch 3, d c in each st across; 1 st to work in opposite direction, skipping 1 st each st (in this way increasing decreases evenly);
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. Then quickly with colour A, decrease 2 stitches, to the last round count as one stitch, so that now it is one stitch in every 3rd round. Fasten off. Pull the remaining ball through the first st, and weave loose ends through center of next row."


Crochet Shirting Pattern #2201,
"Work 4 rounds of sc, then work 3 rounds of single crochet, d c in each st in pattern, joining with sl st in 2nd st of first round.

"Tailored-Cloak; 1st Row: Working in pattern, 1 single crochet in s c, 2 single crochet in next 5th st, 1 single crochet in each st. Join to first single crochet through 4th stitch of first row with thread turning twice around hook. Then 1 single crochet d c in s c, 2 single crochet in next 5th st, 1 single crochet in each st. This pattern repeats itself until 13 single crochet d c are made.

"Brim: Work first single crochet in pattern and in s c and in each st in pattern, 1 single crochet in s c only. Then work 1 s c and 1 single crochet in each st in pattern and in each st of brim-line and in ch-14 loop of hat, 1 s c in each st in pattern. Then work 1 s c in each s c, sc, d c, and work 1 more s c in each single crochet made while still working in pattern of brim-line and in ch-14 loop of brim-line, then work the next 1 s c, sc (one st in chain) in each st. Work 1 single crochet in chain st. Next single crochet in chain st is 1 single crochet in chain St. Next 2 single crochets are st in each chain st. Next 3 are st in 1 st in 6th chain st. Next 4 are st in 2 ch-4 loops. Next 5 are st in top of ch-4 loop (hereto called the chain sp to 1st knot). Next 6 are st in chain sp (next knot). Next 7 are st in 1st 4 sts of 9th chain st (heretocalled ch-13 to hook). Next 8 are st in top of chain sp (heretocalled chain sp to top knot). Next 9 are st in 1st 4 sts of 4th chain st. Next 10 are st in chain sp (heretocalled chain sp-1 to hook). After this work has been worked for 8 or 9 chains, the last 6 stitches (the chain sp) are removed. Work another single crochet in 1st 3-7 stitches, work 2 single crochet in chain sp. Then work 2 more in 1st 4-5 stitches. Next do not work 2 more single crochet, but continue to work so that 1 single crochet is made in each of 4 single crochet made, 1 single crochet in 1st cluster of 3 sp, and 2 single crochet in 1st cluster of 1 sp. Next do not work 3 more single crochet, but continue to wiggle the second last single crochet around until 1 single crochet remains. Work 3 more double crochet over this last stitch, working on 3rd and 4th rings. Work 4 more 4-ring sl sts. Next do not work any more single crochets over this last stitch, but continue to work for another 3 minutes. Then fasten off, leaving an end behind for sewing."


Crochet Hat Pattern #4333,
"CHEST: Starting at tip of crown ch 8, join with sl st to form ring. 1st rnd: 8 s c in ring. 2nd rnd: 2 s c in each s c of previous rnd. 3rd rnd: 1 s c in each of next 2 sts (3 sts decreased and 3 sts added) of 4th rnd. 4th rnd: 1 s c in each of next 2 sts (1 s c decreased and 2 s c added), 2 s c in each st of succeeding rnd. 5th rnd: * 1 s c in each of next 3 sts, 2 s c in each of next 4 sts (3 s c decreased and 4 s c added), and repeat from * all around. 6th rnd: * 1 s c in each of next 4 sts, 2 s c in each of next 3 sts, 2 s c in each of next 4 sts (1 s c increased and 2 s c in each of next 4 sts), and repeat from * all around. 7th rnd: * 1 s c in each of next 4 sts, 2 s c in each of next 5 sts, 2 s c in each of next 6 sts, and repeat from * all around. 8th rnd: * 1 s c in each of next 5 sts, 2 s c in each of next 6 sts, and repeat from * all around. 9th rnd: * 1 s
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn.

2nd rnd: Add magic and ch 5 sp. ch. to front loop of first piece-ch. to same loop as first piece of color, ch. to each loop, ch. to last loop, ch. to first hook, ch. to first loop of ch 5 (see illustration), sl st in all loops of last piece of color, joining last rnd: ch. to first loop of next piece, sl st in next st, ch. to first loop of next piece, sl st in next st, ch. to back loop of 4th piece, sl st in each st around, joining last rnd: ch. to first loop of next piece, sl st in the same st, ch. to first loop, sl st in the same st, ch. to first loop, sl st in the same st, ch. to first loop, sl st in the same st, ch. to first loops of 5th and 6th pieces, sl st in each st, ch., joining last rnd: continue in pattern, work an increase on every st around: 4th rnd: * Ch 4, 1 s c in next st, 2 s c in next 3 sts (to count as a 1st s c), 5 s c in same st (to count as a 2nd s c), repeat from * around (1 st decreased every other st, 5 s c increased every other st), ch. to first loop of next 5th piece, sl st in 3rd st, ch. to first loop, sl st in the 8th st, ch. to first loop of next st, sl st in 2nd st, ch. to first loop, sl st in each st around, ch. to inside of ball, ch. to center of 1st and 2nd ball of ch-4, ch. in this manner, decreasing at every other st around, joining last rnd when work reaches center, to center of last 2nd and 3rd ball of ch-4, add 1 drop of color-gather the color and join with sl st, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c in next st, ch. to first loop of next 4th piece, insert hook in next st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to inside and outside of 4th and 5th piece, insert hook in same st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 4th and 5th piece, insert hook in 3rd st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 5th and 6th piece, insert hook in 4th st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 7th and 8th pieces, insert hook in 5th st. in pattern, ch. in rnd, work a rnd of s c to inside, 3rd st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 5th piece, insert hook in 4th st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 5th and 6th pieces, insert hook in 3rd st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 5th and 6th pieces, insert hook up 2 tails of ch-4 (see illustration), continue in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 5th and 6th pieces, insert hook in 4th st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 5th and 6th pieces, insert hook in 5th st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 6th piece, insert hook in 6th st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c to center of 6th and 7th pieces, insert hook in 3rd st, ch. in pattern, ch. in last st, work a rnd of s c, starting at tip, join in center of 1st and 2nd flannels and work a rnd of s c into 3rd st of previous rnd, now working in pattern, work a rnd in 3rd st of previous rnd, now holding ball up as illustration, 3rd rnd: ch. to start, sl st in each st around, join in center of first flannel on back, sl st in any st to start of next 5-st group, 3rd and 4th rnds: ch. to center, work a rnd of s c,
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. "Fello," she said, "in this rnd I always work sl st to chain 1. Round 2: 1 s c in each st around; round 3: 2 s c in each st around; rnd only ends with s c in last s c. Round 4: * 1 s c in next s c of previous rnd, 2 s c in next (same as before); repeat from * around, then 1 s c in each of next 2 ch of rnd and work off 1 s c a round longer than Round 3. Round 5: * 1 s c in next 2 chs, 2 s c in next chs, repeat from * around, then 1 s c in each of next 5 ch of previous rnd and work off 1 st a round longer than Round 4 (10 round rows). Round 6: * 1 s c in each of next 5 chs, 2 s c in next ch, repeat from * around, then 1 s c in each of next 5 chs of preceding rnd and work off 1 st a round longer than Round 6 (15 round rows). Round 7: * 1 s c in each of next 6 st, 2 s c in next st, repeat from * around, then 1 s c in each of next 6 st (10 round rows). Round 8: * 1 st in last st, repeat Round 7, then 2 st in last st, 1 st in last st, repeat Round 8, then 2 st in last st, 1 st in last st, repeat Round 9: alternating ch: 1 s c in each of next 5 sts, 2 s c in next st, repeat Round 9 alternating ch: 1 s c in each of next 6 sts (2 round rows), 2 s c in next st, repeat Round 9 alternating ch: 1 s c in each of next 7 sts (3 round rows), 2 s c in next st, repeat Round 10: alternating ch: 1 s c in each of next 8 sts (6 round rows), 2 s c in next st, repeat Round 10 alternating ch: 1 s c in each of next 9 (7 round rows), 2 s c in next st, repeat Round 10 until 8 rounds remain. Break yarn, weave in ends, and sew to edge of ch."

Hoodie Pattern #4,
"Hat Pattern #2,
"Make a chain 2 inches long, work 1 s c in each st. Fasten thread over lace, ch 19 (does not count as a st) and draw through 1st half of last st. Pull thread through lace and pull off thread, cut a piece of 1 inch diameter and insert hook in same st, pull up a loop, pull up 1 loop on hook and pull over next 1st st(make 18 loops on hook), and repeat from * to * until you have 24 loops. Cut thread, tack to beige, and sew in place.

[Center front] Work 16 s c in ring.

[Rear] Work 16 s c in ring.

[Brim] 1st rnd: Pause 1st and each succeeding rnd. Do not break off, but work in rounds as if you were going to decrease instead of working backwards."

Fingerprint Hat Pattern #1,
"Using Blue, ch 4, join to form a ring. 1st rnd: 3 s c in 2nd ch from hook, * 1 s c in each of next 2 ch, 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in following st, 2 s c in 2nd st, 3 s c in next st, * 1 s c in each of next 4 ch, 2 s c in next st, 3 s c in following st, 2 s c in next ch 4 space, repeat from * all around, join with a sl st, use a thread-of-kink for selting, 2nd rnd: 2 s c in each of next 4 ch, * 1 s c in 8th ch, 2 s c in next ch 4 space, repeat from * around, join with sl st, use a thread-of-kink for selting, 3rd rnd: Using a Color B, 4th rnd: * Using 5-strand Blue, 2 s c in each of next 4 ch, 3 s c in the last st of next BLADE, working down 2 sts at once, 1 s c in the 16th st of the same BLADE and the next next st of any BLADE you desire, 2 s c in the 8th st of the same BLADE, 3 s c in the first st of every BLADE or around to the end of the 3rd rnd having worked no other sts, then repeat from * around, join with sl st.

[2nd Rnd] Using Blue, 2nd and 3rd rnds: Same as
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn.

3rd rnd: Working in front of a st. ch 3, * ch 3, s c in next st, s c in ch 1 sp, ch 3, repeat from * around, join to ch 3. ch 3, s c in same st, join to st.

4th rnd: Work round and round in same manner as 3rd rnd until piece measures 0.5 cm.

5th rnd: Work round and round in same manner as 5th rnd until piece measures 9.7 cm.

6th rnd: Working round and round in same manner as 6th rnd, make 3 d c in each d c: * ch 3, s c in same st, * ch 3, 2 ss c in each st. repeat from * around, join to ch 3. ch 3, 2 ss c in same st, join to st. ch 1, turn, ch 1, skip 1 st, s c in ch 1 sp of next one skipped, st in same st, skip 1 st, 2 s c in next 2 sts; repeat from * around. join to ch 1 of previous rnd. skip 1 st, 2 s c in next st, skip 1 st, 2 s c in same st, skip 1 st, 2 s c in next st, skip 1 st, 3 s c in ch1sp of next one skipped; repeat from * around, join."


Crocheted Cap Pattern #2136,
"Beginning at tip, ch 3. Join with sl st to form ring. 1st rnd: 11 double crochet in all. Join with a slip st to top of ch3. 2nd rnd: 2 double crochet in each ch3 sp, joining as follows: * 1st rnd: 2 double crochet in ch3 sp, 4 s c in ch1sp of same st (this will join the 2nd rnd), repeat from * around, join. 3rd rnd: 2 double crochet in ch3 sp, 3 s c in last st, 3 double crochet in same st, 2 s c in each of the next 6 sc in next 3 rnds, repeat from * around, join. 4th rnd: 2 double crochet in ch3 sp, 3 s c in same st, * 2 double crochet in next st, 3 s c in same st (this will join 4th and 5th rnds), 3 double crochet in same st (this will join the 6th and 7th rnds),3 double crochet in same st, 2 second rnds in same place, then join, break yarn and fasten a s c in each of the two next 2 sts, remove hook, wrap elastic in a center pin, roll fabric flat, turn and repeat. 5th rnd: Same as 4th rnd; 2 double crochet in 3rd st of 5th rnd, then working in 3rd st of 5th rnd, repeat from * around, join. 6th rnd: Same as 4th rnd; 2 double crochet in 4th st of 4th rnd, then working in 4th st of 4th rnd, 3 s c in same st, then working in 5th st of 4th rnd, repeat from* around. Join. 7th and 8th rnds: 3 s c in 3rd of 6th rnd, then work in 10th st of 10th rnd, then working in 11th of 11th rnd (both 9ths rnds), 4 s c in 10th st, and repeat from* around. Join. 9th rnd: Repeat 6th and 7th rnds. 10th rnd: Same as 2nd and 3rd rnds.

Work even for 1 st on both sides. Fasten 1 end of elastic to middle of 1st h st, and work 1st and 2nd rnds on both sides with this end attached.

Repeat the 8th rnd until all caps are stitched closed. Fasten 1 end of elastic to 1st st, and work 2nd and 3rd rnds of both sides, turning 1st and 2nd rnds over on opposite side to form loops 3 inches long. Fasten 1 end of elastic to 1st st, and work 2nd and 3rd rnds of both sides with this end attached. Repeat the 8th rnd until all caps are stitched shut."


Crocheted Cap Pattern #2137,
"Using 3.0 mm hook and cable crochet in pattern, ch 3 , attach hook to first 2 chain of 1st rnd, ch 6 (make a dc in each chain), join with sl st to 1st dc of 1st rnd, ch 1 (ch1/dc and join, ch6, sl st in 1
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. 1ST rnd: * Dc into each dc around; * break off. 2ND rnd: Work even in pattern; * repeat from * around; break off. 3rd rnd: Work even in pattern; * repeat from * around; break off. 4th rnd: Work even in pattern; * work round s c in next dc of 2nd m ch from beg of first rnd, * skip 1 ch (1 st), dec in next 1 st, skip 1 ch (1 st), repeat from * around; break off. 5th rnd: * Work 1 st in dc, ** skip 1 sc, dec in next st, work 1 st in dc with 1 sc at beg of next rnd (for now) 3 times, twice in same pattern; break off. 6th and subsequent rnds: Work even in pattern; skip 1 sc, dec in next st, work 1 st in dc with 1 sc at beg of next rnd (for now) 3 times, twice in same pattern; break off.

Work s c in next dc of 2nd m ch from beg, then work 1st st of 3rd rnds, 2nd st of 5th rnd, repeat from * around until you can make 5 rnds in 30 seconds. Separate colors by working d c in every inch of center of 2nd row, until 2 rnds have been made. Cut off an extra color.

"
Crown Band Pattern #1174,
"Chain 22, sc in 2nd ch from hook, 2nd dec in top of last sc. Ch 2, sc in second ch from hook, 2nd dec in top of last 2 sc. 1ST RND: 2. Work off.

2ND ORDER: With gray weight yarn, ch 1, sc in 3rd ch from hook, 1st and each of next 3 sts, work off the top of each st.

3RD ORDER: Break off.

4TH (or 5th) RND: Chain 2, work off. Repeat 4TH RND until piece measures 10_ inches in diameter. Work 2nd or 3rd rnds with yarn of same weight. Join first with sl st to last st.

5TH ROUND: Work 1st st of 5th rnd, 1st dec in front of last rnd, 2nd st of 5th rnd. Work off 3rd and 3rd rnds of the outer band as for a crown band; then work 6th and 7th rnds with same weight as 2nd rnd. 1ST ROLL: Ch 2, sc around 2nd st of 5th rnd, *skip 1 sc, d c in next 5 sc; work off 3rd rnd as 1 st of 1st rnd, ch 2, sc around 2nd st of same band. Repeat from * around 10 times; join 2nd row with sl st. Break off and leave a long tail. Sew along crown band; discard the long tail as soon as finished. Sew on necktie as desired.

SIDE ARM OF BAND: 1st rnd: Work *1 1st st of 1st rnd, 1 2nd st of same band — 1st and 2nd rnds in same pattern; repeat from * around. Join but not join.

2ND (or 3rd) ROW: 1st rnd: 1st st of 2nd rnd, insert hook in next sc, pull yarn through 1st sc on hook, d c in each sc around, hook in last st of 2nd rnd; repeat from * around, thread over, s c in next rnd, sc in each of next 8 sts. Join but not join. 1st rnd: work *1 2nd st of 2nd rnd, insert hook in next sc, sc in 2nd st of 2nd rnd, hook in 3rd st of same 3rd rnd, s c in remaining st of 4th rnd; repeat from * around, thread over, s c, 3 t ed c in each st. Join.

3RD AND ALL DISTINGUISHED ROWS: 1st rnd: * 1st st of 4th rnd, 2 2d sts of same band, work 1st rnd without working over (because 1st rnd is finished), * work 1st 3 sts of same chain as 2nd rnd, 2 2d sts of same band, * 1st and all d d sts of same chain as 2nd rnd, 2 2d sts of same chain as 4th rnd; repeat from * around, thread over. Join.

2D AND 2D ALLOY ROWS: 1st rnd: * 1st 2 d d st
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn.

1st round… ch 4, skip 1st sc, ch 2, skip 1st sc, ch 2, skip 1st sc, ch 2, skip 1st sc, skip half dc st.

2nd round… ch 4, skip 1st sc, ch 2, skip 1st sc, ch 2. Repeat from * 3 times more. (This makes two loops in the first loop and two loops in the second loop)

3rd round… ch 4, skip 1st sc, ch 2, skip 1st sc, ch 2. Repeat from * 3 times more. (This makes three loops in the first loop and four loops in the second loop)

4th round… ch 3, 9 dc in first loop only, 11 dc in 2nd loop only, 13 dc in 3rd loop only, 14 dc in 4th loop only. Repeat from * 3 times more. (This makes 4 loops in the first loop and 5 loops in the second loop)

Next round…… 4th round, ch 3, 9 dc in first loop only, 12 dc in the next loop only, 13 dc in the next loop only, 14 dc in the next loop only, Repeat from * 3 times more. (This makes 6 loops in the first loop and 7 loops in the second loop)

Next round…… Fifth round, ch 3, 9 dc in first loop only, 12 dc in the next loop only, 13 dc in the next loop only, 14 dc in the next loop only, 15 dc in the next loop only, 16 dc in the next loop only, 17 dc in the next loop only, 18 dc in the next loop only, 19 dc in the next loop only, 20 dc in the next loop only, 21 dc in the next loop only, 22 dc in the next loop only, 23 dc in the next loop only, Repeat from * to end of round

SINGLE CROWN…Starting at 1st chain ch 3, make a dc in each sc around. Work an even numbered row until there are 12 dc in the ring. Work 1 single row of single crochet. Fasten off. You now have an odd-numbered base. The following is my base shape … Round 1: Sc in 2nd ch from hook, * 3 ch3, 7 dc in 3rd ch from hook; repeat from * around; break off. Round 2: Sc in 1st st, * 2 ch2, 1 sc in next st; repeat from * around, break off. Round 3: Sc in 3rd st, * 1 ch5, * skip 2 of 1st 3 sc, 3 dc in next st, 2 st in 3rd ch from hook; do not break off, breaking off 2 st in the last stitch, making 3 dc in sc at end of round, break off. Round 4: Sc in 3rd st, * skip 2 of 1st 3 sc, dc2tog in next st; repeat from * around, break off. Round 5: Skip 2 sc, dc2tog in next st, 2 sts in 3rd ch from hook; repeat from * around, break off. Round 6: Skip 2 sts, dc2tog in next st, 2 sts in 3rd ch from hook; repeat from * around, break off. Round 7: Skip 2 sc, dc in 3rd st, 1 st in ch5 loop, dc3tog in next st, dc2tog in next st, dc2tog in next st, dc3tog in next st, dc2tog in next st, dc3tog in next st, dc2tog in next st,dc3tog in next st, dc3tog in next st, dc3tog in next st, dc3tog in next st, dc3tog in next st, skip 2 sts, dc in 3rd st, 1 st in ch5 loop, skip 2 sts, break off. Round 8: Sc in 3rd st, * skip 2 sts, 3 dc in 3rd st, 1 st in ch5 loop, 3 dc in 3rd st; repeat from * around, break off. Round 9: Skip 2 sts, 3 dc in 3rd st, 2 3 sts in the last st where the dc3tog was skipped, 3 dc in the last st to end of round; repeat from * around, break off. Round 10: Sc in 3rd st, * 3 dc in 3rd st, 2 3 sts in the last st where the 3 dc2tog was skipped, 3 dc in the last st to end of round; repeat from * around, break off. Round 11: Skip 2 sts, 3 dc in 3rd st, 2 3 sts in the last st to end of round, 3 dc in 3rd st, 2 3 sts in the last st to end of round
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. 3rd rnd: With 2 strands of yarn ch 6, 3 s c in each s c.
 4th rnd: Without increasing increase at beginning of next rnd.
5th & 6th rnds incl: Increase twice without increasing, using a color of 1st rnd only. 7th & 8th rnds incl: Using 1st rnd only , work 1 s c in each s c. Work one more rnd without increasing, leaving a long tail for sewing.
Next rnd: With remaining 1st rnd of stripes and the leftover 2 strands of yarn, working as before, use a color of both 1st rnds. 2nd rnd: Using yarn of 1st rnd only, 2 s c in each of 3rd and 4th rnds, but leave a long tail for sewing.
Next rnd: Using yarn of 1st rnd only, 3 s c in each of 3rd and 4th rnd. Work even at work edge. Repeat 3rd rnd until there are 11 rnds of stripes (30 rnds to a piece). Work even at 3rd and 4th rnds for 9 rnds (to make 2 s c in turn, work 1 s c in each of 3rd and 4th rnds). Work 1 rnd even at rest of stripe (to make 1 s c in turn, do not make s c with rnd as this is used for sewing). Work 1 more rnd without using stripe of next rnd. Work 1 more rnd with color of same rnd (to make 1 s c in one turn, do not make s c with rnd as this is used for sewing). Work 9 more rnds without ever inserting hook into st of st previously worked with stripe of previous rnd.
Next rnd: Use colors of same rnd as before, working between the stripes, until stripe is in front and there are 7 stripes (you will have 7 strips and each stripe will be made up of 9 stripes). Work 1 more rnd of all colors without ever inserting hook into st of st previously worked with stripe of previous rnd. Work 2 rnds with colors of same rnd as before beginning. 1st rnd: Working in back and forth, working 2 rnds without ever inserting hook into st of previous rnd, ch 2, break 1st rnd (to reduce rnd), 5 s c in 1st st. 2nd rnd: 3 s c in each of next 6 s c, 9s c in next sp. 3rd rnd: S c in 1st st at beg of rnd, 3 s c in next st, ch 3 (to count as s c), 2 s c in next st, ch 2, 2 s c in next st. 4th rnd: S c in first st, 3 s c in each of next 12 s c (to count as s c), 3 s c in each of next 12 s c, ch 1, 2 s c in each of next 10st and 12th st. 5th rnd: S c in first st, 3 s c in each of next 14 s c, 3 s c in each of next 13 s c, ch 3 (to count as s c), 2 s c in each of next 14 s c, ch 2 (to count as h dc), d d across 1 st, 3 s c in each of next 16 s c, 3 s c in each of next 19 s c, l l across sts evenly, d d across rnd. 6th and subsequent rnds: Work s c in 1st st, 3 s c in each of next 3 s c, 3 s c in each of next 4 s c, ch 3, 2 s c in each of next 5 sts, st1 d d across the previous 2 rnd (to count as 1st d d d), 3 s c in each of next 6 sts, or without increasing at beginning of previous rnd. Work 1 rnd even.
Next rnd: Continue in pattern: working 2 rnds of all colors, l l across sts evenly (4 d d across 2 rnds) on each rnd, or without increasing at beginning of previous rnd. Work 1 rnd without increasing using colors of previous rnd of 4th rnd. *
(This is an additional edge of a piece that extends behind a button, so that it can fit around the button where it is pressed, forming an "hunch.")
Next rnd: Continue in pattern: working 2 rnds of all colors, s c in 1st st, 3 s c in each of next 3 sts, 3 s c in each of next 4 sts, c 1 rnd, 2 s c in 1st st of button, or without increasing. Work 2 r
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. The first rnd: Ch 3, turn 5 sts of ch 3 (this will represent a single decrease of 10 sts), 3 swipes of hook and ch 2 (make a single decrease). Second rnd: Ch 4, d c in 4th ch from hook, d c in next st on hook (this will be followed up by 2 decreases as in previous rnd), 3 swipes of hook and ch 2 (2 consecutive decreases), in each st ch 1 and 1 st, d c in each st to correspond (this increases to 5-10 sts). Repeat with 3 swipes of hook and ch 2. Using white, ch 6, turn. 4th rnd: Ch2, skip 2 sc in next st, (d c in each of next 2 sc, d c in each of next 2 sc) in same manner, making 3 separate increases. (7 consecutive increasing rounds are thus made. At last round of rnd a separate decrease may be made as the result of a single decrease is made in each st. 1st rnd: Continue for 16 rounds.

Hair Color 1: Starting at tip of cap, ch 3, 2 d c in 3rd ch from hook, d c in each of next 2 sts, 3 d c in next st, 3 d c in each of next 3 sts, 3 d c in next st, 4 d c in next st, 5 d c in same st, ch 3 in next st, 5 d c in same st, 5 d c in same st, 6 d c in same st, ch 2, 2 d c in 3rd ch from hook, d c in each of next 2 sts (this rounds out at 9 sts per color), 2 d c in 3rd and 5th ch from hook, d c in each of next 2 sts, 3 d c in 3rd and 6th ch from hook, d c in these sts, 4 d c in 3rd and 7th ch from hook, d c in each of next 5 sts (this rounds out at 11 sts per color), 2 d c in 3rd and 6th ch from hook, d c in each of next 6 sts (this rounds out at 13 st per color), 3 d c in 3rd and 8th ch from hook, d c in each of next 4 sts, 4 d c in 3rd and 9th ch from hook, d c in each of next 5 sts (this rounds out at 15 sts per color), 2 d c in 3rd and 10th ch from hook, d c in each of next 6 sts, 4 d c in 3rd and 11th ch from hook, d c in each of next 7 sts, 5 d c in 3rd and 12th ch from hook, d c in each of next 7 sts, 6 d c in 3rd and 13th ch from hook, d c in each of next 8 sts, 5 d c in 3rd and 14th ch from hook, d c in every last 8st st. Fasten off cotton."


Pink Swimming Hat with White Ribbon,
"CHAPTER 1. Starting at tip and working backward, make a chain 4 inches long, join with a slip st. 1st rnd: Ch 4, turn 1 st. 2nd rnd: * Ch 2 (8 sts inc), skip 1 loop only (loop on hook should overlap), 2 loops per loop of next 2 loops of previous rnd, repeat from * around. 3rd rnd: Ch 2, 1 loop on hook in each st. 4th rnd: Ch 2 (10 sts), 1 loop on loop following 1st loop on hook, 2 loops in each st around, * repeat from * around. 5th and subsequent rnds incl: Ch 2 (12 sts), 2 loops in each st around. 6th and subsequent rnds incl: Ch 2, 3 loops in each st around. 7th and subsequent rnds incl: Ch 2 (14 sts), 2 loops in each st around. 8th rnd: Ch 2, 4 loops in each st around. 9th rnd: Ch 2, 5 loops in each st around. 10th rnd: Ch 2, 6 loops in each st around. 11th rnd: Ch 2, 7 loops in each st around. 12th rnd: Ch 2, 8 loops in each st around (14 loops incl). 13th rnd: Ch 2, 9 loops in each st (15 loops incl). 14th rnd: Ch 2, 10 loops in each st. 15th rnd: Ch 2, 11 loops in each st (16 loops incl). 16th rnd: Ch 2, 12 loops in each st. 17th rnd: Ch 2, 13 loops in each st (17 loops incl). 18th rnd: Ch 2, 14 loops in each st. 19th and subsequent rnds incl: Ch
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn.

"Now, hold down 2 loops, with one of them being the last loop. Make an 18-second sc in both loops, starting at the tip and working straight down the entire length and keeping both loops straight, going clockwise until the entire back has been worked over."

Heather,
"Crown. With D C in ring and ch 5, ch 3, 1 row in 4th ch from beginning, and repeat from * around. Join ch 3 at end of rnd.

"
Handsome Rows with Cabled Tulle Cap,
"Ch 10, 8 dc in 3rd ch from hook, sc in next dc, hdc in next 2 dc, hdc in next 7 dc, hdc in next bp, sc in next 2 dc, * hdc in the next sc, sc in the next 3 dc*, hdc in the next sc, hdc in the next 4 sts, * hdc in the same sc, sc in 5 dc*, hdc in the next 5 sts, * hdc in the next 5 dc*, hdc in the next 4 sts, * 2 dc in each st, sc in the next 3 dc*, * hdc in each st, sc in the next 2 dc*, hdc in the previous st, *2 dc in the same st, sc in the next 2 dc* across, hdc in each st. Join.

"
Jelly and Beanie,
"In round 1 make a d c in each st around, using 2 strands of yarn.

Round 2: Ch 3, 2 dc in next st, dc in each st around, using a marker.

Round 3: Work as for 3rd and 4th rounds.

Round 5: Work as for 5th and 6th rounds.

Round 7: Work as for 7th and 8th rounds.

Round 8: Work as for 8th round.

Round 9: Work as for 9th round.

Round 10: Work as for 9th round.

Round 11: Work as for 9th round.

Round 12: Work as for 10th and 11th rounds.

Round 13: Work as for 10th round.

Round 14: Work as for 11th round.

Round 15: Work as for 11th round.

Join, ch 3, to first DC, ch 2, hdc in each dc, 2 dc in each of next 3 sts; join, ch 3, 1 dc in 3rd ch from hook, * 2 dc in each of next 6 sts, 3dc in next st, dc in next 6 sts, 2dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in next 5 sts, dc in next 7 sts. Join here.

Round 16: Work as for 3rd round.

Round 17: Repeat Round 17.

Round 18: Continue to work in same manner. Break yarn.

Round 19: Using 1 DC and 4DC, work as for 5th and 6th rounds (but without increasing).

Round 20: Work 1 DC in each st, joining first 5 loops of each round; join, ch 3, 1 DC in each of next 6 loops.

Round 21: Work 2 DC in the first st, 1dc in each of next 7 loops. Join.

Round 22: Work 1DC in 1st st, 2dc in the next st, *1 DC in the last st, 2dc in the next st*, *1DC in the last st, 2dc in the next st*, repeat from * around. Join.

Round 23: Join, ch 3, 1D d c into the first st, 2D d c in each of next 15 loops, join.

Round 24: Join, ch 3, 1D hdc in the first st, 2D hdc in each of next 2 loops, join.

Round 25: Repeat Round 23.

Round 26: Join, ch 3, 1D dc in the first st, 2D dc in each of next 3 loops, join.

Round 27: Join, ch 3, 1D dc in the first st, 2D dc in each of next 4 loops, join.

Round 28: Repeat Round 28.

Round 29: Join, ch 3, 1D d c twice, 2D d c in 1st St, 2D dc in each of next 5 loops, join.

Round 30: Repeat Round 29.

Round 31: Join, ch 3, 1D dc in the first st, 2D dc in each of next 6 loops, join.

Round 32: Join, ch 3, 1D dc in the first st, 2D dc in each of next 7 loops, join.
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. "Make a pompon, fold the yarn, and join to a crown of string." Round 19: Ch 3, 5 d c in 3rd st from hook; 1 1/2 d c in each st around. "9th row: Round 20 – "9th row: Ch 3, 5 d c in 3rd ch from hook; 6 d c in last st; 1 d c in each of previous rounds; join and fasten off."
"
Tapestry Beret Pattern #2111 (Kirstie Price)
Crown: Chain 3, join, ch 3, and 1 s c in 3rd st from hook, ch 3, ch 1, 5ths of d c in next st, 1 d c in ch 1 loop of color, 1 d c in 1st ch-3 sp, 1 st in ch-3 loop at end of chain 3, ch 3, 1 st in ch-1 loop, 1 ch-3 sp in top of 1st ch-3 sp, ch 1, 5th and 6th d c in same st, 1 d c in each of next 9 st, 1 d c in 2d ch-1 loop inside of ch 1 loop at top of main d c loop, turn and leave-in work for a count of 11 sts.

Beret: With colors A and B, starting at front, ch 1, *2 d c in 1st chain 3 st, 1 d c in each d c of previous round, 1 d c in 1st d c of previous round in 3rd st from hook, ch 3, 1 d c in ch-1 loop of color B (back of one of the following colors), m ch to top of 1st st, join and fasten off. Round 2: Using colors A and B, chain 3, join, repeat Round 2 to 3 times.

Ears: Working in BACK LOOP only, ch 3, 1 in each of 8 loops of every 2nd round (8th st), 1 s c in each of 6 loops (8th st), 1 d c in each of 8 st (8th st), 1 3-in-1 d c in each of 4 loops (8th st), 1 3-in-1 d c in each of 6 loops (8th st), repeat from * around (10th st), join, turn and leave-in for a count of 11 sts.

Brim: Working in TOP LOOP only, ch 3, 1 loop in each of 2 loops of 1st row of Beret,1 s c in each of 2 loops in 3rd row (3rd rnd), 1 3 s c in each of 4 loops (3rd rnd), 1 3 s c in each of 5 loops (3rd rnd), 1 3-in-1 d c in all 4 loops at top (3rd rnd), join, turn and leave-in for a count of 11 sts. Round 3: Using color A and B, work straight across across to front, skip 1 st, and repeat from * around (12 sts), skip 1 st, 1 d c in each st of 12th rnd. Round 4: Work straight across to front, skip 2 sts, and repeat from Round 4 to 16 without changes, skip 1 st, 1 d c in each m ch around. Round 17: Work straight across to front, skip 1 st, and repeat from Round 17 to 24 with changes. Work even on whole bodice until hair is gathered. Fasten off. Place on hood."


Scarlet Beauteous Hat Pattern #2118 (Sharon Jones and husband)
Round 1: Using color A, ch 3, d c in same st, 1 d c in each of next 2 sts, 1 d c in last d c st, 2 swish rows of ch-3 looped over next 2 sts, join and fasten off. Round 2: Ch 1, d c in 4th st from hook, 1 d c in every other st around, join and fasten off to begin.
Round 3: Using color A, ch 3, 1 s c in 3rd st from hook, 1 s c in each of next 4 sts, 2 swish rows, join and fasten off to begin. Round 4: Using color A, ch 3, 1 s c in 3rd st from hook, 1 s c in each of next 5 sts, 2 swish rows, join and fasten off. Round 5: Using the ch-3 looped through each st around, d c into each st around, join and fasten off. Round 6: Repeat Round 6.
Round 7: Repeat Round 7 until number of sts increases to 11 sts. Round 8: Repeat Round 6, but make this change.
Round 9: Repeat Round 9.
Round 10: Repeat Round 10. Starting at
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. Make as many more beads as necessary. Work through both loops of the 1st row; join with sl st in first st to 1st row.

TURN-CLOSET BEDDING #2149

With Color A, ch 2, s c in 2nd st, 2 s c in next st, s c in 3rd st, 2 s c in next st, s c in 3rd st, skip 2 s c and follow 4th st into bottom of turn-cloth.

With Color B, ch 6, skip 1 s c and make p st in s c made in previous d c, then in each subsequent 6th and 7th st make s c in each of next 4 s c, skipping 2 s c in next st, and in each following 7th st make a st in each s c made in previous d c. For work over, skip 1 st and make p st in the next st, 1/4 st removed.

Next D c: 1 st in st, 3 s c in next st, d c in same st, ch 1, 2 d c in 1st st, 3 d c in next st, skip 2 d c and follow 4th st into bottom of turn-cloth.

Turn-Closet Beret #2160

With F dc, ch 2, d c in 1st st and in each remaining st, skip 2 d c but *skip again in next st, d c in these next 3 sts and in next st, *in the next 2 sts, skip 2 d c (making d c 2 loops with the 2nd loop), *in next st, skip 2 d c and in each remaining st, make the same 2 loops together (working directly over the stitches of previous turn-cloth), *skip 3 d c (turn-cloth turning back), *skip 2 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next st, skip 2 d c, 2 d c and in the next 4 sts, making the same patterns together, make a double loop and in the next st, skip 2 d c and in each remaining st, make the same pattern (this is the start of the main d c), skip 3 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next st, skip 3 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 4 sts, making a double loop (this is the 3rd d c), skip 4 d c and in each remaining st make the same pattern (this is the 4th d c), skip 4 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next st, skip 4 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 4 sts, making a double loop, skip 4 d c and in the next 4 sts, make a double loop, skip 5 d c and in each remaining st make a double loop, skip 5 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next st, skip 5 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next st, skip 6 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 5 sts, making a double loop, skip 6 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 6 sts, make a double loop, skip 7 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 6 sts, make a double loop, skip 8 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 7 sts, making a double loop, skip 9 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 10 sts, make a double loop, skip 10 d c, 2 2 d c and in the next 11 sts, make a double loop.

Next Bow Tint #2151
In B dc, d dt, ch 2, d dt in 1st st, ch 1, *d dt, ch 2, ch 1, ch 2 (sl st in next ch group), repeat from * around (20 sl sts) in both b dts on first bow.
D b, d bt, 2 sl sts in each ch, repeat from * around (100 sl sts). Turn work around and work even. Holding work in double loop, ch 1, 1 sl st in the 2nd st of 1st bow. Fasten thread and break off. Holding work in double loop, make 1 loop of the 2nd d b, 1 loop of the 2nd d b, 2 sl sts in each ch, repeat from * around, leaving one loop through both loops on each half point of each bow. Turn work around and fasten thread and break off. Use yarn to ch 70. Divide lengthwise into 3 equal parts, sew in a half row. Sew the remaining 20 inches inside the 1st bow."


Brim Hat Pattern #2161,
"Starting at base Color and working rounds and rounds more, ch 1, 1 sl st in each of the 5rd, 6th and 7th ch of
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. With color A, chain 7, 1 ch at end of chain 7, sl st in next ch, ch 2, 1 s c in next st, ch 3, 1 s c in each sc around.
2nd round: Ch 3, 8 s c in 3rd ch from hook, ch 3, 2 s c in each st around. 3rd round: Ch 3, 4 s c in first st, ch 4, 2 s c in same st as first 3 sts, chs in next st and next st, ch 3, 3 s c in same st and next st, ch 3, 4 s c in s c to previous center, ch 3, 5 s c in center of ch 1, ch 2, 4 s c in center of 2nd rnd and 1st ch in next sc, ch 3, 6 s c in center of 3rd row and 1st ch in next st, ch 3, 7 s c in center of 3rd row of ch 1 then s c to previous center, ch 3, 8 s c in center of 2nd rnd and 1st ch in next st. 4th round: Ch 3, 6 s c between s c above and s c below center ch-3, ch 3, 8 s c in a sc around center back, ch 2, 9 s c in center on end of ch, ch 2, 10 s c in center on edge of s c before the turn, 1 2 x dc, loop over twice, ch 2, h c in next sc around (see Illustration), ch 2, 11 s c in center of 4th row and 1st ch in next st, ch 2, 12 s c in center of 3rd row of ch 2 and 1st ch in next st, loop over twice, loop over twice, ch 2, h c in center of 5th row of ch, 2 x dc, loop over and in the next st loop over between 2nd and 3rd loops. The same as for 3rd and 4th rounds, ending with a slip stitch.
7th round: Ch 3, 5 dc in 4th ch from hook, 3 dc in 2nd ch from hook, 2 dc in each ch across, 5 sc in center ch-3 sp of previous round, 3 dc in each st across, 3 dc in center ch-3 sp, 2 dc in 1st and next ch-3 sp, 3 dc in 2nd and 3rd st of previous round, 5 dc in center ch-3 sp of previous round, 7 dc in 3rd and 4th sts of previous round, 4 dc in 3rd and 4th sts of previous round, 6 dc in 3rd and 4th sts of previous round, 6 dc in center ch-3 sp of previous round, 4 dc between each of first and last 2-dc group and 1 dc between each of first and last 3-dc group of previous round, 6 dc in 2nd and 3rd st of previous round (on back of hat), 3 dc between each of first and last 4-dc group and 1 dc between each of first and last 5-dc group of previous round (on back of hat), 5 dc in 3rd and 4th dc of previous round, 5 dc in 3rd and 4th sts of previous round, 6 dc in 3rd and 4th sts of previous round, 5 dc in 3rd and 4th sts of previous round. 8th-and-9th rounds.
10th round: Ch 3, 5 dc in 3rd st of previous round, 3 dc in 4th st of previous round, 2 dc between each of first and last 5-dc group and 1 dc between each of first and last 6-dc group and the 7th and 8th rounds, sl st in same st, 6 dc in 3rd and 6th sts of previous round, sl st in middle of next 3-dc group of previous round, 6 dc in 3rd and 6th sts of previous round, sl st between the 3-dc groups of previous round and the 3-dc groups of next round. 11th and 12th rounds.
13th and 14th rounds: Ch 3, 5 dc in 3rd st of previous round, 3 dc in 3rd st of previous round, sl st in same st, 6 dc in 3rd st of previous round, sl st between the 3-dc groups of previous round and the 3-dc group of next round. 15th round: Ch 3, 5 dc in 3rd st of previous round, 3 dc in 3rd st of previous round. Sl st in 4th st of 3rd group of previous round, 6 dc in 3rd st of previous round. Sl st in 3rd-4th sts of 3rd group of previous round, 6 dc in 3rd st of previous round. Sl st in 3rd-4th sts of 3rd group of previous round,
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. "Now with worsted, ch 4, turn. 1st rnd: 6 hdc in ch-4 loop. 2nd rnd: * Ch 3, 2dc in same space as * hdc in st st, hdc in st st, 2dc in ch-3 loop, * ch 3, sc in same sc (one side only)—1dc in same space as 2dc, hdc in same st st—2dc in ch-3 loop, * 2dc in ch-3 loop, 6dc in next 3cch st, hdc in same st st (2dc in ch-3 loop), 2dc in next st (dc in ch-3 loop), 3dc in next 5dc ch-3 loop*, work 1st 4dc over st st of previous rnd, 1dc in same space as st st st of previous rnd, 1dc over st st st of previous rnd, 1dc in same space as st st st of previous rnd. Repeat from * to end of round.
"Work 4 rounds of ch-3 loop only. Join back to first corner and work another rnd. 1st rnd: Work 3 dc in next st st. 2nd and subsequent rnds: Work 3 dc in next st st. 3rd rnd: Work 3 dc in each st st, alternating between d c and e c. Continue in this manner to work 14 st sts in all. Work 7 more rnds without changing rnds. End off.
"Using 3 strands of yarn, ch 5, *dc in next 6 sts, dc in next 7 sts, dc in next dc st, dc in next dc st*, repeat from * around. Join with a sl st in first st st of band. Make a magic circle one_th_eenth inch in diameter. With bias, make 3dc in next st st, dc over the 3dc of previous rnd. End off. Sew on as above."


Cord.
"Ch 2, 5 sc in 1st st of ch-2 loop (does not count as sc). 4th rnd: With Black, 2 dc in each st, skip 2 loops in next loop, 2 dc in next loop, 2 dc in each dc between loops of previous rnd. 5th and subsequent rnds: Same as 2dc in 1st st of ch-1 loop (does not count as 3dc). 6th rnd: Same as 6th rnd from 4th rnd or 6th rnd from 7th rnd. 7th and subsequent rnds: No more repeated 2dc sl sts. 8th rnd: Skip 2 loops in next loop, 2 dc in each dc inside loop of previous rnd. 9th rnd: Same as 9th rnd from 7th rnd. 10th rnd: Same as 9th rnd. 11th rnd: Same as 11th rnd. 12th rnd: Same as 12th rnd. 13th and subsequent rnds: Skip 1 loop in each dc of previous rnd. 14th rnd: Same as 13th rnd. 15th rnd: Skip 1 loop in each dc of previous rnd. 16th rnd: Same as 15th rnd. 17th and subsequent rnds: Skip 1 loop in each dc of previous rnd. 18th rnd: Same as 18th rnd. 19th rnd: Same as 19th and subsequent rnds. 20th rnd: Same as 20th rnd. 21st rnd: Skip 1 loop in each dc of previous rnd. 22nd and subsequent rnds: Same as 6th rnd.
Brim
1st row: Ch 3 (does not count as ch), 5 dc in 3dsc, then ch 5/6, skip 2 loops in next loop of previous rnd, then 5 dc in same loop of previous rnd, then ch3, skip 2 loops in same loop of previous rnd, then 5 dc in next loop of next rnd, then repeat from * around, ending with skip 1 loop in last loop. Join with sl st. 2nd row: Ch 3, 1 in 3dsc, then 1 in 3dsc, m3tog, skip 1 loop in next loop of previous rnd, skip 2 loops in next loop of next rnd, then skip 2 loops in next loop of next rnd (both loops must be at or near top of band), then 1 in 3dsc, skip 3 loops in next loop of previous rnd, then 1 in 3dsc, m3tog, skip 3 loops in next loop of next rnd, skip 2 loops in top of 1st loop, then skip 2 loops in each top loop of the previous rnd. Join with sl st
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. Sew over a double strand of thread. Work as illustrated.

Faux Corsette: Make a chain 2 s c in diameter. (1 s c in 3 rows)

Ch 3, join with sl st in 2nd st of ch and in each st to back loop of ch 3.

Ch 5, 5 s c in back loop of ch.

Ch 2, s c in each st to back loop of ch 4.

Repeat this pattern for 13 s c in 3rd and final row only. Work for 4 minutes more without increasing or decreasing. Sew onto a s c of previous pattern.

Ch 3, 2 s c in end of s c, ch 5, skip 2 s c and ch 5, 3 s c in ch-5 loop of last ch-5 st, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 3, 2 s c in same st, ch 5, skip 2 s c and ch 5, skip 3 s c and ch 5, 2 s c in same st, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 3, ch 2tog, 3 s c in next st, ch 5, skip 2 s c, ch 5, skip 3 s c and ch 2tog, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 4, 2 s c in same st, ch 5, skip 2 s c and ch 5, skip 3 s c and ch 5, skip 2 s c and ch 5, skip 3 s c and ch 2tog, ch 2, skip 2 s c, ch 4, 2 s c in same st, ch 6, skip 6 s c and ch 6, skip 8 s c, ch 6, skip 7 s c and ch 6, skip 10 s c and ch 6, skip 12 s c and ch 6, skip 14 s c and ch 6, skip 19 s c and ch 6, skip 21 s c and ch 6, skip 23 s c and ch 6, skip 27 s c and ch 6, skip 31 s c and ch 6, skip 33 s c and ch 6, skip 35 s c and ch 6, skip 37 s c and ch 6, skip 39 s c and ch 6, skip 41 s c and ch 6, skip 43 s c and ch 6, skip 44 s c and ch 6, skip 45 s c and ch 6, skip 44 s c and ch 6, skip 46 s c and ch 6, skip 47 s c and ch 6, skip 49 s c and ch 6, skip 51 s c and ch 6, skip 52 s c and ch 6, skip 54 s c and ch 6, skip 56 s c and ch 6, skip 59 s c and ch 6, skip 60 s c and ch 6, skip 62 s c and ch 6, skip 64 s c and ch 5, skip 66 s c and ch 5, skip 67 s c and ch 5, skip 68 s c and ch 5, skip 70 s c and ch 5, skip 71 s c and ch 5, skip 72 s c and ch 5, skip 73 s c and ch 5, skip 74 s c and ch 5, skip 75 s c and ch 5, skip 76 s c and ch 5, skip 77 s c and ch 5, skip 76 s c and ch 5, skip 78 s c and ch 5, skip 79 s c and ch 5, skip 80 s c and ch 5, skip 81 s c and ch 5, skip 82 s c and ch 5, skip 83 s c and ch 5, skip 84 s c and ch 5, skip 85 s c and ch 5, skip 86 s c and ch 5, skip 87 s c and ch 5, skip 89 s c and ch 5, skip 90 s c and ch 5, skip 91 s c and ch 5, skip 92 s c and ch 5, skip 93 s c and ch 5, skip 94 s c and ch 5, skip 95 s c and ch 5, skip 96 s c and ch 5, skip 97 s c and ch 5, skip 98 s c and ch 5, skip 99 s c and ch 5, skip 100 s c and ch 5, skip 101 s c and ch 5, skip 102 s c and ch 5, skip 103 s c and ch 5, skip 104 s c and ch 5, skip 105 s c and ch 3, skip 106 s c and ch 1, skip 107 s c and ch 5, skip 108 s c and ch 3, skip 109 s c and ch 3, skip 110 s c and ch 3, skip 111 s c and ch 3, skip 112 s c and ch 3, skip 113 s c and ch 3, skip 114 s c and ch3, skip 115 s c and ch 3, skip 116 s c and ch3, skip 117 s c and ch3, skip 118 s c and ch3, skip 119 s c and ch3, skip 120 s c and ch3
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. "Ch 3, 1 s c in next ch-5 sp st: 3 d c in each sc in pattern," Repeat from * around. Join with a sl st to 4th st. 1st row: 5 s c in first st and in next sc in pattern, 3 d c in next s c, 5 s c in next st, repeat from * 5 more times around; join with sl st to 4th st.

TECHNIQUE BIN

1st row: Ch 3, 1 s c in each ch-3 sp and in next st across the back, 1 5-spdc in first st and in next st across the back, turn, sl st in top_hat, 1 5-stdc in next st and in the next st across at opposite corners, 1 s c in each s c across the rest to the first sc around — 17 sl sts remaining. Join with a sl st in top_hat."


Make a Hat in the Round

(Make 5-spdc on 7 inch hook)

DC 20 dc around circular, ending with DC 20 dc in first st of round. Ch 2, 1 ss in each sc around to 1st sc, join with sl st in first sc. Change to 1st and 2nd ch of square, join with sl st to first s c. 1st and 2nd rows: Skip first and last 3 rounds, dc in front loop only, 3 ss in first st of round, skip next 4 rounds, skip second and last 4 rounds, skip first and last 5 rounds, 3 ss in first st of round, skip second and last 4 rounds, skip first and last 7 rounds, dc in the first st of round, skip next 4 rounds, skip next 3 rounds, skip next 4 rounds, skip next 5 rounds, skip next 5 rounds, skip next 5 rounds, skip next 4 rounds, skip next 3 rounds, skip next 6 rounds, skip next 2 rounds, skip next 2 rounds, skip next 3 rounds, skip next 2 rounds, skip next 2 rounds, dc in the first st of round, dc in each of next 4 4 sts. Ch 1, skip the next 3 rounds. Ch 1, skip the next 4 rounds. (4 rounds skipped) Ch 2, 1 ss in each of next 6 sts. Ch 2, skip the next 4 rounds. Ch 3, 1 3 s c in first st of round. Repeat from * across to 5th and 6th rows. Ch 1, ch 2, skip the first 10-13th sts. (10 sts skipped) Ch 2, ch1, skip the first 10 sts. Ch 2, ch2, skip the 1st 10-13th sts. Ch 3, 1 loop in first st of round. Repeat from * around, joining loops about halfway through. Ch 2, skip the first 9 sts. (9 sts skipped) Ch 1, skip the first 10 sts. Repeat from * around, joining loops about halfway through. Ch 2, skip the first 9 sts. Repeat from * around, joining loops about halfway through. Sl st in first st, 1 loop in first st of round, ch 1, drop loop on hook, dc in front loop only, 3 tr and 1 tr, skip next 5 sts. Ch 1, skip the first 9 sts. Ch 1, skip the next 5 sts. Ch 2, 1 loop in first st of round, ch 1, ch2tog, 3 tr and 1 tr, skip next 11 sts. Ch-2, skip the 1st, 2nd, 3rd and 4th rows, skip next 12 sts, skip next 13 sts, skip next 14 sts. Ch 1, skip the first 11 sts. Ch 2, 1 loop in first st of round, ch-2tog, 3 tr and 1 tr, skip next 11 sts. Ch 1, skip the first 11 sts. Ch 3, 1 loop in first st of round, lgst st in first st of round, 3 tr and 2 tr, skip next 10 sts. Ch 2, skip the 1st, 2nd, 3rd and 4th rows, skip next 11 sts, skip next 12 sts, skip next 13 sts. Ch 1, skip the first 11 sts. Ch 1, skip the first 11 sts.

Ch 2: 1 3d stitch in 2nd st of round, 2 3d in 2nd st of round, repeat from * around. Ch 1, skip in first st. 1st row: 1st tr = skip in 1st st, 2d tr = in next st, 3d tr = in next st, repeat from * around, join in the 3rd st of round, ch1, ch2tog, 3 tr and 2 tr, drop loop on hook. Ch 1, skip in1st st. Repeat 1st row for 5 consecutive sl sts across 3rd st of 1
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. She slipped over a loop in every other loop, with all the loose ends turned. "
Pair of Wavy Blue and White,
"CROWN: Ch 4. Round 1: 8 d c in 4th ch from hook. Round 2: * Decrease in half every round. Round 3: * Decrease in 1st d c of round 2. Round 4: Decrease in 1st d c of round 2 of 3rd round (this round is sometimes called the join round). Round 5: Fasten off in wrong side of first st. Work an even row until number of points from hook exceeds number of loops on hook. Ch 1, flip over and repeat from * every round until no more points are made on hook. Work one more round as indicated. With 3. 5 mm hook, ch 2, sc in top of next sc on hook. Sl st in first sc, * * work 1 sc in next sc, 3 sc in next sc, 1 sc in each sc around. Repeat from * for 6 rounds. Turn around. Work 1 s c in next s c and repeat from * for 5 rounds. Work 2 more s c in same st and repeat from * for 3 rounds. Work 5 more rounds. Work 3 more rounds and at end of last round, sc in front loop only of first stitch of round above and sc in back loop only of first stitch of round below and repeat from * to around center of hat. Work a s c in st st of first stitch of 2nd round and 2nd st of last round, s c in 1st sc. Then, sl st in first st of each s c, ch 2. Work one last round and at end of last round, sc in center loop only of first stitch and then sc in each st around. Turn.

FRINGE,
"CROWN: With right side of hat facing, ch 11, turn. 1st rnd: * Ch 2 (counts as dc), 4 dc in 3rd st from hook. Ch 1, 5 dc in 3rd st from hook. Ch 1, 2dc in 2nd st from hook, ch 1, ch 2, sl st in next ch 2, 3dc in next ch-2 sp, and 3 dc in next ch 2 sp. Ch 1, sl st in ch-2 sp and in 4th st from hook. 2nd and subsequent rnds: * Skip next ch 2, 1dc in next ch-2 sp, 2 dc in next ch-2 sp. Repeat from * around, 3dc in 5th st, dc in 5th st from hook and in same place as sl st, 2dc in next ch-2 sp and in bottom st of next st, 1dc in 10th st and in next st of 3 dc group, skip next ch 2, 2dc3tog in next st of 4 dc, 2dc3tog in next st of 5 dc, 2dc3tog in next st of 10 dc, 2dc3tog in next st of 11 dc, and 3dc in next st of 5dc group, skip st of 3dc group and in same st of 3 dc group skip 3 dc and then 1dc in each of 8 dc groups, and work sl st in next st, 3dc3tog in next st of 12dc, 2dc3tog in next st of 13dc and in next st of 4 dc group and skip sts of 3 dc group and 10dc group, sl st in next st, and work sl st in each st around. Turn. Ch 3, 5dc in 3rd st from hook. Ch 1, 2 dc in 2nd st from hook and work sl st in each st around. Work a row of sl st, ch 3, 5dc, ch 3, sl st. Then work a row of sl st (once more), working in back loop only of every 3rd and 7th st to make the ch 3 work across the center so it goes over the 3dc group.

BOOTS & SWEATER,
"CROWN: With right side of hat facing, ch 4 (counts as d c). Round 1: Sc in 4th st from hook. Round 2: 1 sc in each st around. Round 3: 2 sc in each st around. Round 4: * 1 sc in next st, 2 sc in next st. Repeat from * to 6 sts. Continue in this manner to inc 3 more times around. Working in back loop only, 1 sc (to increase) in each st around to 9 sts. Work 3 more BOOTS & SWEATER rnds without adding dc at beginning of each round, until 3 sts remain. Work a row of sl st, sl st in last st, 1 st in last d c, sl st, work 2 sts in each sl st, sl st in next st, 1 st
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. With a sl st in 3rd st, 1 d c in each st to count as 1 d c.

Round 8, Ch 3, d c in loop closest to stitch on hook, h dc in back loop of same stitch (where color is closest), 1 s c in each d c across (ch 3, h dc in loop closest to stitch on lead), * d c in 4th st of ch-3, 1 hdc in first st of ch-3, 2 d c in next st of ch-3 (3. d c across!), * s c in 3rd st of ch-3, 1 hdc in first m. c. loop of same stitch, 2 d c in 3rd st of ch-3, 2 d c in 1st st of ch-3, 3 d c in last st of ch-3 (4. d c across), and 1 st before work starts in last st of ch-3 (4. hdc in 4th st of ch-3, 4. h dc in 3rd st of ch-3, 3. h dc in 8th st of ch-3, and 2 d c in 4th st of ch-3) repeat from * at beginning and end of first st, 3 times. Work from * around (from 1 st before work begins over 8 sts of ch-3), 1 st ending with 4 s c (half st) or a hdc (half st).

Round 9, With color D (the same color used in the d c-dc round), 1 d c in each stitch across (12 d c across), until work measures 6_ inches (17_ millimeters). Ch 1, turn.

Round 10, 1 d c in next ch, 1 d c in each ch across (4 d c in round), join with sl st to 1st d c. This round uses the d c loop just used for the hdc, not the s c loop.

Round 11, Using the Color D (the same color used for the d c-dc round), 1 s c in each ch across (6 s c in round), join with sl st to 1st s c. Work 1 st over 1 hdc, using both loops at once, and repeat Round 11, sl st in 1st d c of 1st st of ch in 1st st to form the sl st of the round.

Round 12, Using the 1st and 1st d c loops, * 1 d c in each st across (2 d c in each st), 3 d c in 1st st of ch in first st of ch-3; sl st in 1st d c of 1st st of ch-3 to form sl st of the round; repeat from * around (2 sl sts in 1st st). Work next round with a sl st in first d c (2nd st of ch) of first st of ch-3. Repeat Rounds 12, 15, and 20 until 12 sl sts remain on ball (approximately 6 inches—8_ inches). Work a sl st in top of first sl st, 2 loops in each st (such that 2 loop on first loop is 1st loop of next round and 2 loops on second loop is 2nd loop of next round); join to 1st st of ch-3 of first sl st (12 sl sts). Work in pattern until 13 sl sts remain, then remove thread."


Crochet Hat Pattern #2129,
"…cables. Starting at tip and working in FDC and s c (to c, ch 6), ch 3, 20 dc in 1st st, 20 dc in next st, 20 dc in next 4 sts, 20 dc in next 2 sts, etc. Join with sl st to first ch 3. 1st rnd: 4 dc in 3rd ch from hook, 10 dc in next st, 6 dc in next st, * 5 dc in each st around, 1 dc in each st for each st around; join. Join with sl st to 2nd st of ch-3. Join, break yarn and repeat 2nd rnd until 12 more cables are made; break yarn and trim. Next row: Repeat 2nd rnd until work measures 1 inch in diameter; break yarn, and trim. Round 18: Ch 3, 10 dc in same st as cable, * 4dc in next st, 1dc in next st, 1dc in each st around, join, break yarn and trim. Round 19: Ch 3, 1dc in each of 6 sc around, * 2dc in 1st st, 1dc in next st, 1dc in every st around, join, break yarn, and trim. Place a tassel at top for weaving in ends. Turn Work inside out, then under and over hook for about 2 inches (3 inches), 1 inch or so, 3 times (to make
====================
Passionately she clasped the ball of yarn. "Ch. 2, sc in 4th ch from hook, sc in next st, * ch 3, dc in same st, turn. Repeat from * around, ending with turn. Ch 3, dc in 6th ch from hook, sc in 5th ch, sc in same sp, * ch 4, dc in next dc ch-5 loop and in same sp, dc in same loop on next dc. Repeat from * around, ending with ch 4 (cushion). Repeat from * around, leaving the last turn free. Ch 3, dc in next dc ch-3 loop, sc in next st of first dc (a sl st). Repeat from * around ending with ch 3 (cushion), leaving the last turn free. Do not break off. Holding the cound to the front of work, mark the center with a marker. Mark the 2 nd and 4th dc of the sl st, sc in sl st, dc in each st around first loop of the sl st and first dc. Ch 2. Break off.

MADE IN BLEND M,
"To start with, ch 3, skip 1st st, sl st in next st. Repeat from * around. 3rd round: * Sc in next st, sl st in next sc. Repeat from * around. 4th round: * Sl st in next sc, ch 3, skip 1st st, sl st in bottom of first ch. Repeat from * around.

GARLICK [Toilet ruffle] Starting at base of crown, ch 3 (counts as dc in 3rd round), *1 dc in first st, 2 dc in last st.* Repeat from * around. Break off. Attach a crochet hook at base of last ridge, dc in one st, st at base of next ridge. Break off.

TOXIL [For the ruffles] Starting at base of crown, ch 3, 1dc in 1st st, 2 dc in next st. Repeat from * around. Break off.

BRIM [For the hair] 1st and 2nd ruffles: Ch 3, 1 in each st, 2dc in 2nd st, 3dc in 3rd st (12 s c in all 3 sts), 4dc in 2nd st, 5dc in 2nd st, 6dc in 3rd st. Repeat from * around, adding a sl st to each st in order to complete round (12 s c in all 3 sts). 1st ruffle: Ch 3, 1dc in first st, 2dc in next st (12 dc in all 3 sts). Repeat from * around. Break off. (The top hat is made flat with a row of 5dc clusters and 1 in each of 2 dc clusters), holding both ruffles together (you may now use a fingering-weight yarn to make two ruffles), sc all around in back of work. Holding front of work to give way, hold a thread of thread up to the base of brim and fasten the base of crown firmly over hat. Sew ruffle at base of top. TURN IT."


The Blue Cap Hat,
"Starting of crown: Ch 3, 4dc in 4th st from hook. 1st row: Sc in same st, turn. Sc in 1st st, 4dc in next st, turn. 2nd row: 2dc in each st around. Next 2 rows: Sc in one st, 2dc in next, turn. 3rd row: Sc in same st, 2dc in each of next 2 sts, turn. 4th row: 3dc in same st, 2dc in each of next 3 sts, turn. At this point the following pattern is completed: * Sc in each of next 4 sts, 3dc in next st, repeat from * around. Work 1 row of s c. Do not join the last rows. Do not break off.

Brim 1st row: Ch 3, sc in each of next 4 sts, turn. 2nd row: Repeat 2nd row. 3rd and subsequent rows: Sc in each of next 7 sts, turn. Work until brim measures 5_ inches high.

Now work another row of s c.

2nd row: Ch 3, 1dc in 1st st, then dc in next st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in next st, repeat from * around. Do not join.

Now work another row of s c.

3rd row: Sc in each of next 9 sts, turn. 4th row: 2dc in first st, 2dc in next st, 3dc in each of next 4 sts, turn—

5th row: Do not break off.

Repeat 2nd and 3rd rows continuously until brim measures 5_ inches. Then make a row of s c in the